UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
(Mark One)
☒ ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the ﬁscal year ended December 31, 2022 or
☐TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from________to________
Commission
File NumberRegistrant, State of Incorporation or Organization, Address of Principal Executive
Oﬃces, Zip Code and Telephone NumberIRS Employer
Identiﬁcation No.
1-32853 DUKE ENERG Y CORPORA TION 20-2777218
(a Delaware corporation)
526 South Church Street
Charlotte, North Carolina 28202-1803
704-382-3853
1-4928 DUKE ENERG Y CAROLINAS, LLC 56-0205520
(a North Carolina limited liability company)
526 South Church Street
Charlotte, North Carolina 28202-1803
704-382-3853
1-15929 PROGRES S ENERG Y, INC. 56-2155481
(a North Carolina corporation)
410 South Wilmington Street
Raleigh, North Carolina 27601-1748
704-382-3853
1-3382 DUKE ENERG Y PROGRES S, LLC 56-0165465
(a North Carolina limited liability company)
410 South Wilmington Street
Raleigh, North Carolina 27601-1748
704-382-3853
1-3274 DUKE ENERG Y FLORIDA , LLC 59-0247770
(a Florida limited liability company)
299 First Avenue North
St. Petersburg, Florida 33701
704-382-3853
1-1232 DUKE ENERG Y OHIO , INC. 31-0240030
(an Ohio corporation)
139 East Fourth Street
Cincinnati, Ohio 45202
704-382-3853
1-3543 DUKE ENERG Y INDIANA , LLC 35-0594457
(an Indiana limited liability company)
1000 East Main Street
Plainﬁeld, Indiana 46168
704-382-3853
1-6196 PIEDMONT NA TURAL GAS COMP ANY, INC. 56-0556998
(a North Carolina corporation)
4720 Piedmont Row Drive
Charlotte, North Carolina 28210
704-364-3120
SECURITIES REGISTERED PURSUANT TO SECTION 12(b) OF THE ACT:
Name of each exchange on
Registrant    Title of each class        Trading symbols    which registered
Duke Energy Corporation    Common Stock, $0.001 par value         DUK    New York Stock Exchange LLC
(Duke Energy)
Duke Energy    5.625% Junior Subordinated Debentures due         DUKB    New York Stock Exchange LLC
September 15, 2078
Duke Energy    Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th         DUK PR A    New York Stock Exchange LLC
interest in a share of 5.75% Series A Cumulative
Redeemable Perpetual Preferred Stock, par value
$0.001 per share
Duke Energy        3.10% Senior Notes due 2028             DUK 28A        New York Stock Exchange LLC
Duke Energy        3.85% Senior Notes due 2034             DUK 34        New York Stock Exchange LLC
SECURITIES REGISTERED PURSUANT TO SECTION 12(g) OF THE ACT:  None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as deﬁned in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.
Duke Energy Yes☒ No☐ Duke Energy Florida, LLC (Duke Energy Florida) Yes☒ No☐
Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC (Duke Energy Carolinas) Yes☒ No☐ Duke Energy Ohio, Inc. (Duke Energy Ohio) Yes☒ No☐
Progress Energy, Inc. (Progress Energy) Yes☐ No☒ Duke Energy Indiana, LLC (Duke Energy Indiana) Yes☒ No☐
Duke Energy Progress, LLC (Duke Energy Progress) Yes☒ No☐ Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc. (Piedmont) Yes☒ No☐
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to ﬁle reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Exchange Act. Yes ☐ No ☒ (Response
applicable to all registrants.)
Indicate by check mark whether the registrants (1) have ﬁled all reports required to be ﬁled by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to ﬁle such reports), and (2) has been subject to such ﬁling
requirements for the past 90 days. Yes ☒ No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrants have submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of
Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit such ﬁles).
Yes ☒ No ¨
Indicate by check mark whether Duke Energy is a large accelerated ﬁler, an accelerated ﬁler, a non-accelerated ﬁler, a smaller reporting company, or an
emerging growth company. See the deﬁnitions of “large accelerated ﬁler,” “accelerated ﬁler,” “smaller reporting company,” and "emerging growth company"
in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.:
Large Accelerated Filer ☒ Accelerated Filer ¨ Non-accelerated Filer ☐ Smaller Reporting Company ☐ Emerging Growth Company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or
revised ﬁnancial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether each of Duke Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida, Duke Energy Ohio, Duke
Energy Indiana and Piedmont is a large accelerated ﬁler, accelerated ﬁler, non-accelerated ﬁler, smaller reporting company, or emerging growth company.
See the deﬁnitions of “large accelerated ﬁler,” “accelerated ﬁler,” “smaller reporting company,” and "emerging growth company" in Rule 12b-2 of the
Exchange Act.:
Large Accelerated Filer ¨ Accelerated Filer ¨ Non-accelerated Filer ☒ Smaller Reporting Company ☐ Emerging Growth Company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or
revised ﬁnancial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has ﬁled a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of the eﬀectiveness of its internal
control over ﬁnancial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public accounting ﬁrm that prepared or
issued its audit report. ☒
If securities are registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act, indicate by check mark whether the ﬁnancial statements of the registrant included in the
ﬁling reﬂect the correction of an error to previously issued ﬁnancial statements. ¨
Indicate by check mark whether any of those error corrections are restatements that required a recovery analysis of incentive-based compensation
received by any of the registrant’s executive oﬃcers during the relevant recovery period pursuant to §240.10D-1(b). ¨
Indicate by check mark whether each of the registrants is a shell company (as deﬁned in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act). Yes ☐ No x
Estimated aggregate market value of the common equity held by nonaﬃliates of Duke Energy at June 30, 2022. $ 82,471,565 
Number of shares of Common Stock, $0.001 par value, outstanding at January 31, 2023. 770,080,285 
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
Portions of the Duke Energy deﬁnitive proxy statement for the 2023 Annual Meeting of the Shareholders or an amendment to this Annual Report are
incorporated by reference into PART III, Items 10, 11 and 13 hereof.
This combined Form 10-K is ﬁled separately by eight registrants: Duke Energy, Duke Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy
Florida, Duke Energy Ohio, Duke Energy Indiana and Piedmont (collectively the Duke Energy Registrants). Information contained herein relating to any
individual registrant is ﬁled by such registrant solely on its own behalf. Each registrant makes no representation as to information relating exclusively to the
other registrants.
Duke Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida, Duke Energy Ohio, Duke Energy Indiana and Piedmont meet the
conditions set forth in General Instructions I(1)(a) and (b) of Form 10-K and are, therefore, ﬁling this Form 10-K with the reduced disclosure format speciﬁed
in General Instructions I(2) of Form 10-K. 
Auditor Firm ID: 34      Auditor Name: Deloitte & Touche LLP Auditor Location: Charlotte, NC
TABLE OF CONTENTS
TABLE OF CONTENTS
FORM 10-K FOR THE YEAR ENDED December 31, 2022
 Item  Page
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT REGARDING FORWARD-LOOKING INFORMATION  
GLOSSARY OF TERMS  
PART I.  
1. BUSINESS 9
DUKE ENERGY 9
GENERAL 9
BUSINESS SEGMENTS 9
HUMAN CAPITAL MANAGEMENT 19
EXECUTIVE OFFICERS 21
ENVIRONMENTAL MATTERS 22
DUKE ENERGY CAROLINAS 22
PROGRESS ENERGY 22
DUKE ENERGY PROGRESS 22
DUKE ENERGY FLORIDA 23
DUKE ENERGY OHIO 23
DUKE ENERGY INDIANA 23
PIEDMONT 23
1A. RISK FACTORS 23
1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS 32
2. PROPERTIES 33
3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS 36
4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES 36
PART II.  
5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES 37
6. SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA 37
7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS 38
7A. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK 67
8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA 68
9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE 224
9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES 224
PART III.  
10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE 226
11. EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION 226
12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS 226
13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE 226
14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTING FEES AND SERVICES 227
PART IV.  
15. EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES 228
  EXHIBIT INDEX E-1
  SIGNATURES E-2
FORWARD LOOKING STATEMENTS
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT REGARDING FORWARD-LOOKING INFORMATION
This document includes forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933 and Section 21E of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934. Forward-looking statements are based on management’s beliefs and assumptions and can often be identiﬁed by terms and phrases
that include “anticipate,” “believe,” “intend,” “estimate,” “expect,” “continue,” “should,” “could,” “may,” “plan,” “project,” “predict,” “will,” “potential,”
“forecast,” “target,” “guidance,” “outlook” or other similar terminology. Various factors may cause actual results to be materially diﬀerent than the
suggested outcomes within forward-looking statements; accordingly, there is no assurance that such results will be realized. These factors include, but are
not limited to:
◦ The ability to implement our business strategy, including our carbon emission reduction goals;
◦ State, federal and foreign legislative and regulatory initiatives, including costs of compliance with existing and future environmental requirements,
including those related to climate change, as well as rulings that aﬀect cost and investment recovery or have an impact on rate structures or market
prices;
◦ The extent and timing of costs and liabilities to comply with federal and state laws, regulations and legal requirements related to coal ash remediation,
including amounts for required closure of certain ash impoundments, are uncertain and diﬃcult to estimate;
◦ The ability to recover eligible costs, including amounts associated with coal ash impoundment retirement obligations, asset retirement and construction
costs related to carbon emissions reductions, and costs related to signiﬁcant weather events, and to earn an adequate return on investment through
rate case proceedings and the regulatory process;
◦ The costs of decommissioning nuclear facilities could prove to be more extensive than amounts estimated and all costs may not be fully recoverable
through the regulatory process;
◦ The impact of extraordinary external events, such as the pandemic health event resulting from COVID-19, and their collateral consequences, including
the disruption of global supply chains or the economic activity in our service territories;
◦ Costs and eﬀects of legal and administrative proceedings, settlements, investigations and claims;
◦ Industrial, commercial and residential growth or decline in service territories or customer bases resulting from sustained downturns of the economy,
reduced customer usage due to cost pressures from inﬂation or fuel costs, and the economic health of our service territories or variations in customer
usage patterns, including energy eﬃciency eﬀorts, natural gas building and appliance electriﬁcation, and use of alternative energy sources, such as self-
generation and distributed generation technologies;
◦ Federal and state regulations, laws and other eﬀorts designed to promote and expand the use of energy eﬃciency measures, natural gas electriﬁcation,
and distributed generation technologies, such as private solar and battery storage, in Duke Energy service territories could result in a reduced number of
customers, excess generation resources as well as stranded costs;
◦ Advancements in technology;
◦ Additional competition in electric and natural gas markets and continued industry consolidation;
◦ The inﬂuence of weather and other natural phenomena on operations, including the economic, operational and other eﬀects of severe storms,
hurricanes, droughts, earthquakes and tornadoes, including extreme weather associated with climate change;
◦ Changing investor, customer and other stakeholder expectations and demands including heightened emphasis on environmental, social and governance
concerns and costs related thereto;
◦ The ability to successfully operate electric generating facilities and deliver electricity to customers including direct or indirect eﬀects to the company
resulting from an incident that aﬀects the United States electric grid or generating resources;
◦ Operational interruptions to our natural gas distribution and transmission activities;
◦ The availability of adequate interstate pipeline transportation capacity and natural gas supply;
◦ The impact on facilities and business from a terrorist or other attack, war, vandalism, cybersecurity threats, data security breaches, operational events,
information technology failures or other catastrophic events, such as ﬁres, explosions, pandemic health events or other similar occurrences;
◦ The inherent risks associated with the operation of nuclear facilities, including environmental, health, safety, regulatory and ﬁnancial risks, including the
ﬁnancial stability of third-party service providers;
◦ The timing and extent of changes in commodity prices and interest rates and the ability to recover such costs through the regulatory process, where
appropriate, and their impact on liquidity positions and the value of underlying assets;
◦ The results of ﬁnancing eﬀorts, including the ability to obtain ﬁnancing on favorable terms, which can be aﬀected by various factors, including credit
ratings, interest rate ﬂuctuations, compliance with debt covenants and conditions, an individual utility’s generation mix, and general market and
economic conditions;
◦ Credit ratings of the Duke Energy Registrants may be diﬀerent from what is expected;
◦ Declines in the market prices of equity and ﬁxed-income securities and resultant cash funding requirements for deﬁned beneﬁt pension plans, other
post-retirement beneﬁt plans and nuclear decommissioning trust funds;
FORWARD LOOKING STATEMENTS
◦ Construction and development risks associated with the completion of the Duke Energy Registrants’ capital investment projects, including risks related
to ﬁnancing, timing and receipt of necessary regulatory approvals, obtaining and complying with terms of permits, meeting construction budgets and
schedules and satisfying operating and environmental performance standards, as well as the ability to recover costs from customers in a timely manner,
or at all;
◦ Changes in rules for regional transmission organizations, including changes in rate designs and new and evolving capacity markets, and risks related to
obligations created by the default of other participants;
◦ The ability to control operation and maintenance costs;
◦ The level of creditworthiness of counterparties to transactions;
◦ The ability to obtain adequate insurance at acceptable costs;
◦ Employee workforce factors, including the potential inability to attract and retain key personnel;
◦ The ability of subsidiaries to pay dividends or distributions to Duke Energy Corporation holding company (the Parent);
◦ The performance of projects undertaken by our nonregulated businesses and the success of eﬀorts to invest in and develop new opportunities, as well
as the successful sale of the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups;
◦ The eﬀect of accounting and reporting pronouncements issued periodically by accounting standard-setting bodies and the SEC;
◦ The impact of United States tax legislation to our ﬁnancial condition, results of operations or cash ﬂows and our credit ratings;
◦ The impacts from potential impairments of goodwill or equity method investment carrying values;
◦ Asset or business acquisitions and dispositions may not yield the anticipated beneﬁts;
◦ The actions of activist shareholders could disrupt our operations, impact our ability to execute on our business strategy, or cause ﬂuctuations in the
trading price of our common stock; and
Additional risks and uncertainties are identiﬁed and discussed in the Duke Energy Registrants' reports ﬁled with the SEC and available at the SEC's website at
sec.gov. In light of these risks, uncertainties and assumptions, the events described in the forward-looking statements might not occur or might occur to a
diﬀerent extent or at a diﬀerent time than described. Forward-looking statements speak only as of the date they are made and the Duke Energy Registrants
expressly disclaim an obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or
otherwise.
GLOSSARY OF TERMS
Glossary of Terms 
The following terms or acronyms used in this Form 10-K are deﬁned below:
Term or Acronym Deﬁnition
2017 Settlement
Second Revised and Restated Settlement Agreement in 2017 among Duke Energy Florida, the Florida Oﬃce of Public
Counsel and other customer advocates, which replaces and supplants the 2013 Settlement
2021 Settlement Settlement Agreement in 2021 among Duke Energy Florida, the Florida Oﬃce of Public Counsel, the Florida Industrial
Power Users Group, White Springs Agricultural Chemicals, Inc. d/b/a PSC Phosphate and NUCOR Steel Florida, Inc.
ACP Atlantic Coast Pipeline, LLC, a limited liability company owned by Dominion and Duke Energy
ACP pipeline The approximately 600-mile canceled interstate natural gas pipeline
AFS Available for Sale
AFUDC Allowance for funds used during construction
AMI Advanced Metering Infrastructure
AMT Alternative Minimum Tax
AOCI Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
ARO Asset Retirement Obligation
Audit Committee Audit Committee of the Board of Directors
Belews Creek Belews Creek Steam Station
Bison Bison Insurance Company Limited
Board of Directors Duke Energy Board of Directors
Brunswick Brunswick Nuclear Plant
Cardinal Cardinal Pipeline Company, LLC
Catawba Catawba Nuclear Station
CC Combined Cycle
CCR Coal Combustion Residuals
CEP Rider Duke Energy Ohio's Capital Expenditure Program Rider
Cinergy Cinergy Corp. (collectively with its subsidiaries)
Citrus County CC Citrus County Combined Cycle Facility
CO Carbon Dioxide
Coal Ash Act North Carolina Coal Ash Management Act of 2014
the company Duke Energy Corporation and its subsidiaries
Commercial Renewables Disposal
GroupsCommercial Renewables business segment, excluding the oﬀshore wind contract for Carolina Long Bay, marketed as
two separate disposal groups, the utility-scale solar and wind group and the distributed generation group
COVID-19 Coronavirus Disease 2019
CPCN Certiﬁcate of Public Convenience and Necessity
CRC Cinergy Receivables Company LLC
Crystal River Unit 3 Crystal River Unit 3 Nuclear Plant
CT Combustion Turbine
DATC Duke-American Transmission Company, LLC
DECON A method of decommissioning in which structures, systems, and components that contain radioactive contamination
are removed from a site and safely disposed at a commercially operated low-level waste disposal facility, or
decontaminated to a level that permits the site to be released for unrestricted use shortly after it ceases operation
DEFR Duke Energy Florida Receivables, LLC
Deloitte Deloitte & Touche LLP, and the member ﬁrms of Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu and their respective aﬃliates
DEPR Duke Energy Progress Receivables, LLC
DERF Duke Energy Receivables Finance Company, LLC2
GLOSSARY OF TERMS
DOE U.S. Department of Energy
Dominion Dominion Energy, Inc.
Dth Dekatherms
Duke Energy Duke Energy Corporation (collectively with its subsidiaries)
Duke Energy Carolinas Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC
Duke Energy Florida Duke Energy Florida, LLC
Duke Energy Indiana Duke Energy Indiana, LLC
Duke Energy Kentucky Duke Energy Kentucky, Inc.
Duke Energy Ohio Duke Energy Ohio, Inc.
Duke Energy Progress Duke Energy Progress, LLC
Duke Energy Registrants Duke Energy, Duke Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida, Duke Energy
Ohio, Duke Energy Indiana and Piedmont
East Bend East Bend Generating Station
EDIT Excess deferred income tax
EE Energy eﬃciency
EPA U.S. Environmental Protection Agency
EPS Earnings Per Share
ETR Eﬀective tax rate
EU&I Electric Utilities and Infrastructure
Exchange Act Securities Exchange Act of 1934
FASB Financial Accounting Standards Board
FERC Federal Energy Regulatory Commission
Form S-3 Registration statement
FPSC Florida Public Service Commission
FTR Financial transmission rights
GAAP Generally Accepted Accounting Principles in the United States
GAAP Reported Earnings Net Income Available to Duke Energy Corporation common stockholders
GAAP Reported EPS Basic EPS Available to Duke Energy Corporation common stockholders
GHG Greenhouse Gas
GIC GIC Private Limited, Singapore's sovereign wealth fund and an experienced investor in U.S. infrastructure
GU&I Gas Utilities and Infrastructure
GWh Gigawatt-hour
Hardy Storage Hardy Storage Company, LLC
Harris Shearon Harris Nuclear Plant
HB 951 The Energy Solutions for North Carolina, or House Bill 951, passed in October 2021
IMPA Indiana Municipal Power Agency
IMR Integrity Management Rider
IRP Integrated Resource Plans
IRS Internal Revenue Service
ISO Independent System Operator
ITC Investment Tax Credit
IURC Indiana Utility Regulatory Commission
Investment Trusts Grantor trusts of Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida and Duke Energy Indiana
KO Transmission KO Transmission Company
KPSC Kentucky Public Service Commission
GLOSSARY OF TERMS
LLC Limited Liability Company
McGuire McGuire Nuclear Station
MGP Manufactured gas plant
MGP Settlement Stipulation and Recommendation ﬁled jointly by Duke Energy Ohio the staﬀ of the PUCO, the Oﬃce of the
Ohio Consumers' Counsel and the Ohio Energy Group on August 31, 2021
MISO Midcontinent Independent System Operator, Inc.
MTBE Methyl tertiary butyl ether
MW Megawatt
MWh Megawatt-hour
MYRP Multiyear rate plans
NCDEQ North Carolina Department of Environmental Quality
NCUC North Carolina Utilities Commission
NDTF Nuclear decommissioning trust funds
New Source Review Clean Air Act program that requires industrial facilities to install modern pollution control equipment when they are
built or when making a change that increases emissions signiﬁcantly
NMC National Methanol Company
NOL Net operating loss
NPNS Normal purchase/normal sale
NRC U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission
NYSE New York Stock Exchange
Oconee Oconee Nuclear Station
OPEB Other Post-Retirement Beneﬁt Obligations
OVEC Ohio Valley Electric Corporation
the Parent Duke Energy Corporation holding company
PBR Performance-based regulation
PGA Purchased Gas Adjustments
PHMSA Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration
Piedmont Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc.
Pine Needle Pine Needle LNG Company, LLC
Pioneer Pioneer Transmission, LLC
PJM PJM Interconnection, LLC
PMPA Piedmont Municipal Power Agency
PISCC Post-in-service carrying costs
PPA Purchase Power Agreement
Progress Energy Progress Energy, Inc.
PSCSC Public Service Commission of South Carolina
PTC Production Tax Credits
PUCO Public Utilities Commission of Ohio
PURPA Public Utility Regulatory Policies Act of 1978
QF Qualifying Facility
REC Renewable Energy Certiﬁcate
Relative TSR TSR of Duke Energy stock relative to a predeﬁned peer group
Robinson Robinson Nuclear Plant
ROE Return of equity
ROU Right-of-use
RSU Restricted Stock Unit
GLOSSARY OF TERMS
RTO Regional Transmission Organization
Sabal Trail Sabal Trail Transmission, LLC
SAFSTOR A method of decommissioning in which a nuclear facility is placed and maintained in a condition that allows the
facility to be safely stored and subsequently decontaminated to levels that permit release for unrestricted use
SEC Securities and Exchange Commission
S&P Standard & Poor’s Rating Services
State utility commissions NCUC, PSCSC, FPSC, PUCO, IURC, KPSC and TPUC (Collectively)
State electric utility commissions NCUC, PSCSC, FPSC, PUCO, IURC and KPSC (Collectively)
State gas utility commissions NCUC, PSCSC, PUCO, TPUC and KPSC (Collectively)
Subsidiary Registrants Duke Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida, Duke Energy Ohio, Duke
Energy Indiana and Piedmont
Sutton L.V. Sutton Combined Cycle Plant
the Tax Act Tax Cuts and Jobs Act
TPUC Tennessee Public Utility Commission
TSR Total shareholder return
U.S. United States
VIE Variable Interest Entity
W.S. Lee CC William States Lee Combined Cycle Facility
WVPA Wabash Valley Power Association, Inc.
BUSINESS
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
DUKE ENERGY
General
Duke Energy was incorporated on May 3, 2005, and is an energy company headquartered in Charlotte, North Carolina, subject to regulation by the FERC and
other regulatory agencies listed below. Duke Energy operates in the U.S. primarily through its direct and indirect subsidiaries. Certain Duke Energy
subsidiaries are also Subsidiary Registrants, including Duke Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida, Duke Energy
Ohio, Duke Energy Indiana and Piedmont. When discussing Duke Energy’s consolidated ﬁnancial information, it necessarily includes the results of its
separate Subsidiary Registrants, which along with Duke Energy, are collectively referred to as the Duke Energy Registrants.
The Duke Energy Registrants electronically ﬁle reports with the SEC, including Annual Reports on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, current reports
on Form 8-K, proxy statements and amendments to such reports.
The SEC maintains an internet site that contains reports, proxy and information statements and other information regarding issuers that ﬁle electronically
with the SEC at sec.gov. Additionally, information about the Duke Energy Registrants, including reports ﬁled with the SEC, is available through Duke Energy’s
website at duke-energy.com. Such reports are accessible at no charge and are made available as soon as reasonably practicable after such material is ﬁled
with or furnished to the SEC.
Business Segments
Duke Energy's segment structure includes two reportable business segments: Electric Utilities and Infrastructure (EU&I) and Gas Utilities and Infrastructure
(GU&I). The remainder of Duke Energy’s operations is presented as Other. Commercial Renewables is reported as discontinued operations and is no longer a
reportable segment beginning in the fourth quarter of 2022. See Note 2 for further details. Duke Energy's chief operating decision-maker routinely reviews
ﬁnancial information about each of these business segments in deciding how to allocate resources and evaluate the performance of the business. For
additional information on each of these business segments, including ﬁnancial and geographic information, see Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements, “Business Segments.” The following sections describe the business and operations of each of Duke Energy’s business segments, as well as
Other.
ELECTRIC UTILITIES AND INFRASTRUCTURE
EU&I conducts operations primarily through the regulated public utilities of Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida, Duke Energy
Indiana and Duke Energy Ohio. EU&I provides retail electric service through the generation, transmission, distribution and sale of electricity to approximately
8.2 million customers within the Southeast and Midwest regions of the U.S. The service territory is approximately 92,000 square miles across six states with a
total estimated population of 26 million. The operations include electricity sold wholesale to municipalities, electric cooperative utilities and other load-
serving entities.
During 2021, Duke Energy executed an agreement providing for an investment by an aﬃliate of GIC in Duke Energy Indiana in exchange for a 19.9% minority
interest issued by Duke Energy Indiana Holdco, LLC, the holding company for Duke Energy Indiana. The transaction was completed following two closings.
Additionally, in November 2022, Duke Energy committed to a plan to sell the Commercial Renewables business segment, excluding the oﬀshore wind
contract for Carolina Long Bay, which was moved to EU&I. See Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Dispositions," for additional information.
EU&I is also a joint owner in certain electric transmission projects. EU&I has a 50% ownership interest in DATC, a partnership with American Transmission
Company, formed to design, build and operate transmission infrastructure. DATC owns 72% of the transmission service rights to Path 15, an 84-mile
transmission line in central California. EU&I also has a 50% ownership interest in Pioneer, which builds, owns and operates electric transmission facilities in
North America. The following map shows the service territory for EU&I as of December 31, 2022.
9
BUSINESS
The electric operations and investments in projects are subject to the rules and regulations of the FERC, the NRC, the NCUC, the PSCSC, the FPSC, the IURC,
the PUCO and the KPSC.
The following table represents the distribution of GWh billed sales by customer class for the year ended December 31, 2022.
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Energy Energy Energy Energy Energy
Carolinas Progress Florida Ohio Indiana
Residential 33 % 26 % 47 % 38 % 30 %
General service 33 % 22 % 34 % 38 % 27 %
Industrial 23 % 16 % 8 % 22 % 28 %
Total retail sales 89 % 64 % 89 % 98 % 85 %
Wholesale and other sales 11 % 36 % 11 % 2 % 15 %
Total sales 100 % 100 % 100 % 100 % 100 %
The number of residential and general service customers within the EU&I service territory is expected to increase over time. Sales growth is expected within
the service territory but continues to be impacted by adoption of energy eﬃciencies and self-generation. Migration into EU&I’s service territories and
continued remote work contributed to higher residential sales volumes in 2022 while higher data center usage contributed to growth in commercial sales
volumes. This was partially oﬀset by lower industrial sales volumes impacted by certain automotive customers experiencing supply chain constraints along
with reduced volumes in the steel sector. The impact on customer's usage from these factors and other potential economic dynamics continues to be
monitored. Over the longer time frame, it is still expected that the continued adoption of more eﬃcient housing and appliances will have a negative impact
on average usage per residential customer over time.
Seasonality and the Impact of Weather
Revenues and costs are inﬂuenced by seasonal weather patterns. Peak sales of electricity occur during the summer and winter months, which results in
higher revenue and cash ﬂows during these periods. By contrast, lower sales of electricity occur during the spring and fall, allowing for scheduled plant
maintenance. Residential and general service customers are more impacted by weather than industrial customers. Estimated weather impacts are based on
actual current period weather compared to normal weather conditions. Normal weather conditions are deﬁned as the long-term average of actual historical
weather conditions.
The estimated impact of weather on earnings is based on the temperature variances from a normal condition and customers’ historic usage patterns. The
methodology used to estimate the impact of weather does not consider all variables that may impact customer response to weather conditions such as
humidity in the summer or wind chill in the winter. The precision of this estimate may also be impacted by applying long-term weather trends to shorter-term
periods.
10
BUSINESS
Heating degree days measure the variation in weather based on the extent the average daily temperature falls below a base temperature. Cooling degree
days measure the variation in weather based on the extent the average daily temperature rises above the base temperature. Each degree of temperature
below the base temperature counts as one heating degree day and each degree of temperature above the base temperature counts as one cooling degree
day.
Competition
Retail
EU&I’s businesses operate as the sole supplier of electricity within their service territories, with the exception of Ohio, which has a competitive electricity
supply market for generation service. EU&I owns and operates facilities necessary to generate, transmit, distribute and sell electricity. Services are priced by
state commission-approved rates designed to include the costs of providing these services and a reasonable return on invested capital. This regulatory policy
is intended to provide safe and reliable electricity at fair prices.
In Ohio, EU&I conducts competitive auctions for electricity supply. The cost of energy purchased through these auctions is recovered from retail customers.
EU&I earns retail margin in Ohio on the transmission and distribution of electricity, but not on the cost of the underlying energy.
Competition in the regulated electric distribution business is primarily from the development and deployment of alternative energy sources including on-site
generation from industrial customers and distributed generation, such as private solar, at residential, general service and/or industrial customer sites.
Wholesale
Duke Energy competes with other utilities and merchant generators for bulk power sales, sales to municipalities and cooperatives and wholesale transactions
under primarily cost-based contracts approved by FERC. The principal factors in competing for these sales are availability of capacity and power, reliability of
service and price. Prices are inﬂuenced primarily by market conditions and fuel costs.
Increased competition in the wholesale electric utility industry and the availability of transmission access could aﬀect EU&I’s load forecasts, plans for power
supply and wholesale energy sales and related revenues. Wholesale energy sales will be impacted by the extent to which additional generation is available
to sell to the wholesale market and the ability of EU&I to attract new customers and to retain existing customers.
Energy Capacity and Resources
EU&I owns approximately 49,870 MW of generation capacity. For additional information on owned generation facilities, see Item 2, “Properties.”
Energy and capacity are also supplied through contracts with other generators and purchased on the open market. Factors that could cause EU&I to purchase
power for its customers may include, but are not limited to, generating plant outages, extreme weather conditions, generation reliability, demand growth
and price. EU&I has interconnections and arrangements with its neighboring utilities to facilitate planning, emergency assistance, sale and purchase of
capacity and energy and reliability of power supply.
EU&I’s generation portfolio is a balanced mix of energy resources having diﬀerent operating characteristics and fuel sources designed to provide energy at
the lowest possible cost to meet its obligation to serve retail customers. All options, including owned generation resources and purchased power
opportunities, are continually evaluated on a real-time basis to select and dispatch the lowest-cost resources available to meet system load requirements.
Sources of Electricity
EU&I relies principally on natural gas, nuclear fuel and coal for its generation of electricity. The following table lists sources of electricity and fuel costs for the
three years ended December 31, 2022.
Cost of Delivered Fuel per Net
Generation by Source Kilowatt-hour Generated (Cents)
2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Natural gas and fuel oil 34.2 % 31.8 % 31.3 % 6.35  3.89  2.55 
Nuclear 26.6 % 29.8 % 29.6 % 0.58  0.58  0.58 
Coal 13.5 % 18.2 % 18.1 % 3.43  2.84  2.99 
All fuels (cost based on weighted average) 74.3 % 79.8 % 79.0 % 3.75  2.42  1.91 
Hydroelectric and solar 1.5 % 1.5 % 1.9 %
Total generation 75.8 % 81.3 % 80.9 %
Purchased power and net interchange 24.2 % 18.7 % 19.1 %
Total sources of energy 100.0 % 100.0 % 100.0 %
(a)    Statistics related to all fuels reﬂect EU&I's public utility ownership interest in jointly owned generation facilities.
(b)    Generating ﬁgures are net of output required to replenish pumped-storage facilities during oﬀ-peak periods. 
Natural Gas and Fuel Oil
Natural gas and fuel oil supply, transportation and storage for EU&I’s generation ﬂeet is purchased under standard industry agreements from various
suppliers, including Piedmont. Natural gas supply agreements typically provide for a percentage of forecasted burns being procured over time, with varied
expiration dates. Electric Utilities and Infrastructure believes it has access to an adequate supply of natural gas and fuel oil for the reasonably foreseeable
future.(a)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(b)
11
BUSINESS
EU&I has certain dual-fuel generating facilities that can operate utilizing both natural gas and fuel oil. The cost of EU&I’s natural gas and fuel oil is ﬁxed price
or determined by published market prices as reported in certain industry publications, plus any transportation and freight costs. Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke
Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida and Duke Energy Indiana use derivative instruments to manage a portion of their exposure to price ﬂuctuations for
natural gas. Duke Energy Florida has temporarily agreed to not hedge natural gas prices, but retains an ability to propose hedging again in annual fuel
docket ﬁlings.
EU&I has ﬁrm interstate and intrastate natural gas transportation agreements and storage agreements in place to support generation needed for load
requirements. EU&I may purchase additional shorter-term natural gas transportation and utilize natural gas interruptible transportation agreements to
support generation needed for load requirements. The EU&I natural gas plants are served by various supply zones and multiple pipelines.
Nuclear
The industrial processes for producing nuclear generating fuel generally involve the mining and milling of uranium ore to produce uranium concentrates and
services to convert, enrich and fabricate fuel assemblies.
EU&I has contracted for uranium materials and services to fuel its nuclear reactors. Uranium concentrates, conversion services and enrichment services are
primarily met through a diversiﬁed portfolio of long-term supply contracts. The contracts are diversiﬁed by supplier, country of origin and pricing. EU&I
staggers its contracting so that its portfolio of long-term contracts covers the majority of its fuel requirements in the near term and decreasing portions of its
fuel requirements over time thereafter. Near-term requirements not met by long-term supply contracts have been and are expected to be fulﬁlled with spot
market purchases. Due to the technical complexities of changing suppliers of fuel fabrication services, EU&I generally source these services to a single
domestic supplier on a plant-by-plant basis using multiyear contracts.
EU&I has entered into fuel contracts that cover 100% of its uranium concentrates through at least 2024, 100% of its conversion services through at least
2026, 100% of its enrichment services through at least 2026, and 100% of its fabrication services requirements for these plants through at least 2027. For
future requirements not already covered under long-term contracts, EU&I believes it will be able to renew contracts as they expire or enter into similar
contractual arrangements with other suppliers of nuclear fuel materials and services.
Coal
EU&I meets its coal demand through a portfolio of long-term purchase contracts and short-term spot market purchase agreements. Large amounts of coal
are purchased under long-term contracts with mining operators who mine both underground and at the surface. EU&I uses spot market purchases to meet
coal requirements not met by long-term contracts. Expiration dates for its long-term contracts, which may have various price adjustment provisions and
market reopeners, range from 2023 to 2027 for Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Indiana, 2023 to 2024 for Duke Energy Progress and 2023 to 2025
for Duke Energy Florida and Duke Energy Ohio. EU&I expects to renew these contracts or enter into similar contracts with other suppliers as existing
contracts expire, though prices will ﬂuctuate over time as coal markets change. EU&I has an adequate supply of coal under contract to meet its risk
management guidelines regarding projected future consumption. As a result of volatility in natural gas prices and the associated impacts on coal-ﬁred
dispatch within the generation ﬂeet, coal inventories will continue to ﬂuctuate. EU&I continues to actively manage its portfolio and has worked with suppliers
to obtain increased ﬂexibility in its coal contracts.
Coal purchased for the Carolinas is primarily produced from mines in Central Appalachia, Northern Appalachia and the Illinois Basin. Coal purchased for
Florida is primarily produced from mines in the Illinois Basin. Coal purchased for Kentucky is produced from mines along the Ohio River in Illinois, Ohio, West
Virginia and Pennsylvania. Coal purchased for Indiana is primarily produced in Indiana and Illinois. There are adequate domestic coal reserves to serve EU&I's
coal generation needs through end of life. The current average sulfur content of coal purchased by Electric Utilities and Infrastructure is between 0.5% and
3.5% for Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress, and between 0.5% and 4% for Duke Energy Florida, Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana.
EU&I's environmental controls, in combination with the use of sulfur dioxide (SO) emission allowances, enable EU&I to satisfy current SO emission
limitations for its existing facilities.
Purchased Power
EU&I purchases a portion of its capacity and system requirements through purchase obligations, leases and purchase capacity contracts. EU&I believes it can
obtain adequate purchased power capacity to meet future system load needs. However, during periods of high demand, the price and availability of
purchased power may be signiﬁcantly aﬀected.
The following table summarizes purchased power for the previous three years:
2022 2021 2020
Purchase obligations and leases (in millions of MWh) 41.2  36.0  32.7 
Purchase capacity under contract (in MW) 4,028  4,259  4,716 
(a)    Represents approximately 16% of total system requirements for 2022, 14% for 2021 and 13% for 2020.
(b)    For 2022, 2021 and 2020, these agreements include approximately 412 MW of ﬁrm capacity under contract by Duke Energy Florida with QFs.
Inventory
EU&I must maintain an adequate stock of fuel and materials and supplies in order to ensure continuous operation of generating facilities and reliable delivery
to customers. As of December 31, 2022, the inventory balance for EU&I was approximately $3.4 billion. For additional information on inventory, see Note 1 to
the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Summary of Signiﬁcant Accounting Policies.”2 2
(a)
(b)
12
BUSINESS
Ash Basin Management
During 2015, EPA issued regulations related to the management of CCR from power plants. These regulations classify CCR as nonhazardous waste under the
Resource Conservation and Recovery Act (RCRA) and apply to electric generating sites with new and existing landﬁlls and new and existing surface
impoundments and establish requirements regarding landﬁll design, structural integrity design and assessment criteria for surface impoundments,
groundwater monitoring, protection and remedial procedures and other operational and reporting procedures for the disposal and management of CCR. In
addition to the federal regulations, CCR landﬁlls and surface impoundments (ash basins or impoundments) will continue to be regulated by existing state
laws, regulations and permits, such as the North Carolina Coal Ash Management Act of 2014 (Coal Ash Act).
EU&I has and will periodically submit to applicable authorities required site-speciﬁc coal ash impoundment remediation or closure plans. Closure plans must
be approved and all associated permits issued before any work can begin. Closure activities have begun in all of Duke Energy's jurisdictions. Excavation
began in 2015 at the four sites speciﬁed as high priority by the Coal Ash Act and at the W.S. Lee Steam Station site in South Carolina in connection with other
legal requirements. Excavation at these sites involves movement of CCR materials to appropriate engineered oﬀ-site or on-site lined landﬁlls or for reuse in
an approved beneﬁcial application. Duke Energy has completed excavation of coal ash at the four high-priority North Carolina sites. At other sites where CCR
management is required, planning and closure methods have been studied and factored into the estimated retirement and management costs, and closure
activities have commenced.
The EPA CCR rule and the Coal Ash Act leave the decision on cost recovery determinations related to closure of coal ash surface impoundments to the normal
ratemaking processes before utility regulatory commissions. Duke Energy's electric utilities have included compliance costs associated with federal and state
requirements in their respective rate proceedings. During 2017, Duke Energy Carolinas' and Duke Energy Progress’ wholesale contracts were amended to
include the recovery of expenditures related to AROs for the closure of coal ash basins. The amended contracts have retail disallowance parity or provisions
limiting challenges to CCR cost recovery actions at FERC. FERC approved the amended wholesale rate schedules in 2017. For additional information on the
ash basins and recovery, see Item 7, "Other Matters" and Notes 4, 5 and 10 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters," "Commitments
and Contingencies" and "Asset Retirement Obligations," respectively.
Nuclear Matters
Duke Energy owns, wholly or partially, 11 operating nuclear reactors located at six operating stations. The Crystal River Unit 3 permanently ceased operation
in February 2013. Nuclear insurance includes: nuclear liability coverage; property damage coverage; nuclear accident decontamination and premature
decommissioning coverage; and accidental outage coverage for losses in the event of a major accidental outage. Joint owners reimburse Duke Energy for
certain expenses associated with nuclear insurance in accordance with joint owner agreements. The Price-Anderson Act requires plant owners to provide for
public nuclear liability claims resulting from nuclear incidents to the maximum total ﬁnancial protection liability, which is approximately $13.7 billion. For
additional information on nuclear insurance, see Note 5 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Commitments and Contingencies.”
Duke Energy has a signiﬁcant future ﬁnancial commitment to dispose of spent nuclear fuel and decommission and decontaminate each plant safely. The
NCUC, PSCSC and FPSC require Duke Energy to update their cost estimates for decommissioning their nuclear plants every ﬁve years.
The following table summarizes the fair value of NDTF investments and the most recent site-speciﬁc nuclear decommissioning cost studies.
Decommissioning costs are stated in 2018 or 2019 dollars, depending on the year of the cost study, and include costs to decommission plant components
not subject to radioactive contamination.
NDTF Decommissioning
(in millions) December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021 Costs Year of Cost Study
Duke Energy $ 8,637 $ 10,401 $ 9,105  2018 or 2019
Duke Energy Carolinas 4,783  5,759  4,365  2018
Duke Energy Progress 3,430  4,089  4,181  2019
Duke Energy Florida 424  553  559  N/A
(a)    Amounts for Progress Energy equal the sum of Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida.
(b)    Decommissioning cost for Duke Energy Carolinas reﬂects its ownership interest in jointly owned reactors. Other joint owners are responsible for
decommissioning costs related to their interest in the reactors.
(c)    Duke Energy Carolinas' site-speciﬁc nuclear decommissioning cost study completed in 2018 was ﬁled with the NCUC and PSCSC in 2019. A new funding
study was also completed and ﬁled with the NCUC and PSCSC in 2019.
(d)    Duke Energy Progress' site-speciﬁc nuclear decommissioning cost study completed in 2019 was ﬁled with the NCUC and PSCSC in March 2020. Duke
Energy Progress also completed a funding study, which was ﬁled with the NCUC and PSCSC in July 2020. In October 2021, Duke Energy Progress
ﬁled the 2019 nuclear decommissioning cost study with the FERC, as well as a revised date schedule for decommissioning expense to be collected
from wholesale customers. The FERC accepted the ﬁling, as ﬁled on December 9, 2021.
(e)    During 2019, Duke Energy Florida reached an agreement to transfer decommissioning work for Crystal River Unit 3 to a third party and
decommissioning costs are based on the agreement with this third party rather than a cost study. Regulatory approval was received from the NRC
and the FPSC in April 2020 and August 2020, respectively. See Note 4 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters,” for more
information.
The NCUC, PSCSC, FPSC and FERC have allowed EU&I to recover estimated decommissioning costs through retail and wholesale rates over the expected
remaining service periods of their nuclear stations. EU&I believes the decommissioning costs being recovered through rates, when coupled with the existing
fund balances and expected fund earnings, will be suﬃcient to provide for the cost of future decommissioning. For additional information, see Note 10 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements, “Asset Retirement Obligations.”(a)
(a)
(b)(c)
(d)
(e)
13
BUSINESS
The Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982 (as amended) provides the framework for development by the federal government of interim storage and permanent
disposal facilities for high-level radioactive waste materials. The government has not yet developed a storage facility or disposal capacity, so EU&I will
continue to store spent fuel on its reactor sites.
Under federal law, the DOE is responsible for the selection and construction of a facility for the permanent disposal of spent nuclear fuel and high-level
radioactive waste. The DOE terminated the project to license and develop a geologic repository at Yucca Mountain, Nevada in 2010, and is currently taking
no action to fulﬁll its responsibilities to dispose of spent fuel.
Until the DOE begins to accept the spent nuclear fuel, Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida will continue to safely manage
their spent nuclear fuel. Under current regulatory guidelines, Harris has suﬃcient storage capacity in its spent fuel pools through the expiration of its
renewed operating license. With certain modiﬁcations and approvals by the NRC to expand the on-site dry cask storage facilities, spent nuclear fuel dry
storage facilities will be suﬃcient to provide storage space of spent fuel through the expiration of the operating licenses, including any license renewals, for
Brunswick, Catawba, McGuire, Oconee and Robinson. Crystal River Unit 3 ceased operation in 2013 and was placed in a SAFSTOR condition in January 2018.
As of January 2018, all spent fuel at Crystal River Unit 3 has been transferred from the spent fuel pool to dry storage at an on-site independent spent fuel
storage installation. During 2020, the NRC and the FPSC approved an agreement to transfer ownership of spent fuel for Crystal River Unit 3 to a third party.
See Note 4 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters,” for more information.
The nuclear power industry faces uncertainties with respect to the cost and long-term availability of disposal sites for spent nuclear fuel and other
radioactive waste, compliance with changing regulatory requirements, capital outlays for modiﬁcations and new plant construction.
EU&I is subject to the jurisdiction of the NRC for the design, construction and operation of its nuclear generating facilities. The following table includes the
current year of expiration of nuclear operating licenses for nuclear stations in operation. In June 2021, Duke Energy Carolinas ﬁled a subsequent license
renewal application for the Oconee Nuclear Station (ONS) with the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission to renew ONS's operating license for an additional 20
years. Duke Energy has announced its intention to seek 20-year operating license renewals for each of the reactors it operates in Duke Energy Carolinas and
Duke Energy Progress. See Note 4 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters,” for additional information.
Unit Year of Expiration
Duke Energy Carolinas
Catawba Units 1 and 2 2043
McGuire Unit 1 2041
McGuire Unit 2 2043
Oconee Units 1 and 2 2033
Oconee Unit 3 2034
Duke Energy Progress
Brunswick Unit 1 2036
Brunswick Unit 2 2034
Harris 2046
Robinson 2030
The NRC has acknowledged permanent cessation of operation and permanent removal of fuel from the reactor vessel at Crystal River Unit 3. Therefore, the
license no longer authorizes operation of the reactor. For additional information on nuclear decommissioning activity, see Notes 4 and 10 to the Consolidated
Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters" and "Asset Retirement Obligations," respectively.
Regulation
State
The state electric utility commissions approve rates for Duke Energy's retail electric service within their respective states. The state electric utility
commissions, to varying degrees, have authority over the construction and operation of EU&I’s generating facilities. CPCNs issued by the state electric utility
commissions, as applicable, authorize EU&I to construct and operate its electric facilities and to sell electricity to retail and wholesale customers. Prior
approval from the relevant state electric utility commission is required for the entities within EU&I to issue securities. The underlying concept of utility
ratemaking is to set rates at a level that allows the utility to collect revenues equal to its cost of providing service plus earn a reasonable rate of return on its
invested capital, including equity.
In addition to rates approved in base rate cases, each of the state electric utility commissions allow recovery of certain costs through various cost recovery
clauses to the extent the respective commission determines in periodic hearings that such costs, including any past over or under-recovered costs, are
prudent.
Fuel, fuel-related costs and certain purchased power costs are eligible for recovery by EU&I. EU&I uses coal, hydroelectric, natural gas, oil, renewable
generation and nuclear fuel to generate electricity, thereby maintaining a diverse fuel mix that helps mitigate the impact of cost increases in any one fuel.
Due to the associated regulatory treatment and the method allowed for recovery, changes in fuel costs from year to year have no material impact on
operating results of EU&I, unless a commission ﬁnds a portion of such costs to have been imprudent. However, delays between the expenditure for fuel costs
and recovery from customers can adversely impact the timing of cash ﬂows of EU&I.
14
BUSINESS
The table below reﬂects signiﬁcant electric rate case applications approved and eﬀective in the past three years and applications currently pending approval.
Regulatory
BodyAnnual
Increase
(Decrease)
(in millions)Return
on
EquityEquity
Component of
Capital StructureEﬀective
Date
Approved Rate Cases:
Duke Energy Progress 2022 South Carolina Rate Case PSCSC$ 52  9.6 % 52.43 % 4/1/2023
Duke Energy Ohio 2021 Ohio Electric Rate Case PUCO 23  9.5 % 50.5 % 1/3/2023
Duke Energy Progress 2019 North Carolina Rate Case NCUC 178  9.6 % 52 % 6/1/2021
Duke Energy Carolinas 2019 North Carolina Rate Case NCUC 33  9.6 % 52 % 6/1/2021
Duke Energy Indiana 2019 Indiana Rate Case IURC 146  9.7 % 54 % 7/30/2020
Duke Energy Kentucky 2019 Kentucky Electric Rate Case KPSC 24  9.25 % 48.23 % 5/1/2020
Pending Rate Cases:
Duke Energy Carolinas 2023 North Carolina Rate Case NCUC$ 823  10.4 % 53 % 1/1/2024
Duke Energy Kentucky 2022 Kentucky Electric Rate Case KPSC 75  10.35 % 52.5 % 7/15/2023
Duke Energy Progress 2022 North Carolina Rate Case NCUC 615  10.4 % 53 % 10/1/2023
(a)    Step 1 rates are approximately 75% of the total and became eﬀective July 30, 2020. Step 2 rates are approximately 25% of the total rate case increase.
They were approved on July 28, 2021, and implemented in August 2021.
(b)    Year 1 rates are approximately 61% of the total. Year 2 rates are approximately 21% of the total rate case increase. Year 3 rates are approximately 18%
of the total rate increase.
(c)    Year 1 rates are approximately 53% of the total. Year 2 rates are approximately 25% of the total rate case increase. Year 3 rates are approximately 22%
of the total rate increase. Implementation of interim rates is planned for June 1, 2023.
Additionally, in January 2021, Duke Energy Florida ﬁled a settlement agreement with the FPSC that will allow annual increases to its base rates, an agreed
upon return on equity (“ROE”) and includes a base rate stay-out provision through 2024, among other provisions. The FPSC approved the 2021 Settlement on
May 4, 2021, issuing an order on June 4, 2021. Revised customer rates became eﬀective January 1, 2022, with subsequent base rate increases eﬀective
January 1, 2023, and January 1, 2024. For more information on rate matters and other regulatory proceedings, see Note 4 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements, “Regulatory Matters.”
Federal
The FERC approves EU&I’s cost-based rates for electric sales to certain power and transmission wholesale customers. Regulations of FERC and the state
electric utility commissions govern access to regulated electric and other data by nonregulated entities and services provided between regulated and
nonregulated energy aﬃliates. These regulations aﬀect the activities of nonregulated aﬃliates with EU&I.
RTOs
PJM and MISO are the ISOs and FERC-approved RTOs for the regions in which Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana operate. PJM and MISO operate
energy, capacity and other markets, and control the day-to-day operations of bulk power systems through central dispatch.
Duke Energy Ohio is a member of PJM and Duke Energy Indiana is a member of MISO. Transmission owners in these RTOs have turned over control of their
transmission facilities and their transmission systems are currently under the dispatch control of the RTOs. Transmission service is provided on a regionwide,
open-access basis using the transmission facilities of the RTO members at rates based on the costs of transmission service.
Environmental
EU&I is subject to the jurisdiction of the EPA and state and local environmental agencies. For a discussion of environmental regulation, see “Environmental
Matters” in this section. See the “Other Matters” section of Item 7 Management's Discussion and Analysis for a discussion about potential Global Climate
Change legislation and other EPA regulations under development and the potential impacts such legislation and regulation could have on Duke Energy’s
operations.
GAS UTILITIES AND INFRASTRUCTURE
GU&I conducts natural gas operations primarily through the regulated public utilities of Piedmont, Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Kentucky. The natural
gas operations are subject to the rules and regulations of the NCUC, PSCSC, PUCO, KPSC, TPUC, PHMSA and the FERC. GU&I serves residential, commercial,
industrial and power generation natural gas customers, including customers served by municipalities who are wholesale customers. GU&I has over 1.6
million total customers, including 1.1 million customers located in North Carolina, South Carolina and Tennessee, and an additional 550,000 customers
located within southwestern Ohio and northern Kentucky. In the Carolinas, Ohio and Kentucky, the service areas are comprised of numerous cities, towns and
communities. In Tennessee, the service area is the metropolitan area of Nashville. The following map shows the service territory and investments in
operating pipelines for GU&I as of December 31, 2022.(a)
(b)
(c)
15
BUSINESS
The number of residential, commercial and industrial customers within the GU&I service territory is expected to increase over time. Average usage per
residential customer is expected to remain ﬂat or decline for the foreseeable future; however, decoupled rates in North Carolina and various rate design
mechanisms in other jurisdictions partially mitigate the impact of the declining usage per customer on overall proﬁtability.
GU&I also has investments in various pipeline transmission projects, renewable natural gas projects and natural gas storage facilities.
Natural Gas for Retail Distribution
GU&I is responsible for the distribution of natural gas to retail customers in its North Carolina, South Carolina, Tennessee, Ohio and Kentucky service
territories. GU&I’s natural gas procurement strategy is to contract primarily with major and independent producers and marketers for natural gas supply. It
also purchases a diverse portfolio of transportation and storage service from interstate pipelines. This strategy allows GU&I to assure reliable natural gas
supply and transportation for its ﬁrm customers during peak winter conditions. When ﬁrm pipeline services or contracted natural gas supplies are
temporarily not needed due to market demand ﬂuctuations, GU&I may release these services and supplies in the secondary market under FERC-approved
capacity release provisions or make wholesale secondary market sales. In 2022, ﬁrm supply purchase commitment agreements provided 100% of the natural
gas supply for both Piedmont and Duke Energy Ohio. Approximately 90% of forecasted demand was under contract prior to the winter heating season, with
ﬁrm daily spot purchases making up the balance.
16
BUSINESS
Impact of Weather
GU&I revenues are generally protected from the impact of weather ﬂuctuations due to the regulatory mechanisms that are available in most service
territories. In North Carolina, margin decoupling provides protection from both weather and other usage variations like conservation for residential and small
and medium general service customers. Margin decoupling provides a set margin per customer independent of actual usage. In South Carolina, Tennessee
and Kentucky, weather normalization adjusts revenues either up or down depending on how much warmer or colder than normal a given month has been.
Weather normalization adjustments occur from November through March in South Carolina, from October through April in Tennessee and from November
through April in Kentucky. Duke Energy Ohio collects most of its non-fuel revenue through a ﬁxed monthly charge that is not impacted by usage ﬂuctuations
that result from weather changes or conservation.
Competition
GU&I’s businesses operate as the sole provider of natural gas service within their retail service territories. GU&I owns and operates facilities necessary to
transport and distribute natural gas. GU&I earns retail margin on the transmission and distribution of natural gas and not on the cost of the underlying
commodity. Services are priced by state commission-approved rates designed to include the costs of providing these services and a reasonable return on
invested capital. This regulatory policy is intended to provide safe and reliable natural gas service at fair prices.
In residential, commercial and industrial customer markets, natural gas distribution operations compete with other companies that supply energy, primarily
electric companies, propane and fuel oil dealers, renewable energy providers and coal companies in relation to sources of energy for electric power plants, as
well as nuclear energy. A signiﬁcant competitive factor is price. GU&I's primary product competition is with electricity for heating, water heating and cooking.
Increases in the price of natural gas or decreases in the price of other energy sources could negatively impact competitive position by decreasing the price
beneﬁts of natural gas to the consumer. In the case of industrial customers, such as manufacturing plants, adverse economic or market conditions, including
higher natural gas costs, could cause these customers to suspend business operations or to use alternative sources of energy in favor of energy sources with
lower per-unit costs.
Higher natural gas costs or decreases in the price of other energy sources may allow competition from alternative energy sources for applications that have
traditionally used natural gas, encouraging some customers to move away from natural gas-ﬁred equipment to equipment fueled by other energy sources.
Competition between natural gas and other forms of energy is also based on eﬃciency, performance, reliability, safety and other non-price factors.
Technological improvements in other energy sources and events that impair the public perception of the non-price attributes of natural gas could erode our
competitive advantage. These factors in turn could decrease the demand for natural gas, impair our ability to attract new customers and cause existing
customers to switch to other forms of energy or to bypass our systems in favor of alternative competitive sources. This could result in slow or no customer
growth and could cause customers to reduce or cease using our product, thereby reducing our ability to make capital expenditures and otherwise grow our
business, adversely aﬀecting our earnings.
Natural Gas Investments
Duke Energy, through its GU&I segment, has a 7.5% equity ownership interest in Sabal Trail. Sabal Trail is a joint venture that owns the Sabal Trail Natural
Gas Pipeline (Sabal Trail pipeline) to transport natural gas to Florida, regulated by FERC. The Sabal Trail Phase I mainline was placed into service in July 2017
and traverses Alabama, Georgia and Florida. The remaining lateral line to the Duke Energy Florida's Citrus County CC was placed into service in March 2018.
Phase II of Sabal Trail went into service in May 2020, adding approximately 200,000 Dth of capacity to the Sabal Trail pipeline.
Duke Energy, through its GU&I segment, has a 47% equity ownership interest in ACP, which planned to build the ACP pipeline, an approximately 600-mile
interstate natural gas pipeline. The ACP pipeline was intended to transport diverse natural gas supplies into southeastern markets and would be regulated by
FERC. Dominion Energy owns 53% of ACP and was contracted to construct and operate the ACP pipeline upon completion. On July 5, 2020, Dominion
announced a sale of substantially all of its natural gas transmission and storage segment assets, which were critical to the ACP pipeline. Further, permitting
delays and legal challenges had materially aﬀected the timing and cost of the pipeline. As a result, Duke Energy determined that they would no longer invest
in the construction of the ACP pipeline.
Duke Energy, also through its GU&I segment, has investments in various renewable natural gas joint ventures.
GU&I has a 21.49% equity ownership interest in Cardinal, an intrastate pipeline located in North Carolina regulated by the NCUC, a 45% equity ownership in
Pine Needle, an interstate liqueﬁed natural gas storage facility located in North Carolina and a 50% equity ownership interest in Hardy Storage, an
underground interstate natural gas storage facility located in Hardy and Hampshire counties in West Virginia. Pine Needle and Hardy Storage are regulated
by FERC.
KO Transmission Company (KO Transmission), a wholly owned subsidiary of Duke Energy Ohio, is an interstate pipeline company engaged in the business of
transporting natural gas and is subject to the rules and regulations of FERC. KO Transmission's 90-mile pipeline supplies natural gas to Duke Energy Ohio and
interconnects with the Columbia Gulf Transmission pipeline and Tennessee Gas Pipeline. An approximately 70-mile portion of KO Transmission's pipeline
facilities is co-owned by Columbia Gas Transmission, LLC. KO Transmission sold all of its pipeline facilities and related real property to Columbia Gas
Transmission, LLC on February 1, 2023, for approximately book value.
See Notes 4, 13 and 18 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters," "Investments in Unconsolidated Aﬃliates" and "Variable Interest
Entities," respectively, for further information on Duke Energy's and GU&I's natural gas investments.
Inventory
GU&I must maintain adequate natural gas inventory in order to provide reliable delivery to customers. As of December 31, 2022, the inventory balance for
GU&I was $185 million. For more information on inventory, see Note 1 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Summary of Signiﬁcant Accounting
Policies."
17
BUSINESS
Regulation
State
The state gas utility commissions approve rates for Duke Energy's retail natural gas service within their respective states. The state gas utility commissions,
to varying degrees, have authority over the construction and operation of GU&I’s natural gas distribution facilities. CPCNs issued by the state gas utility
commissions or other government agencies, as applicable, authorize GU&I to construct and operate its natural gas distribution facilities and to sell natural
gas to retail and wholesale customers. Prior approval from the relevant state gas utility commission is required for GU&I to issue securities. The underlying
concept of utility ratemaking is to set rates at a level that allows the utility to collect revenues equal to its cost of providing service plus a reasonable rate of
return on its invested capital, including equity.
In addition to amounts collected from customers through approved base rates, each of the state gas utility commissions allow recovery of certain costs
through various cost recovery clauses to the extent the respective commission determines in periodic hearings that such costs, including any past over- or
under-recovered costs, are prudent.
Natural gas costs are eligible for recovery by GU&I. Due to the associated regulatory treatment and the method allowed for recovery, changes in natural gas
costs from year to year have no material impact on operating results of GU&I, unless a commission ﬁnds a portion of such costs to have been imprudent.
However, delays between the expenditure for natural gas and recovery from customers can adversely impact the timing of cash ﬂows of GU&I.
The following table summarizes certain components underlying recently approved and eﬀective base rates or rate stabilization ﬁlings in the last three years
and applications currently pending approval.
Annual
Increase
(Decrease)
(in millions)Return
on
EquityEquity
Component of
Capital Structure Eﬀective Date
Approved Rate Cases:
Piedmont 2020 Tennessee Natural Gas Base Rate Case $ 16  9.8 % 50.5 % January 2021
Piedmont 2021 North Carolina Natural Gas Base Rate Case 67  9.6 % 51.6 % November 2021
Piedmont 2021 South Carolina Rate Stabilization Adjustment Filing 7  9.8 % 52.2 % November 2021
Duke Energy Kentucky 2021 Natural Gas Base Rate Case 9  9.38 % 51.3 % January 2022
Piedmont 2022 South Carolina Natural Gas Base Rate Case 2  9.3 % 52.2 % November 2022
Pending Rate Cases:
Duke Energy Ohio 2022 Natural Gas Base Rate Case 49  10.3 % 52.3 % April 2023
(a)    An ROE of 9.375% for natural gas base rates and 9.3% for natural gas riders was approved.
(b)    Under the rate stabilization adjustment (RSA) mechanism, Piedmont resets rates in South Carolina based on updated costs and revenues on an annual
basis. The SC RSA ﬁling for 2022 did not reset the rates since Piedmont ﬁled a General Rate Case in 2022.
GU&I has an IMR mechanism in North Carolina designed to separately track and recover certain costs associated with capital investments incurred to comply
with federal pipeline safety and integrity programs. Piedmont has withdrawn from the Tennessee IMR mechanism subsequent to the authorization of the
Tennessee Annual Review Mechanism eﬀective January 2022. The following table summarizes information related to the recently approved IMR ﬁling.
Cumulative Annual Eﬀective
(in millions) Investment Revenues Date
Piedmont 2022 IMR Filing – North Carolina $ 213 $ 20  December 2022
In Ohio, GU&I has a Capital Expenditure Program Rider (CEP Rider) designed to recover costs between rate cases on PUCO approved capital expenditures.
Duke Energy Ohio submits a ﬁling each year for incremental investments to increase the revenue requirement up to the cap of approximately $7 million. The
cumulative investment under the CEP Rider is $359 million with total annual revenue requirement of $70 million.
For more information on rate matters and other regulatory proceedings, see Note 4 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Regulatory Matters.”
Federal
GU&I is subject to various federal regulations, including regulations that are particular to the natural gas industry. These federal regulations include but are
not limited to the following:
• Regulations of the FERC aﬀect the certiﬁcation and siting of new interstate natural gas pipeline projects, the purchase and sale of, the prices paid for,
and the terms and conditions of service for the interstate transportation and storage of natural gas.
• Regulations of the PHMSA aﬀect the design, construction, operation, maintenance, integrity, safety and security of natural gas distribution and
transmission systems.
• Regulations of the EPA relate to the environment including proposed air emissions regulations that would expand to include emissions of methane.(a)
(b)
18
BUSINESS
Regulations of the FERC and the state gas utility commissions govern access to regulated natural gas and other data by nonregulated entities and services
provided between regulated and nonregulated energy aﬃliates. These regulations aﬀect the activities of nonregulated aﬃliates with Gas Utilities and
Infrastructure.
Environmental
GU&I is subject to the jurisdiction of the EPA and state and local environmental agencies. For a discussion of environmental regulation, see “Environmental
Matters” in this section. See “Other Matters” section of Item 7 Management's Discussion and Analysis for a discussion about potential Global Climate Change
legislation and other EPA regulations under development and the potential impacts such legislation and regulation could have on Duke Energy’s operations.
OTHER
The remainder of Duke Energy’s operations is presented as Other. While it is not a business segment, Other primarily includes interest expense on holding
company debt, unallocated corporate costs, amounts related to certain companywide initiatives and contributions made to the Duke Energy Foundation.
Other also includes Bison and an investment in NMC.
The Duke Energy Foundation is a nonproﬁt organization funded by Duke Energy shareholders that makes charitable contributions to selected nonproﬁts and
government subdivisions.
Bison, a wholly owned subsidiary of Duke Energy, is a captive insurance company with the principal activity of providing Duke Energy subsidiaries with
indemniﬁcation for ﬁnancial losses primarily related to property, workers’ compensation and general liability.
Duke Energy owns a 17.5% equity interest in NMC. The joint venture company has production facilities in Jubail, Saudi Arabia, where it manufactures certain
petrochemicals and plastics. The company annually produces approximately 1 million metric tons each of MTBE and methanol and has the capacity to
produce 50,000 metric tons of polyacetal. The main feedstocks to produce these products are natural gas and butane. Duke Energy records the investment
activity of NMC using the equity method of accounting and retains 25% of NMC's board of directors' representation and voting rights.
Human Capital Management
Governance
Our employees are critical to the success of our company. Our Human Resources organization is responsible for our human capital management strategy,
which includes recruiting and hiring, onboarding and training, diversity and inclusion, workforce planning, talent and succession planning, performance
management and employee development. Key areas of focus include fostering a high-performance and inclusive culture built on strong leadership and highly
engaged and diverse employees, building a pipeline of skilled workers and ensuring knowledge transfer as employees retire.
Our Board of Directors provides oversight on certain human capital management matters, primarily through the Compensation and People Development
Committee, which is responsible for reviewing strategies and policies related to human capital management, including with respect to matters such as
diversity and inclusion, employee engagement and talent development.
Employees
On December 31, 2022, Duke Energy had a total of 27,859 full-time, part-time and temporary employees, the majority of which were full-time employees.
The total includes 5,081 employees who are represented by labor unions under various collective bargaining agreements that generally cover wages,
beneﬁts, working practices, and other terms and conditions of employment.
Compensation
The company seeks to attract and retain an appropriately qualiﬁed workforce and leverages Duke Energy’s leadership imperatives to foster a culture focused
on customers, innovation, and highly engaged employees. Our compensation program is market driven and designed to link pay to performance with the
goal of attracting and retaining talented employees, rewarding individual performance, and encouraging long-term commitment to our business. Our market
competitive pay program includes short-term and long-term variable pay components that help to align the interests of Duke Energy to our customers and
shareholders. In addition to competitive base pay, we provide eligible employees with compensation and beneﬁts under a variety of plans and programs,
including health care beneﬁts, retirement savings, pension, health savings and ﬂexible spending accounts, wellness, family leaves, employee assistance, as
well as other beneﬁts including a charitable matching program. The company is committed to providing market competitive, fair, and equitable
compensation and regularly conducts internal pay equity reviews, and benchmarking against peer companies to ensure our pay is competitive.
Diversity and Inclusion
Duke Energy is committed to continuing to build a diverse workforce that reﬂects the communities we serve while strengthening a culture of inclusion where
employees and customers feel respected and valued. Our Enterprise Diversity and Inclusion Council, chaired by our Chief Operating Oﬃcer in 2022, monitors
the eﬀectiveness and execution of our diversity and inclusion strategy and programs. Employee-led councils are also embedded across the company in our
business units and focus on the speciﬁc diversity and inclusion needs of the business and help drive inclusion deeper into the employee experience. Leaders
and individual contributors also have the opportunity to participate in voluntary diversity and inclusion training programs and facilitated conversations on
insightful topics oﬀered to further our commitment to building and enabling an inclusive work environment.
Our aspirational goals include achieving workforce representation of at least 25% female and 20% racial and ethnic diversity. We continue to strive toward
reaching these aspirational goals and as of December 31, 2022, our workforce consisted of approximately 23.9% female and 20.4% racial and ethnic
diversity.
19
BUSINESS
The company also has 10 Employee Resource Groups (ERGs), with 37 chapters and more than 6,500 employees participating. ERGs are networks of
employees formed around a common dimension of diversity whose goals and objectives align with the company's goals and objectives. These groups focus
on employee professional development and networking, community outreach, cultural awareness, recruiting and retention. They also serve as a resource to
the company for advocacy and community outreach and improving customer service through innovation. ERG-sponsored forums include networking events,
mentoring, scholarship banquets for aspiring college students, and workshops on topics such as time management, stress reduction, career planning and
work-life balance. Our ERGs are open to all employees.
Among other eﬀorts, the company has developed partnerships with community organizations, community colleges and historically Black colleges and
universities to support our strategy of building a diverse and highly skilled talent pipeline.
Operational Excellence
The foundation for our growth and success is our continued focus on operational excellence, the leading indicator of which is safety. As such, the safety of
our workforce remains our top priority. The company closely monitors the total incident case rate (TICR), which is a metric based on strict OSHA deﬁnitions
that measures the number of occupational injuries and illnesses per 100 employees. This objective emphasizes our focus on achieving an event-free and
injury-free workplace. As an indication of our commitment to safety, we include safety metrics in both the short-term and long-term incentive plans based on
the TICR for employees. Our employees delivered strong safety results in 2022, consistent with our industry-leading performance levels from 2017 through
2021.
20
BUSINESS
Information about Our Executive Oﬃcers
The following table sets forth the individuals who currently serve as executive oﬃcers. Executive oﬃcers serve until their successors are duly elected or
appointed.
Name Age Current and Recent Positions Held
Lynn J. Good 63 Chair, President and Chief Executive Oﬃcer. Ms. Good has served as Chair, President and Chief Executive Oﬃcer
of Duke Energy since January 1, 2016, and was Vice Chairman, President and Chief Executive Oﬃcer of Duke Energy
from July 2013 through December 2015. Prior to that, she served as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial
Oﬃcer since 2009.
Brian D. Savoy 47 Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Oﬃcer. Mr. Savoy assumed the position of Executive Vice President
and Chief Financial Oﬃcer in September 2022. Prior to that, he held the position of Executive Vice President, Chief
Strategy and Commercial Oﬃcer from May 2021 through August 2022; Senior Vice President, Chief Transformation and
Administrative Oﬃcer from October 2019 through April 2021; Senior Vice President, Business Transformation and
Technology from May 2016 through September 2019; Senior Vice President, Controller and Chief Accounting Oﬃcer
from September 2013 to May 2016; Director, Forecasting and Analysis from 2009 to September 2013; and Vice
President and Controller of the Commercial Power segment from 2006 to 2009.
Kodwo Ghartey-Tagoe 59 Executive Vice President, Chief Legal Oﬃcer and Corporate Secretary. Mr. Ghartey-Tagoe assumed the
position of Executive Vice President, Chief Legal Oﬃcer and Corporate Secretary in May 2020. He was appointed
Executive Vice President and Chief Legal Oﬃcer in October 2019 after serving as President, South Carolina since 2017.
Mr. Ghartey-Tagoe joined Duke Energy in 2002, and has held numerous management positions in Duke Energy’s Legal
Department, including Duke Energy's Senior Vice President of State and Federal Regulatory Legal Support.
T. Preston Gillespie 60 Executive Vice President, Chief Generation Oﬃcer and Enterprise Operational Excellence. Mr. Gillespie
assumed the position of Executive Vice President, Chief Generation Oﬃcer and Enterprise Operational Excellence in
January 2023. Prior to that, Mr. Gillespie served as the Chief Generation Oﬃcer since 2020.
R. Alexander Glenn 57 Senior Vice President and Chief Executive Oﬃcer, Duke Energy Florida and Midwest. Mr. Glenn assumed his
current position in May 2021. Prior to that, Mr. Glenn served as Senior Vice President, State and Federal Regulatory
Legal Support since 2017 and as State President of Duke Energy Florida's operations from 2012 to 2017.
Dhiaa M. Jamil 66 Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Oﬃcer. Mr. Jamil assumed the role of Chief Operating Oﬃcer in
May 2016. Prior to his current position, he held the title Executive Vice President and President, Regulated Generation
and Transmission since June 2015. Prior to that, he served as Executive Vice President and President, Regulated
Generation since August 2014. He served as Executive Vice President and President of Duke Energy Nuclear from
March 2013 to August 2014, and was Chief Nuclear Oﬃcer from February 2008 to February 2013.
Julia S. Janson 58 Executive Vice President and Chief Executive Oﬃcer, Duke Energy Carolinas. Ms. Janson assumed her current
position in May 2021. Prior to that she held the position of Executive Vice President, External Aﬀairs and President,
Carolinas Region since October 2019 and the position of Executive Vice President, External Aﬀairs and Chief Legal
Oﬃcer since November 2018. She originally assumed the position of Executive Vice President, Chief Legal Oﬃcer and
Corporate Secretary in December 2012, and then assumed the responsibilities for External Aﬀairs in February 2016.
Cynthia S. Lee 56 Vice President, Chief Accounting Oﬃcer and Controller. Ms. Lee assumed her role as Vice President, Chief
Accounting Oﬃcer and Controller in May 2021. Prior to that, she served as Director, Investor Relations since June 2019
and in various roles within the Corporate Controller's organization after joining the Corporation and its aﬃliates in
2002.
Ronald R. Reising 62 Senior Vice President and Chief Human Resources Oﬃcer. Mr. Reising assumed his current position in July 2020.
Prior to that, he served as Senior Vice President of Operations Support since 2014. Prior to that, he served as Chief
Procurement Oﬃcer since 2006.
Louis E. Renjel 49 Senior Vice President, External Aﬀairs and Communications. Mr. Renjel assumed his current position in May
2021. Prior to that, he served as Senior Vice President of Federal Government and Corporate Aﬀairs since 2019, and as
Vice President, Federal Government Aﬀairs and Strategic Policy since he joined Duke Energy in March 2017 until 2019.
Prior to joining Duke Energy, Mr. Renjel served as Vice President of Strategic Infrastructure since 2009 for CSX Corp
and as their Director of Environmental and Government Aﬀairs from 2006 to 2008.
Harry K. Sideris 52 Executive Vice President, Customer Experience, Solutions and Services. Mr. Sideris assumed his current
position in October 2019. Prior to that, he served as Senior Vice President and Chief Distribution Oﬃcer since June
2018; State President, Florida from January 2017 to June 2018; Senior Vice President of Environmental Health and
Safety from August 2014 to January 2017; and Vice President of Power Generations for the company's Fossil/Hydro
Operations in the western portions of North Carolina and South Carolina from July 2012 to August 2014.
Steven K. Young 64 Executive Vice President, Chief Strategy and Commercial Oﬃcer. Mr. Young assumed the position of Executive
Vice President, Chief Strategy and Commercial Oﬃcer in September 2022. Prior to that, he held the position of
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Oﬃcer from August 2013 through August 2022; Vice President, Chief
Accounting Oﬃcer and Controller, assuming the role of Chief Accounting Oﬃcer in July 2012 and the role of Controller
in December 2006.
(a)    The ages of the oﬃcers provided are as of January 31, 2023.
There are no family relationships between any of the executive oﬃcers, nor any arrangement or understanding between any executive oﬃcer and any other
person involved in oﬃcer selection.(a)
21
BUSINESS
Environmental Matters
The Duke Energy Registrants are subject to federal, state and local laws and regulations with regard to air and water quality, hazardous and solid waste
disposal and other environmental matters. Environmental laws and regulations aﬀecting the Duke Energy Registrants include, but are not limited to:
• The Clean Air Act, as well as state laws and regulations impacting air emissions, including State Implementation Plans related to existing and new
national ambient air quality standards for ozone and particulate matter. Owners and/or operators of air emission sources are responsible for
obtaining permits and for annual compliance and reporting.
• The Clean Water Act, which requires permits for facilities that discharge wastewaters into navigable waters.
• The Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act, which can require any individual or entity that currently owns or in
the past owned or operated a disposal site, as well as transporters or generators of hazardous substances sent to a disposal site, to share in
remediation costs.
• The National Environmental Policy Act, which requires federal agencies to consider potential environmental impacts in their permitting and licensing
decisions, including siting approvals.
• Coal Ash Act, as amended, which establishes requirements regarding the use and closure of existing ash basins, the disposal of ash at active coal
plants and the handling of surface water and groundwater impacts from ash basins in North Carolina.
• The Solid Waste Disposal Act, as amended by RCRA, which creates a framework for the proper management of hazardous and nonhazardous solid
waste; classiﬁes CCR as nonhazardous waste; and establishes standards for landﬁll and surface impoundment placement, design, operation and
closure, groundwater monitoring, corrective action, and post-closure care.
• The Toxic Substances Control Act, which gives EPA the authority to require reporting, recordkeeping and testing requirements, and to place
restrictions relating to chemical substances and/or mixtures, including polychlorinated biphenyls.
For more information on environmental matters, see Notes 5 and 10 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Commitments and Contingencies –
Environmental” and "Asset Retirement Obligations," respectively, and the “Other Matters” section of Item 7 Management's Discussion and Analysis. Except
as otherwise described in these sections, costs to comply with current federal, state and local provisions regulating the discharge of materials into the
environment or other potential costs related to protecting the environment are incorporated into the routine cost structure of our various business segments
and are not expected to have a material adverse eﬀect on the competitive position, consolidated results of operations, cash ﬂows or ﬁnancial position of the
Duke Energy Registrants.
The "Other Matters" section of Item 7 Management's Discussion and Analysis includes more information on certain environmental regulations and a
discussion of Global Climate Change including the potential impact of current and future legislation related to GHG emissions on the Duke Energy
Registrants' operations. Recently passed and potential future environmental statutes and regulations could have a signiﬁcant impact on the Duke Energy
Registrants’ results of operations, cash ﬂows or ﬁnancial position. However, if and when such statutes and regulations become eﬀective, the Duke Energy
Registrants will seek appropriate regulatory recovery of costs to comply within its regulated operations.
DUKE ENERGY CAROLINAS
Duke Energy Carolinas is a regulated public utility primarily engaged in the generation, transmission, distribution and sale of electricity in portions of North
Carolina and South Carolina. Duke Energy Carolinas’ service area covers approximately 24,000 square miles and supplies electric service to 2.8 million
residential, commercial and industrial customers. For information about Duke Energy Carolinas’ generating facilities, see Item 2, “Properties.” Duke Energy
Carolinas is subject to the regulatory provisions of the NCUC, PSCSC, NRC and FERC.
Substantially all of Duke Energy Carolinas' operations are regulated and qualify for regulatory accounting. Duke Energy Carolinas operates one reportable
business segment, EU&I. For additional information regarding this business segment, including ﬁnancial information, see Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements, “Business Segments.”
PROGRESS ENERGY
Progress Energy is a public utility holding company primarily engaged in the regulated electric utility business and is subject to regulation by the FERC.
Progress Energy conducts operations through its wholly owned subsidiaries, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida. When discussing Progress
Energy’s ﬁnancial information, it necessarily includes the results of Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida.
Substantially all of Progress Energy’s operations are regulated and qualify for regulatory accounting. Progress Energy operates one reportable business
segment, EU&I. For additional information regarding this business segment, including ﬁnancial information, see Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements, “Business Segments.”
DUKE ENERGY PROGRESS
Duke Energy Progress is a regulated public utility primarily engaged in the generation, transmission, distribution and sale of electricity in portions of North
Carolina and South Carolina. Duke Energy Progress’ service area covers approximately 29,000 square miles and supplies electric service to approximately 1.7
million residential, commercial and industrial customers. For information about Duke Energy Progress’ generating facilities, see Item 2, “Properties.” Duke
Energy Progress is subject to the regulatory provisions of the NCUC, PSCSC, NRC and FERC.
Substantially all of Duke Energy Progress’ operations are regulated and qualify for regulatory accounting. Duke Energy Progress operates one reportable
business segment, EU&I. For additional information regarding this business segment, including ﬁnancial information, see Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements, “Business Segments.”
22
PART I
DUKE ENERGY FLORIDA
Duke Energy Florida is a regulated public utility primarily engaged in the generation, transmission, distribution and sale of electricity in portions of Florida.
Duke Energy Florida’s service area covers approximately 13,000 square miles and supplies electric service to approximately 1.9 million residential,
commercial and industrial customers. For information about Duke Energy Florida’s generating facilities, see Item 2, “Properties.” Duke Energy Florida is
subject to the regulatory provisions of the FPSC, NRC and FERC.
Substantially all of Duke Energy Florida’s operations are regulated and qualify for regulatory accounting. Duke Energy Florida operates one reportable
business segment, EU&I. For additional information regarding this business segment, including ﬁnancial information, see Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements, “Business Segments.”
DUKE ENERGY OHIO
Duke Energy Ohio is a regulated public utility primarily engaged in the transmission and distribution of electricity in portions of Ohio and Kentucky, in the
generation and sale of electricity in portions of Kentucky and the transportation and sale of natural gas in portions of Ohio and Kentucky. Duke Energy Ohio
also conducts competitive auctions for retail electricity supply in Ohio whereby recovery of the energy price is from retail customers. Operations in Kentucky
are conducted through its wholly owned subsidiary, Duke Energy Kentucky. References herein to Duke Energy Ohio include Duke Energy Ohio and its
subsidiaries, unless otherwise noted. Duke Energy Ohio is subject to the regulatory provisions of the PUCO, KPSC, PHMSA and FERC.
Duke Energy Ohio’s service area covers approximately 3,000 square miles and supplies electric service to approximately 900,000 residential, commercial
and industrial customers and provides transmission and distribution services for natural gas to approximately 550,000 customers. For information about
Duke Energy Ohio's generating facilities, see Item 2, “Properties.”
KO Transmission, a wholly owned subsidiary of Duke Energy Ohio, is an interstate pipeline company engaged in the business of transporting natural gas and
is subject to the rules and regulations of FERC. KO Transmission's 90-mile pipeline supplies natural gas to Duke Energy Ohio and interconnects with the
Columbia Gulf Transmission pipeline and Tennessee Gas Pipeline. An approximately 70-mile portion of KO Transmission's pipeline facilities is co-owned by
Columbia Gas Transmission, LLC. KO Transmission sold all of its pipeline facilities and related real property to Columbia Gas Transmission, LLC on February 1,
2023, for approximately book value.
Substantially all of Duke Energy Ohio's operations are regulated and qualify for regulatory accounting. Duke Energy Ohio has two reportable segments, EU&I
and GU&I. For additional information on these business segments, including ﬁnancial information, see Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial Statements,
“Business Segments.”
DUKE ENERGY INDIANA
Duke Energy Indiana is a regulated public utility primarily engaged in the generation, transmission, distribution and sale of electricity in portions of Indiana.
Duke Energy Indiana’s service area covers 23,000 square miles and supplies electric service to 890,000 residential, commercial and industrial customers. For
information about Duke Energy Indiana's generating facilities, see Item 2, “Properties.” Duke Energy Indiana is subject to the regulatory provisions of the
IURC and FERC.
In 2021, Duke Energy executed an agreement providing for an investment in Duke Energy Indiana by GIC. The transaction was completed following two
closings. For additional information, see Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Dispositions."
Substantially all of Duke Energy Indiana’s operations are regulated and qualify for regulatory accounting. Duke Energy Indiana operates one reportable
business segment, EU&I. For additional information regarding this business segment, including ﬁnancial information, see Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements, “Business Segments.”
PIEDMONT
Piedmont is a regulated public utility primarily engaged in the distribution of natural gas to over 1.1 million residential, commercial, industrial and power
generation customers in portions of North Carolina, South Carolina and Tennessee, including customers served by municipalities who are wholesale
customers. For information about Piedmont's natural gas distribution facilities, see Item 2, "Properties." Piedmont is subject to the regulatory provisions of
the NCUC, PSCSC, TPUC, PHMSA and FERC.
Substantially all of Piedmont’s operations are regulated and qualify for regulatory accounting. Piedmont operates one reportable business segment, GU&I.
For additional information regarding this business segment, including ﬁnancial information, see Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Business
Segments.”
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
In addition to other disclosures within this Form 10-K, including "Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations –
Matters Impacting Future Results" for each registrant in Item 7, and other documents ﬁled with the SEC from time to time, the following factors should be
considered in evaluating Duke Energy and its subsidiaries. Such factors could aﬀect actual results of operations and cause results to diﬀer substantially from
those currently expected or sought. Unless otherwise indicated, risk factors discussed below generally relate to risks associated with all of the Duke Energy
Registrants. Risks identiﬁed at the Subsidiary Registrant level are generally applicable to Duke Energy.
23
RISK FACTORS
BUSINESS STRATEGY RISKS
Duke Energy’s future results could be adversely aﬀected if it is unable to implement its business strategy including achieving its carbon
emissions reduction goals.
Duke Energy’s results of operations depend, in signiﬁcant part, on the extent to which it can implement its business strategy successfully. Duke Energy's
clean energy transition, which includes achieving net-zero carbon emissions from electricity generation by 2050, modernizing the regulatory construct,
transforming the customer experience, and digital transformation, is subject to business, policy, regulatory, technology, economic and competitive
uncertainties and contingencies, many of which are beyond its control and may make those goals diﬃcult to achieve.
Federal or state policies could be enacted that restrict the availability of fuels or generation technologies, such as natural gas or nuclear power, that enable
Duke Energy to reduce its carbon emissions. Supportive policies may be needed to facilitate the siting and cost recovery of transmission and distribution
upgrades needed to accommodate the build out of large volumes of renewables and energy storage. Further, the approval of our state regulators will be
necessary for the company to continue to retire existing carbon emitting assets or make investments in new generating capacity. The company may be
constrained by the ability to procure resources or labor needed to build new generation at a reasonable price as well as to construct projects on time. In
addition, new technologies that are not yet commercially available or are unproven at utility scale will likely be needed including new resources capable of
following electric load over long durations such as advanced nuclear, hydrogen and long-duration storage, If these technologies are not developed or are not
available at reasonable prices, or if we invest in early stage technologies that are then supplanted by technological breakthroughs, Duke Energy’s ability to
achieve a net-zero target by 2050 at a cost-eﬀective price could be at risk.
Achieving our carbon reduction goals will require continued operation of our existing carbon-free technologies including nuclear and renewables. The rapid
transition to and expansion of certain low-carbon resources, such as renewables without cost-eﬀective storage, may challenge our ability to meet customer
expectations of reliability in a carbon constrained environment. Our nuclear ﬂeet is central to our ability to meet these objectives and customer expectations.
We are continuing to seek to renew the operating licenses of the 11 reactors we operate at six nuclear stations for an additional 20 years, extending their
operating lives to and beyond midcentury. Failure to receive approval from the NRC for the relicensing of any of these reactors could aﬀect our ability to
achieve a net-zero target by 2050.
As a consequence, Duke Energy may not be able to fully implement or realize the anticipated results of its energy transition strategy, which may have an
adverse eﬀect on its ﬁnancial condition.
REGULATORY, LEGISLATIVE AND LEGAL RISKS
The Duke Energy Registrants’ regulated utility revenues, earnings and results of operations are dependent on state legislation and
regulation that aﬀect electric generation, electric and natural gas transmission, distribution and related activities, which may limit their
ability to recover costs.
The Duke Energy Registrants’ regulated electric and natural gas utility businesses are regulated on a cost-of-service/rate-of-return basis subject to statutes
and regulatory commission rules and procedures of North Carolina, South Carolina, Florida, Ohio, Tennessee, Indiana and Kentucky. If the Duke Energy
Registrants’ regulated utility earnings exceed the returns established by the state utility commissions, retail electric and natural gas rates may be subject to
review and possible reduction by the commissions, which may decrease the Duke Energy Registrants’ earnings. Additionally, if regulatory or legislative
bodies do not allow recovery of costs incurred in providing service, or do not do so on a timely basis, the Duke Energy Registrants’ earnings could be
negatively impacted. Diﬀerences in regulation between jurisdictions with concurrent operations, such as North Carolina and South Carolina in Duke Energy
Carolinas' and Duke Energy Progress' service territory, may also result in failure to recover costs.
If legislative and regulatory structures were to evolve in such a way that the Duke Energy Registrants’ exclusive rights to serve their regulated customers
were eroded, their earnings could be negatively impacted. Federal and state regulations, laws, commercialization and reduction of costs and other eﬀorts
designed to promote and expand the use of EE measures and distributed generation technologies, such as private solar and battery storage, in Duke Energy
service territories could reduce recovery of ﬁxed costs in Duke Energy service territories or result in customers leaving the electric distribution system and an
increase in customer net energy metering, which allows customers with private solar to receive bill credits for surplus power at the full retail amount. Over
time, customer adoption of these technologies could result in Duke Energy not being able to fully recover the costs and investment in generation.
State regulators have approved various mechanisms to stabilize natural gas utility margins, including margin decoupling in North Carolina and rate
stabilization in South Carolina. State regulators have approved other margin stabilizing mechanisms that, for example, allow for recovery of margin losses
associated with negotiated transactions designed to retain large volume customers that could use alternative fuels or that may otherwise directly access
natural gas supply through their own connection to an interstate pipeline. If regulators decided to discontinue the Duke Energy Registrants' use of tariﬀ
mechanisms, it would negatively impact results of operations, ﬁnancial position and cash ﬂows. In addition, regulatory authorities also review whether
natural gas costs are prudently incurred and can disallow the recovery of a portion of natural gas costs that the Duke Energy Registrants seek to recover
from customers, which would adversely impact earnings.
The rates that the Duke Energy Registrants’ regulated utility businesses are allowed to charge are established by state utility commissions
in rate case proceedings, which may limit their ability to recover costs and earn an appropriate return on investment.
The rates that the Duke Energy Registrants’ regulated utility businesses are allowed to charge signiﬁcantly inﬂuences the results of operations, ﬁnancial
position and cash ﬂows of the Duke Energy Registrants. The regulation of the rates that the regulated utility businesses charge customers is determined, in
large part, by state utility commissions in rate case proceedings. Negative decisions made by these regulators, or by any court on appeal of a rate case
proceeding, have, and in the future could have, a material adverse eﬀect on the Duke Energy Registrants’ results of operations, ﬁnancial position or cash
ﬂows and aﬀect the ability of the Duke Energy Registrants to recover costs and an appropriate return on the signiﬁcant infrastructure investments being
made.
24
RISK FACTORS
Deregulation or restructuring in the electric industry may result in increased competition and unrecovered costs that could adversely aﬀect
the Duke Energy Registrants’ results of operations, ﬁnancial position or cash ﬂows and their utility businesses.
Increased competition resulting from deregulation or restructuring legislation could have a signiﬁcant adverse impact on the Duke Energy Registrants’ results
of operations, ﬁnancial position or cash ﬂows and their utility businesses. If the retail jurisdictions served by the Duke Energy Registrants become subject to
deregulation, the impairment of assets, loss of retail customers, lower proﬁt margins or increased costs of capital, and recovery of stranded costs could have
a signiﬁcant adverse ﬁnancial impact on the Duke Energy Registrants. Stranded costs primarily include the generation assets of the Duke Energy Registrants
whose value in a competitive marketplace may be less than their current book value, as well as above-market purchased power commitments from QFs from
whom the Duke Energy Registrants are legally obligated to purchase energy at an avoided cost rate under PURPA. The Duke Energy Registrants cannot
predict the extent and timing of entry by additional competitors into the electric markets. The Duke Energy Registrants cannot predict if or when they will be
subject to changes in legislation or regulation, nor can they predict the impact of these changes on their results of operations, ﬁnancial position or cash
ﬂows.
The Duke Energy Registrants’ businesses are subject to extensive federal regulation and a wide variety of laws and governmental policies,
including taxes and environmental regulations, that may change over time in ways that aﬀect operations and costs.
The Duke Energy Registrants are subject to regulations under a wide variety of U.S. federal and state regulations and policies, including by FERC, NRC, EPA
and various other federal agencies as well as the North American Electric Reliability Corporation. Regulation aﬀects almost every aspect of the Duke Energy
Registrants’ businesses, including, among other things, their ability to: take fundamental business management actions; determine the terms and rates of
transmission and distribution services; make acquisitions; issue equity or debt securities; engage in transactions with other subsidiaries and aﬃliates; and
pay dividends upstream to the Duke Energy Registrants. Changes to federal regulations are continuous and ongoing. There can be no assurance that laws,
regulations and policies will not be changed in ways that result in material modiﬁcations of business models and objectives or aﬀect returns on investment
by restricting activities and products, subjecting them to escalating costs, causing delays, or prohibiting them outright.
The Duke Energy Registrants are subject to numerous environmental laws and regulations requiring signiﬁcant capital expenditures that
can increase the cost of operations, and which may impact or limit business plans, or cause exposure to environmental liabilities.
The Duke Energy Registrants are subject to numerous environmental laws and regulations aﬀecting many aspects of their present and future operations,
including CCRs, air emissions, water quality, wastewater discharges, solid waste and hazardous waste. These laws and regulations can result in increased
capital, operating and other costs. These laws and regulations generally require the Duke Energy Registrants to obtain and comply with a wide variety of
environmental licenses, permits, inspections and other approvals. Compliance with environmental laws and regulations can require signiﬁcant expenditures,
including expenditures for cleanup costs and damages arising from contaminated properties. Failure to comply with environmental regulations may result in
the imposition of ﬁnes, penalties and injunctive measures aﬀecting operating assets. The steps the Duke Energy Registrants could be required to take to
ensure their facilities are in compliance could be prohibitively expensive. As a result, the Duke Energy Registrants may be required to shut down or alter the
operation of their facilities, which may cause the Duke Energy Registrants to incur losses. Further, the Duke Energy Registrants may not be successful in
recovering capital and operating costs incurred to comply with new environmental regulations through existing regulatory rate structures and their contracts
with customers. Also, the Duke Energy Registrants may not be able to obtain or maintain from time to time all required environmental regulatory approvals
for their operating assets or development projects. Delays in obtaining any required environmental regulatory approvals, failure to obtain and comply with
them or changes in environmental laws or regulations to more stringent compliance levels could result in additional costs of operation for existing facilities or
development of new facilities being prevented, delayed or subject to additional costs. Although it is not expected that the costs to comply with current
environmental regulations will have a material adverse eﬀect on the Duke Energy Registrants’ results of operations, ﬁnancial position and cash ﬂows due to
regulatory cost recovery, the Duke Energy Registrants are at risk that the costs of complying with environmental regulations in the future will have such an
eﬀect.
The EPA has enacted or proposed federal regulations governing the management of cooling water intake structures, wastewater and CO emissions. New
state legislation could impose carbon reduction goals that are more aggressive than the company's plans. These regulations may require the Duke Energy
Registrants to make additional capital expenditures and increase operating and maintenance costs.
The Duke Energy Registrants' operations, capital expenditures and ﬁnancial results may be aﬀected by regulatory changes related to the
impacts of global climate change.
There is continued concern, and increasing activism, both nationally and internationally, about climate change. The EPA and state regulators have, and may
adopt and implement, additional regulations to restrict emissions of GHGs to address global climate change. Certain local and state jurisdictions have also
enacted laws to restrict or prevent new natural gas infrastructure. Increased regulation of GHG emissions could impose signiﬁcant additional costs on the
Duke Energy Registrants' electric and natural gas operations, their suppliers and customers and aﬀect demand for energy conservation and renewable
products, which could impact both our electric and natural gas businesses. Regulatory changes could also result in generation facilities to be retired earlier
than planned to meet our net-zero 2050 goal. Though we would plan to seek cost recovery for investments related to GHG emissions reductions through
regulatory rate structures, changes in the regulatory climate could result in the delay in or failure to fully recover such costs and investment in generation.
OPERATIONAL RISKS
The Duke Energy Registrants’ results of operations may be negatively aﬀected by overall market, economic and other conditions that are
beyond their control.
Sustained downturns or sluggishness in the economy generally aﬀect the markets in which the Duke Energy Registrants operate and negatively inﬂuence
operations. Declines in demand for electricity or natural gas as a result of economic downturns in the Duke Energy Registrants’ regulated service territories
will reduce overall sales and lessen cash ﬂows, especially as industrial customers reduce production and, therefore, consumption of electricity and the use of
natural gas. Although the Duke Energy Registrants’ regulated electric and natural gas businesses are subject to regulated allowable rates of return and
recovery of certain costs, such as fuel and purchased natural gas costs, under periodic adjustment clauses, overall declines in electricity or natural gas sold
as a result of economic downturn or recession could reduce revenues and cash ﬂows, thereby diminishing results of operations.2
25
RISK FACTORS
A continuation of adverse economic conditions including economic downturn or high commodity prices could also negatively impact the ﬁnancial stability of
certain of our customers and result in their inability to pay for electric and natural gas services. This could lead to increased bad debt expense and higher
allowance for doubtful account reserves for the Duke Energy Registrants and result in delayed or unrecovered operating costs and lower ﬁnancial results.
Additionally, prolonged economic downturns that negatively impact the Duke Energy Registrants’ results of operations and cash ﬂows could result in future
material impairment charges to write-down the carrying value of certain assets, including goodwill, to their respective fair values. The Duke Energy
Registrants also monitor the impacts of inﬂation on the procurement of goods and services and seek to minimize its eﬀects in future periods through pricing
strategies, productivity improvements, and cost reductions. Rapidly rising prices as a result of inﬂation or other factors may impact the ability of the
company to recover costs timely or execute on its business strategy including the achievement of growth objectives.
The Duke Energy Registrants sell electricity into the spot market or other competitive power markets on a contractual basis. With respect to such
transactions, the Duke Energy Registrants are not guaranteed any rate of return on their capital investments through mandated rates, and revenues and
results of operations are likely to depend, in large part, upon prevailing market prices. These market prices may ﬂuctuate substantially over relatively short
periods of time and could negatively impact the company's ability to accurately forecast the ﬁnancial impact or reduce the Duke Energy Registrants’
revenues and margins, thereby diminishing results of operations.
Factors that could impact sales volumes, generation of electricity and market prices at which the Duke Energy Registrants are able to sell electricity and
natural gas are as follows:
• weather conditions, including abnormally mild winter or summer weather that cause lower energy or natural gas usage for heating or cooling
purposes, as applicable, and periods of low rainfall that decrease the ability to operate facilities in an economical manner;
• supply of and demand for energy commodities;
• transmission or transportation constraints or ineﬃciencies that impact nonregulated energy operations;
• availability of purchased power;
• availability of competitively priced alternative energy sources, which are preferred by some customers over electricity produced from coal, nuclear
or natural gas plants, and customer usage of energy-eﬃcient equipment that reduces energy demand;
• natural gas, crude oil and reﬁned products production levels and prices;
• ability to procure satisfactory levels of inventory, including materials, supplies, and fuel such as coal, natural gas and uranium; and
• capacity and transmission service into, or out of, the Duke Energy Registrants’ markets.
Natural disasters or operational accidents may adversely aﬀect the Duke Energy Registrants’ operating results.
Natural disasters or operational accidents within the company or industry (such as forest ﬁres, earthquakes, hurricanes or natural gas transmission pipeline
explosions) could have direct or indirect impacts to the Duke Energy Registrants or to key contractors and suppliers. Further, the generation of electricity and
the transportation and storage of natural gas involve inherent operating risks that may result in accidents involving serious injury or loss of life,
environmental damage or property damage. Such events could impact the Duke Energy Registrants through changes to policies, laws and regulations whose
compliance costs have a signiﬁcant impact on the Duke Energy Registrants’ results of operations, ﬁnancial position and cash ﬂows. In addition, if a serious
operational accident were to occur, existing insurance policies may not cover all of the potential exposures or the actual amount of loss incurred, including
potential litigation awards. Any losses not covered by insurance, or any increases in the cost of applicable insurance as a result of such accident, could have
a material adverse eﬀect on the results of operations, ﬁnancial position, cash ﬂows and reputation of the Duke Energy Registrants.
The reputation and ﬁnancial condition of the Duke Energy Registrants could be negatively impacted due to their obligations to comply with
federal and state regulations, laws, and other legal requirements that govern the operations, assessments, storage, closure, remediation,
disposal and monitoring relating to CCR, the high costs and new rate impacts associated with implementing these new CCR-related
requirements and the strategies and methods necessary to implement these requirements in compliance with these legal obligations.
As a result of electricity produced for decades at coal-ﬁred power plants, the Duke Energy Registrants manage large amounts of CCR that are primarily
stored in dry storage within landﬁlls or combined with water in surface impoundments, all in compliance with applicable regulatory requirements. A CCR-
related operational incident could have a material adverse impact on the reputation and results of operations, ﬁnancial position and cash ﬂows of the Duke
Energy Registrants.
During 2015, EPA regulations were enacted related to the management of CCR from power plants. These regulations classify CCR as nonhazardous waste
under the RCRA and apply to electric generating sites with new and existing landﬁlls and, new and existing surface impoundments, and establish
requirements regarding landﬁll design, structural integrity design and assessment criteria for surface impoundments, groundwater monitoring, protection
and remedial procedures and other operational and reporting procedures for the disposal and management of CCR. In addition to the federal regulations,
CCR landﬁlls and surface impoundments will continue to be regulated by existing state laws, regulations and permits, as well as additional legal
requirements that may be imposed in the future, such as the settlement reached with the NCDEQ to excavate seven of the nine remaining coal ash basins in
North Carolina, and partially excavate the remaining two, and the EPA's January 11, 2022, issuance of a letter interpreting the CCR Rule, including its
applicability and closure provisions. These federal and state laws, regulations and other legal requirements may require or result in additional expenditures,
including increased operating and maintenance costs, which could aﬀect the results of operations, ﬁnancial position and cash ﬂows of the Duke Energy
Registrants. The Duke Energy Registrants will continue to seek full cost recovery for expenditures through the normal ratemaking process with state and
federal utility commissions, who permit recovery in rates of necessary and prudently incurred costs associated with the Duke Energy Registrants’ regulated
operations, and through other wholesale contracts with terms that contemplate recovery of such costs, although there is no guarantee of full cost recovery.
In addition, the timing for and amount of recovery of such costs could have a material adverse impact on Duke Energy's cash ﬂows.
26
RISK FACTORS
The Duke Energy Registrants have recognized signiﬁcant AROs related to these CCR-related requirements. Closure activities began in 2015 at the four sites
speciﬁed as high priority by the Coal Ash Act and at the W.S. Lee Steam Station site in South Carolina in connection with other legal requirements. Excavation
at these sites involves movement of CCR materials to oﬀ-site locations for use as structural ﬁll, to appropriately engineered oﬀ-site or on-site lined landﬁlls or
conversion of the ash for beneﬁcial use. Duke Energy has completed excavation of coal ash at the four high-priority North Carolina sites. At other sites,
planning and closure methods have been studied and factored into the estimated retirement and management costs, and closure activities have
commenced. As the closure and CCR management work progresses and ﬁnal closure plans and corrective action measures are developed and approved at
each site, the scope and complexity of work and the amount of CCR material could be greater than estimates and could, therefore, materially increase
compliance expenditures and rate impacts.
The Duke Energy Registrants’ results of operations, ﬁnancial position and cash ﬂows may be negatively aﬀected by a lack of growth or
slower growth in the number of customers, or decline in customer demand or number of customers.
Growth in customer accounts and growth of customer usage each directly inﬂuence demand for electricity and natural gas and the need for additional power
generation and delivery facilities. Customer growth and customer usage are aﬀected by several factors outside the control of the Duke Energy Registrants,
such as mandated EE measures, demand-side management goals, distributed generation resources and economic and demographic conditions, such as
inﬂation and interest rate volatility, population changes, job and income growth, housing starts, new business formation and the overall level of economic
activity.
In addition, certain regulatory and legislative bodies have passed legislation implementing the extension of certain tax credits to be used toward the costs of
residential solar installation or have introduced or are considering requirements and/or incentives to reduce energy consumption by certain dates in response
to concerns related to climate change. Additionally, technological advances driven by federal laws mandating new levels of EE in end-use electric and natural
gas devices or other improvements in or applications of technology could lead to declines in per capita energy consumption.
Advances in distributed generation technologies that produce power, including fuel cells, microturbines, wind turbines and solar cells, may reduce the cost of
alternative methods of producing power to a level competitive with central power station electric production utilized by the Duke Energy Registrants. In
addition, the electriﬁcation of buildings and appliances currently relying on natural gas could reduce the number of customers in our natural gas distribution
business.
Some or all of these factors could result in a lack of growth or decline in customer demand for electricity or number of customers and may cause the failure
of the Duke Energy Registrants to fully realize anticipated beneﬁts from signiﬁcant capital investments and expenditures, which could have a material
adverse eﬀect on their results of operations, ﬁnancial position and cash ﬂows.
Furthermore, the Duke Energy Registrants currently have EE riders in place to recover the cost of EE programs in North Carolina, South Carolina, Florida,
Indiana, Ohio and Kentucky. Should the Duke Energy Registrants be required to invest in conservation measures that result in reduced sales from eﬀective
conservation, regulatory lag in adjusting rates for the impact of these measures could have a negative ﬁnancial impact.
The Duke Energy Registrants future results of operations may be impacted by changing expectations and demands including heightened
emphasis on environmental, social and governance concerns.
Duke Energy’s ability to execute its strategy and achieve anticipated ﬁnancial outcomes are inﬂuenced by the expectations of our customers, regulators,
investors, and stakeholders. Those expectations are based in part on the core fundamentals of reliability and aﬀordability but are also increasingly focused
on our ability to meet rapidly changing demands for new and varied products, services and oﬀerings. Additionally, the risks of global climate change
continues to shape our customers’ sustainability goals and energy needs as well as the investment and ﬁnancing criteria of investors. Failure to meet these
increasing expectations or to adequately address the risks and external pressures from regulators, customers, investors and other stakeholders may impact
Duke Energy’s reputation and aﬀect its ability to achieve favorable outcomes in future rate cases and the results of operations for the Duke Energy
Registrants. Furthermore, the increasing use of social media may accelerate and increase the potential scope of negative publicity we might receive and
could increase the negative impact on our reputation, business, results of operations, and ﬁnancial condition.
As it relates to electric generation, a diversiﬁed ﬂeet with increasingly clean generation resources may facilitate more eﬃcient ﬁnancing and lower costs.
Conversely, jurisdictions utilizing more carbon-intensive generation such as coal may experience diﬃculty attracting certain investors and obtaining the most
economical ﬁnancing terms available. Furthermore, with this heightened emphasis on environmental, social, and governance concerns, and climate change
in particular, there is an increased risk of litigation, activism, and legislation from groups both in support of and opposed to various environmental, social and
governance initiatives, which could cause delays and increase the costs of our clean energy transition.
The Duke Energy Registrants’ operating results may ﬂuctuate on a seasonal and quarterly basis and can be negatively aﬀected by changes
in weather conditions and severe weather, including extreme weather conditions and changes in weather patterns from climate change.
Electric power generation and natural gas distribution are generally seasonal businesses. In most parts of the U.S., the demand for power peaks during the
warmer summer months, with market prices also typically peaking at that time. In other areas, demand for power peaks during the winter. Demand for
natural gas peaks during the winter months. Further, changing frequency or magnitude of extreme weather conditions such as hurricanes, droughts, heat
waves, winter storms and severe weather, including from climate change, could cause these seasonal ﬂuctuations to be more pronounced. As a result, the
overall operating results of the Duke Energy Registrants’ businesses may ﬂuctuate substantially on a seasonal and quarterly basis and thus make period-to-
period comparison less relevant.
Sustained severe drought conditions could impact generation by hydroelectric plants, as well as fossil and nuclear plant operations, as these facilities use
water for cooling purposes and for the operation of environmental compliance equipment. Furthermore, destruction caused by severe weather events, such
as hurricanes, ﬂooding, tornadoes, severe thunderstorms, snow and ice storms, including from climate change, can result in lost operating revenues due to
outages, property damage, including downed transmission and distribution lines, and additional and unexpected expenses to mitigate storm damage. The
cost of storm restoration eﬀorts may not be fully recoverable through the regulatory process.
27
RISK FACTORS
The Duke Energy Registrants’ sales may decrease if they are unable to gain adequate, reliable and aﬀordable access to transmission
assets.
The Duke Energy Registrants depend on transmission and distribution facilities owned and operated by utilities and other energy companies to deliver
electricity sold to the wholesale market. In addition, the growth of renewables and energy storage will put strains on existing transmission assets and require
transmission and distribution upgrades. The FERC’s power transmission regulations require wholesale electric transmission services to be oﬀered on an open-
access, non-discriminatory basis. If transmission is disrupted, or if transmission capacity is inadequate, the Duke Energy Registrants’ ability to sell and
deliver products may be hindered.
The diﬀerent regional power markets have changing regulatory structures, which could aﬀect growth and performance in these regions. In addition, the ISOs
who oversee the transmission systems in regional power markets have imposed in the past, and may impose in the future, price limitations and other
mechanisms to address volatility in the power markets. These types of price limitations and other mechanisms may adversely impact the proﬁtability of the
Duke Energy Registrants’ wholesale power marketing business.
The availability of adequate interstate pipeline transportation capacity and natural gas supply may decrease.
The Duke Energy Registrants purchase almost all of their natural gas supply from interstate sources that must be transported to the applicable service
territories. Interstate pipeline companies transport the natural gas to the Duke Energy Registrants' systems under ﬁrm service agreements that are designed
to meet the requirements of their core markets. A signiﬁcant disruption to interstate pipelines capacity or reduction in natural gas supply due to events
including, but not limited to, operational failures or disruptions, hurricanes, tornadoes, ﬂoods, freeze oﬀ of natural gas wells, terrorist or cyberattacks or other
acts of war or legislative or regulatory actions or requirements, including remediation related to integrity inspections or regulations and laws enacted to
address climate change, could reduce the normal interstate supply of natural gas and thereby reduce earnings. Moreover, if additional natural gas
infrastructure, including, but not limited to, exploration and drilling rigs and platforms, processing and gathering systems, oﬀshore pipelines, interstate
pipelines and storage, cannot be built at a pace that meets demand, then growth opportunities could be limited.
Fluctuations in commodity prices or availability may adversely aﬀect various aspects of the Duke Energy Registrants’ operations as well as
their results of operations, ﬁnancial position and cash ﬂows.
The Duke Energy Registrants are exposed to the eﬀects of market ﬂuctuations in the price of natural gas, coal, fuel oil, nuclear fuel, electricity and other
energy-related commodities as a result of their ownership of energy-related assets. Fuel costs are recovered primarily through cost recovery clauses, subject
to the approval of state utility commissions.
Additionally, the Duke Energy Registrants are exposed to risk that counterparties will not be able to fulﬁll their obligations. Disruption in the delivery of fuel,
including disruptions as a result of, among other things, bankruptcies, transportation delays, weather, labor relations, force majeure events or environmental
regulations aﬀecting any of these fuel suppliers, could limit the Duke Energy Registrants' ability to operate their facilities. Should counterparties fail to
perform, the Duke Energy Registrants might be forced to replace the underlying commitment at prevailing market prices possibly resulting in losses in
addition to the amounts, if any, already paid to the counterparties.
Certain of the Duke Energy Registrants’ hedge agreements may result in the receipt of, or posting of, collateral with counterparties, depending on the daily
market-based calculation of ﬁnancial exposure of the derivative positions. Fluctuations in commodity prices that lead to the return of collateral received
and/or the posting of collateral with counterparties could negatively impact liquidity. Downgrades in the Duke Energy Registrants’ credit ratings could lead to
additional collateral posting requirements. The Duke Energy Registrants continually monitor derivative positions in relation to market price activity.
Cyberattacks and data security breaches could adversely aﬀect the Duke Energy Registrants' businesses.
Cybersecurity risks have increased in recent years as a result of the proliferation of new technologies and the increased sophistication, magnitude and
frequency of cyberattacks and data security breaches. Duke Energy relies on the continued operation of sophisticated digital information technology systems
and network infrastructure, which are part of an interconnected regional grid. Additionally, connectivity to the internet continues to increase through grid
modernization and other operational excellence initiatives. Because of the critical nature of the infrastructure, increased connectivity to the internet and
technology systems’ inherent vulnerability to disability or failures due to hacking, viruses, acts of war or terrorism or other types of data security breaches,
the Duke Energy Registrants face a heightened risk of cyberattack from foreign or domestic sources and have been subject, and will likely continue to be
subject, to attempts to gain unauthorized access to information and/or information systems or to disrupt utility operations through computer viruses and
phishing attempts either directly or indirectly through its material vendors or related third parties. In the event of a signiﬁcant cybersecurity breach on either
the Duke Energy Registrants or with one of our material vendors or related third parties, the Duke Energy Registrants could (i) have business operations
disrupted, including the disruption of the operation of our natural gas and electric assets and the power grid, theft of conﬁdential company, employee,
retiree, shareholder, vendor or customer information, and general business systems and process interruption or compromise, including preventing the Duke
Energy Registrants from servicing customers, collecting revenues or the recording, processing and/or reporting ﬁnancial information correctly, (ii) experience
substantial loss of revenues, repair and restoration costs, penalties and costs for lack of compliance with relevant regulations, implementation costs for
additional security measures to avert future cyberattacks and other ﬁnancial loss and (iii) be subject to increased regulation, litigation and reputational
damage. While Duke Energy maintains insurance relating to cybersecurity events, such insurance is subject to a number of exclusions and may be
insuﬃcient to oﬀset any losses, costs or damage experienced. Also, the market for cybersecurity insurance is relatively new and coverage available for
cybersecurity events is evolving as the industry matures.
28
RISK FACTORS
The Duke Energy Registrants are subject to standards enacted by the North American Electric Reliability Corporation and enforced by FERC regarding
protection of the physical and cybersecurity of critical infrastructure assets required for operating North America's bulk electric system. The Duke Energy
Registrants are also subject to regulations set by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission regarding the protection of digital computer and communication
systems and networks required for the operation of nuclear power plants. The Duke Energy Registrants that operate designated critical pipelines that
transport natural gas are also subject to security directives issued by the Department of Homeland Security's Transportation Security Administration (TSA)
requiring such registrants to implement speciﬁc cybersecurity mitigation measures. While the Duke Energy Registrants believe they are in compliance with,
or, in the case of recent TSA security directives, are in the process of implementing such standards and regulations, the Duke Energy Registrants have from
time to time been, and may in the future be, found to be in violation of such standards and regulations. In addition, compliance with or changes in the
applicable standards and regulations may subject the Duke Energy Registrants to higher operating costs and/or increased capital expenditures as well as
substantial ﬁnes for non-compliance.
The Duke Energy Registrants’ operations have been and may be aﬀected by pandemic health events, including COVID-19, in ways listed
below and in ways the Duke Energy Registrants cannot predict at this time.
The COVID-19 pandemic and eﬀorts to respond to it have resulted in widespread adverse consequences on the global economy and on the Duke Energy
Registrants’ customers, third-party vendors, and other parties with whom we do business. If the COVID-19 pandemic or other health epidemics and outbreaks
that may occur are signiﬁcantly prolonged, it could impact the Duke Energy Registrants' business strategy, results of operations, ﬁnancial position and cash
ﬂows in the future as a result of delays in rate cases or other legal proceedings, an inability to obtain labor or equipment necessary for the construction of
large capital projects, an inability to procure satisfactory levels of fuels or other necessary equipment for the continued production of electricity and delivery
of natural gas, and the health and availability of our critical personnel and their ability to perform business functions.
Duke Energy Ohio’s and Duke Energy Indiana’s membership in an RTO presents risks that could have a material adverse eﬀect on their
results of operations, ﬁnancial position and cash ﬂows.
The rules governing the various regional power markets may change, which could aﬀect Duke Energy Ohio’s and Duke Energy Indiana’s costs and/or
revenues. To the degree Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana incur signiﬁcant additional fees and increased costs to participate in an RTO, their
results of operations may be impacted. Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana may be allocated a portion of the cost of transmission facilities built by
others due to changes in RTO transmission rate design. Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana may be required to expand their transmission system
according to decisions made by an RTO rather than their own internal planning process. In addition, RTOs have been developing rules associated with the
allocation and methodology of assigning costs associated with improved transmission reliability, reduced transmission congestion and ﬁrm transmission
rights that may have a ﬁnancial impact on the results of operations, ﬁnancial position and cash ﬂows of Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana.
As members of an RTO, Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana are subject to certain additional risks, including those associated with the allocation
among RTO members, of losses caused by unreimbursed defaults of other participants in the RTO markets and those associated with complaint cases ﬁled
against an RTO that may seek refunds of revenues previously earned by RTO members.
The Duke Energy Registrants may not recover costs incurred to begin construction on projects that are canceled.
Duke Energy’s long-term strategy requires the construction of new projects, either wholly owned or partially owned, which involve a number of risks,
including construction delays, delays in or failure to receive required regulatory approvals and/or sitting or environmental permits, nonperformance by
equipment and other third-party suppliers, and increases in equipment and labor costs. To limit the risks of these construction projects, the Duke Energy
Registrants enter into equipment purchase orders and construction contracts and incur engineering and design service costs in advance of receiving
necessary regulatory approvals and/or siting or environmental permits. If any of these projects are canceled for any reason, including failure to receive
necessary regulatory approvals and/or siting or environmental permits, signiﬁcant cancellation penalties under the equipment purchase orders and
construction contracts could occur. In addition, if any construction work or investments have been recorded as an asset, an impairment may need to be
recorded in the event the project is canceled.
The Duke Energy Registrants are subject to risks associated with their ability to obtain adequate insurance at acceptable costs.
The ﬁnancial condition of some insurance companies, actual or threatened physical or cyberattacks, and natural disasters, among other things, could have
disruptive eﬀects on insurance markets. The availability of insurance covering risks that the Duke Energy Registrants and their respective competitors
typically insure against may decrease, and the insurance that the Duke Energy Registrants are able to obtain may have higher deductibles, higher premiums,
and more restrictive policy terms. Further, the insurance policies may not cover all of the potential exposures or the actual amount of loss incurred. Any
losses not covered by insurance, or any increases in the cost of applicable insurance, could adversely aﬀect the results of operations, ﬁnancial position or
cash ﬂows of the aﬀected Duke Energy Registrant.
Our business could be negatively aﬀected as a result of actions of activist shareholders.
While we strive to maintain constructive communications with our shareholders, activist shareholders may, from time to time, engage in proxy solicitations
or advance shareholder proposals, or otherwise attempt to aﬀect changes and assert inﬂuence on our Board and management. Perceived uncertainties as to
the future direction or governance of the company may cause concern to our current or potential regulators, vendors or strategic partners, or make it more
diﬃcult to execute on our strategy or to attract and retain qualiﬁed personnel, which may have a material impact on our business and operating results.
In addition, actions such as those described above could cause ﬂuctuations in the trading price of our common stock, based on temporary or speculative
market perceptions or other factors that do not necessarily reﬂect the underlying fundamentals and prospects of our business.
29
RISK FACTORS
NUCLEAR GENERATION RISKS
Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida may incur substantial costs and liabilities due to their ownership
and operation of nuclear generating facilities.
Ownership interests in and operation of nuclear stations by Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida subject them to various
risks. These risks include, among other things: the potential harmful eﬀects on the environment and human health resulting from the current or past
operation of nuclear facilities and the storage, handling and disposal of radioactive materials; limitations on the amounts and types of insurance
commercially available to cover losses that might arise in connection with nuclear operations; and uncertainties with respect to the technological and
ﬁnancial aspects of decommissioning nuclear plants at the end of their licensed lives.
Ownership and operation of nuclear generation facilities requires compliance with licensing and safety-related requirements imposed by the NRC. In the
event of non-compliance, the NRC may increase regulatory oversight, impose ﬁnes or shut down a unit depending upon its assessment of the severity of the
situation. Revised security and safety requirements promulgated by the NRC, which could be prompted by, among other things, events within or outside of
the control of Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida, such as a serious nuclear incident at a facility owned by a third party,
could necessitate substantial capital and other expenditures, as well as assessments to cover third-party losses. In addition, if a serious nuclear incident were
to occur, it could have a material adverse eﬀect on the results of operations, ﬁnancial position, cash ﬂows and reputation of the Duke Energy Registrants.
LIQUIDITY, CAPITAL REQUIREMENTS AND COMMON STOCK RISKS
The Duke Energy Registrants rely on access to short-term borrowings and longer-term debt and equity markets to ﬁnance their capital
requirements and support their liquidity needs. Access to those markets can be adversely aﬀected by a number of conditions, many of
which are beyond the Duke Energy Registrants’ control.
The Duke Energy Registrants’ businesses are signiﬁcantly ﬁnanced through issuances of debt and equity. The maturity and repayment proﬁle of debt used to
ﬁnance investments often does not correlate to cash ﬂows from their assets. Accordingly, as a source of liquidity for capital requirements not satisﬁed by the
cash ﬂows from their operations and to fund investments originally ﬁnanced through debt instruments with disparate maturities, the Duke Energy
Registrants rely on access to short-term money markets as well as longer-term capital markets. The Subsidiary Registrants also rely on access to short-term
intercompany borrowings. If the Duke Energy Registrants are not able to access debt or equity at competitive rates or at all, the ability to ﬁnance their
operations and implement their strategy and business plan as scheduled could be adversely aﬀected. An inability to access debt and equity may limit the
Duke Energy Registrants’ ability to pursue improvements or acquisitions that they may otherwise rely on for future growth.
Market disruptions may increase the cost of borrowing or adversely aﬀect the ability to access one or more ﬁnancial markets. Such disruptions could include:
economic downturns, unfavorable capital market conditions, market prices for natural gas and coal, geopolitical risks, actual or threatened terrorist attacks,
or the overall health of the energy industry. Additionally, rapidly rising interest rates could impact the ability to aﬀordably ﬁnance the capital plan or increase
rates to customers and could have an impact on our ability to execute on our clean energy transition. The availability of credit under Duke Energy’s Master
Credit Facility depends upon the ability of the banks providing commitments under the facility to provide funds when their obligations to do so arise.
Systemic risk of the banking system and the ﬁnancial markets could prevent a bank from meeting its obligations under the facility agreement.
Duke Energy maintains a revolving credit facility to provide backup for its commercial paper program and letters of credit to support variable rate demand
tax-exempt bonds that may be put to the Duke Energy Registrant issuer at the option of the holder. The facility includes borrowing sublimits for the Duke
Energy Registrants, each of whom is a party to the credit facility, and ﬁnancial covenants that limit the amount of debt that can be outstanding as a
percentage of the total capital for the speciﬁc entity. Failure to maintain these covenants at a particular entity could preclude Duke Energy from issuing
commercial paper or the Duke Energy Registrants from issuing letters of credit or borrowing under the Master Credit Facility.
The Duke Energy Registrants must meet credit quality standards and there is no assurance they will maintain investment grade credit
ratings. If the Duke Energy Registrants are unable to maintain investment grade credit ratings, they would be required under credit
agreements to provide collateral in the form of letters of credit or cash, which may materially adversely aﬀect their liquidity.
Each of the Duke Energy Registrants’ senior long-term debt issuances is currently rated investment grade by various rating agencies. The Duke Energy
Registrants cannot ensure their senior long-term debt will be rated investment grade in the future.
If the rating agencies were to rate the Duke Energy Registrants below investment grade, borrowing costs would increase, perhaps signiﬁcantly. In addition,
the potential pool of investors and funding sources would likely decrease. Further, if the short-term debt rating were to fall, access to the commercial paper
market could be signiﬁcantly limited.
A downgrade below investment grade could also require the posting of additional collateral in the form of letters of credit or cash under various credit,
commodity and capacity agreements and trigger termination clauses in some interest rate derivative agreements, which would require cash payments. All of
these events would likely reduce the Duke Energy Registrants’ liquidity and proﬁtability and could have a material eﬀect on their results of operations,
ﬁnancial position and cash ﬂows.
Non-compliance with debt covenants or conditions could adversely aﬀect the Duke Energy Registrants’ ability to execute future
borrowings.
The Duke Energy Registrants’ debt and credit agreements contain various ﬁnancial and other covenants. Failure to meet those covenants beyond applicable
grace periods could result in accelerated due dates and/or termination of the agreements.
30
RISK FACTORS
Market performance and other changes may decrease the value of the NDTF investments of Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress
and Duke Energy Florida, which then could require signiﬁcant additional funding.
Ownership and operation of nuclear generation facilities also requires the maintenance of funded trusts that are intended to pay for the decommissioning
costs of the respective nuclear power plants. The performance of the capital markets aﬀects the values of the assets held in trust to satisfy these future
obligations. Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida have signiﬁcant obligations in this area and hold signiﬁcant assets in
these trusts. These assets are subject to market ﬂuctuations and will yield uncertain returns, which may fall below projected rates of return. Although a
number of factors impact funding requirements, a decline in the market value of the assets may increase the funding requirements of the obligations for
decommissioning nuclear plants. If Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida are unable to successfully manage their NDTF
assets, their results of operations, ﬁnancial position and cash ﬂows could be negatively aﬀected.
Poor investment performance of the Duke Energy pension plan holdings and other factors impacting pension plan costs could unfavorably
impact the Duke Energy Registrants’ liquidity and results of operations.
The costs of providing non-contributory deﬁned beneﬁt pension plans are dependent upon a number of factors, such as the rates of return on plan assets,
discount rates, the level of interest rates used to measure the required minimum funding levels of the plans, future government regulation and required or
voluntary contributions made to the plans. The Subsidiary Registrants are allocated their proportionate share of the cost and obligations related to these
plans. Without sustained growth in the pension investments over time to increase the value of plan assets and, depending upon the other factors impacting
costs as listed above, Duke Energy could be required to fund its plans with signiﬁcant amounts of cash. Such cash funding obligations, and the Subsidiary
Registrants’ proportionate share of such cash funding obligations, could have a material adverse impact on the Duke Energy Registrants’ results of
operations, ﬁnancial position and cash ﬂows.
Duke Energy is a holding company and depends on the cash ﬂows from its subsidiaries to meet its ﬁnancial obligations.
Because Duke Energy is a holding company with no operations or cash ﬂows of its own, its ability to meet its ﬁnancial obligations, including making interest
and principal payments on outstanding indebtedness and to pay dividends on its common stock, is primarily dependent on the net income and cash ﬂows of
its subsidiaries and the ability of those subsidiaries to pay upstream dividends or to repay borrowed funds. Prior to funding Duke Energy, its subsidiaries have
regulatory restrictions and ﬁnancial obligations that must be satisﬁed. These subsidiaries are separate legal entities and have no obligation to provide Duke
Energy with funds. In addition, Duke Energy may provide capital contributions or debt ﬁnancing to its subsidiaries under certain circumstances, which would
reduce the funds available to meet its ﬁnancial obligations, including making interest and principal payments on outstanding indebtedness and to pay
dividends on Duke Energy’s common stock.
GENERAL RISKS
The failure of Duke Energy information technology systems, or the failure to enhance existing information technology systems and
implement new technology, could adversely aﬀect the Duke Energy Registrants’ businesses.
Duke Energy’s operations are dependent upon the proper functioning of its internal systems, including the information technology systems that support our
underlying business processes. Any signiﬁcant failure or malfunction of such information technology systems may result in disruptions of our operations. In
the ordinary course of business, we rely on information technology systems, including the internet and third-party hosted services, to support a variety of
business processes and activities and to store sensitive data, including (i) intellectual property, (ii) proprietary business information, (iii) personally
identiﬁable information of our customers, employees, retirees and shareholders and (iv) data with respect to invoicing and the collection of payments,
accounting, procurement, and supply chain activities. Our information technology systems are dependent upon global communications and cloud service
providers, as well as their respective vendors, many of whom have at some point experienced signiﬁcant system failures and outages in the past and may
experience such failures and outages in the future. These providers’ systems are susceptible to cybersecurity and data breaches, outages from ﬁre, ﬂoods,
power loss, telecommunications failures, break-ins and similar events. Failure to prevent or mitigate data loss from system failures or outages could
materially aﬀect the results of operations, ﬁnancial position and cash ﬂows of the Duke Energy Registrants.
In addition to maintaining our current information technology systems, Duke Energy believes the digital transformation of its business is key to driving
internal eﬃciencies as well as providing additional capabilities to customers. Duke Energy’s information technology systems are critical to cost-eﬀective,
reliable daily operations and our ability to eﬀectively serve our customers. We expect our customers to continue to demand more sophisticated technology-
driven solutions and we must enhance or replace our information technology systems in response. This involves signiﬁcant development and implementation
costs to keep pace with changing technologies and customer demand. If we fail to successfully implement critical technology, or if it does not provide the
anticipated beneﬁts or meet customer demands, such failure could materially adversely aﬀect our business strategy as well as impact the results of
operations, ﬁnancial position and cash ﬂows of the Duke Energy Registrants.
Potential terrorist activities, or military or other actions, could adversely aﬀect the Duke Energy Registrants’ businesses.
The continued threat of terrorism and the impact of retaliatory military and other action by the U.S. and its allies may lead to increased political, economic
and ﬁnancial market instability and volatility in prices for natural gas and oil, which may have material adverse eﬀects in ways the Duke Energy Registrants
cannot predict at this time. In addition, future acts of terrorism and possible reprisals as a consequence of action by the U.S. and its allies could be directed
against companies operating in the U.S. Information technology systems, transportation systems for our fuel sources including natural gas pipelines,
transmission and distribution and generation facilities such as nuclear plants could be potential targets of terrorist activities or harmful activities by
individuals or groups that could have a material adverse eﬀect on Duke Energy Registrants' businesses. In particular, the Duke Energy Registrants may
experience increased capital and operating costs to implement increased security for their information technology systems, transmission and distribution
and generation facilities, including nuclear power plants under the NRC’s design basis threat requirements. These increased costs could include additional
physical plant security and security personnel or additional capability following a terrorist incident.
31
RISK FACTORS
Failure to attract and retain an appropriately qualiﬁed workforce could unfavorably impact the Duke Energy Registrants’ results of
operations.
Certain events, such as an aging workforce, mismatch of skill set or complement to future needs, or unavailability of contract resources may lead to
operating challenges and increased costs. The challenges include lack of resources, loss of knowledge base and the lengthy time required for skill
development. In this case, costs, including costs for contractors to replace employees, productivity costs and safety costs, may increase. Failure to hire and
adequately train replacement employees, including the transfer of signiﬁcant internal historical knowledge and expertise to new employees, or future
availability and cost of contract labor may adversely aﬀect the ability to manage and operate the business, especially considering the workforce needs
associated with nuclear generation facilities and new skills required to operate a modernized, technology-enabled power grid. If the Duke Energy Registrants
are unable to successfully attract and retain an appropriately qualiﬁed workforce, their results of operations, ﬁnancial position and cash ﬂows could be
negatively aﬀected.
ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS
None.
32
PROPERTIES
ITEM 2. PROPERTIES
ELECTRIC UTILITIES AND INFRASTRUCTURE
The following table provides information related to the EU&I's generation stations as of December 31, 2022. The MW displayed in the table below are based
on summer capacity. Ownership interest in all facilities is 100% unless otherwise indicated.
Owned MW
Facility Plant Type Primary Fuel Location Capacity
Duke Energy Carolinas
Oconee Nuclear Uranium SC 2,554 
McGuire Nuclear Uranium NC 2,316 
Catawba Nuclear Uranium SC 445 
Belews Creek Fossil Coal/Gas NC 2,220 
Marshall Fossil Coal/Gas NC 2,058 
J.E. Rogers  Fossil Coal/Gas NC 1,388 
Lincoln Combustion Turbine (CT) Fossil Gas/Oil NC 1,161 
Allen Fossil Coal NC 421 
Rockingham CT Fossil Gas/Oil NC 825 
W.S. Lee Combined Cycle (CC) Fossil Gas SC 686 
Buck CC Fossil Gas NC 668 
Dan River CC Fossil Gas NC 662 
Mill Creek CT Fossil Gas/Oil SC 563 
W.S. Lee CT Fossil Gas/Oil SC 84 
Clemson CHP Fossil Gas SC 13 
Bad Creek Hydro Water SC 1,520 
Jocassee Hydro Water SC 780 
Cowans Ford Hydro Water NC 324 
Keowee Hydro Water SC 152 
Other small facilities (19 plants) Hydro Water NC/SC 581 
Distributed generation Renewable Solar NC 71 
Total Duke Energy Carolinas 19,492 
Owned MW
Facility Plant Type Primary Fuel Location Capacity
Duke Energy Progress
Brunswick Nuclear Uranium NC 1,870 
Harris Nuclear Uranium NC 964 
Robinson Nuclear Uranium SC 759 
Roxboro Fossil Coal NC 2,439 
Smith CC Fossil Gas/Oil NC 1,083 
H.F. Lee CC Fossil Gas/Oil NC 888 
Wayne County CT Fossil Gas/Oil NC 822 
Smith CT Fossil Gas/Oil NC 772 
Mayo Fossil Coal NC 704 
L.V. Sutton CC Fossil Gas/Oil NC 607 
Asheville CC Fossil Gas/Oil NC 476 
Asheville CT Fossil Gas/Oil NC 320 
Darlington CT Fossil Gas/Oil SC 234 
Weatherspoon CT Fossil Gas/Oil NC 124 
L.V. Sutton CT Fossil Gas/Oil NC 84 
Blewett CT Fossil Oil NC 52 
Walters Hydro Water NC 112 
Other small facilities (3) Hydro Water NC 116 
Distributed generation Renewable Solar NC 35 
Asheville – Rock Hill Battery Renewable Storage NC 2 
Hot Springs Microgrid Renewable Storage NC 1 
Total Duke Energy Progress 12,464 (a)
(b)
33
PROPERTIES
Owned MW
Facility Plant Type Primary Fuel Location Capacity
Duke Energy Florida
Hines CC Fossil Gas/Oil FL 2,061 
Citrus County CC Fossil Gas FL 1,610 
Crystal River Fossil Coal FL 1,410 
Bartow CC Fossil Gas/Oil FL 1,112 
Anclote Fossil Gas FL 1,013 
Intercession City CT Fossil Gas/Oil FL 940 
Osprey CC Fossil Gas/Oil FL 576 
DeBary CT Fossil Gas/Oil FL 524 
Tiger Bay CC Fossil Gas/Oil FL 199 
Bayboro CT Fossil Oil FL 171 
Bartow CT Fossil Gas/Oil FL 168 
Suwannee River CT Fossil Gas FL 145 
University of Florida CoGen CT Fossil Gas FL 44 
Distributed generation Renewable Solar FL 485 
Trenton Battery Renewable Storage FL 11 
Micanopy Energy Storage Renewable Storage FL 8 
Jennings Battery Renewable Storage FL 5.5 
Cape San Blas Battery Renewable Storage FL 5.5 
Total Duke Energy Florida 10,488 
Owned MW
Facility Plant Type Primary Fuel Location Capacity
Duke Energy Ohio
East Bend Fossil Coal KY 600 
Woodsdale CT Fossil Gas/Propane OH 476 
Beckjord Battery Storage Renewable Storage OH 4 
Total Duke Energy Ohio 1,080 
Owned MW
Facility Plant Type Primary Fuel Location Capacity
Duke Energy Indiana
Gibson Fossil Coal IN 2,822 
Cayuga Fossil Coal/Oil IN 1,005 
Edwardsport Fossil Coal IN 595 
Madison CT Fossil Gas OH 566 
Wheatland CT Fossil Gas IN 444 
Vermillion CT Fossil Gas IN 360 
Noblesville CC Fossil Gas/Oil IN 264 
Henry County CT Fossil Gas/Oil IN 126 
Cayuga CT Fossil Gas/Oil IN 84 
Purdue CHP Fossil Gas IN 12 
Markland Hydro Water IN 54 
Distributed generation Renewable Solar IN 11 
Camp Atterbury Battery Renewable Storage IN 1 
Nabb Battery Renewable Storage IN 1 
Crane Battery Renewable Storage IN 1 
Total Duke Energy Indiana 6,346 (c)
(d)
(e)
34
PROPERTIES
Owned MW
Totals by Type Capacity
Total Electric Utilities 49,870 
Totals by Plant Type
Nuclear 8,908 
Fossil 36,681 
Hydro 3,639 
Renewable 642 
Total Electric Utilities 49,870 
(a) Jointly owned with North Carolina Municipal Power Agency Number 1, NCEMC and PMPA. Duke Energy Carolinas' ownership is 19.25% of the facility.
(b) Jointly owned with NCEMC. Duke Energy Carolinas' ownership is 87.27% of the facility.
(c) Duke Energy Indiana owns and operates Gibson Station Units 1 through 4 and is a joint owner of unit 5 with WVPA and IMPA. Duke Energy Indiana
operates unit 5 and owns 50.05%.
(d) Includes Cayuga Internal Combustion.
(e) Jointly owned with WVPA. Duke Energy Indiana's ownership is 62.5% of the facility.
The following table provides information related to EU&I's electric transmission and distribution properties as of December 31, 2022.
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Energy Energy Energy Energy
Energy Carolinas Progress Florida Ohio Indiana
Electric Transmission Lines
Miles of 500 to 525 kilovolt (kV) 1,100  600  300  200  —  — 
Miles of 345 kV 1,100  —  —  —  400  700 
Miles of 230 kV 8,500  2,700  3,400  1,700  —  700 
Miles of 100 to 161 kV 12,500  6,800  2,600  1,000  700  1,400 
Miles of 13 to 69 kV 8,300  2,900  —  2,200  700  2,500 
Total conductor miles of electric transmission lines 31,500  13,000  6,300  5,100  1,800  5,300 
Electric Distribution Lines
Miles of overhead lines 173,600  66,600  46,300  25,300  13,300  22,100 
Miles of underground line 116,100  41,900  35,200  22,700  6,500  9,800 
Total conductor miles of electric distribution lines 289,700  108,500  81,500  48,000  19,800  31,900 
Number of electric transmission and distribution substations 3,000  1,200  500  500  300  500 
Substantially all of EU&I's electric plant in service is mortgaged under indentures relating to Duke Energy Carolinas’, Duke Energy Progress', Duke Energy
Florida's, Duke Energy Ohio’s and Duke Energy Indiana’s various series of First Mortgage Bonds.
GAS UTILITIES AND INFRASTRUCTURE
GU&I owns transmission pipelines and distribution mains that are generally underground, located near public streets and highways, or on property owned by
others for which Duke Energy Ohio and Piedmont have obtained the necessary legal rights to place and operate facilities on such property located within the
GU&I service territories. The following table provides information related to GU&I's natural gas distribution.
Duke
Duke Energy
Energy Ohio Piedmont
Miles of natural gas distribution and transmission pipelines 35,200  7,600  27,600 
Miles of natural gas service lines 28,300  6,600  21,700 
OTHER
Duke Energy owns approximately 7.1 million square feet and leases approximately 2.7 million square feet of corporate, regional and district oﬃce space
spread throughout its service territories. See Note 11, "Property, Plant and Equipment," for further information.
35
LEGAL PROCEEDINGS AND MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES
ITEM 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS
MTBE Litigation
On December 15, 2017, the state of Maryland ﬁled suit in Baltimore City Circuit Court against Duke Energy Merchants and other defendants alleging
contamination of state waters by MTBE leaking from gasoline storage tanks and is seeking an unspeciﬁed amount of monetary damages. MTBE is a gasoline
additive intended to increase the oxygen levels in gasoline and make it burn cleaner. The case was removed from Baltimore City Circuit Court to federal
District Court. Initial motions to dismiss ﬁled by the defendants were denied by the court on September 4, 2019, and the matter is now in discovery. On
December 18, 2020, the plaintiﬀ and defendants selected 50 focus sites, none of which have any ties to Duke Energy Merchants. Discovery will be speciﬁc to
those sites. At this time, Duke Energy Merchants has not engaged in settlement negotiations with the plaintiﬀ and the plaintiﬀ has not reached a settlement
agreement with any defendant. Duke Energy cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
In addition, the Duke Energy Registrants are, from time to time, parties to various lawsuits and regulatory proceedings in the ordinary course of their
business. For information regarding legal proceedings, including regulatory and environmental matters, see Note 4, “Regulatory Matters,” and Note 5,
“Commitments and Contingencies,” to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES
This is not applicable for any of the Duke Energy Registrants.
36
SECURITIES INFORMATION
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT'S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUER
PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
The common stock of Duke Energy is listed and traded on the NYSE (ticker symbol DUK). As of January 31, 2023, there were 127,329 Duke Energy common
stockholders of record. For information on dividends, see the "Dividend Payments" section of Management's Discussion and Analysis.
There is no market for the common equity securities of the Subsidiary Registrants, all of which are directly or indirectly owned by Duke Energy. See Note 2,
"Dispositions," to the Consolidated Financial Statements for information on the investment of a minority interest in Duke Energy Indiana.
Securities Authorized for Issuance Under Equity Compensation Plans
See Item 12 of Part III within this Annual Report for information regarding Securities Authorized for Issuance Under Equity Compensation Plans.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities for Fourth Quarter 2022
There were no repurchases of equity securities during the fourth quarter of 2022.
Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities and Use of Proceeds
None.
Stock Performance Graph
The following performance graph compares the cumulative TSR from Duke Energy Corporation common stock, as compared with the Standard & Poor's 500
Stock Index (S&P 500) and the Philadelphia Utility Index for the past ﬁve years. The graph assumes an initial investment of $100 on December 31, 2017, in
Duke Energy common stock, in the S&P 500 and in the Philadelphia Utility Index and that all dividends were reinvested. The stockholder return shown below
for the ﬁve-year historical period may not be indicative of future performance.
NYSE CEO Certiﬁcation
Duke Energy has ﬁled the certiﬁcation of its Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 as
exhibits to this Annual Report.
ITEM 6. SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA
This is not applicable for any of the Duke Energy Registrants.
37
MD&A DUKE ENERGY
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Management’s Discussion and Analysis includes ﬁnancial information prepared in accordance with GAAP in the U.S., as well as certain non-GAAP ﬁnancial
measures such as adjusted earnings and adjusted EPS discussed below. Generally, a non-GAAP ﬁnancial measure is a numerical measure of ﬁnancial
performance, ﬁnancial position or cash ﬂows that excludes (or includes) amounts that are included in (or excluded from) the most directly comparable
measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP. The non-GAAP ﬁnancial measures should be viewed as a supplement to, and not a substitute
for, ﬁnancial measures presented in accordance with GAAP. Non-GAAP measures as presented herein may not be comparable to similarly titled measures
used by other companies.
The following combined Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations is separately ﬁled by Duke Energy
Corporation and its subsidiaries. Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC, Progress Energy, Inc., Duke Energy Progress, LLC, Duke Energy Florida, LLC, Duke Energy Ohio,
Inc., Duke Energy Indiana, LLC and Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc. However, none of the registrants make any representation as to information related
solely to Duke Energy or the subsidiary registrants of Duke Energy other than itself.
Management’s Discussion and Analysis should be read in conjunction with the Consolidated Financial Statements and Notes for the years ended December
31, 2022, 2021 and 2020.
See "Item 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations," in Duke Energy's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the
year ended December 31, 2021, ﬁled with the SEC on February 24, 2022, for a discussion of variance drivers for the year ended December 31, 2021, as
compared to December 31, 2020.
DUKE ENERGY
Duke Energy is an energy company headquartered in Charlotte, North Carolina. Duke Energy operates in the U.S. primarily through its direct and indirect
subsidiaries, Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida, Duke Energy Ohio, Duke Energy Indiana and Piedmont. When discussing
Duke Energy’s consolidated ﬁnancial information, it necessarily includes the results of the Subsidiary Registrants, which along with Duke Energy, are
collectively referred to as the Duke Energy Registrants.
Executive Overview
At Duke Energy, we remain focused on continuing to advance our clean energy transition while maintaining aﬀordability and reliability for our customers and
delivering on our commitments to our communities, employees, investors, and other stakeholders. The fundamentals of our business are strong and allow us
to deliver growth in earnings and dividends in a low-risk, predictable and transparent way. In 2022, we continued to make progress, navigating rising interest
rates, volatile commodity prices and other macroeconomic headwinds while meeting our near-term ﬁnancial commitments, executing on our strategic
priorities, responding to severe weather and external events, and continuing to provide the safe and reliable service that our communities depend on.
In 2022, we announced the sale of our commercial renewables business, ﬁled the Carbon Plan with the NCUC, and continued to engage with the communities
in our jurisdictions. We also continue to make the investments necessary to support our ongoing clean energy transition and a business portfolio that delivers
a reliable and growing dividend, with 2022 representing the 96th consecutive year Duke Energy paid a cash dividend on its common stock.
Financial Results
(a) See Results of Operations below for Duke Energy’s deﬁnition of adjusted earnings and adjusted EPS as well as a reconciliation of this non-GAAP
ﬁnancial measure to net income available to Duke Energy and net income available to Duke Energy per basic share.
38
MD&A DUKE ENERGY
On February 9, 2023, Duke Energy announced 2022 full year reported earnings of $2,563 million, or $3.33 per share and adjusted earnings of $4,060 million,
or $5.27 per share. On February 21, 2023, Duke Energy Indiana received an opinion from the Indiana Court of Appeals disallowing recovery of certain coal
ash costs. As a result of this opinion, Duke Energy Indiana recognized a pretax charge of approximately $175 million to Impairment of assets and other
charges for the year ended December 31, 2022. The 2022 full year reported earnings changed to $2,444 million, or $3.17 per share. There was no change to
adjusted earnings or adjusted earnings per share.
Duke Energy's 2022 Net Income Available to Duke Energy Corporation (GAAP Reported Earnings) was impacted primarily by the estimated impairment on the
sale of the Commercial Renewables business in the current year. See “Results of Operations” below for a detailed discussion of the consolidated results of
operations and a detailed discussion of ﬁnancial results for each of Duke Energy’s reportable business segments, as well as Other.
2022 Areas of Focus and Accomplishments
Clean Energy Transition. Our industry continues to experience an unprecedented level of change and 2022 was a dynamic year for our company as we
navigated macroeconomic headwinds and continued to execute on our strategic priorities and deliver on our vision.
Generating Cleaner Energy
We’re targeting energy generated from coal to represent less than 5% by 2030 and a full exit by 2035, subject to regulatory approvals. We’ve made strong
progress to date in reducing carbon emissions from electricity generation (a 44% reduction from 2005) and have committed to do more (at least 50%
reduction by 2030 and net-zero by 2050). In October 2022, we announced an additional interim target to reduce carbon emissions from electric generation
by 80% by 2040. We also adopted a goal of reducing Scope 2 and certain Scope 3 emissions, including emissions from upstream purchased power and fossil
fuel purchases, as well as downstream customer use of natural gas, by 50% by 2035, on the way to net-zero by 2050.
Duke Energy is one of the ﬁrst utilities to address the totality of its impact – approximately 95% of the company's greenhouse gas emissions are now tied to
a measurable net-zero goal. Over the next decade, we expect to deploy over $145 billion of capital into our regulated businesses, driven by clean energy
transition investments. These investments will drive substantial economic beneﬁts for the communities we serve and reduce our customer’s exposure to fuel
volatility. We’ve ﬁled and reﬁned comprehensive IRPs consistent with this strategy in multiple jurisdictions, allowing us to accelerate coal plant retirements,
make needed grid investments to enable renewables and energy storage, and increase resiliency. To partially fund this plan, in December 2022, we closed on
the second and ﬁnal tranche of the approximate $2 billion investment in Duke Energy Indiana by GIC.
In 2022, we were awarded one of two North Carolina oﬀshore wind sites held by the Bureau of Ocean Energy Management. The approximately 55,000-acre
site in the Atlantic Ocean east of Wilmington could support up to 1.6 gigawatts of potential oﬀshore wind energy, enough to power nearly 375,000 homes.
Securing this contract creates optionality for future oﬀshore wind if the NCUC determines it's part of the least cost path to achieve North Carolina's interim
and long-term carbon reduction goals.
As we look beyond 2030, we will need additional tools to continue our progress. We will actively work to advocate for research and development and
deployment of carbon-free, dispatchable resources. This includes longer-duration energy storage, advanced nuclear technologies, carbon capture and zero-
carbon fuels.
Sale of Commercial Renewables
In November 2022, the Board approved pursuing the sale of our Commercial Renewables business, excluding the oﬀshore wind contract for Carolina Long
Bay. Since 2007, we have built a portfolio of approximately 5,000 megawatts of commercial wind, solar and battery projects across the U.S., and established
a robust development pipeline. As we look forward to the remainder of this decade and beyond, we have line of sight to signiﬁcant renewable, grid and other
investment opportunities within our faster-growing regulated operations.
Carbon Plan
North Carolina House Bill 951 (HB 951) was passed in 2021 and reﬂects new state policy that accelerates a clean energy transition for generation serving
customers in the Carolinas, including providing a framework for a goal of 70% carbon reduction in electric generation in the state from 2005 levels by 2030
and carbon neutrality by 2050 while continuing to prioritize aﬀordability and reliability for our customers. The legislation established a framework overseen
by the NCUC to advance state CO emission reductions through the use of least cost planning, including stakeholder involvement, and also introduced
modernized recovery mechanisms, including multiyear rate plans (MYRP), that promote more eﬃcient recovery of investments and performance-based
regulation (PBR), that align incentives between the company and the state’s energy policy objectives.
In May 2022, we ﬁled a proposed Carbon Plan with the NCUC that outlined potential pathways toward achieving the HB 951 carbon reduction targets while
balancing aﬀordability and reliability for our customers. We presented four “portfolios” – a base portfolio of what it would take to achieve 70% carbon
reduction by 2030 and other portfolios demonstrating the impact of an extension to the 2030 compliance deadline to allow the introduction of new
technologies at a more aﬀordable price. In December 2022, the NCUC issued an order adopting its initial Carbon Plan, which included a set of near-term
actions to support meeting the state's carbon reduction goals. This is a constructive outcome that advances our clean energy transition, supporting a
diverse, all-of-the-above approach that is essential for long-term resource planning.
Modernizing the Power Grid and Natural Gas Infrastructure
Our grid improvement programs continue to be a key component of our growth strategy. Modernization of the electric grid, including smart meters, storm
hardening, self-healing and targeted undergrounding, helps to continue to ensure the system is better prepared for severe weather, improves the system's
reliability and ﬂexibility, and provides better information and services for customers. We continue to expand our self-optimizing grid capabilities, and in 2022,
smart, self-healing technologies helped to avoid more than 1.4 million customer interruptions across our six-state electric service area, saving customers
more than 443 million minutes of lost outage time.2
39
MD&A DUKE ENERGY
Duke Energy has a demonstrated track record of driving eﬃciencies and productivity in the business and we continue to leverage new technology, digital
tools and data analytics across the business in response to a transforming landscape. In 2022, we ﬁled for approval of a new demand response pilot program
expected to launch in 2023 for customers in the Duke Energy Carolinas service area. Pilot incentives will reduce vehicle lease payments for program
participants who lease an eligible electric vehicle, including Ford F-150 Lightning trucks. In exchange, customers will allow their electric vehicles to feed
energy back to the grid – helping to balance it during peak demand. Also, in August 2022, Duke Energy Florida announced a research and development pilot
program to test and evaluate the viability of the new Ford F-150 Lightning all-electric truck's high-capacity batteries as a grid edge resource.
Recognizing the importance of natural gas to our plans, we continue to work toward a net-zero methane emission goal by 2030 related to our natural gas
distribution business. In our LDC business, we are making great progress reducing methane emissions through our partnership with Accenture, Microsoft and
Avanade to use satellites and build an emissions platform, the addition of other sensors and technologies to ﬁnd and ﬁx leaks in near real time, and the use
of cross compression to avoid releasing natural gas into the atmosphere during certain operational activities. Investments in integrity management of our
natural gas infrastructure continue to be of importance to ensure reliable, safe, and increasingly clean delivery of natural gas to our customers.
Response to Macroeconomic Headwinds. In addition to achieving ﬁnancial results in the upper half of our revised guidance, we continued our cost-
management journey with a focus on driving productivity, increasing ﬂexibility and prioritizing spend based on risk and strategic value to our customers and
investors. In 2022, to address rising interest rates, increased commodity prices, labor and material inﬂation, and supply chain constraints, we launched the
Workload Reduction Initiative, building on our culture of continuous improvement to identify more ways to reduce operating costs. Including cost reductions
from supply chain, we identiﬁed approximately $300 million of savings opportunities focused on organization simpliﬁcation, elimination of work, automation,
reducing service levels provided to internal customers, and outsourcing.
Commodity prices have impacted the price of electricity in all of our jurisdictions. We actively worked to manage and maintain prices at lower levels than
they otherwise would be in light of increased commodity prices, working with our regulators to extend recovery periods in certain jurisdictions in a way that
is manageable for our customers. We also continued our work with our vulnerable customers through increased communications, securing state and federal
funding, and providing access to philanthropic support. Additionally, we've created a specialized team that's partnered with agencies across our service
territories and has helped connect customers to nearly $300 million in energy assistance funding since 2021.
We successfully navigated supply chain challenges including inﬂation, longer lead times, and shortages of solar panels and other equipment. We've executed
longer supply agreements and proactively secured equipment in early 2022 for hurricane season while placing orders for key needs for our customer delivery
organization for 2023. Our procurement teams continue to execute on action plans to enhance planning, augment supply, amend operations and leverage
our scale to continue to mitigate these risks to the extent possible.
Constructive Regulatory and Legislative Outcomes. One of our long-term strategic goals is to achieve modernized regulatory constructs in our
jurisdictions. Modernized constructs provide beneﬁts, which include improved earnings and cash ﬂows through more timely recovery of investments, as well
as stable pricing for customers. Grid investment riders in the Midwest and Florida enable more timely cost recovery and earnings growth and we have a
MYRP in Florida through 2024. Additionally, as highlighted above, HB 951 provides the framework for many of the beneﬁts of modernized regulatory
constructs in North Carolina under the direction of the NCUC. Duke Energy Progress ﬁled its ﬁrst rate case utilizing these beneﬁts, including both PBR and
MYRP, in North Carolina in October 2022. In January 2023, we also ﬁled a Duke Energy Carolinas rate case in North Carolina, which incorporates elements of
PBR and MYRP.
In addition to the Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Carolinas rate cases in North Carolina, we continued to move a variety of other regulatory
initiatives forward during 2022. Base rate cases were ﬁled for both Duke Energy Progress and Piedmont in South Carolina, for Duke Energy Ohio's natural gas
business, and for Duke Energy Kentucky's electric business. Constructive partial settlements were approved by the NCUC in January 2022 related to
Piedmont's 2021 North Carolina rate case and by the PUCO in December 2022 related to Duke Energy Ohio's 2021 electric rate case. We also reached a
constructive comprehensive settlement with all parties in the Duke Energy Progress South Carolina rate case in January 2023, which the PSCSC approved in
February 2023. Duke Energy Indiana's TDSIC 2.0 was approved in June 2022 and Duke Energy Florida's 10 year storm protection plan was approved in
October 2022, both of which provide for signiﬁcant investments to improve the reliability and integrity of the grid in their respective jurisdictions. Overall,
this was a very active year as it relates to regulatory ﬁlings, which reﬂects the important investments and ongoing clean energy transition across all our
service territories.
In November 2022, the Southeast Energy Exchange Market (SEEM) announced it had initiated operations. The new SEEM platform facilitates sub-hourly,
bilateral trading, allowing participants to buy and sell power close to the time the energy is consumed, utilizing available unreserved transmission and
providing southeastern electricity customers cost, reliability and environmental beneﬁts. Also in 2022, storm securitization legislation was passed in South
Carolina, providing the opportunity to securitize deferred storm costs and lower the bill impacts for our customers. We also continue to evaluate the impacts
of the Inﬂation Reduction Act, which is expected to have signiﬁcant beneﬁts to customers and lower the cost of the clean energy transition.
Customer Satisfaction. Duke Energy continues to transform the customer experience through our use of customer data to better inform operational
priorities and performance levels. This data-driven approach allows us to identify the investments that are most important to the customer experience. In
2022, we successfully implemented the last of eight jurisdictional releases of Customer Connect, a new system that consolidates four legacy billing systems
into one customer-service platform, allowing us to deliver the universal experience customers expect. While customer satisfaction across our industry
continues to be impacted by the macroeconomic environment and the impacts of higher fuel prices on customer bills, our work continues to be recognized
by our customers, with incremental improvements in customer satisfaction scores at certain jurisdictions including Piedmont, which was ranked number one
in customer satisfaction by J.D. Power for residential natural gas service in the south.
40
MD&A DUKE ENERGY
Operational Excellence, Safety and Reliability. The reliable and safe operation of our power plants, electric distribution system and natural gas
infrastructure in our communities continues to be foundational to serving our customers, our ﬁnancial results, and our credibility with stakeholders. This year
presented unique challenges to the grid in our service territories, including attacks on two substations in Moore County, North Carolina and extreme winter
weather that forced us to take unprecedented measures to ensure the integrity of our systems in North Carolina. Despite these recent challenges, our
regulated generation ﬂeet and nuclear sites had strong performance throughout the year and our electric distribution system performed well. The safety of
our workforce is a core value. While our TICR was slightly above target, our employees continued to deliver strong safety results in 2022 and we remain an
industry leader in personal safety. In addition, we continued our strong environmental performance, with no reportable environmental events.
Storm activity was severe in our service territories in 2022. Hurricane Ian, the ﬁfth-strongest hurricane on record, impacted our service territories in Florida
and the Carolinas with heavy rainfall, strong winds, and life-threatening storm surge and ﬂooding. Across our service territories, we assembled more than
20,000 power line technicians, damage assessors, and vegetation workers to prepare and begin to restore power as soon as it was safe to do so. In total, we
experienced 2 million outages, and thanks to their eﬀorts, more than 97% of our Florida customers were restored within three days of the storm moving out
of our Florida territories, and over 99% of our Carolinas customers within two days of the storm exiting the Carolinas. In November, Hurricane Nicole made
landfall in Florida as a Category 1 hurricane causing nearly 300,000 customer outages. Our crews were able to restore more than 98% of those outages
within 12 hours.
In December, high winds and extreme cold from Winter Storm Elliott, customer demand that was higher than forecasted, and inability to import additional
power from out of state, resulted in the need to temporarily interrupt service to about 500,000 customers to maintain overall grid reliability and prevent
further potential disruptions in the Carolinas. We will continue to further evaluate lessons learned to improve our strategy and communications, and
incorporate any identiﬁed improvements to address this matter to better serve our customers now and in the future.
Our ability to eﬀectively handle all facets of the 2022 storm response eﬀorts, including navigating ongoing macroeconomic challenges and supply chain
constraints, is a testament to our team’s extensive preparation and coordination, applying lessons learned from previous storms, and to on-the-ground
management throughout the restoration eﬀorts. Duke Energy has received over 20 Emergency Response Awards since EEI began recognizing storm response
in 1998 (including nine for assisting other utilities). We received EEI’s Emergency Assistance Award for our support to other electric companies following
Hurricane Ian, as well as EEI’s Emergency Recovery Award for multiple events that include our own recovery from Hurricane Ian, Winter Storm Izzy, and the
July storms in the Midwest.
Duke Energy Objectives – 2023 and Beyond
At Duke Energy, our climate strategy is our business strategy – to safely transform and ready our system by investing in new and existing carbon-free
technology, modernizing our gas and electric infrastructure, and expanding and integrating eﬃciency and demand management programs. As we transition
our business to cleaner sources of energy, we are focused on delivering sustainable value for our customers and shareholders by maintaining aﬀordability
and leveraging business transformation to exceed customer expectations, optimizing investments to drive attractive shareholder returns, and providing new
product oﬀerings and solutions that deliver growth and customer value. To achieve these major milestones, we are shaping the landscape by partnering with
stakeholders, championing public policy that advances innovation, and advancing regulatory models that support carbon and methane emission reductions.
Matters Impacting Future Results
The matters discussed herein could materially impact the future operating results, ﬁnancial condition and cash ﬂows of the Duke Energy Registrants and
Business Segments.
Regulatory Matters
Coal Ash Costs
Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress both have approximately $1.4 billion, in regulatory assets related to coal ash retirement obligations as of
December 31, 2022. Future spending, including amounts recorded for depreciation and liability accretion, is expected to continue to be deferred and
recovered in future rate cases or rider ﬁlings. The majority of spend is expected to occur over the next 10 to 15 years.
Duke Energy Indiana has interpreted the CCR rule to identify the coal ash basin sites impacted and has assessed the amounts of coal ash subject to the rule
and a method of compliance. Interpretation of the requirements of the CCR rule is subject to further legal challenges and regulatory approvals, which could
result in additional ash basin closure requirements, higher costs of compliance and greater AROs. Additionally, Duke Energy Indiana has retired facilities that
are not subject to the CCR rule. Duke Energy Indiana may incur costs at these facilities to comply with environmental regulations or to mitigate risks
associated with on-site storage of coal ash. In January 2022, Duke Energy Indiana received a letter from the EPA regarding interpretation of the CCR rule.
Duke Energy Indiana has approximately $385 million in regulatory assets related to coal ash asset retirement obligations as of December 31, 2022. See Note
5 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Commitments and Contingencies" for more information.
Fuel Cost Recovery
As a result of rapidly rising commodity costs, including natural gas, fuel and purchased power prices in excess of amounts included in fuel-related revenues
has led to an increase in the undercollection of fuel costs from customers at certain jurisdictions including Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and
Duke Energy Florida. These amounts have been deferred in regulatory assets and have impacted the cash ﬂows of the registrants, including increased
borrowings to temporarily ﬁnance related expenditures until recovery. The Duke Energy Registrants are working with various state commissions on the timing
of recovery of these amounts. See Note 4 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters" for more information.
41
MD&A DUKE ENERGY
Commercial Renewables
In November 2022, Duke Energy committed to a plan to sell the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups. The bid process for the utility-scale solar and wind
group is ongoing. Initial indicative bids were received for the distributed generation group in January 2023. Duke Energy expects to dispose of both groups in
the second half of 2023. The Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups were classiﬁed as held for sale and as discontinued operations in the fourth quarter of
2022. Duke Energy recorded an impairment loss in the fourth quarter of 2022. If necessary, the loss on the sale of the assets will be updated based on
market changes or the ﬁnal sales price, after any adjustments at closing for working capital and capital expenditures and could be materially diﬀerent than
the estimated loss. Additionally, certain other costs resulting from the transactions may be recognized in the period incurred, including Duke Energy's share
of debt extinguishment costs and costs incurred to modify or terminate PPAs. Proceeds from the sales are expected to be used for debt avoidance. For more
information, see Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Dispositions."
In February 2021, a severe winter storm impacted certain Commercial Renewables assets in Texas. Extreme weather conditions limited the ability for these
solar and wind facilities to generate and sell electricity into the Electric Reliability Council of Texas market. Duke Energy has been named in multiple lawsuits
arising out of this winter storm. The legal actions related to these lawsuits will remain with Duke Energy and any future activity related to the matters will be
presented in discontinued operations. For more information, see Note 5 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Commitments and Contingencies."
Supply Chain
Duke Energy is monitoring supply chain disruptions, which could impact the timing of in-service dates and may result in adverse impacts on operating
results. The company is also monitoring the potential impacts on future ﬁnancial results and clean energy goals due to supply chain challenges regarding the
availability of transformers and renewable components like solar panels and batteries.
Other
Duke Energy is monitoring general market conditions, including rising interest rates, and evaluating the impact to its results of operations, ﬁnancial position
and cash ﬂows in the future.
Results of Operations
Non-GAAP Measures
Management evaluates ﬁnancial performance in part based on non-GAAP ﬁnancial measures, including adjusted earnings and adjusted EPS. These items
represent income from continuing operations available to Duke Energy common stockholders in dollar and per share amounts, adjusted for the dollar and per
share impact of special items. As discussed below, special items include certain charges and credits, which management believes are not indicative of Duke
Energy's ongoing performance. Management believes the presentation of adjusted earnings and adjusted EPS provides useful information to investors, as it
provides them with an additional relevant comparison of Duke Energy’s performance across periods.
Management uses these non-GAAP ﬁnancial measures for planning and forecasting, and for reporting ﬁnancial results to the Board of Directors, employees,
stockholders, analysts and investors. Adjusted EPS is also used as a basis for employee incentive bonuses. The most directly comparable GAAP measures for
adjusted earnings and adjusted EPS are GAAP Reported Earnings and EPS Available to Duke Energy Corporation common stockholders (GAAP Reported EPS),
respectively.
Special items included in the periods presented include the following, which management believes do not reﬂect ongoing costs:
• Regulatory matters and litigation represents the net impact of charges related to the Indiana court rulings on coal ash and other unrelated ongoing
litigation.
• Workplace and workforce realignment represents costs attributable to business transformation, including long-term real estate strategy changes
and workforce reduction.
• Regulatory settlements represents an impairment charge related to the South Carolina Supreme Court decision on coal ash, insurance proceeds and
Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress coal ash settlement.
• Gas pipeline investments represents additional exit obligations related to ACP.
Discontinued operations primarily includes results from Duke Energy's Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups, including an estimated impairment on the
sale of the business in 2022.
Duke Energy’s adjusted earnings and adjusted EPS may not be comparable to similarly titled measures of another company because other companies may
not calculate the measures in the same manner.
42
MD&A DUKE ENERGY
Reconciliation of GAAP Reported Amounts to Adjusted Amounts
The following table presents a reconciliation of adjusted earnings and adjusted EPS to the most directly comparable GAAP measures.
  Years Ended December 31,
2022 2021
(in millions, except per share amounts) Earnings EPS Earnings EPS
GAAP Reported Earnings/EPS $ 2,444 $ 3.17 $ 3,802 $ 4.94 
Adjustments to Reported:
Regulatory Matters and Litigation 295  0.39  —  — 
Workplace and Workforce Realignment 105  0.14  148  0.20 
Regulatory Settlements —  —  69  0.09 
Gas Pipeline Investments —  —  15  0.02 
Discontinued Operations 1,216  1.57  (197) (0.26)
Adjusted Earnings/Adjusted EPS $ 4,060 $ 5.27 $ 3,837 $ 4.99 
(a)    Net of tax beneﬁt of $128 million. $386 million recorded within Impairment of assets and other charges, $46 million within Regulated electric (Operating
Revenues) and $34 million within Net Loss Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests. $25 million recorded within Operations, maintenance and other.
(b)    Net of tax beneﬁt of $31 million and tax beneﬁt of $44 million for the years ended December 31, 2022, and 2021, respectively. $72 million recorded
within Impairment of assets and other charges, $71 million recorded within Operations, maintenance and other and a $7 million gain recorded in
Gains on sales of other assets and other for the year ended December 31, 2022. $133 million recorded within Impairment of assets and other
charges, $42 million within Operations, maintenance and other, and $17 million within Depreciation and amortization for the year ended December
31, 2021.
(c)    Net of tax beneﬁt of $21 million. $202 million of expense recorded within Impairment of assets and other charges, $111 million of income within Other
income and expenses, $12 million of expense within Operations, maintenance and other, $28 million of income within Regulated electric operating
revenues, $8 million of expense within Interest expense and $7 million of expense within Depreciation and amortization.
(d)    Net of tax beneﬁt of $5 million. $20 million loss recorded within Equity in earnings (losses) of unconsolidated aﬃliates.
(e)    Recorded in Loss from Discontinued Operations, net of tax, and Net Loss Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests.
Year Ended December 31, 2022, as compared to 2021
GAAP Reported EPS was $3.17 for the year ended December 31, 2022, compared to $4.94 for the year ended December 31, 2021. The decrease in GAAP
Reported Earnings/EPS was primarily due to the estimated impairment on the sale of the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups in the current year.
As discussed and shown in the table above, management also evaluates ﬁnancial performance based on adjusted EPS. Duke Energy’s adjusted EPS was
$5.27 for the year ended December 31, 2022, compared to $4.99 for the year ended December 31, 2021. The increase in Adjusted Earnings/Adjusted EPS
was primarily due to higher volumes, favorable weather and rate case contributions, partially oﬀset by higher ﬁnancing costs, higher depreciation and
property taxes on a growing asset base, storm costs and unfavorable market impacts.
SEGMENT RESULTS
The remaining information presented in this discussion of results of operations is on a GAAP basis. Management evaluates segment performance based on
segment income. Segment income is deﬁned as income from continuing operations net of income attributable to noncontrolling interests and preferred stock
dividends. Segment income includes intercompany revenues and expenses that are eliminated in the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Duke Energy's segment structure includes Electric Utilities and Infrastructure (EU&I) and Gas Utilities and Infrastructure (GU&I). The remainder of Duke
Energy’s operations is presented as Other. See Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Business Segments,” for additional information on Duke
Energy’s segment structure.(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
43
MD&A SEGMENT RESULTS - ELECTRIC UTILITIES AND INFRASTRUCTURE
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 Variance
Operating Revenues $ 26,024 $ 22,603 $ 3,421 
Operating Expenses
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 8,862  6,332  2,530 
Operations, maintenance and other 5,354  5,340  14 
Depreciation and amortization 4,550  4,251  299 
Property and other taxes 1,315  1,233  82 
Impairment of assets and other charges 374  204  170 
Total operating expenses 20,455  17,360  3,095 
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 7  13  (6)
Operating Income 5,576  5,256  320 
Other Income and Expenses, net 467  534  (67)
Interest Expense 1,565  1,432  133 
Income Before Income Taxes 4,478  4,358  120 
Income Tax Expense 536  494  42 
Less: Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interest 13  14  (1)
Segment Income $ 3,929 $ 3,850 $ 79 
Duke Energy Carolinas GWh sales 90,915  87,796  3,119 
Duke Energy Progress GWh sales 70,435  66,797  3,638 
Duke Energy Florida GWh sales 46,214  42,422  3,792 
Duke Energy Ohio GWh sales 24,269  24,129  140 
Duke Energy Indiana GWh sales 31,979  31,388  591 
Total Electric Utilities and Infrastructure GWh sales 263,812  252,532  11,280 
Net proportional MW capacity in operation 49,539  49,871  (332)
Year Ended December 31, 2022, as compared to 2021
EU&I’s higher segment income is due to higher retail sales volumes and favorable weather, partially oﬀset by higher depreciation and higher interest
expense. The following is a detailed discussion of the variance drivers by line item.
Operating Revenues. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $2,332 million increase in fuel revenues primarily due to higher fuel prices and retail sales volumes;
• a $456 million increase in weather-normal retail sales volumes;
• a $293 million increase in retail base rate pricing due to general rate cases in North Carolina, net of rider impacts as well as multiyear rate
adjustments in Florida;
• a $145 million increase in retail sales due to favorable weather compared to prior year;
• a $141 million increase in wholesale revenues primarily due to higher capacity volumes; and
• a $137 million increase in rider revenues primarily due to higher sales volumes and storm securitization in North Carolina.
Partially oﬀset by:
• an $86 million decrease in capacity revenue primarily due to accelerated recovery of the retired coal units Crystal River 1 and 2 in 2021; and
• a $67 million decrease due to the Indiana Supreme Court ruling on recovery of certain coal ash costs.
Operating Expenses. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $2,530 million increase in fuel used in electric generation and purchased power due to higher fuel prices and volumes from customer demand;
• a $299 million increase in depreciation and amortization primarily due to higher plant in service and resolution of prior year rate cases, partially
oﬀset by lower depreciation related to the extension of the lives of nuclear facilities;
• a $170 million increase in impairment of assets and other charges due to the Indiana court rulings on recovery of certain coal ash costs; and
• an $82 million increase in property and other taxes primarily due to higher property taxes as well as higher revenue related taxes.
44
MD&A SEGMENT RESULTS - ELECTRIC UTILITIES AND INFRASTRUCTURE
Other Income and Expenses, net. The variance is primarily due to coal ash insurance litigation proceeds received in the prior year, partially oﬀset by an
increase in AFUDC equity due to higher capital expenditures.
Interest Expense. The variance was primarily driven by higher interest rates and outstanding debt balances.
Income Tax Expense. The increase in tax expense was primarily due to an increase in pretax income and a decrease in the amortization of excess deferred
taxes. The ETRs for the years ended December 31, 2022, and 2021, were 12.0% and 11.3%, respectively. The increase in the ETR was primarily due to a
decrease in the amortization of excess deferred taxes.
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 Variance
Operating Revenues $ 2,840 $ 2,112 $ 728 
Operating Expenses
Cost of natural gas 1,276  705  571 
Operation, maintenance and other 532  442  90 
Depreciation and amortization 327  303  24 
Property and other taxes 138  120  18 
Impairment of assets and other charges (12) 19  (31)
Total operating expenses 2,261  1,589  672 
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 1  —  1 
Operating Income 580  523  57 
Other income and expenses, net 78  70  8 
Interest Expense 182  142  40 
Income Before Income Taxes 476  451  25 
Income Tax Expense 8  55  (47)
Segment Income $ 468 $ 396 $ 72 
Piedmont Local Distribution Company (LDC) throughput (Dth) 628,035,471  542,759,891  85,275,580 
Duke Energy Midwest LDC throughput (MCF) 90,010,669  85,787,624  4,223,045 
Year Ended December 31, 2022, as compared to 2021
GU&I’s results were impacted primarily by margin growth, partially oﬀset by higher operation and maintenance costs and higher interest expense. The
following is a detailed discussion of the variance drivers by line item.
Operating Revenues. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $383 million increase due to higher natural gas costs passed through to customers and higher volumes;
• a $213 million increase due to increased secondary marketing activity including higher oﬀ-system sales natural gas costs;
• a $64 million increase due to base rate increases;
• a $48 million increase due to rider revenues related to Ohio Capital Expenditure Program (CEP); and
• a $4 million increase due to customer growth.
Partially oﬀset by:
• a $15 million decrease due to the MGP Settlement.
Operating Expenses. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $383 million increase in cost of natural gas due to higher natural gas costs passed through to customers and higher volumes;
• a $188 million increase in cost of natural gas due to increased secondary marketing activity including higher oﬀ-system sales natural gas costs;
• a $90 million increase in operations, maintenance and other primarily due to the MGP settlement, higher spend on internal and contract labor costs,
locates, ﬂeet, and materials;
• a $24 million increase in depreciation and amortization due to additional plant in service and lower CEP deferrals; and
• an $18 million increase in property and other taxes due to lower CEP deferrals.
Partially oﬀset by:
• a $31 million decrease in impairment of assets and other charges due to an impairment of propane caverns in 2021, which was partially reversed in
2022.
45
MD&A SEGMENT RESULTS - GAS UTILITIES AND INFRASTRUCTURE
Interest Expense. The variance was primarily due to higher interest rates and outstanding debt balances and lower CEP Rider deferrals.
Income Tax Expense. The decrease in tax expense was primarily due to an increase in the amortization of excess deferred taxes related to the Ohio MGP
Settlement, partially oﬀset by an increase in pretax income. The ETRs for the years ended December 31, 2022, and 2021, were 1.7% and 12.2%,
respectively. The decrease in the ETR was primarily due to an increase in the amortization of excess deferred taxes related to the Ohio MGP Settlement.
Other
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 Variance
Operating Revenues $ 122 $ 113 $ 9 
Operating Expenses 298  409  (111)
Gains (Losses) on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 14  (1) 15 
Operating Loss (162) (297) 135 
Other Income and Expenses, net 65  125  (60)
Interest Expense 778  643  135 
Loss Before Income Taxes (875) (815) (60)
Income Tax Beneﬁt (244) (281) 37 
Less: Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests —  1  (1)
Less: Preferred Dividends 106  106 — 
Net Loss $ (737)$ (641)$ (96)
Year Ended December 31, 2022, as compared to 2021
The higher net loss was driven by higher interest expense and lower return on investments, partially oﬀset by higher equity earnings from the NMC
investment and prior year obligations to the Duke Energy Foundation.
Operating Expenses. The decrease was primarily driven by prior year obligations to the Duke Energy Foundation, lower expense on certain employee
beneﬁt obligations and lower asset impairments to optimize the company's real estate portfolio and reduce oﬃce space.
Other Income and Expenses, net. The variance was primarily due to lower return on investments that fund certain employee beneﬁt obligations, partially
oﬀset by higher equity earnings from the NMC investment.
Interest Expense. The variance was primarily due to higher interest rates and outstanding debt balances.
Income Tax Beneﬁt. The decrease in the tax beneﬁt was primarily due to a reduction of a valuation allowance relating to a capital loss carryforward in the
prior year, partially oﬀset by lower state tax beneﬁt in the prior year. The ETRs for the years ended December 31, 2022, and 2021, were 27.9% and 34.5%,
respectively. The decrease in the ETR was primarily due to a reduction of a valuation allowance relating to a capital loss carryforward in the prior year.
LOSS FROM DISCONTINUED OPERATIONS, NET OF TAX
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 Variance
Loss From Discontinued Operations, net of tax $ (1,323)$ (144)$ (1,179)
Year Ended December 31, 2022, as compared to December 31, 2021
The variance was primarily driven by the estimated impairment on the sale of the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups in the current year.
46
MD&A DUKE ENERGY CAROLINAS
SUBSIDIARY REGISTRANTS
Basis of Presentation
The results of operations and variance discussion for the Subsidiary Registrants is presented in a reduced disclosure format in accordance with General
Instruction (I)(2)(a) of Form 10-K.
DUKE ENERGY CAROLINAS
Results of Operations
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 Variance
Operating Revenues $ 7,857 $ 7,102 $ 755 
Operating Expenses
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 2,015  1,601  414 
Operation, maintenance and other 1,892  1,833  59 
Depreciation and amortization 1,526  1,468  58 
Property and other taxes 340  320  20 
Impairment of assets and other charges 26  227  (201)
Total operating expenses 5,799  5,449  350 
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 4  2  2 
Operating Income 2,062  1,655  407 
Other Income and Expenses, net 221  270  (49)
Interest Expense 557  538  19 
Income Before Income Taxes 1,726  1,387  339 
Income Tax Expense 126  51  75 
Net Income $ 1,600 $ 1,336 $ 264 
The following table shows the percent changes in GWh sales and average number of customers for Duke Energy Carolinas. The below percentages for retail
customer classes represent billed sales only. Total sales includes billed and unbilled retail sales and wholesale sales to incorporated municipalities, public and
private utilities and power marketers. Amounts are not weather-normalized.
Increase (Decrease) over prior year 2022
Residential sales 0.5 %
General service sales 4.0 %
Industrial sales 1.0 %
Wholesale power sales 1.3 %
Joint dispatch sales 0.9 %
Total sales 3.6 %
Average number of customers 1.8 %
Year Ended December 31, 2022, as compared to 2021
Operating Revenues. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $396 million increase in fuel revenues driven by higher fuel prices and higher volumes;
• a $156 million increase in weather-normal retail sales volumes;
• a $78 million increase in retail sales due to favorable weather compared to prior year;
• a $63 million increase due to higher pricing from the North Carolina retail rate case, net of a return of EDIT to customers; and
• a $52 million increase in rider revenues primarily due to energy eﬃciency, storm securitization, and competitive procurement of renewable energy
programs.
Operating Expenses. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $414 million increase in fuel used in electric generation and purchased power primarily due to higher coal and natural gas prices and changes in
the generation mix, partially oﬀset by the recovery of fuel expenses;
• a $59 million increase in operation, maintenance and other expense primarily due to higher storm restoration costs, higher bad debt expense and
higher nuclear outage and maintenance costs;
• a $58 million increase in depreciation and amortization primarily due to new depreciation rates associated with the North Carolina rate case and a
higher depreciable base, partially oﬀset by lower depreciation related to the extension of the lives of nuclear facilities; and
• a $20 million increase in property and other taxes due to higher franchise and property taxes and a prior year sales and use tax refund.
47
MD&A DUKE ENERGY CAROLINAS
Partially oﬀset by:
• a $201 million decrease in impairment of assets and other charges primarily due to the prior year South Carolina Supreme Court decision on coal
ash.
Other Income and Expenses. The variance was driven by the coal ash insurance litigation proceeds received in the prior year, partially oﬀset by an
increase in AFUDC equity due to higher capital expenditures.
Interest Expense. The variance was driven by higher interest rates and outstanding debt balances.
Income Tax Expense. The increase in tax expense was primarily due to an increase in pretax income.
PROGRESS ENERGY
Results of Operations
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 Variance
Operating Revenues $ 13,125 $ 11,057 $ 2,068 
Operating Expenses
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 5,078  3,584  1,494 
Operation, maintenance and other 2,458  2,529  (71)
Depreciation and amortization 2,142  1,929  213 
Property and other taxes 607  542  65 
Impairment of assets and other charges 12  82  (70)
Total operating expenses 10,297  8,666  1,631 
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 11  14  (3)
Operating Income 2,839  2,405  434 
Other Income and Expenses, net 181  215  (34)
Interest Expense 844  794  50 
Income Before Income Taxes 2,176  1,826  350 
Income Tax Expense 348  227  121 
Net Income 1,828  1,599  229 
Less: Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests —  1  (1)
Net Income Attributable to Parent $ 1,828 $ 1,598 $ 230 
Year Ended December 31, 2022, as compared to 2021
Operating Revenues. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $1,481 million increase in fuel revenues driven by higher fuel prices and higher volumes;
• a $249 million increase in weather-normal retail sales volumes;
• a $230 million increase in retail pricing due to the North Carolina rate case and base rate adjustments at Duke Energy Florida related to annual
increases from the 2021 Settlement Agreement and the solar base rate adjustment;
• an $85 million increase in rider revenues due to higher revenues from the Storm Protection Plan at Duke Energy Florida and storm securitization
and energy eﬃciency riders at Duke Energy Progress;
• a $53 million increase in wholesale revenues, net of fuel, due to higher capacity volumes; and
• a $43 million increase in retail sales due to favorable weather.
Partially oﬀset by:
• an $86 million decrease in capacity revenue primarily due to accelerated recovery of retired Crystal River coal units in 2021.
Operating Expenses. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $1,494 million increase in fuel used in electric generation and purchased power primarily due to higher demand and higher natural gas prices;
• a $213 million increase in depreciation and amortization primarily due to increased rates at Duke Energy Florida and higher amortization of
deferred coal ash and storm costs at Duke Energy Progress, partially oﬀset by the extension of the lives at nuclear facilities at Duke Energy
Progress; and
• a $65 million increase in property and other taxes primarily due to an increase in gross receipts taxes at Duke Energy Florida and higher franchise
and property taxes at Duke Energy Progress.
48
MD&A PROGRESS ENERGY
Partially oﬀset by:
• a $71 million decrease in operation, maintenance and other expense primarily due to reduced storm amortization at Duke Energy Florida; and
• a $70 million decrease in impairment of assets and other charges due to the prior year South Carolina Supreme Court decision on coal ash and
optimization of the company's real estate portfolio and reduction of oﬃce space.
Other Income and Expenses, net. The variance is primarily due to coal ash insurance litigation proceeds received in the prior year at Duke Energy
Progress.
Interest Expense. The variance was driven primarily by higher interest expense and outstanding debt balances at Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy
Florida.
Income Tax Expense. The increase in tax expense was primarily due to an increase in pretax income and a decrease in the amortization of excess deferred
taxes.
DUKE ENERGY PROGRESS
Results of Operations
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 Variance
Operating Revenues $ 6,753 $ 5,780 $ 973 
Operating Expenses
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 2,492  1,778  714 
Operation, maintenance and other 1,475  1,467  8 
Depreciation and amortization 1,187  1,097  90 
Property and other taxes 190  159  31 
Impairment of assets and other charges 7  63  (56)
Total operating expenses 5,351  4,564  787 
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 4  13  (9)
Operating Income 1,406  1,229  177 
Other Income and Expenses, net 114  143  (29)
Interest Expense 354  306  48 
Income Before Income Taxes 1,166  1,066  100 
Income Tax Expense 158  75  83 
Net Income $ 1,008 $ 991 $ 17 
The following table shows the percent changes in GWh sales and average number of customers for Duke Energy Progress. The below percentages for retail
customer classes represent billed sales only. Total sales includes billed and unbilled retail sales and wholesale sales to incorporated municipalities, public and
private utilities and power marketers. Amounts are not weather-normalized.
Increase (Decrease) over prior year 2022
Residential sales (0.8)%
General service sales 7.5 %
Industrial sales 18.1 %
Wholesale power sales 2.5 %
Joint dispatch sales 27.5 %
Total sales 5.4 %
Average number of customers 1.9 %
Year Ended December 31, 2022, as compared to 2021
Operating Revenues. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $699 million increase in fuel revenues driven by higher fuel prices and higher volumes;
• a $128 million increase due to higher pricing from the North Carolina retail rate case, net of a return of EDIT to customers;
• a $58 million increase in weather-normal retail sales volumes;
• a $39 million increase in rider revenues primarily due to storm securitization and energy eﬃciency riders, partially oﬀset by the Renewable Energy
Portfolio Standards rider;
• a $27 million increase in retail sales due to favorable weather compared to the prior year; and
• a $20 million increase in wholesale revenues, net of fuel, due to higher capacity volumes.
49
MD&A DUKE ENERGY PROGRESS
Operating Expenses. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $714 million increase in fuel used in electric generation and purchased power primarily due to higher natural gas prices and changes in the
generation mix, partially oﬀset by the recovery of fuel expenses and lower coal expense;
• a $90 million increase in depreciation and amortization due to higher amortization of deferred coal ash costs and amortization related to deferred
storm costs, partially oﬀset by lower depreciation related to the extension of the lives of nuclear facilities; and
• a $31 million increase in property and other taxes due to higher franchise and property taxes and a prior year sales and use tax refund.
Partially oﬀset by:
• a $56 million decrease in impairment of assets and other charges primarily due to the prior year South Carolina Supreme Court decision on coal ash
and optimization of the company's real estate portfolio and reduction of oﬃce space.
Other Income and Expenses, net. The variance was primarily due to coal ash insurance litigation proceeds received in the prior year.
Interest Expense. The variance was driven primarily by higher outstanding debt balances.
Income Tax Expense. The increase in tax expense was primarily due to an increase in pretax income and a decrease in the amortization of excess deferred
taxes.
DUKE ENERGY FLORIDA
Results of Operations
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 Variance
Operating Revenues $ 6,353 $ 5,259 $ 1,094 
Operating Expenses
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 2,586  1,806  780 
Operation, maintenance and other 967  1,048  (81)
Depreciation and amortization 955  831  124 
Property and other taxes 421  383  38 
Impairment of assets and other charges 4  19  (15)
Total operating expenses 4,933  4,087  846 
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 2  1  1 
Operating Income 1,422  1,173  249 
Other Income and Expenses, net 74  71  3 
Interest Expense 362  319  43 
Income Before Income Taxes 1,134  925  209 
Income Tax Expense 225  187  38 
Net Income $ 909 $ 738 $ 171 
The following table shows the percent changes in GWh sales and average number of customers for Duke Energy Florida. The below percentages for retail
customer classes represent billed sales only. Wholesale power sales include both billed and unbilled sales. Total sales includes billed and unbilled retail sales
and wholesale sales to incorporated municipalities, public and private utilities and power marketers. Amounts are not weather-normalized.
Increase (Decrease) over prior year 2022
Residential sales 1.5 %
General service sales 3.5 %
Industrial sales 6.6 %
Wholesale power sales 38.7 %
Total sales 8.9 %
Average number of customers 1.7 %
Year Ended December 31, 2022, as compared to 2021
Operating Revenues. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $782 million increase in fuel revenues driven by higher fuel prices and higher volumes;
• a $191 million increase in weather-normal retail sales volumes;
• a $102 million increase in retail pricing due to base rate adjustments related to annual increases from the 2021 Settlement agreement and the
solar base rate adjustment;
50
MD&A DUKE ENERGY FLORIDA
• a $46 million increase in rider revenues primarily due to increased Storm Protection Plan rider revenue driven by higher debt and equity returns
from increased capital expenditures in the current year;
• a $33 million increase in wholesale power revenues, net of fuel, primarily due to higher capacity revenues and bulk power sales; and
• a $16 million increase in retail sales due to favorable weather in the current year.
Partially oﬀset by:
• an $86 million decrease in capacity revenue primarily due to accelerated recovery of the retired coal units Crystal River 1 and 2 in 2021.
Operating Expenses. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $780 million increase in fuel used in electric generation and purchased power primarily due to higher natural gas prices;
• a $124 million increase in depreciation and amortization primarily due to an increase in depreciation rates starting in January 2022; and
• a $38 million increase in property and other taxes primarily due to an increase in gross receipt taxes driven by higher revenues.
Partially oﬀset by:
• an $81 million decrease in operation, maintenance and other primarily due to reduced storm amortization and reduced vegetation management
costs, partially oﬀset by higher bad debt expense; and
• a $15 million decrease in impairment of assets and other charges due to the prior year optimization of the company's real estate portfolio and
reduction of oﬃce space.
Interest Expense. The variance was driven by higher interest rates and outstanding debt balances.
Income Tax Expense. The increase in tax expense was primarily due to higher pretax income.
DUKE ENERGY OHIO
Results of Operations
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 Variance
Operating Revenues
Regulated electric $ 1,798 $ 1,493 $ 305 
Regulated natural gas 716  544  172 
Total operating revenues 2,514  2,037  477 
Operating Expenses
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 657  409  248 
Cost of natural gas  261  136  125 
Operation, maintenance and other 523  479  44 
Depreciation and amortization 324  307  17 
Property and other taxes 369  355  14 
Impairment of assets and other charges (10) 25  (35)
Total operating expenses 2,124  1,711  413 
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 1  1  — 
Operating Income 391  327  64 
Other Income and Expenses, net 19  18  1 
Interest Expense 129  111  18 
Income Before Income Taxes 281  234  47 
Income Tax (Beneﬁt) Expense (21) 30  (51)
Net Income $ 302 $ 204 $ 98 
51
MD&A DUKE ENERGY OHIO
The following table shows the percent changes in GWh sales of electricity, MCF of natural gas delivered and average number of electric and natural gas
customers for Duke Energy Ohio. The below percentages for retail customer classes represent billed sales only. Total sales includes billed and unbilled retail
sales and wholesale sales to incorporated municipalities, public and private utilities and power marketers. Amounts are not weather-normalized.
Electric Natural Gas
Increase (Decrease) over prior year 2022 2022
Residential sales (0.5)% 13.7 %
General service sales (2.1)% 1.3 %
Industrial sales (6.8)% 0.7 %
Wholesale electric power sales (11.0)% n/a
Other natural gas sales n/a (3.6)%
Total sales 0.6 % 4.9 %
Average number of customers 1.3 % 0.6 %
Year Ended December 31, 2022, as compared to 2021
Operating Revenues. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $372 million increase in fuel related revenues primarily due to higher retail sales volumes and higher fuel rates in the current year in response to
an increase in natural gas prices and purchased power expense;
• a $55 million increase in retail revenue riders primarily due to the Ohio CEP and Distribution Capital Investment Rider (DCI);
• a $39 million increase in other electric revenues primarily due to Distribution Decoupling rider adjustments recorded in 2021;
• a $10 million increase in bulk power marketing sales; and
• a $10 million increase due to favorable weather in the current year.
Partially oﬀset by:
• a $15 million decrease due to the MGP Settlement.
Operating Expenses. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $373 million increase in fuel expense primarily driven by higher retail prices and increased volumes for natural gas and purchased power;
• a $44 million increase in operation, maintenance and other expense primarily due to the MGP Settlement, partially oﬀset by employee related
costs;
• a $17 million increase in depreciation and amortization primarily driven by increases in distribution plant in service and lower CEP deferrals,
partially oﬀset by rate case adjustments for the over amortization of meter assets in 2022; and
• a $14 million increase in property and other taxes primarily due to higher property taxes, higher kilowatt and natural gas distribution taxes and a
lower Network Integration Transmission Services tax deferral.
Partially oﬀset by:
• a $35 million decrease in impairment of assets and other charges primarily due to the prior year impairments related to the propane caverns in
Ohio and the optimization of the company's real estate portfolio and reduction of oﬃce space, partially oﬀset by the partial reversal of the propane
cavern impairment in the current year.
Interest Expense. The variance was primarily due to higher interest rates, outstanding debt balances and post in-service carrying costs, partially oﬀset by
AFUDC debt.
Income Tax (Beneﬁt) Expense. The decrease in tax expense was primarily due to an increase in the amortization of excess deferred taxes related to the
MGP Settlement.
52
MD&A DUKE ENERGY INDIANA
DUKE ENERGY INDIANA
Results of Operations
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 Variance
Operating Revenues $ 3,922 $ 3,174 $ 748 
Operating Expenses
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 1,819  985  834 
Operation, maintenance and other 729  750  (21)
Depreciation and amortization 645  615  30 
Property and other taxes 75  73  2 
Impairment of assets and other charges 388  9  379 
Total operating expenses 3,656  2,432  1,224 
Operating Income 266  742  (476)
Other Income and Expenses, net 36  42  (6)
Interest Expense 189  196  (7)
Income Before Income Taxes 113  588  (475)
Income Tax (Beneﬁt) Expense (24) 107  (131)
Net Income  $ 137 $ 481 $ (344)
The following table shows the percent changes in GWh sales and average number of customers for Duke Energy Indiana. The below percentages for retail
customer classes represent billed sales only. Total sales includes billed and unbilled retail sales and wholesale sales to incorporated municipalities, public and
private utilities and power marketers. Amounts are not weather-normalized.
Increase (Decrease) over prior year 2022
Residential sales (0.4)%
General service sales 1.8 %
Industrial sales (12.1)%
Wholesale power sales 5.4 %
Total sales 1.9 %
Average number of customers 1.4 %
Year Ended December 31, 2022, as compared to 2021
Operating Revenues. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $700 million increase in retail fuel revenues primarily due to higher fuel cost recovery driven by higher retail sales volumes and fuel prices;
• a $74 million increase primarily due to wholesale revenues, including fuel revenues, driven by higher rates and the bulk power marketing sharing
provision;
• a $46 million increase in weather-normal retail sales volumes primarily due to higher nonresidential customer demand; and
• a $20 million increase in retail sales due to favorable weather.
Partially oﬀset by:
• a $67 million decrease due to the Indiana Supreme Court ruling on recovery of certain coal ash costs;
• a $13 million decrease primarily due to the Utility Receipts Tax repeal; and
• a $12 million decrease primarily due to ﬁxed bill plans and other electric revenues.
Operating Expenses. The variance was driven primarily by:
• an $834 million increase in fuel used in electric generation and purchased power primarily due to higher purchased power expense and higher
natural gas and coal costs;
• a $379 million increase in impairment of assets and other charges primarily due to the Indiana court rulings on recovery of certain coal ash costs;
and
• a $30 million increase in depreciation and amortization primarily due to additional plant in service, Step 2 rates true-up adjustment to depreciation
expense and coal ash depreciation.
Partially oﬀset by:
• a $21 million decrease in operation, maintenance and other primarily due to lower outage, base maintenance work and employee related costs.
53
MD&A DUKE ENERGY INDIANA
Income Tax (Beneﬁt) Expense. The decrease in tax expense was primarily due to a decrease in pretax income and an increase in the amortization of
excess deferred income taxes.
PIEDMONT
Results of Operations
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 Variance
Operating Revenues $ 2,124 $ 1,569 $ 555 
Operating Expenses
Cost of natural gas 1,015  569  446 
Operation, maintenance and other 368  327  41 
Depreciation and amortization 222  213  9 
Property and other taxes 57  55  2 
Impairment of assets and other charges 18  10  8 
Total operating expenses 1,680  1,174  506 
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 4  —  4 
Operating Income 448  395  53 
Other Income and Expenses, net 54  64  (10)
Interest Expense 140  119  21 
Income Before Income Taxes 362  340  22 
Income Tax Expense 39  30  9 
Net Income $ 323 $ 310 $ 13 
The following table shows the percent changes in Dth delivered and average number of customers. The percentages for all throughput deliveries represent
billed and unbilled sales. Amounts are not weather-normalized.
Increase (Decrease) over prior year 2022
Residential deliveries 5.0 %
Commercial deliveries 8.5 %
Industrial deliveries 1.2 %
Power generation deliveries 23.3 %
For resale (4.3)%
Total throughput deliveries 15.7 %
Secondary market volumes 18.9 %
Average number of customers 1.4 %
The margin decoupling mechanism adjusts for variations in residential and commercial use per customer, including those due to weather and conservation.
The weather normalization adjustment mechanisms mostly oﬀset the impact of weather on bills rendered, but do not ensure full recovery of approved margin
during periods when winter weather is signiﬁcantly warmer or colder than normal.
Year Ended December 31, 2022, as compared to 2021
Operating Revenues. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $257 million increase due to higher natural gas costs passed through to customers and higher volumes;
• a $213 million increase due to increased secondary marketing activity including higher oﬀ-system sales natural gas costs; and
• a $64 million increase due to base rate increases.
Operating Expenses. The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $257 million increase in cost of natural gas due to higher natural gas costs passed through to customers and higher volumes;
• a $189 million increase in cost of natural gas due to increased secondary marketing activity including higher oﬀ-system sales higher natural gas
costs; and
• a $41 million increase in operation, maintenance and other due to higher spend on internal and contract labor costs, locates, ﬂeet, materials and
other.
Other Income and Expenses, net. The variance was driven primarily by a decrease in AFUDC equity base.
Interest Expense. The variance was primarily due to higher debt outstanding and interest rates.
Income Tax Expense. The increase in tax expense was primarily due to an increase in pretax income and a decrease in the amortization of excess deferred
taxes.
54
MD&A CRITICAL ACCOUNTING POLICIES AND ESTIMATES
CRITICAL ACCOUNTING POLICIES AND ESTIMATES
Preparation of ﬁnancial statements requires the application of accounting policies, judgments, assumptions and estimates that can signiﬁcantly aﬀect the
reported results of operations, cash ﬂows or the amounts of assets and liabilities recognized in the ﬁnancial statements. Judgments made include the
likelihood of success of particular projects, possible legal and regulatory challenges, earnings assumptions on pension and other beneﬁt fund investments
and anticipated recovery of costs, especially through regulated operations. 
Management discusses these policies, estimates and assumptions with senior members of management on a regular basis and provides periodic updates on
management decisions to the Audit Committee. Management believes the areas described below require signiﬁcant judgment in the application of
accounting policy or in making estimates and assumptions that are inherently uncertain and that may change in subsequent periods.
For further information, see Note 1 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Summary of Signiﬁcant Accounting Policies."
Regulated Operations Accounting
Substantially all of Duke Energy’s regulated operations meet the criteria for application of regulated operations accounting treatment. As a result, Duke
Energy is required to record assets and liabilities that would not be recorded for nonregulated entities. Regulatory assets generally represent incurred costs
that have been deferred because such costs are probable of future recovery in customer rates. Regulatory liabilities are recorded when it is probable that a
regulator will require Duke Energy to make refunds to customers or reduce rates to customers for previous collections or deferred revenue for costs that have
yet to be incurred.
Management continually assesses whether recorded regulatory assets are probable of future recovery by considering factors such as:
• applicable regulatory environment changes;
• historical regulatory treatment for similar costs in Duke Energy’s jurisdictions;
• litigation of rate orders;
• recent rate orders to other regulated entities;
• levels of actual return on equity compared to approved rates of return on equity; and
• the status of any pending or potential deregulation legislation.
If future recovery of costs ceases to be probable, asset write-oﬀs would be recognized in operating income. Additionally, regulatory agencies can provide
ﬂexibility in the manner and timing of the depreciation of property, plant and equipment, recognition of asset retirement costs and amortization of regulatory
assets, or may disallow recovery of all or a portion of certain assets.
As required by regulated operations accounting rules, signiﬁcant judgment can be required to determine if an otherwise recognizable incurred cost qualiﬁes
to be deferred for future recovery as a regulatory asset. Signiﬁcant judgment can also be required to determine if revenues previously recognized are for
entity speciﬁc costs that are no longer expected to be incurred or have not yet been incurred and are therefore a regulatory liability.
For further information, see Note 4 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters."
Goodwill Impairment Assessments
Duke Energy performed its annual goodwill impairment tests for all reporting units as of August 31, 2022. Additionally, Duke Energy monitors all relevant
events and circumstances during the year to determine if an interim impairment test is required. Such events and circumstances include an adverse
regulatory outcome, declining ﬁnancial performance and deterioration of industry or market conditions. As of August 31, 2022, all of the reporting units'
estimated fair value of equity substantially exceeded the carrying value of equity. The fair values of the reporting units were calculated using a weighted
combination of the income approach, which estimates fair value based on discounted cash ﬂows, and the market approach, which estimates fair value based
on market comparables within the utility and energy industries.
Estimated future cash ﬂows under the income approach are based on Duke Energy’s internal business plan. Signiﬁcant assumptions used are growth rates,
future rates of return expected to result from ongoing rate regulation and discount rates. Management determines the appropriate discount rate for each of
its reporting units based on the Weighted Average Cost of Capital (WACC) for each individual reporting unit. The WACC takes into account both the after-tax
cost of debt and cost of equity. A major component of the cost of equity is the current risk-free rate on 20-year U.S. Treasury bonds. In the 2022 impairment
tests, Duke Energy considered implied WACCs for certain peer companies in determining the appropriate WACC rates to use in its analysis. As each reporting
unit has a diﬀerent risk proﬁle based on the nature of its operations, including factors such as regulation, the WACC for each reporting unit may diﬀer.
Accordingly, the WACCs were adjusted, as appropriate, to account for company speciﬁc risk premiums. The discount rates used for calculating the fair values
as of August 31, 2022, for each of Duke Energy’s reporting units ranged from 6.6% to 6.9%. The underlying assumptions and estimates are made as of a
point in time. Subsequent changes, particularly changes in the discount rates, authorized regulated rates of return or growth rates inherent in management’s
estimates of future cash ﬂows, could result in future impairment charges.
One of the most signiﬁcant assumptions utilized in determining the fair value of reporting units under the market approach is implied market multiples for
certain peer companies. Management selects comparable peers based on each peer’s primary business mix, operations, and market capitalization compared
to the applicable reporting unit and calculates implied market multiples based on available projected earnings guidance and peer company market values as
of August 31. The implied market multiples used for calculating the fair values as of August 31, 2022, for each of Duke Energy's reporting units ranged from
10.3 to 13.6.
55
MD&A CRITICAL ACCOUNTING POLICIES AND ESTIMATES
Duke Energy primarily operates in environments that are rate-regulated. In such environments, revenue requirements are adjusted periodically by regulators
based on factors including levels of costs, sales volumes and costs of capital. Accordingly, Duke Energy’s regulated utilities operate to some degree with a
buﬀer from the direct eﬀects, positive or negative, of signiﬁcant swings in market or economic conditions. However, signiﬁcant changes in discount rates or
implied market multiples over a prolonged period may have a material impact on the fair value of equity.
Duke Energy has $19.3 billion in Goodwill at both December 31, 2022, and 2021. For further information, see Note 12 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements, "Goodwill and Intangible Assets."
Asset Retirement Obligations
AROs are recognized for legal obligations associated with the retirement of property, plant and equipment at the present value of the projected liability in the
period in which it is incurred, if a reasonable estimate of fair value can be made. Duke Energy has $12.7 billion and $12.6 billion of AROs as of December 31,
2022, and 2021, respectively. See Note 10, "Asset Retirement Obligations," for further details including a rollforward of related liabilities.
The present value of the initial obligation and subsequent updates are based on discounted cash ﬂows, which include estimates regarding the amount and
timing of future cash ﬂows, regulatory, legal, and legislative decisions, selection of discount rates and cost escalation rates, among other factors. These
estimates are subject to change.
Obligations for nuclear decommissioning are based on site-speciﬁc cost studies. Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress assume prompt
dismantlement of the nuclear facilities after operations are ceased. During 2020, Duke Energy Florida, closed an agreement for the accelerated
decommissioning of the Crystal River Unit 3 nuclear power station after receiving approval from the NRC and FPSC. The retirement obligations for the
decommissioning of Crystal River Unit 3 nuclear power station are measured based on accelerated decommissioning from 2020 continuing through 2027.
Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida also assume that spent fuel will be stored on-site until such time that it can be
transferred to a yet to be built DOE facility.
Obligations for closure of ash basins are based upon discounted cash ﬂows of estimated costs for site-speciﬁc plans. In prior years, certain ash basins have
had probability weightings applied to them based on diﬀerent potential closure methods and the probabilities surrounding pending legal changes.
For further information, see Notes 4, 5 and 10 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters," "Commitments and Contingencies" and "Asset
Retirement Obligations."
Discontinued Operations
Duke Energy calculated an estimated impairment on the disposition of its Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups as of December 31, 2022. The
impairment was recorded to write-down the carrying amount to fair value, less cost to sell. The fair value was primarily determined from the income
approach using discounted cash ﬂows, but also considered market information obtained through the bidding process. Estimated future cash ﬂows under the
income approach were based on Duke Energy's forecast, which was informed by existing power purchase agreements with oﬀtakers and forward merchant
curves. Signiﬁcant assumptions used in the income approach include forward merchant curves and discount rates. The discount rates take into account both
the after-tax cost of debt and cost of equity.
The actual loss will be recorded based on ﬁnal sales agreements and could be materially diﬀerent than the estimated loss.
For further information, See Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Dispositions."
LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
Sources and Uses of Cash
Duke Energy relies primarily upon cash ﬂows from operations, debt and equity issuances and its existing cash and cash equivalents to fund its liquidity and
capital requirements. Duke Energy’s capital requirements arise primarily from capital and investment expenditures, repaying long-term debt and paying
dividends to shareholders. Additionally, due to its existing tax attributes and projected tax credits to be generated relating to the IRA, Duke Energy does not
expect to be a signiﬁcant federal cash taxpayer until around 2030.
56
MD&A LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
Capital Expenditures
Duke Energy continues to focus on reducing risk and positioning its business for future success and will invest principally in its strongest business sectors.
Duke Energy’s projected capital and investment expenditures, including AFUDC debt and capitalized interest, for the next three ﬁscal years are included in
the table below.
(in millions) 2023 2024 2025
Electric Generation $ 1,650 $ 1,950 $ 3,150 
Electric Transmission 1,550  1,925  1,850 
Electric Distribution 3,750  3,750  4,100 
Environmental and Other 675  500  475 
EU&I Growth Capital 7,625  8,125  9,575 
Maintenance 2,800  2,625  2,425 
Total EU&I 10,425  10,750  12,000 
GU&I
1,375  1,150  975 
Other 400  375  425 
Total projected capital and investment expenditures $ 12,200 $ 12,275 $ 13,400 
(a)    Includes nuclear fuel of approximately $1.9 billion in 2023-2025.
Debt
Long-term debt maturities and the interest payable on long-term debt each represent a signiﬁcant cash requirement for the Duke Energy Registrants. See
Note 7 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Debt and Credit Facilities,” for information regarding the Duke Energy Registrants' long-term debt at
December 31, 2022, the weighted average interest rate applicable to each long-term debt category and a schedule of long-term debt maturities over the
next ﬁve years.
Fuel and Purchased Power
Fuel and purchased power includes ﬁrm capacity payments that provide Duke Energy with uninterrupted ﬁrm access to electricity transmission capacity and
natural gas transportation contracts, as well as undesignated contracts and contracts that qualify as NPNS. Duke Energy’s contractual cash obligations for
fuel and purchased power as of December 31, 2022, are as follows:
Payments Due by Period
(in millions) TotalLess than 1
year (2023)2-3 years
(2024 &
2025)4-5 years
(2026 &
2027)More than 5
years (2028
& beyond)
Fuel and purchased power $ 23,255 $ 5,840 $ 7,277 $ 3,674 $ 6,464 
Other Purchase Obligations
Other purchase obligations includes contracts for software, telephone, data and consulting or advisory services, contractual obligations for Engineering,
Procurement, and Construction agreement costs for new generation plants, solar facilities, plant refurbishments, maintenance and day-to-day contract work
and commitments to buy certain products. Amount excludes certain open purchase orders for services that are provided on demand for which the timing of
the purchase cannot be determined. Total cash commitments for related other purchase obligation expenditures are $12,095 million, with $11,118 million
expected to be paid in the next 12 months.
See Note 6 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Leases” for a schedule of both ﬁnance lease and operating lease payments over the next ﬁve years.
See Note 10 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Asset Retirement Obligations” for information on nuclear decommissioning trust funding obligations
and the closure of ash impoundments.
Duke Energy performs ongoing assessments of its respective guarantee obligations to determine whether any liabilities have been incurred as a result of
potential increased nonperformance risk by third parties for which Duke Energy has issued guarantees. See Note 8 to the Consolidated Financial Statements,
“Guarantees and Indemniﬁcations,” for further details of the guarantee arrangements. Issuance of these guarantee arrangements is not required for the
majority of Duke Energy’s operations. Thus, if Duke Energy discontinued issuing these guarantees, there would not be a material impact to the consolidated
results of operations, cash ﬂows or ﬁnancial position. Other than the guarantee arrangements discussed in Note 8 and oﬀ-balance sheet debt related to non-
consolidated VIEs, Duke Energy does not have any material oﬀ-balance sheet ﬁnancing entities or structures. For additional information, see Note 18 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements, "Variable Interest Entities."
Cash and Liquidity
The Subsidiary Registrants generally maintain minimal cash balances and use short-term borrowings to meet their working capital needs and other cash
requirements. The Subsidiary Registrants, excluding Progress Energy, support their short-term borrowing needs through participation with Duke Energy and
certain of its other subsidiaries in a money pool arrangement. The companies with short-term funds may provide short-term loans to aﬃliates participating
under this arrangement. See Note 7 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Debt and Credit Facilities,” for additional discussion of the money pool
arrangement.(a)
57
MD&A LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
Duke Energy and the Subsidiary Registrants, excluding Progress Energy, may also use short-term debt, including commercial paper and the money pool, as a
bridge to long-term debt ﬁnancings. The levels of borrowing may vary signiﬁcantly over the course of the year due to the timing of long-term debt ﬁnancings
and the impact of ﬂuctuations in cash ﬂows from operations. From time to time, Duke Energy’s current liabilities exceed current assets resulting from the use
of short-term debt as a funding source to meet scheduled maturities of long-term debt, as well as cash needs, which can ﬂuctuate due to the seasonality of
its businesses.
As of December 31, 2022, Duke Energy had approximately $409 million of cash on hand, $5.2 billion available under its $9 billion Master Credit Facility. Duke
Energy expects to have suﬃcient liquidity in the form of cash on hand, cash from operations and available credit capacity to support its funding needs. Refer
to Notes 7 and 20 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Debt and Credit Facilities" and "Stockholders' Equity," respectively, for information regarding
Duke Energy's debt and equity issuances, debt maturities and available credit facilities including the Master Credit Facility.
Credit Facilities and Registration Statements
See Note 7 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Debt and Credit Facilities," for further information regarding credit facilities and shelf registration
statements available to Duke Energy and the Duke Energy Registrants.
Dividend Payments
In 2022, Duke Energy paid quarterly cash dividends for the 96th consecutive year and expects to continue its policy of paying regular cash dividends in the
future. There is no assurance as to the amount of future dividends because they depend on future earnings, capital requirements, ﬁnancial condition and are
subject to the discretion of the Board of Directors.
Duke Energy targets a dividend payout ratio of between 65% and 75%, based upon adjusted EPS. Duke Energy increased the dividend by approximately 2%
annually in both 2022 and 2021, and the company remains committed to continued growth of the dividend.
Dividend and Other Funding Restrictions of Duke Energy Subsidiaries
As discussed in Note 4 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Regulatory Matters,” Duke Energy’s public utility operating companies have restrictions on
the amount of funds that can be transferred to Duke Energy through dividends, advances or loans as a result of conditions imposed by various regulators in
conjunction with merger transactions. Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida also have restrictions imposed by their ﬁrst mortgage bond indentures
and Articles of Incorporation, which in certain circumstances, limit their ability to make cash dividends or distributions on common stock. Additionally, certain
other Duke Energy subsidiaries have other restrictions, such as minimum working capital and tangible net worth requirements pursuant to debt and other
agreements that limit the amount of funds that can be transferred to Duke Energy. At December 31, 2022, the amount of restricted net assets of subsidiaries
of Duke Energy that may not be distributed to Duke Energy in the form of a loan or dividend does not exceed a material amount of Duke Energy’s net assets.
Duke Energy does not have any legal or other restrictions on paying common stock dividends to shareholders out of its consolidated equity accounts.
Although these restrictions cap the amount of funding the various operating subsidiaries can provide to Duke Energy, management does not believe these
restrictions will have a signiﬁcant impact on Duke Energy’s ability to access cash to meet its payment of dividends on common stock and other future
funding obligations.
Cash Flows From Operating Activities
Cash ﬂows from operations of EU&I and GU&I are primarily driven by sales of electricity and natural gas, respectively, and costs of operations. These cash
ﬂows from operations are relatively stable and comprise a substantial portion of Duke Energy’s operating cash ﬂows. Weather conditions, working capital and
commodity price ﬂuctuations and unanticipated expenses including unplanned plant outages, storms, legal costs and related settlements can aﬀect the
timing and level of cash ﬂows from operations.
As part of Duke Energy’s continued eﬀort to improve its cash ﬂows from operations and liquidity, Duke Energy works with vendors to improve terms and
conditions, including the extension of payment terms. To support this eﬀort, Duke Energy established a supply chain ﬁnance program (the “program”) in
2020, under which suppliers, at their sole discretion, may sell their receivables from Duke Energy to the participating ﬁnancial institution. The ﬁnancial
institution administers the program. Duke Energy does not issue any guarantees with respect to the program and does not participate in negotiations
between suppliers and the ﬁnancial institution. Duke Energy does not have an economic interest in the supplier’s decision to participate in the program and
receives no interest, fees or other beneﬁt from the ﬁnancial institution based on supplier participation in the program. Suppliers’ decisions on which invoices
are sold do not impact Duke Energy’s payment terms, which are based on commercial terms negotiated between Duke Energy and the supplier regardless of
program participation. A signiﬁcant deterioration in the credit quality of Duke Energy, economic downturn or changes in the ﬁnancial markets could limit the
ﬁnancial institutions willingness to participate in the program. Duke Energy does not believe such risk would have a material impact on our cash ﬂows from
operations or liquidity, as substantially all our payments are made outside the program.
Duke Energy believes it has suﬃcient liquidity resources through the commercial paper markets, and ultimately, the Master Credit Facility, to support these
operations. Cash ﬂows from operations are subject to a number of other factors, including, but not limited to, regulatory constraints, economic trends and
market volatility (see Item 1A, “Risk Factors,” for additional information).
Debt Issuances
Depending on availability based on the issuing entity, the credit rating of the issuing entity, and market conditions, the Subsidiary Registrants prefer to issue
ﬁrst mortgage bonds and secured debt, followed by unsecured debt. This preference is the result of generally higher credit ratings for ﬁrst mortgage bonds
and secured debt, which typically result in lower interest costs. Duke Energy Corporation primarily issues unsecured debt.
In 2023, Duke Energy anticipates issuing additional securities of $6.7 billion through debt capital markets. In certain instances Duke Energy may utilize
instruments other than senior notes, including equity-content securities such as subordinated debt or preferred stock. Proceeds will primarily be for the
purpose of funding capital expenditures and debt maturities. See to Note 7 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Debt and Credit Facilities," for further
information regarding signiﬁcant debt issuances.
58
MD&A LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
Duke Energy’s capitalization is balanced between debt and equity as shown in the table below.
  Projected 2023 Actual 2022 Actual 2021
Equity 41 % 41 % 43 %
Debt 59 % 59 % 57 %
Restrictive Debt Covenants
Duke Energy’s debt and credit agreements contain various ﬁnancial and other covenants. Duke Energy's Master Credit Facility contains a covenant requiring
the debt-to-total capitalization ratio to not exceed 65% for each borrower, excluding Piedmont, and 70% for Piedmont. Failure to meet those covenants
beyond applicable grace periods could result in accelerated due dates and/or termination of the agreements or sublimits thereto. As of December 31, 2022,
Duke Energy presented approximately $131 million of long-term debt as current on the Consolidated Balance Sheet as a result of a technical default due to
the bankruptcy ﬁling of a Duke Energy customer. The Duke Energy Registrants were in compliance with all other covenants related to their debt agreements
as of December 31, 2022. In addition, some credit agreements may allow for acceleration of payments or termination of the agreements due to nonpayment,
or acceleration of other signiﬁcant indebtedness of the borrower or some of its subsidiaries. None of the debt or credit agreements contain material adverse
change clauses.
Credit Ratings
Moody’s Investors Service, Inc. and S&P provide credit ratings for various Duke Energy Registrants. The following table includes Duke Energy and certain
subsidiaries’ credit ratings and ratings outlook as of February 2023.
  Moody's S&P
Duke Energy Corporation Stable Stable
Issuer Credit Rating Baa2  BBB+
Senior Unsecured Debt Baa2  BBB
Junior Subordinated Debt/Preferred Stock Baa3 BBB-
Commercial Paper P-2 A-2
Duke Energy Carolinas Stable  Stable
Senior Secured Debt Aa3  A
Senior Unsecured Debt A2  BBB+
Progress Energy Stable  Stable
Senior Unsecured Debt Baa1  BBB
Duke Energy Progress Stable  Stable
Senior Secured Debt Aa3  A
Duke Energy Florida Stable  Stable
Senior Secured Debt A1  A
Senior Unsecured Debt A3  BBB+
Duke Energy Ohio Stable  Stable
Senior Secured Debt A2  A
Senior Unsecured Debt Baa1  BBB+
Duke Energy Indiana Stable  Stable
Senior Secured Debt Aa3  A
Senior Unsecured Debt A2  BBB+
Duke Energy Kentucky Stable Stable
Senior Unsecured Debt Baa1 BBB+
Piedmont Natural Gas Stable Stable
Senior Unsecured A3 BBB+
Credit ratings are intended to provide credit lenders a framework for comparing the credit quality of securities and are not a recommendation to buy, sell or
hold. The Duke Energy Registrants’ credit ratings are dependent on the rating agencies’ assessments of their ability to meet their debt principal and interest
obligations when they come due. If, as a result of market conditions or other factors, the Duke Energy Registrants are unable to maintain current balance
sheet strength, or if earnings and cash ﬂow outlook materially deteriorates, credit ratings could be negatively impacted.
59
MD&A LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
Cash Flow Information
The following table summarizes Duke Energy’s cash ﬂows for the two most recently completed ﬁscal years.
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021
Cash ﬂows provided by (used in):
Operating activities $ 5,927 $ 8,290 
Investing activities (11,973) (10,935)
Financing activities 6,129  2,609 
Net increase (decrease) in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash 83  (36)
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at beginning of period 520  556 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at end of period $ 603 $ 520 
OPERATING CASH FLOWS
The following table summarizes key components of Duke Energy’s operating cash ﬂows for the two most recently completed ﬁscal years.
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 Variance
Net income $2,455 $3,579 $ (1,124)
Non-cash adjustments to net income 7,385  5,941  1,444 
Contributions to qualiﬁed pension plans (58) —  (58)
Payments for AROs (584) (540) (44)
Working capital (2,081) (897) (1,184)
Other assets and Other liabilities (1,190) 207  (1,397)
Net cash provided by operating activities $5,927 $8,290 $ (2,363)
The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $1,184 million increase in cash outﬂows from working capital and a $1,397 million increase in cash outﬂows from Other assets and Other
liabilities primarily due to an increase in under-collected fuel used in generation due to higher commodity costs.
Partially oﬀset by:
• a $320 million increase in net income after adjustment for non-cash items primarily due to higher revenues from rate cases in various jurisdictions,
favorable weather and volumes, partially oﬀset by an estimated impairment on the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups.
INVESTING CASH FLOWS
The following table summarizes key components of Duke Energy’s investing cash ﬂows for the two most recently completed ﬁscal years.
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 Variance
Capital, investment and acquisition expenditures, net of return of investment capital $(11,419)$(9,752)$ (1,667)
Debt and equity securities, net 90  5  85 
Disbursements to canceled equity method investments —  (855) 855 
Other investing items (644) (333) (311)
Net cash used in investing activities $(11,973)$(10,935)$ (1,038)
The variance relates primarily to an increase in capital expenditures due to higher investments in EU&I, partially oﬀset by a payment made in 2021 to fund
ACP's outstanding debt. The primary use of cash related to investing activities is typically capital, investment and acquisition expenditures, net of return of
investment capital detailed by reportable business segment in the following table.
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 Variance
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure $ 8,985 $ 7,653 $ 1,332 
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure 1,295  1,271  24 
Other 1,139  828  311 
Total capital, investment and acquisition expenditures, net of return of investment capital $11,419 $ 9,752 $ 1,667 
60
MD&A LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
FINANCING CASH FLOWS
The following table summarizes key components of Duke Energy’s ﬁnancing cash ﬂows for the two most recently completed ﬁscal years.
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 Variance
Issuances of long-term debt, net $7,478 $ 3,758 $ 3,720 
Notes payable and commercial paper 574  479  95 
Dividends paid (3,179) (3,114) (65)
Contributions from noncontrolling interests 1,377  1,575  (198)
Other ﬁnancing items (121) (89) (32)
Net cash provided by ﬁnancing activities $6,129 $ 2,609 $ 3,520 
The variance was driven primarily by:
• a $3,720 million net increase in proceeds from issuances of long-term debt, primarily due to timing of issuances and redemptions of long-term debt.
Partially oﬀset by:
• a $198 million decrease in contributions from noncontrolling interests, primarily due to fewer project investments ﬁnanced by tax equity being
placed into service in the current year.
QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
Risk Management Policies
The Enterprise Risk Management policy framework at Duke Energy includes strategy, operational, project execution and ﬁnancial or transaction related risks.
Enterprise Risk Management includes market risk as part of the ﬁnancial and transaction related risks in its framework.
Duke Energy is exposed to market risks associated with commodity prices, interest rates and equity prices. Duke Energy has established comprehensive risk
management policies to monitor and manage these market risks. Duke Energy’s Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer are responsible for the
overall approval of market risk management policies and the delegation of approval and authorization levels. The Finance and Risk Management Committee
of the Board of Directors receives periodic updates from the Chief Risk Oﬃcer and other members of management on market risk positions, corporate
exposures and overall risk management activities. The Chief Risk Oﬃcer is responsible for the overall governance of managing commodity price risk,
including monitoring exposure limits.
The following disclosures about market risk contain forward-looking statements that involve estimates, projections, goals, forecasts, assumptions, risks and
uncertainties that could cause actual results or outcomes to diﬀer materially from those expressed in the forward-looking statements. See Item 1A, “Risk
Factors,” and “Cautionary Statement Regarding Forward-Looking Information” for a discussion of the factors that may impact any such forward-looking
statements made herein.
Commodity Price Risk
Price risk represents the potential risk of loss from adverse changes in the market price of electricity or other energy commodities. Duke Energy’s exposure
to commodity price risk is inﬂuenced by a number of factors, including the eﬀects of regulation, commodity contract size and length, market liquidity, market
conditions, location and unique or speciﬁc contract terms. Duke Energy is exposed to the impact of market ﬂuctuations in the prices of electricity, coal,
natural gas and other energy-related products marketed and purchased as a result of its ownership of energy-related assets.
Duke Energy’s exposure to these ﬂuctuations through its regulated utility operations is limited since these operations are subject to cost-based regulation
and are typically allowed to recover substantially all of these costs through various cost recovery clauses, including fuel clauses, formula-based contracts, or
other cost-sharing mechanisms. While there may be a delay in timing between when these costs are incurred and when they are recovered through rates,
changes from year to year generally do not have a material impact on operating results of these regulated operations.
Duke Energy employs established policies and procedures to manage risks associated with these market ﬂuctuations, which may include using various
commodity derivatives, such as swaps, futures, forwards and options. For additional information, see Note 15 to the Consolidated Financial Statements,
“Derivatives and Hedging.”
Generation Portfolio Risks
For the EU&I segment, the generation portfolio not utilized to serve retail operations or committed load is subject to commodity price ﬂuctuations. However,
the impact on the Consolidated Statements of Operations is limited due to mechanisms in these regulated jurisdictions that result in the sharing of most of
the net proﬁts from these activities with retail customers.
Hedging Strategies
Duke Energy monitors risks associated with commodity price changes on its future operations and, where appropriate, uses various commodity instruments
such as electricity, coal and natural gas hedging contracts and options to mitigate the eﬀect of such ﬂuctuations on operations. Duke Energy’s primary use of
energy commodity derivatives is to hedge against exposure to the prices of power, fuel for generation and natural gas for customers.
61
MD&A QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
Duke Energy also manages its exposure to basis risk through the use of congestion hedge products in RTOs such as ﬁnancial transmission rights (PJM and
MISO), which result in payments based on diﬀerentials in locational marginal prices. The majority of instruments used to manage Duke Energy’s commodity
price exposure are either not designated as hedges or do not qualify for hedge accounting. These instruments are referred to as undesignated contracts.
Mark-to-market changes for undesignated contracts entered into by regulated businesses are reﬂected as regulatory assets or liabilities on the Consolidated
Balance Sheets.
Duke Energy may also enter into other contracts that qualify for the NPNS exception. When a contract meets the criteria to qualify as NPNS, Duke Energy
applies such exception. Income recognition and realization related to NPNS contracts generally coincide with the physical delivery of the commodity. For
contracts qualifying for the NPNS exception, no recognition of the contract’s fair value in the Consolidated Financial Statements is required until settlement of
the contract as long as the transaction remains probable of occurring.
Interest Rate Risk
Duke Energy is exposed to risk resulting from changes in interest rates as a result of its issuance or anticipated issuance of variable and ﬁxed-rate debt and
commercial paper. Duke Energy manages interest rate exposure by limiting variable-rate exposures to a percentage of total debt and by monitoring the
eﬀects of market changes in interest rates. Duke Energy also enters into ﬁnancial derivative instruments, which may include instruments such as, but not
limited to, interest rate swaps, swaptions and U.S. Treasury lock agreements to manage and mitigate interest rate risk exposure. See Notes 1, 7, 15 and 17
to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Summary of Signiﬁcant Accounting Policies,” “Debt and Credit Facilities,” “Derivatives and Hedging,” and “Fair
Value Measurements.”
Duke Energy had $9.2 billion of unhedged long- and short-term ﬂoating interest rate exposure at December 31, 2022. The impact of a 100-basis point
change in interest rates on pretax income is approximately $92 million at December 31, 2022. This amount was estimated by considering the impact of the
hypothetical interest rates on variable-rate securities outstanding, adjusted for interest rate hedges as of December 31, 2022.
Foreign Currency Exchange Risk
Duke Energy is exposed to risk resulting from changes in the foreign currency exchange rates as a result of its issuances of long-term debt denominated in a
foreign currency. Duke Energy manages foreign currency exchange risk exposure by entering into cross-currency swaps, a type of ﬁnancial derivative
instrument, which mitigate foreign currency exchange exposure. See Notes 7, 15 and 17 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Debt and Credit
Facilities,” “Derivatives and Hedging” and “Fair Value Measurements," respectively.
Credit Risk
Credit risk represents the loss that the Duke Energy Registrants would incur if a counterparty fails to perform under its contractual obligations. Where
exposed to credit risk, the Duke Energy Registrants analyze the counterparty's ﬁnancial condition prior to entering into an agreement and monitor exposure
on an ongoing basis. The Duke Energy Registrants establish credit limits where appropriate in the context of contractual arrangements and monitor such
limits.
To reduce credit exposure, the Duke Energy Registrants seek to include netting provisions with counterparties, which permit the oﬀset of receivables and
payables with such counterparties. The Duke Energy Registrants also frequently use master agreements with credit support annexes to further mitigate
certain credit exposures. The master agreements provide for a counterparty to post cash or letters of credit to the exposed party for exposure in excess of an
established threshold. The threshold amount represents a negotiated unsecured credit limit for each party to the agreement, determined in accordance with
the Duke Energy Registrants’ internal corporate credit practices and standards. Collateral agreements generally also provide that the failure to post collateral
when required is suﬃcient cause to terminate transactions and liquidate all positions.
The Duke Energy Registrants also obtain cash, letters of credit, or surety bonds from certain counterparties to provide credit support outside of collateral
agreements, where appropriate, based on a ﬁnancial analysis of the counterparty and the regulatory or contractual terms and conditions applicable to each
transaction. See Note 15 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Derivatives and Hedging,” for additional information regarding credit risk related to
derivative instruments.
The Duke Energy Registrants’ principal counterparties for its electric and natural gas businesses are RTOs, distribution companies, municipalities, electric
cooperatives and utilities located throughout the U.S. Exposure to these entities consists primarily of amounts due to Duke Energy Registrants for delivered
electricity. Additionally, there may be potential risks associated with remarketing of energy and capacity in the event of default by wholesale power
customers. The Duke Energy Registrants have concentrations of receivables from certain of such entities that may aﬀect the Duke Energy Registrants’ credit
risk.
The Duke Energy Registrants are also subject to credit risk from transactions with their suppliers that involve prepayments or milestone payments in
conjunction with outsourcing arrangements, major construction projects and certain commodity purchases. The Duke Energy Registrants’ credit exposure to
such suppliers may take the form of increased costs or project delays in the event of nonperformance. The Duke Energy Registrants' frequently require
guarantees or letters of credit from suppliers to mitigate this credit risk.
Credit risk associated with the Duke Energy Registrants’ service to residential, commercial and industrial customers is generally limited to outstanding
accounts receivable. The Duke Energy Registrants mitigate this credit risk by requiring tariﬀ customers to provide a cash deposit, letter of credit or surety
bond until a satisfactory payment history is established, subject to the rules and regulations in eﬀect in each retail jurisdiction at which time the deposit is
typically refunded. Charge-oﬀs for retail customers have historically been insigniﬁcant to the operations of the Duke Energy Registrants and are typically
recovered through retail rates. Management continually monitors customer charge-oﬀs, payment patterns and the impact of current economic conditions on
customers' ability to pay their outstanding balance to ensure the adequacy of bad debt reserves.
62
MD&A QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
In response to the COVID-19 pandemic that began in March 2020, the Duke Energy Registrants announced a suspension of disconnections for nonpayment to
assist customers during the national emergency. While disconnections have resumed, the company continued to oﬀer ﬂexible options to customers
struggling with the pandemic and the economic fallout, including extended payment arrangements to satisfy delinquent balances through June 2021. Since
then, the company has resumed standard payment arrangement options. The Duke Energy Registrants are monitoring the eﬀects of the resultant economic
slowdown on counterparties’ abilities to perform under their contractual obligations. The Duke Energy Registrants experienced higher charge-oﬀs during
2022, and higher utility account balances in arrears as of December 31, 2022. There is an expectation for the increase in charge-oﬀs to continue in the near
term. The Duke Energy Registrants have reserved for these estimated losses in the allowance for doubtful account balance. See Notes 4 and 19 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters" and "Revenue," respectively, for more information. Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana sell
certain of their accounts receivable and related collections through CRC, a Duke Energy consolidated VIE. Losses on collection are ﬁrst absorbed by the
equity of CRC and next by the subordinated retained interests held by Duke Energy Ohio, Duke Energy Kentucky and Duke Energy Indiana. See Note 18 to
the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Variable Interest Entities.”
The Duke Energy Registrants provide certain non-tariﬀ services, primarily to large commercial and industrial customers in which incurred costs, including
invested capital, are intended to be recovered from the individual customer and therefore are not subject to rate recovery in the event of customer default.
Customer creditworthiness is assessed prior to entering into these transactions. Credit concentration related to these transactions exists for certain of these
customers.
Duke Energy Carolinas has third-party insurance to cover certain losses related to asbestos-related injuries and damages above an aggregate self-insured
retention. See Note 5 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Commitments and Contingencies" for information on asbestos-related injuries and damages
claims.
The Duke Energy Registrants also have credit risk exposure through issuance of performance and ﬁnancial guarantees, letters of credit and surety bonds on
behalf of less than wholly owned entities and third parties. Where the Duke Energy Registrants have issued these guarantees, it is possible that they could
be required to perform under these guarantee obligations in the event the obligor under the guarantee fails to perform. Where the Duke Energy Registrants
have issued guarantees related to assets or operations that have been disposed of via sale, they attempt to secure indemniﬁcation from the buyer against
all future performance obligations under the guarantees. See Note 8 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Guarantees and Indemniﬁcations,” for
further information on guarantees issued by the Duke Energy Registrants.
Duke Energy is subject to credit risk from transactions with counterparties to cross-currency swaps related to future interest and principal payments. The
credit exposure to such counterparties may take the form of higher costs to meet Duke Energy's future euro-denominated interest and principal payments in
the event of counterparty default. Duke Energy selects highly rated banks as counterparties and allocates the hedge for each debt issuance across multiple
counterparties. The master agreements with the counterparties impose collateral requirements on the parties in certain circumstances indicative of material
deterioration in a party's creditworthiness.
Based on the Duke Energy Registrants’ policies for managing credit risk, their exposures and their credit and other reserves, the Duke Energy Registrants do
not currently anticipate a materially adverse eﬀect on their consolidated ﬁnancial position or results of operations as a result of nonperformance by any
counterparty.
Marketable Securities Price Risk
As described further in Note 16 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Investments in Debt and Equity Securities,” Duke Energy invests in debt and
equity securities as part of various investment portfolios to fund certain obligations. The vast majority of investments in equity securities are within the NDTF
and assets of the various pension and other post-retirement beneﬁt plans.
Pension Plan Assets
Duke Energy maintains investments to facilitate funding the costs of providing non-contributory deﬁned beneﬁt retirement and other post-retirement beneﬁt
plans. These investments are exposed to price ﬂuctuations in equity markets and changes in interest rates. The equity securities held in these pension plans
are diversiﬁed to achieve broad market participation and reduce the impact of any single investment, sector or geographic region. Duke Energy has
established asset allocation targets for its pension plan holdings, which take into consideration the investment objectives and the risk proﬁle with respect to
the trust in which the assets are held. See Note 23 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Employee Beneﬁt Plans,” for additional information regarding
investment strategy of pension plan assets.
A signiﬁcant decline in the value of plan asset holdings could require Duke Energy to increase funding of its pension plans in future periods, which could
adversely aﬀect cash ﬂows in those periods. Additionally, a decline in the fair value of plan assets, absent additional cash contributions to the plan, could
increase the amount of pension cost required to be recorded in future periods, which could adversely aﬀect Duke Energy’s results of operations in those
periods.
Nuclear Decommissioning Trust Funds
As required by the NRC, NCUC, PSCSC and FPSC, subsidiaries of Duke Energy maintain trust funds to fund the costs of nuclear decommissioning. As of
December 31, 2022, these funds were invested primarily in domestic and international equity securities, debt securities, cash and cash equivalents and
short-term investments. Per the NRC, Internal Revenue Code, NCUC, PSCSC and FPSC requirements, these funds may be used only for activities related to
nuclear decommissioning. These investments are exposed to price ﬂuctuations in equity markets and changes in interest rates. Duke Energy actively
monitors its portfolios by benchmarking the performance of its investments against certain indices and by maintaining, and periodically reviewing, target
allocation percentages for various asset classes.
Accounting for nuclear decommissioning recognizes that costs are recovered through retail and wholesale rates; therefore, ﬂuctuations in investment prices
do not materially aﬀect the Consolidated Statements of Operations, as changes in the fair value of these investments are primarily deferred as regulatory
assets or regulatory liabilities pursuant to Orders by the NCUC, PSCSC, FPSC and FERC. Earnings or losses of the funds will ultimately impact the amount of
costs recovered through retail and wholesale rates. See Note 10 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Asset Retirement Obligations,” for additional
information regarding nuclear decommissioning costs. See Note 16 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Investments in Debt and Equity Securities,”
for additional information regarding NDTF assets.
63
MD&A OTHER MATTERS
OTHER MATTERS
Environmental Regulations
The Duke Energy Registrants are subject to federal, state and local regulations regarding air and water quality, hazardous and solid waste disposal, coal ash
and other environmental matters. These regulations can be changed from time to time and result in new obligations of the Duke Energy Registrants.
The following sections outline various proposed and recently enacted legislation and regulations that may impact the Duke Energy Registrants. Refer to Note
4 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters," for further information regarding potential plant retirements and regulatory ﬁlings related
to the Duke Energy Registrants.
Coal Combustion Residuals
In April 2015, EPA published a rule to regulate the disposal of CCR from electric utilities as solid waste. The federal regulation classiﬁes CCR as nonhazardous
waste and allows for beneﬁcial use of CCR with some restrictions. The regulation applies to all new and existing landﬁlls, new and existing surface
impoundments receiving CCR and existing surface impoundments located at stations generating electricity (regardless of fuel source), which were no longer
receiving CCR but contained liquids as of the eﬀective date of the rule. The rule establishes requirements regarding landﬁll design, structural integrity design
and assessment criteria for surface impoundments, groundwater monitoring, protection and remedial procedures and other operational and reporting
procedures to ensure the safe disposal and management of CCR.
In addition to the requirements of the federal CCR rule, CCR landﬁlls and surface impoundments will continue to be regulated by the states. Cost recovery for
future expenditures will be pursued through the normal ratemaking process with federal and state utility commissions and via wholesale contracts, which
permit recovery of necessary and prudently incurred costs associated with Duke Energy’s regulated operations. For more information, see Notes 4 and 10 to
the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters" and "Asset Retirement Obligations," respectively.
Coal Ash Act
AROs recorded on the Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress Consolidated Balance Sheets at December 31, 2022, and December 31, 2021,
include the legal obligation for closure of coal ash basins and the disposal of related ash as a result of the Coal Ash Act, the EPA CCR rule and other
agreements. The Coal Ash Act includes a variance procedure for compliance deadlines and other issues surrounding the management of CCR and CCR
surface impoundments and prohibits cost recovery in customer rates for unlawful discharge of ash impoundment waters occurring after January 1, 2014. The
Coal Ash Act leaves the decision on cost recovery determinations related to closure of ash impoundments to the normal ratemaking processes before utility
regulatory commissions.
Consistent with the requirements of the Coal Ash Act, Duke Energy previously submitted comprehensive site assessments and groundwater corrective action
plans to NCDEQ. On December 31, 2019, Duke Energy submitted updated groundwater corrective action plans for six sites in North Carolina and site-speciﬁc
coal ash impoundment closure plans for all 14 North Carolina sites to NCDEQ. In addition, from 2020 through 2022, Duke Energy submitted updated
comprehensive site assessments and groundwater corrective action plans for the remaining North Carolina sites, except for Buck Steam Station, which Duke
Energy expects to submit in June 2023.
On April 1, 2019, NCDEQ issued a closure determination requiring Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress to excavate all remaining coal ash
impoundments at the Allen, Belews Creek, Rogers, Marshall, Mayo and Roxboro facilities in North Carolina. On April 26, 2019, Duke Energy Carolinas and
Duke Energy Progress ﬁled Petitions for Contested Case Hearings in the Oﬃce of Administrative Hearings to challenge NCDEQ's April 1 Order. On December
31, 2019, Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress entered into a settlement agreement with NCDEQ and certain community groups under which
Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress agreed to excavate seven of the nine remaining coal ash basins at these sites with ash moved to on-site
lined landﬁlls, including two at Allen, one at Belews Creek, one at Mayo, one at Roxboro, and two at Rogers. At the two remaining basins at Marshall and
Roxboro, uncapped basin ash will be excavated and moved to lined landﬁlls. Those portions of the basins at Marshall and Roxboro, which were previously
ﬁlled with ash and on which permitted facilities were constructed, will not be disturbed and will be closed pursuant to other state regulations.
Following NCDEQ's April 1 Order, Duke Energy estimated the incremental undiscounted cost to close the nine remaining impoundments by excavation would
be approximately $4 billion to $5 billion, potentially increasing the total estimated costs to permanently close all ash basins in North Carolina and South
Carolina to $9.5 billion to $10.5 billion. The settlement lowered the estimated total undiscounted cost to close the nine remaining basins by excavation by
approximately $1.5 billion as compared to Duke Energy’s original estimate that followed the order. As a result, the estimated total cost to permanently close
all ash basins in North Carolina and South Carolina was estimated to be approximately $8 billion to $9 billion, of which approximately $3.5 billion has been
spent through 2022. The majority of the remaining spend is expected to occur over the next 10 to 15 years.
Duke Energy has completed excavation of all coal ash at the Riverbend, Dan River, Asheville and Sutton plants.
For further information on ash basins and recovery, see Notes 4 and 10 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters" and “Asset
Retirement Obligations,” respectively.
64
MD&A OTHER MATTERS
North Carolina House Bill 951
On October 13, 2021, North Carolina House Bill 951 (HB 951) was signed into law (the “Legislation”). This Legislation establishes a framework overseen by
the NCUC to advance state CO emission reductions from electric generating facilities in the state through the use of least cost planning while providing for
continued reliability and aﬀordable rates for customers served by such generation. It also authorizes the use of performance-based regulation in North
Carolina. Among other things, the Legislation requires the NCUC to:
• develop an initial carbon plan that would target a 70% reduction in CO emissions from public utilities' electric generation in the state by 2030 and
carbon neutrality by 2050, considering all resource options and the latest technology;
• adopt rules to implement the requirements of the Legislation authorizing PBR that includes MYRP with a maximum three-year term, performance
incentive mechanisms to track utility performance, and revenue decoupling for the residential customer class;
• establish rules to securitize costs associated with the early retirement of subcritical coal-ﬁred electric generating facilities necessary to achieve the
authorized carbon reduction goals at 50% of remaining net book value, with the remaining net book value recovered through normal cost-of-service
basis; and
• initiate a process for updating rates and terms of certain existing solar power purchase agreements executed under PURPA.
In October 2022 and January 2023, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Carolinas, respectively, ﬁled applications with the NCUC, which proposed
implementation of the Legislation’s provisions around PBR, including MYRP, residential decoupling and performance incentive mechanisms. Additionally, on
December 30, 2022, the NCUC issued an order adopting the ﬁrst Carbon Plan as directed by the Legislation.
See Note 4, "Regulatory Matters" to the Consolidated Financial Statements for more information.
Other Environmental Regulations
The Duke Energy Registrants are also subject to various federal, state and local laws regarding air and water quality, hazardous and solid waste disposal and
other environmental matters. Duke Energy continues to comply with enacted environmental statutes and regulations even as certain of these regulations are
in various stages of clariﬁcation, revision or legal challenge. The Duke Energy Registrants cannot predict the outcome of these matters.
Global Climate Change and Regulation of GHG Emissions
In 2021, President Biden recommitted the United States to the Paris Agreement and announced a new target for the United States of 50% to 52% reduction
in economywide net GHG emissions from 2005 levels by 2030. The U.S. submittal to support this Paris target includes a goal for 100% carbon-free electricity
by 2035. These actions have been supplemented by a number of executive orders by President Biden and an indication by a number of regulatory agencies,
including the EPA, that they would impose additional regulations on CO and methane emissions to which Duke Energy will be subject. The Duke Energy
Registrants are monitoring these matters and cannot predict the outcome, however, there could be a material impact on our clean energy transition.
CO Emissions Reductions
The Duke Energy Registrants’ direct GHG emissions consist primarily of CO that results primarily from operating a ﬂeet of coal-ﬁred and natural gas-ﬁred
power plants to serve its customers reliably and aﬀordably. In 2019, Duke Energy announced an updated climate strategy with new goals of at least 50%
reduction in carbon emissions from 2005 levels from electric generation by 2030 and net-zero carbon emissions from electric generation by 2050. In
February 2022, we added Scope 2 and certain Scope 3 emissions, including emissions from upstream purchased power and fossil fuel purchases, as well as
downstream customer use of natural gas, to our 2050 net-zero goal. In October 2022, we announced an additional interim target to reduce carbon emissions
from electric generation by 80% from 2005 levels by 2040. Duke Energy also adopted an interim goal of reducing Scope 2 and Scope 3 emissions mentioned
above by 50% below 2021 levels by 2035.
The Duke Energy Registrants have taken actions that have resulted in a reduction of CO emissions over time. Between 2005 and 2022, the Duke Energy
Registrants have collectively lowered the CO emissions from their electricity generation by 44%. Timelines and initiatives, as well as implementation of new
technologies, for future reductions of GHG emissions will vary in each state in which the company operates and will involve collaboration with regulators,
customers and other stakeholders. The goals announced in 2019, and updated in 2022, as well as the actions taken to reduce CO emissions, potentially
lower the exposure to any future mandatory CO emission reduction requirements, whether as a result of federal legislation, EPA regulation, state regulation
or other as yet unknown emission reduction requirement.
Actions to reduce CO emissions have included the retirement of 56 coal-ﬁred electric generating units with a combined generating capacity of 7,500 MW,
while investing in renewables and state-of-the-art highly eﬃcient natural gas-ﬁred generation that produces far fewer CO emissions per unit of electricity
generated than coal. Duke Energy also has made investments to increase EE oﬀerings and ensure continued operations of its zero-CO emissions hydropower
and nuclear plants. These eﬀorts have diversiﬁed its system and signiﬁcantly reduced CO emissions.
Duke Energy will continue to explore the use of currently available and commercially demonstrated technology to reduce CO emissions, including EE, wind,
solar and storage, as well as evolving technologies like carbon capture, utilization and storage, the use of hydrogen and other low-carbon fuels, long-duration
storage and advanced nuclear, in its eﬀorts to achieve its net-zero goal as well as to comply with any future regulations. Duke Energy plans to adjust to and
incorporate evolving and innovative technologies in a way that balances the reliability and aﬀordability while meeting regulatory requirements and customer
demands. Under any future scenario involving mandatory CO limitations, the Duke Energy Registrants would plan to seek recovery of their compliance costs
through appropriate regulatory mechanisms. Future levels of GHG emissions by the Duke Energy Registrants will be inﬂuenced by variables that include
capacity needs in the jurisdictions in which they operate, public policy, tax incentives, economic conditions that aﬀect electricity demand, fuel prices, market
prices, availability of resources and labor, compliance with new or existing regulations, the ability to make enhancements to transmission and distribution
systems to support increased renewables, and the existence of new technologies that can be deployed to generate the electricity necessary to meet
customer demand.2
2
2
2
2
2
2
2
2
2
2
2
2
2
2
65
MD&A OTHER MATTERS
Currently, the Duke Energy Registrants do not purchase carbon credits or oﬀsets for use in connection with the company's net-zero emissions goals. Though
they may purchase carbon credits or oﬀsets for such uses in the future, the amount or cost of which is not expected to be material at this time.
Generation Mix Planning Process
The Duke Energy Registrants annually, biennially or triennially prepare lengthy, forward-looking IRPs. These detailed, highly technical plans are based on the
company’s thorough analysis of numerous factors that can impact the cost of producing and delivering electricity that inﬂuence long-term generation
resource planning decisions. The IRP process helps to evaluate a range of options, taking into account stakeholder input as well as forecasts of future
electricity demand, fuel prices, transmission improvements, new generating capacity, integration of renewables, energy storage, EE and demand response
initiatives. The IRP process also helps evaluate potential environmental and regulatory scenarios to better mitigate policy and economic risks. The IRPs we
ﬁle with regulators look out 10 to 20 years depending on the jurisdiction.
For a number of years, the Duke Energy Registrants have included a price on CO emissions in their IRP planning process to account for the potential
regulation of CO emissions. Incorporating a price on CO emissions in the IRPs allows for the evaluation of existing and future resource needs against
potential climate change policy risk in the absence of policy certainty. One of the challenges with using a CO price, especially in the absence of a clear and
certain policy, is determining the appropriate price to use. To address this uncertainty and ensure the company remains agile, the Duke Energy Registrants
typically use a range of potential CO prices to reﬂect a range of potential policy outcomes.
In September 2020, Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress ﬁled their IRPs in North Carolina and South Carolina, and, in December 2021, Duke
Energy Indiana ﬁled its IRP, outlining an accelerated energy transition, which aligns with the company's 2030 COemissions goal. In December 2021, the
PSCSC rejected Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress’ preferred accelerated coal retirements IRP scenario and instead found that the base case
without a price on CO emissions was the most reasonable IRP scenario.
In 2021, the state of North Carolina passed HB 951, which among other things, directs the NCUC to develop and approve a carbon reduction plan by the end
of 2022 that would target a 70% reduction in CO emissions from Duke Energy Progress' and Duke Energy Carolinas' electric generation in the state by 2030
and carbon neutrality by 2050, considering all resource options and the latest technology. In light of this legislation, in November 2021, the NCUC declined to
make a determination on the portfolios presented in the 2020 IRP noting that the legislation may impact the schedule for coal plant retirements and new
resources and limited its order to short-term actions for use on an interim basis pending preparation of the carbon plan. The NCUC approved its initial carbon
reduction plan in December 2022, which considered feedback from extensive stakeholder engagement and was informed by Duke Energy's initial proposed
carbon plan, ﬁled with the NCUC on May 16, 2022, and built on the IRPs that were ﬁled in 2020 by Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress.
CO and Methane Emissions Reductions from the Natural Gas Distribution Business
In addition to CO emissions resulting primarily from our operations of coal-ﬁred and natural gas-ﬁred power plants, the Duke Energy Registrants are also
responsible for certain methane emissions from the distribution of natural gas to customers. In October 2020, Duke Energy announced a new goal to achieve
net-zero methane emissions from its natural gas distribution business by 2030. The Duke Energy Registrants have taken actions that have resulted in
methane emission reductions, including the replacement of cast iron and bare steel pipelines and associated services with plastic or coated steel, advanced
methane leak detection eﬀorts, reducing time to repair nonhazardous leaks and operational releases of methane, and investment in renewable natural gas.
Timelines and initiatives, as well as implementation of new technologies, for future reductions of upstream methane emissions will vary in each state in
which the company’s natural gas distribution business operates and will involve collaboration with regulators, customers and other stakeholders. EPA has
also proposed regulations that would require reduction of methane emissions upstream of the Duke Energy Registrants' natural gas distribution business. The
impact of these regulations on natural gas fuel prices is not currently quantiﬁable.
In addition to possible EPA regulation of methane emissions, certain local governments, none within the jurisdictions in which the Duke Energy Registrants
operate, have enacted or are considering initiatives to eliminate natural gas use in new buildings and focus on electriﬁcation. Enactment of similar
regulations in the areas in which the Duke Energy Registrants' natural gas distribution operates could have a signiﬁcant impact on the natural gas
distribution business and its operations. At this time, such impacts are not able to be quantiﬁed; however, the net-zero methane goals announced in 2020 for
the natural gas distribution business, as well as the actions taken to reduce these GHG emissions, potentially lowers the exposure to any future mandatory
GHG emission reduction requirements. The Duke Energy Registrants would plan to seek recovery of their compliance costs with any new regulations through
the regulatory process.
Physical Impacts of Climate Change
The Duke Energy Registrants recognize that scientists associate severe weather events with increasing levels of GHGs in the atmosphere. It is possible that
these weather events could have a material impact on future results of operations should they occur more frequently and with greater severity. However, the
uncertain nature of potential changes in extreme weather events (such as increased frequency, duration and severity), the long period of time over which
any potential changes might take place and the inability to predict potential changes with any degree of accuracy, make estimating with any certainty any
potential future ﬁnancial risk to the Duke Energy Registrants’ operations diﬃcult. Additionally, the Duke Energy Registrants would plan to continue to seek
recovery of storm costs through the appropriate regulatory mechanisms. For more information on storm securitization in North Carolina and storm cost
recovery in Florida, see Note 4 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, "Regulatory Matters."
The Duke Energy Registrants routinely take steps to reduce the potential impact of severe weather events on their electric transmission and distribution
systems and natural gas facilities. The steps include modernizing the electric grid through smart meters, storm hardening, self-healing systems and targeted
undergrounding and applying lessons learned from previous storms to restoration eﬀorts. The Duke Energy Registrants’ electric generating facilities and
natural gas facilities are designed to withstand extreme weather events without signiﬁcant damage. The Duke Energy Registrants maintain inventories of
coal, oil and liquiﬁed natural gas to mitigate the eﬀects of any potential short-term disruption in fuel supply so they can continue to provide customers with
an uninterrupted supply of electricity and/or natural gas.2
2 2
2
2
2 
2
2
2
2
66
MD&A OTHER MATTERS
New Accounting Standards
See Note 1 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, “Summary of Signiﬁcant Accounting Policies,” for a discussion of the impact of new accounting
standards.
ITEM 7A. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
See “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Results of Operations and Financial Condition – Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk.”
67
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Duke Energy  
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 70
Consolidated Statements of Operations 73
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income 74
Consolidated Balance Sheets 75
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows  76
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity 77
Duke Energy Carolinas  
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 78
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income 80
Consolidated Balance Sheets 81
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 82
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity 83
Progress Energy  
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 84
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income 86
Consolidated Balance Sheets 87
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 88
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity 89
Duke Energy Progress  
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 90
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income 92
Consolidated Balance Sheets 93
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 94
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity 95
Duke Energy Florida  
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 96
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income 98
Consolidated Balance Sheets 99
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 100
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity 101
Duke Energy Ohio  
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 102
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income 104
Consolidated Balance Sheets 105
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 106
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity 107
Duke Energy Indiana  
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 108
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income 110
Consolidated Balance Sheets 111
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 112
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity 113
Piedmont  
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 114
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income 116
Consolidated Balance Sheets 117
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 118
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity 119
68
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Combined Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements  
Note 1 – Summary of Signiﬁcant Accounting Policies 120
Note 2 – Dispositions 128
Note 3 – Business Segments 130
Note 4 – Regulatory Matters 134
Note 5 – Commitments and Contingencies 151
Note 6 – Leases 156
Note 7 – Debt and Credit Facilities 160
Note 8 – Guarantees and Indemniﬁcations 166
Note 9 – Joint Ownership of Generating and Transmission Facilities 166
Note 10 – Asset Retirement Obligations 167
Note 11 – Property, Plant and Equipment 170
Note 12 – Goodwill and Intangible Assets 172
Note 13 – Investments in Unconsolidated Aﬃliates 173
Note 14 – Related Party Transactions 174
Note 15 – Derivatives and Hedging 175
Note 16 – Investments in Debt and Equity Securities 181
Note 17 – Fair Value Measurements 185
Note 18 – Variable Interest Entities 190
Note 19 – Revenue 193
Note 20 – Stockholders' Equity 198
Note 21 – Severance 200
Note 22 – Stock-Based Compensation 201
Note 23 – Employee Beneﬁt Plans 203
Note 24 – Income Taxes 216
Note 25 – Other Income and Expenses, Net 222
Note 26 – Subsequent Events 223
Note 27 – Quarterly Financial Data (Unaudited) 223
69
REPORTS
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholders and the Board of Directors of Duke Energy Corporation
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Duke Energy Corporation and subsidiaries (the "Company") as of December 31, 2022,
and 2021, the related consolidated statements of operations, comprehensive income, changes in equity, and cash ﬂows, for each of the three years in the
period ended December 31, 2022, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "ﬁnancial statements"). In our opinion, the ﬁnancial statements
present fairly, in all material respects, the ﬁnancial position of the Company as of December 31, 2022, and 2021, and the results of its operations and its
cash ﬂows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2022, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United
States of America.
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB), the Company's
internal control over ﬁnancial reporting as of December 31, 2022, based on criteria established in Internal Control — Integrated Framework (2013) issued
by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission and our report dated February 27, 2023, expressed an unqualiﬁed opinion on
the Company's internal control over ﬁnancial reporting.
Basis for Opinion
These ﬁnancial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company's ﬁnancial
statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting ﬁrm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the
Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the
PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable
assurance about whether the ﬁnancial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. Our audits included performing
procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the ﬁnancial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond
to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the ﬁnancial statements. Our audits
also included evaluating the accounting principles used and signiﬁcant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of
the ﬁnancial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current-period audit of the ﬁnancial statements that were communicated or
required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relate to accounts or disclosures that are material to the ﬁnancial statements and (2)
involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on
the ﬁnancial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matters below, providing a separate opinion on the critical
audit matters or on the accounts or disclosures to which they relate.
Dispositions – Assessment of Held for Sale and Discontinued Operations Classiﬁcation and Impairment Charge – Refer to Note 2 to the
ﬁnancial statements.
Critical Audit Matter Description
In November 2022, Duke Energy committed to a plan to sell the Commercial Renewables business segment, excluding the oﬀshore wind contract for Carolina
Long Bay (“Commercial Renewables business segment”). As a result, the Commercial Renewables business segment was classiﬁed as held for sale and
reported as discontinued operations and pretax impairment charges of approximately $1.7 billion were recorded to reduce the carrying amount of the assets
to their estimated fair value, based on the expected selling price less cost to sell.
We identiﬁed the assessment of held for sale and discontinued operations classiﬁcation and associated impairment charges as a critical audit matter
because of the extensive eﬀort required to audit the subjective and complex judgments associated with those matters, including:
• The assessment of whether the sale is probable and the transfer of assets will be completed within one year from period-end;
• The assessment of whether the sale of the segment represents a discontinued operation;
• The determination of the impairment charges; and
• The assessment of the fair value of the Commercial Renewables business segment.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the classiﬁcation of the Commercial Renewables business segment as held for sale and the associated impairment charges
included the following, among others:
• We tested the eﬀectiveness of management’s controls over (1) the evaluation and disclosure of the held for sale and discontinued operations
classiﬁcation and (2) the determination of the impairment charges, including controls over the reasonableness of the inputs and assumptions used
in management’s estimates.
• We evaluated management’s assessment of held for sale and discontinued operations classiﬁcation as follows:
–Inquired of executive oﬃcers, key members of management and members of the Board of Directors to obtain an understanding of plans to
sell the Commercial Renewables business segment.
70
REPORTS
–Assessed management’s judgments in determining whether the Commercial Renewables business segment meets the held for sale and
discontinued operations classiﬁcation criteria through procedures performed, including, but not limited to, reviewing minutes from
meetings of the Board of Directors, reviewing communications regarding the progression of the selling process, and assessing the
Commercial Renewables business segment relative to the Company’s operations and ﬁnancial results.
–Compared management’s conclusions against relevant guidance and tested the completeness and accuracy of information used in the
Company’s evaluation.
• We evaluated the reasonableness of the determination of the fair value of the long-lived assets by using an internal fair value specialist to assess
the reasonableness of the overall methodology and discount rates. Additionally, we evaluated the mathematical accuracy of the underlying
calculations. Further, we tested forecasted information used to determine fair value.
• We evaluated the accuracy and completeness of the Company's reclassiﬁcation of balances and activity and related disclosures.
• We obtained representation from management asserting to the appropriate presentation, measurement and timing of the Commercial Renewables
business segment.
Regulatory Matters – Impact of Rate Regulation on the Financial Statements – Refer to Notes 1, 4 and 10 to the ﬁnancial statements.
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company is subject to regulation by federal and state utility regulatory agencies (the “Commissions”), which have jurisdiction with respect to the
rates of the Company’s electric and natural gas distribution companies. Management has determined it meets the criteria for the application of regulated
operations accounting in preparing its ﬁnancial statements under accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. Signiﬁcant
judgment can be required to determine if otherwise recognizable incurred costs qualify to be presented as a regulatory asset and deferred because such
costs are probable of future recovery in customer rates. As discussed in Note 4, regulatory proceedings in recent years have focused on the recoverability
of storm costs, fuel costs, and asset retirement obligations speciﬁc to coal ash. As a result, assessing the potential outcomes of future regulatory orders
requires signiﬁcant management judgment. As of December 31, 2022, the Company has approximately $18.1 billion of recorded regulatory assets.
We identiﬁed the impact of rate regulation related to regulatory assets as a critical audit matter due to the signiﬁcant judgments made by management,
including assumptions regarding the outcome of future decisions by the Commissions; to support its assertions on the likelihood of future recovery for
deferred costs. Given that management’s accounting judgments are based on assumptions about the outcome of future decisions by the Commissions,
auditing these judgments required specialized knowledge of accounting for rate regulation and the ratemaking process due to its inherent complexities as
it relates to regulatory assets.
How the Critical Audit Matters Were Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the recovery of regulatory assets included the following, among others:
• We tested the eﬀectiveness of management’s controls over the evaluation of the likelihood of the recovery in future rates and the monitoring
and evaluation of regulatory developments that may aﬀect the likelihood of recovering costs in future rates.
• We evaluated the Company’s disclosures related to the impacts of rate regulation including the balances recorded and regulatory developments.
• We read relevant regulatory orders issued by the Commissions, regulatory statutes, interpretations, procedural memorandums, ﬁlings made by
interveners, and other publicly available information to assess the likelihood of recovery in future rates based on precedents of the Commissions’
treatment of similar costs under similar circumstances. We also evaluated the external information and compared it to management’s recorded
balances for completeness.
• For regulatory matters in process, we inspected the Company’s and intervenors’ ﬁlings with the Commissions, that may impact the Company’s
future rates, for any evidence that might contradict management’s assertions.
• We evaluated the reasonableness of management’s judgments regarding the recoverability of regulatory asset balances by performing the
following:
–We inquired of management regarding changes in regulatory orders and regulatory asset balances during the year.
–We evaluated the reasonableness of such changes based on our knowledge of commission-approved amortization, expected incurred
costs, and recently approved regulatory orders, as applicable.
–We utilized trend analyses to evaluate the historical consistency of regulatory asset balances.
–We compared the recorded regulatory asset balance to an independently developed expectation of the corresponding balance.
71
REPORTS
• We obtained an analysis from management and letters from internal legal counsel for asset retirement obligations speciﬁc to coal ash costs,
regarding probability of recovery for deferred costs not yet addressed in a regulatory order to assess management’s assertion that amounts are
probable of recovery.
• We obtained representation from management asserting that regulatory assets recorded in the ﬁnancial statements are probable of recovery.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Charlotte, North Carolina
February 27, 2023 
We have served as the Company's auditor since 1947.
72
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions, except per share amounts) 2022 2021 2020
Operating Revenues
Regulated electric $ 25,759 $ 22,319 $ 21,461 
Regulated natural gas 2,724  2,008  1,642 
Nonregulated electric and other 285  294  263 
Total operating revenues 28,768  24,621  23,366 
Operating Expenses
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 8,782  6,255  6,051 
Cost of natural gas 1,276  705  460 
Operation, maintenance and other 5,734  5,703  5,502 
Depreciation and amortization 5,086  4,762  4,504 
Property and other taxes 1,466  1,355  1,311 
Impairment of assets and other charges 434  353  978 
Total operating expenses 22,778  19,133  18,806 
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 22  12  11 
Operating Income 6,012  5,500  4,571 
Other Income and Expenses
Equity in earnings (losses) of unconsolidated aﬃliates 113  62  (2,005)
Other income and expenses, net 392  636  451 
Total other income and expenses 505  698  (1,554)
Interest Expense 2,439  2,207  2,097 
Income From Continuing Operations Before Income Taxes 4,078  3,991  920 
Income Tax Expense (Beneﬁt) From Continuing Operations 300  268  (169)
Income From Continuing Operations 3,778  3,723  1,089 
Loss From Discontinued Operations, net of tax (1,323) (144) (7)
Net Income 2,455  3,579  1,082 
Add: Net Loss Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests 95  329  295 
Net Income Attributable to Duke Energy Corporation 2,550  3,908  1,377 
Less: Preferred Dividends 106  106  107 
Net Income Available to Duke Energy Corporation Common Stockholders $ 2,444 $ 3,802 $ 1,270 
Earnings Per Share – Basic and Diluted
Income from continuing operations available to Duke Energy Corporation common stockholders
Basic and Diluted $ 4.74 $ 4.68 $ 1.33 
(Loss) Income from discontinued operations attributable to Duke Energy Corporation common stockholders
Basic and Diluted $ (1.57)$ 0.26 $ 0.39 
Net income available to Duke Energy Corporation common stockholders
Basic and Diluted $ 3.17 $ 4.94 $ 1.72 
Weighted average shares outstanding
Basic 770  769  737 
Diluted 770  769  738 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
73
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Net Income $ 2,455 $ 3,579 $ 1,082 
Other Comprehensive Income (Loss), net of tax
Pension and OPEB adjustments (19) 7  6 
Net unrealized gains (losses) on cash ﬂow hedges 285  (68) (138)
Reclassiﬁcation into earnings from cash ﬂow hedges (38) 13  11 
Net unrealized losses on fair value hedges (33) —  — 
Unrealized (losses) gains on available-for-sale securities (21) (8) 3 
Other Comprehensive Income (Loss), net of tax 174  (56) (118)
Comprehensive Income 2,629  3,523  964 
Add: Comprehensive Loss Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests 84  319  306 
Comprehensive Income Attributable to Duke Energy Corporation 2,713  3,842  1,270 
Less: Preferred Dividends 106  106  107 
Comprehensive Income Available to Duke Energy Corporation Common Stockholders $ 2,607 $ 3,736 $ 1,163 
(a)     Net of income tax expense of approximately $52 million for the year ended December 31, 2022, and income tax beneﬁt of approximately $17 million
and $35 million for the years ended December 31, 2021, and 2020, respectively.
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements(a)
74
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021
ASSETS
Current Assets
Cash and cash equivalents $ 409 $ 341 
Receivables (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $40 at 2022 and $45 at 2021) 1,309  1,085 
Receivables of VIEs (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $176 at 2022 and $76 at 2021) 3,106  2,437 
Inventory 3,584  3,111 
Regulatory assets (includes $106 at 2022 and $105 at 2021 related to VIEs) 3,485  2,150 
Assets held for sale 262  232 
Other (includes $116 at 2022 and $41 at 2021 related to VIEs) 1,067  584 
Total current assets 13,222  9,940 
Property, Plant and Equipment
Cost 163,839  154,496 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (52,100) (49,104)
Facilities to be retired, net 9  144 
Net property, plant and equipment 111,748  105,536 
Other Noncurrent Assets
Goodwill 19,303  19,303 
Regulatory assets (includes $1,715 at 2022 and $1,824 at 2021 related to VIEs) 14,645  12,487 
Nuclear decommissioning trust funds 8,637  10,401 
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net 1,042  1,136 
Investments in equity method unconsolidated aﬃliates 455  457 
Assets held for sale 5,634  6,695 
Other (includes $52 at 2022 and $30 at 2021 related to VIEs) 3,400  3,632 
Total other noncurrent assets 53,116  54,111 
Total Assets $178,086 $169,587 
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY
Current Liabilities
Accounts payable $4,754 $ 3,531 
Notes payable and commercial paper 3,952  3,304 
Taxes accrued 722  731 
Interest accrued 626  530 
Current maturities of long-term debt (includes $350 at 2022 and $76 at 2021 related to VIEs) 4,154  3,387 
Asset retirement obligations 773  647 
Regulatory liabilities 1,466  1,211 
Liabilities associated with assets held for sale 259  167 
Other 2,167  2,423 
Total current liabilities 18,873  15,931 
Long-Term Debt (includes $3,108 at 2022 and $3,379 at 2021 related to VIEs) 67,061  60,448 
Other Noncurrent Liabilities
Deferred income taxes 9,964  9,379 
Asset retirement obligations 11,955  11,953 
Regulatory liabilities 13,582  16,152 
Operating lease liabilities 876  940 
Accrued pension and other post-retirement beneﬁt costs 832  855 
Investment tax credits 849  833 
Liabilities associated with assets held for sale 739  612 
Other 1,502  1,348 
Total other noncurrent liabilities 40,299  42,072 
Commitments and Contingencies
Equity
Preferred stock, Series A, $0.001 par value, 40 million depositary shares authorized and outstanding at 2022 and 2021 973  973 
Preferred stock, Series B, $0.001 par value, 1 million shares authorized and outstanding at 2022 and 2021 989  989 
Common stock, $0.001 par value, 2 billion shares authorized; 770 million and 769 million shares outstanding at 2022 and 2021 1  1 
Additional paid-in capital 44,862  44,371 
Retained earnings 2,637  3,265 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (140) (303)
Total Duke Energy Corporation stockholders' equity 49,322  49,296 
Noncontrolling interests 2,531  1,840 
Total equity 51,853  51,136 
Total Liabilities and Equity $178,086 $169,587 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
75
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES
Net income $ 2,455 $ 3,579 $ 1,082 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:
Depreciation, amortization and accretion (including amortization of nuclear fuel) 5,843  5,663  5,486 
Equity in (earnings) losses of unconsolidated aﬃliates (114) (28) 2,005 
Equity component of AFUDC (197) (171) (154)
Impairment of assets and other charges 2,183  356  984 
Deferred income taxes (200) 191  54 
Contributions to qualiﬁed pension plans (58) —  — 
Payments for asset retirement obligations (584) (540) (610)
Provision for rate refunds (130) (70) (22)
Refund of AMT credit carryforwards —  —  572 
(Increase) decrease in
Net realized and unrealized mark-to-market and hedging transactions 19  50  63 
Receivables (788) (297) (56)
Inventory (476) (34) 66 
Other current assets (1,498) (1,136) 205 
Increase (decrease) in
Accounts payable 805  249  (21)
Taxes accrued 10  284  117 
Other current liabilities (153) (13) (65)
Other assets (1,600) 112  (408)
Other liabilities 410  95  (442)
Net cash provided by operating activities 5,927  8,290  8,856 
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES
Capital expenditures (11,367) (9,715) (9,907)
Contributions to equity method investments (58) (81) (370)
Return of investment capital 6  44  133 
Purchases of debt and equity securities (4,243) (6,098) (8,011)
Proceeds from sales and maturities of debt and equity securities 4,333  6,103  7,949 
Disbursements to canceled equity method investments —  (855) — 
Other (644) (333) (398)
Net cash used in investing activities (11,973) (10,935) (10,604)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES
Proceeds from the:
Issuance of long-term debt 11,874  9,052  6,330 
Issuance of common stock 9  5  2,745 
Payments for the redemption of long-term debt (4,396) (5,294) (4,506)
Proceeds from the issuance of short-term debt with original maturities greater than 90 days 80  332  3,009 
Payments for the redemption of short-term debt with original maturities greater than 90 days (287) (997) (2,147)
Notes payable and commercial paper 781  1,144  (1,181)
Contributions from noncontrolling interests 1,377  1,575  426 
Dividends paid (3,179) (3,114) (2,812)
Other (130) (94) (133)
Net cash provided by ﬁnancing activities 6,129  2,609  1,731 
Net increase (decrease) in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash 83  (36) (17)
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at beginning of period 520  556  573 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at end of period $ 603 $ 520 $ 556 
Supplemental Disclosures:
Cash paid for interest, net of amount capitalized $ 2,361 $ 2,248 $ 2,186 
Cash received from income taxes (6) (3) (585)
Signiﬁcant non-cash transactions:
Accrued capital expenditures 1,766  1,325  1,116 
Non-cash dividends —  —  110 
(a)    Includes approximately $2.6 billion for impacts of under-collected deferred fuel regulatory assets for the year ended December 31, 2022.
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements(a)
(a)
76
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY CORPORATION
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CHANGES IN EQUITY
Duke Energy Corporation
Stockholders'
Accumulated Other Comprehensive
Income (Loss)
Net
Unrealized Total
Net
GainsGains
(Losses) Duke Energy
Common Additional (Losses)on
Available-Pension andCorporation
Preferred StockCommon Paid-inRetained on for-Sale- OPEBStockholders'Noncontrolling Total
(in millions) StockSharesStock CapitalEarningsHedges SecuritiesAdjustments Equity Interests Equity
Balance at
December
31, 2019 $1,962  733 $ 1 $40,881 $4,108 $ (51)$ 3 $ (82)$ 46,822 $ 1,129 $47,951 
Net income
(loss) —  —  —  —  1,270  —  —  —  1,270  (295) 975 
Other
comprehensive
(loss) income —  —  —  —  —  (116) 3  6  (107) (11) (118)
Common stock
issuances,
including
dividend
reinvestment
and employee
beneﬁts —  36  —  2,902  —  —  —  —  2,902  —  2,902 
Common stock
dividends —  —  —  —  (2,815) —  —  —  (2,815) —  (2,815)
Contribution
from
noncontrolling
interest —  —  —  (17) —  —  —  —  (17) 426  409 
Distributions
to
noncontrolling
interest in
subsidiaries —  —  —  —  —  —  —  —  —  (30) (30)
Other —  —  —  1  (92) —  —  —  (91) 1  (90)
Balance at
December
31, 2020 $1,962  769 $ 1 $43,767 $2,471 $ (167)$ 6 $ (76)$ 47,964 $ 1,220 $49,184 
Net income
(loss) —  —  —  —  3,802  —  —  —  3,802  (329) 3,473 
Other
comprehensive
(loss) income —  —  —  —  —  (65) (8) 7  (66) 10  (56)
Common stock
issuances,
including
dividend
reinvestment
and employee
beneﬁts —  —  —  68  —  —  —  —  68  —  68 
Common stock
dividends —  —  —  —  (3,008) —  —  —  (3,008) —  (3,008)
Sale of
noncontrolling
interest —  —  —  545  —  —  —  —  545  454  999 
Contribution
from
noncontrolling
interest, net of
transaction
costs —  —  —  —  —  —  —  —  —  550  550 
Distributions
to
noncontrolling
interest in
subsidiaries —  —  —  —  —  —  —  —  —  (66) (66)
Other —  —  —  (9) —  —  —  —  (9) 1  (8)
Balance at
December
31, 2021 $1,962  769 $ 1 $44,371 $3,265 $ (232)$ (2)$ (69)$ 49,296 $ 1,840 $51,136 
Net income
(loss) —  —  —  —  2,444  —  —  —  2,444  (95) 2,349 
Other
comprehensive
income (loss) —  —  —  —  —  203  (21) (19) 163  11  174 
Common stock
issuances,
including
dividend
reinvestment
and employee
beneﬁts —  1  —  76  —  —  —  —  76  —  76 
Common stock
dividends —  —  —  — (3,073) —  —  —  (3,073) — (3,073)
Sale of
noncontrolling
interest —  —  —  465  —  —  —  —  465  569  1,034 
Purchase of
noncontrolling
interest —  —  —  (51) —  —  —  —  (51) 31  (20)
Contribution
from
noncontrolling
interest, net of
transaction
costs —  —  —  —  —  —  —  —  —  314  314 
Distributions
to
noncontrolling
interests in
subsidiaries —  —  —  —  —  —  —  —  —  (140) (140)
Other —  —  —  1  1  —  —  —  2  1  3 
Balance at(d)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(a)
(c)
(a)
aace a
December
31, 2022 $1,962  770 $ 1 $44,862 $2,637 $ (29)$ (23)$ (88)$ 49,322 $ 2,531 $51,853 
(a)     Relates to tax equity ﬁnancing activity in the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups.
(b)    Amounts in Retained earnings primarily represent impacts due to implementation of a new accounting standard related to Current Estimated Credit Losses. See Note 1 for
additional discussion.
(c)     Relates primarily to the sale of a noncontrolling interest in Duke Energy Indiana. See Note 2 for additional discussion.
(d)    See Duke Energy Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for detailed activity related to Cash Flow and Fair Value Hedges.
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
77
REPORTS
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholder and the Board of Directors of Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC and subsidiaries (the "Company") as of December 31,
2022, and 2021, the related consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income, changes in equity, and cash ﬂows, for each of the three
years in the period ended December 31, 2022, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "ﬁnancial statements"). In our opinion, the ﬁnancial
statements present fairly, in all material respects, the ﬁnancial position of the Company as of December 31, 2022, and 2021, and the results of its
operations and its cash ﬂows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2022, in conformity with accounting principles generally
accepted in the United States of America.
Basis for Opinion
These ﬁnancial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company's ﬁnancial
statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting ﬁrm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB)
and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and
regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable
assurance about whether the ﬁnancial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. The Company is not required to have,
nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over ﬁnancial reporting. As part of our audits, we are required to obtain an understanding
of internal control over ﬁnancial reporting but not for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the eﬀectiveness of the Company’s internal control over
ﬁnancial reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the ﬁnancial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and
performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures
in the ﬁnancial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and signiﬁcant estimates made by management, as well
as evaluating the overall presentation of the ﬁnancial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matter
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current-period audit of the ﬁnancial statements that was communicated or
required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relates to accounts or disclosures that are material to the ﬁnancial statements and (2)
involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion
on the ﬁnancial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matter below, providing a separate opinion on the
critical audit matter or on the accounts or disclosures to which it relates.
Regulatory Matters – Impact of Rate Regulation on the Financial Statements – Refer to Notes 1, 4 and 10 to the ﬁnancial
statements.
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company is subject to rate regulation by the North Carolina Utilities Commission and by the South Carolina Public Service Commission (collectively
the “Commissions”), which have jurisdiction with respect to the electric rates of the Company. Management has determined it meets the criteria for the
application of regulated operations accounting in preparing its ﬁnancial statements under accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of
America. Signiﬁcant judgment can be required to determine if otherwise recognizable incurred costs qualify to be presented as a regulatory asset and
deferred because such costs are probable of future recovery in customer rates. As discussed in Note 4, regulatory proceedings in recent years have
focused on the recoverability of storm costs, fuel costs, and asset retirement obligations speciﬁc to coal ash. As a result, assessing the potential outcomes
of future regulatory orders requires signiﬁcant management judgment. As of December 31, 2022, the Company has approximately $5.4 billion recorded as
regulatory assets.
We identiﬁed the impact of rate regulation related to regulatory assets as a critical audit matter due to the signiﬁcant judgments made by management,
including assumptions regarding the outcome of future decisions by the Commissions, to support its assertions on the likelihood of future recovery for
deferred costs. Given that management’s accounting judgments are based on assumptions about the outcome of future decisions by the Commissions,
auditing these judgments required specialized knowledge of accounting for rate regulation and the ratemaking process due to its inherent complexities as
it relates to regulatory assets.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the recovery of regulatory assets included the following, among others:
•We tested the eﬀectiveness of management’s controls over the evaluation of the likelihood of the recovery in future rates and the monitoring and
evaluation of regulatory developments that may aﬀect the likelihood of recovering costs in future rates.
•We evaluated the Company’s disclosures related to the impacts of rate regulation, including the balances recorded and regulatory
developments.
•We read relevant regulatory orders issued by the Commissions, regulatory statutes, interpretations, procedural memorandums, ﬁlings made by
intervenors, and other publicly available information to assess the likelihood of recovery in future rates based on precedents of the
Commissions’ treatment of similar costs under similar circumstances. We evaluated the external information and compared it to management’s
recorded balances for completeness.
78
REPORTS
•For regulatory matters in process, we inspected the Company’s and intervenors’ ﬁlings with the Commission, that may impact the Company’s
future rates, for any evidence that might contradict management’s assertions.
•We evaluated the reasonableness of management’s judgments regarding the recoverability of regulatory asset balances by performing the
following:
–We inquired of management regarding changes in regulatory orders and regulatory asset balances during the year.
–We evaluated the reasonableness of such changes based on our knowledge of commission-approved amortization, expected incurred
costs, and recently approved regulatory orders, as applicable.
–We utilized trend analyses to evaluate the historical consistency of regulatory asset balances.
–We compared the recorded regulatory asset balance to an independently developed expectation of the corresponding balance.
•We obtained an analysis from management and letters from internal legal counsel for asset retirement obligations speciﬁc to coal ash costs,
regarding probability of recovery for deferred costs not yet addressed in a regulatory order to assess management’s assertion that amounts are
probable of recovery.
•We obtained representation from management asserting that regulatory assets recorded in the ﬁnancial statements are probable of recovery.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Charlotte, North Carolina
February 27, 2023
We have served as the Company's auditor since 1947.
79
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY CAROLINAS, LLC
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS AND COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Operating Revenues $ 7,857 $ 7,102 $ 7,015 
Operating Expenses      
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 2,015  1,601  1,682 
Operation, maintenance and other 1,892  1,833  1,743 
Depreciation and amortization 1,526  1,468  1,462 
Property and other taxes 340  320  299 
Impairment of assets and other charges 26  227  476 
Total operating expenses 5,799  5,449  5,662 
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 4  2  1 
Operating Income 2,062  1,655  1,354 
Other Income and Expenses, net 221  270  177 
Interest Expense 557  538  487 
Income Before Income Taxes 1,726  1,387  1,044 
Income Tax Expense 126  51  88 
Net Income $ 1,600 $ 1,336 $ 956 
Other Comprehensive Income, net of tax      
Net unrealized gain on cash ﬂow hedges —  1  — 
Other Comprehensive Income, net of tax —  1  — 
Comprehensive Income $ 1,600 $ 1,337 $ 956 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
80
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY CAROLINAS, LLC
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
  December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021
ASSETS    
Current Assets    
Cash and cash equivalents $ 44 $ 7 
Receivables (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $3 at 2022 and $1 at 2021) 338  300 
Receivables of VIEs (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $65 at 2022 and $41 at 2021) 928  844 
Receivables from aﬃliated companies 390  190 
Inventory 1,164  1,026 
Regulatory assets (includes $12 at 2022 and 2021 related to VIEs) 1,095  544 
Other (includes $8 at 2022 related to VIEs) 216  95 
Total current assets 4,175  3,006 
Property, Plant and Equipment    
Cost 54,650  51,874 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (18,669) (17,854)
Facilities to be retired, net —  102 
Net property, plant and equipment 35,981  34,122 
Other Noncurrent Assets
Regulatory assets (includes $208 at 2022 and $220 at 2021 related to VIEs) 4,293  2,935 
Nuclear decommissioning trust funds 4,783  5,759 
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net 78  92 
Other 1,036  1,248 
Total other noncurrent assets 10,190  10,034 
Total Assets $ 50,346 $ 47,162 
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY    
Current Liabilities    
Accounts payable $ 1,472 $ 988 
Accounts payable to aﬃliated companies 209  266 
Notes payable to aﬃliated companies 1,233  226 
Taxes accrued 228  274 
Interest accrued 120  125 
Current maturities of long-term debt (includes $10 at 2022 and $5 at 2021 related to VIEs) 1,018  362 
Asset retirement obligations 261  249 
Regulatory liabilities 530  487 
Other 580  546 
Total current liabilities 5,651  3,523 
Long-Term Debt (includes $689 at 2022 and $703 at 2021 related to VIEs) 12,948  12,595 
Long-Term Debt Payable to Aﬃliated Companies 300  318 
Other Noncurrent Liabilities    
Deferred income taxes 4,153  3,634 
Asset retirement obligations 5,121  5,052 
Regulatory liabilities 5,783  7,198 
Operating lease liabilities 83  78 
Accrued pension and other post-retirement beneﬁt costs 38  50 
Investment tax credits 300  287 
Other 527  536 
Total other noncurrent liabilities 16,005  16,835 
Commitments and Contingencies
Equity    
Member's equity 15,448  13,897 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (6) (6)
Total equity 15,442  13,891 
Total Liabilities and Equity $ 50,346 $ 47,162 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
81
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY CAROLINAS, LLC
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES      
Net income $ 1,600 $ 1,336 $ 956 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:
Depreciation and amortization (including amortization of nuclear fuel) 1,787  1,743  1,731 
Equity component of AFUDC (98) (65) (62)
Impairment of assets and other charges 26  227  476 
Deferred income taxes 210  (213) (260)
Contributions to qualiﬁed pension plans (15) —  — 
Payments for asset retirement obligations (200) (182) (162)
Provision for rate refunds (74) (46) (5)
(Increase) decrease in
Net realized and unrealized mark-to-market and hedging transactions —  —  (4)
Receivables (102) (99) 52 
Receivables from aﬃliated companies (200) (66) (10)
Inventory (138) (16) (14)
Other current assets (592) (309) 209 
Increase (decrease) in
Accounts payable 377  5  55 
Accounts payable to aﬃliated companies (75) 85  (11)
Taxes accrued (46) 206  30 
Other current liabilities (91) (39) (56)
Other assets (764) 21  (102)
Other liabilities (36) 116  (47)
Net cash provided by operating activities 1,569  2,704  2,776 
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES
Capital expenditures (3,304) (2,693) (2,669)
Purchases of debt and equity securities (2,633) (3,425) (1,602)
Proceeds from sales and maturities of debt and equity securities 2,633  3,425  1,602 
Other (181) (177) (164)
Net cash used in investing activities (3,485) (2,870) (2,833)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES
Proceeds from the issuance of long-term debt 1,441  1,651  998 
Payments for the redemption of long-term debt (436) (617) (813)
Notes payable to aﬃliated companies 1,007  (280) 477 
Distributions to parent (50) (600) (600)
Other (1) (1) (2)
Net cash provided by ﬁnancing activities 1,961  153  60 
Net increase (decrease) in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash 45  (13) 3 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at beginning of period 8  21  18 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at end of period $ 53 $ 8 $ 21 
Supplemental Disclosures:
Cash paid for interest, net of amount capitalized $ 546 $ 508 $ 481 
Cash (received from) paid for income taxes (60) 233  321 
Signiﬁcant non-cash transactions:
Accrued capital expenditures 475  359  365 
(a)    Includes approximately $1.3 billion for impacts of under-collected deferred fuel regulatory assets for the year ended December 31, 2022.
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements(a)
(a)
82
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY CAROLINAS, LLC
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CHANGES IN EQUITY
Accumulated Other
    Comprehensive  
Income (Loss)
Net Gains
(Losses) on
Member's Cash Flow Total
(in millions) Equity Hedges Equity
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 12,818 $ (7)$ 12,811 
Net income 956  —  956 
Distributions to parent (600) —  (600)
Other (13) —  (13)
Balance at December 31, 2020 $ 13,161 $ (7)$ 13,154 
Net income 1,336  —  1,336 
Other comprehensive income —  1  1 
Distributions to parent (600) —  (600)
Balance at December 31, 2021 $ 13,897 $ (6)$ 13,891 
Net income 1,600  —  1,600 
Distributions to parent (50) —  (50)
Other 1  —  1 
Balance at December 31, 2022 $ 15,448 $ (6)$15,442 
(a)     Amounts primarily represent impacts due to implementation of a new accounting standard related to Credit Losses. See Note 1 for additional
discussion.
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements(a)
83
REPORTS
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholder and the Board of Directors of Progress Energy, Inc.
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Progress Energy, Inc. and subsidiaries (the "Company") as of December 31, 2022, and
2021, the related consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income, changes in equity, and cash ﬂows, for each of the three years in the
period ended December 31, 2022, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "ﬁnancial statements"). In our opinion, the ﬁnancial statements
present fairly, in all material respects, the ﬁnancial position of the Company as of December 31, 2022, and 2021, and the results of its operations and its
cash ﬂows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2022, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United
States of America.
Basis for Opinion
These ﬁnancial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company's ﬁnancial
statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting ﬁrm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB)
and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations
of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable
assurance about whether the ﬁnancial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. The Company is not required to have,
nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over ﬁnancial reporting. As part of our audits, we are required to obtain an understanding of
internal control over ﬁnancial reporting but not for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the eﬀectiveness of the Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial
reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the ﬁnancial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and
performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in
the ﬁnancial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and signiﬁcant estimates made by management, as well as
evaluating the overall presentation of the ﬁnancial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matter
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current-period audit of the ﬁnancial statements that was communicated or
required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relates to accounts or disclosures that are material to the ﬁnancial statements and (2)
involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on
the ﬁnancial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matter below, providing a separate opinion on the critical
audit matter or on the accounts or disclosures to which it relates.
Regulatory Matters – Impact of Rate Regulation on the Financial Statements – Refer to Notes 1, 4 and 10 to the ﬁnancial statements.
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company is subject to rate regulation by the North Carolina Utilities Commission, South Carolina Public Service Commission and Florida Public Service
Commission (collectively the “Commissions”), which have jurisdiction with respect to the electric rates of the Company. Management has determined it
meets the criteria for the application of regulated operations accounting in preparing its ﬁnancial statements under accounting principles generally accepted
in the United States of America. Signiﬁcant judgment can be required to determine if otherwise recognizable incurred costs qualify to be presented as a
regulatory asset and deferred because such costs are probable of future recovery in customer rates. As discussed in Note 4, regulatory proceedings in recent
years have focused on the recoverability of storm costs, fuel costs, and asset retirement obligations speciﬁc to coal ash. As a result, assessing the potential
outcomes of future regulatory orders requires signiﬁcant management judgment. As of December 31, 2022, the Company has approximately $9 billion
recorded as regulatory assets.
We identiﬁed the impact of rate regulation related to regulatory assets as a critical audit matter due to the signiﬁcant judgments made by management,
including assumptions regarding the outcome of future decisions by the Commissions, to support its assertions on the likelihood of future recovery for
deferred costs. Given that management’s accounting judgments are based on assumptions about the outcome of future decisions by the Commissions,
auditing these judgments required specialized knowledge of accounting for rate regulation and the ratemaking process due to its inherent complexities as it
relates to regulatory assets.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the recovery of regulatory assets included the following, among others:
• We tested the eﬀectiveness of management’s controls over the evaluation of the likelihood of the recovery in future rates and the monitoring
and evaluation of regulatory developments that may aﬀect the likelihood of recovering costs in future rates.
• We evaluated the Company’s disclosures related to the impacts of rate regulation, including the balances recorded and regulatory
developments.
• We read relevant regulatory orders issued by the Commissions, regulatory statutes, interpretations, procedural memorandums, ﬁlings made by
interveners, and other publicly available information to assess the likelihood of recovery in future rates based on precedents of the
Commissions’ treatment of similar costs under similar circumstances. We evaluated the external information and compared it to management’s
recorded balances for completeness.
84
REPORTS
• For regulatory matters in process, we inspected the Company’s and intervenors’ ﬁlings with the Commissions, that may impact the
Company’s future rates, for any evidence that might contradict management’s assertions.
• We evaluated the reasonableness of management’s judgments regarding the recoverability of regulatory asset balances by performing the
following:
–We inquired of management regarding changes in regulatory orders and regulatory asset balances during the year.
–We evaluated the reasonableness of such changes based on our knowledge of commission-approved amortization, expected incurred
costs, and recently approved regulatory orders, as applicable.
–We utilized trend analyses to evaluate the historical consistency of regulatory asset balances.
–We compared the recorded regulatory asset balance to an independently developed expectation of the corresponding balance.
• We obtained an analysis from management and letters from internal legal counsel for asset retirement obligations speciﬁc to coal ash costs,
regarding probability of recovery for deferred costs not yet addressed in a regulatory order to assess management’s assertion that amounts are
probable of recovery.
• We obtained representation from management asserting that regulatory assets recorded in the ﬁnancial statements are probable of recovery.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Charlotte, North Carolina
February 27, 2023
We have served as the Company's auditor since 1930.
85
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
PROGRESS ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS AND COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Operating Revenues $ 13,125 $ 11,057 $ 10,627 
Operating Expenses      
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 5,078  3,584  3,479 
Operation, maintenance and other 2,458  2,529  2,479 
Depreciation and amortization 2,142  1,929  1,818 
Property and other taxes 607  542  545 
Impairment of assets and other charges 12  82  495 
Total operating expenses 10,297  8,666  8,816 
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 11  14  9 
Operating Income 2,839  2,405  1,820 
Other Income and Expenses, net 181  215  129 
Interest Expense 844  794  790 
Income Before Income Taxes 2,176  1,826  1,159 
Income Tax Expense 348  227  113 
Net Income 1,828  1,599  1,046 
Less: Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests —  1  1 
Net Income Attributable to Parent $ 1,828 $ 1,598 $ 1,045 
Net Income $ 1,828 $ 1,599 $ 1,046 
Other Comprehensive Income, net of tax      
Pension and OPEB adjustments 5  1  (1)
Net unrealized gain on cash ﬂow hedges 1  3  5 
Unrealized (losses) gains on available-for-sale securities (6) —  (1)
Other Comprehensive Income, net of tax —  4  3 
Comprehensive Income 1,828  1,603  1,049 
Less: Comprehensive Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests —  1  1 
Comprehensive Income Attributable to Parent $ 1,828 $ 1,602 $ 1,048 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
86
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
PROGRESS ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
  December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021
ASSETS    
Current Assets    
Cash and cash equivalents $ 108 $ 70 
Receivables (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $13 at 2022 and $11 at 2021) 318  247 
Receivables of VIEs (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $68 at 2022 and $25 at 2021) 1,289  1,006 
Receivables from aﬃliated companies 22  121 
Inventory 1,579  1,398 
Regulatory assets (includes $94 at 2022 and $93 at 2021 related to VIEs) 1,833  1,030 
Other (includes $88 at 2022 and $39 at 2021 related to VIEs) 342  125 
Total current assets 5,491  3,997 
Property, Plant and Equipment    
Cost 64,822  60,894 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (20,584) (19,214)
Facilities to be retired, net —  26 
Net property, plant and equipment 44,238  41,706 
Other Noncurrent Assets    
Goodwill 3,655  3,655 
Regulatory assets (includes $1,507 at 2022 and $1,603 at 2021 related to VIEs) 7,146  5,909 
Nuclear decommissioning trust funds 3,855  4,642 
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net 628  691 
Other 1,066  1,242 
Total other noncurrent assets 16,350  16,139 
Total Assets $ 66,079 $ 61,842 
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY    
Current Liabilities    
Accounts payable $ 1,481 $ 1,099 
Accounts payable to aﬃliated companies 712  506 
Notes payable to aﬃliated companies 843  2,809 
Taxes accrued 135  128 
Interest accrued 206  192 
Current maturities of long-term debt (includes $340 at 2022 and $71 at 2021 related to VIEs) 697  1,082 
Asset retirement obligations 289  275 
Regulatory liabilities 576  478 
Other 782  868 
Total current liabilities 5,721  7,437 
Long-Term Debt (includes $2,003 at 2022 and $2,293 at 2021 related to VIEs) 21,592  19,591 
Long-Term Debt Payable to Aﬃliated Companies 150  150 
Other Noncurrent Liabilities    
Deferred income taxes 5,147  4,564 
Asset retirement obligations 5,892  5,837 
Regulatory liabilities 4,753  5,566 
Operating lease liabilities 546  606 
Accrued pension and other post-retirement beneﬁt costs 292  417 
Investment tax credits 358  364 
Other 222  162 
Total other noncurrent liabilities 17,210  17,516 
Commitments and Contingencies
Equity    
Common stock, $0.01 par value, 100 shares authorized and outstanding at 2022 and 2021 —  — 
Additional paid-in capital 11,832  9,149 
Retained earnings 9,585  8,007 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (11) (11)
Total Progress Energy, Inc. stockholder's equity 21,406  17,145 
Noncontrolling interests —  3 
Total equity 21,406  17,148 
Total Liabilities and Equity $ 66,079 $ 61,842 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
87
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
PROGRESS ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES      
Net income $ 1,828 $ 1,599 $ 1,046 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:      
Depreciation, amortization and accretion (including amortization of nuclear fuel) 2,405  2,302  2,327 
Equity component of AFUDC (68) (51) (42)
Impairment of assets and other charges 12  82  495 
Deferred income taxes 364  247  (197)
Contributions to qualiﬁed pension plans (13) —  — 
Payments for asset retirement obligations (291) (288) (384)
Provision for rate refunds (58) (36) 2 
(Increase) decrease in
Net realized and unrealized mark-to-market and hedging transactions —  51  (9)
Receivables (322) (97) (69)
Receivables from aﬃliated companies 117  18  (81)
Inventory (183) (26) 49 
Other current assets (937) (551) 223 
Increase (decrease) in
Accounts payable 222  59  (62)
Accounts payable to aﬃliated companies 206  217  (21)
Taxes accrued 8  13  75 
Other current liabilities 96  (32) 139 
Other assets (1,116) (110) (137)
Other liabilities 573  (99) (177)
Net cash provided by operating activities 2,843  3,298  3,177 
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES      
Capital expenditures (4,317) (3,668) (3,488)
Purchases of debt and equity securities (1,341) (2,233) (5,998)
Proceeds from sales and maturities of debt and equity securities 1,417  2,322  6,010 
Notes receivable from aﬃliated companies —  —  164 
Other (137) (156) (160)
Net cash used in investing activities (4,378) (3,735) (3,472)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES      
Proceeds from the issuance of long-term debt 2,775  3,095  1,791 
Payments for the redemption of long-term debt (1,173) (1,883) (2,157)
Notes payable to aﬃliated companies 465  (160) 1,148 
Dividends to parent (425) (700) (400)
Other (36) (2) (13)
Net cash provided by ﬁnancing activities 1,606  350  369 
Net increase (decrease) in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash 71  (87) 74 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at beginning of period 113  200  126 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at end of period $ 184 $ 113 $ 200 
Supplemental Disclosures:      
Cash paid for interest, net of amount capitalized $ 854 $ 813 $ 819 
Cash paid for income taxes 79  14  149 
Signiﬁcant non-cash transactions:
Accrued capital expenditures 663  501  363 
(a)    Includes approximately $1.3 billion for impacts of under-collected deferred fuel regulatory assets for the year ended December 31, 2022.
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements(a)
(a)
88
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
PROGRESS ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CHANGES IN EQUITY
     Accumulated Other Comprehensive
Income (Loss)      
Net GainsNet
UnrealizedTotal
Progress
Additional (Losses) onGains
(Losses)Pension and Energy, Inc.
Paid-inRetainedCash Flowon Available-
for- OPEBStockholder'sNoncontrolling Total
(in millions) CapitalEarnings HedgesSale
SecuritiesAdjustments Equity Interests Equity
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 9,143 $6,465 $ (10)$ (1)$ (7)$ 15,590 $ 3 $15,593 
Net income —  1,045  —  —  —  1,045  1  1,046 
Other comprehensive income (loss) —  —  5  (1) (1) 3  —  3 
Dividends to parent —  (400) —  —  —  (400) —  (400)
Other —  (1) —  —  —  (1) —  (1)
Balance at December 31, 2020 $ 9,143 $7,109 $ (5)$ (2)$ (8)$ 16,237 $ 4 $16,241 
Net income —  1,598  —  —  —  1,598  1  1,599 
Other comprehensive income —  —  3  —  1  4  —  4 
Distributions to noncontrolling
interests —  —  —  —  —  —  (1) (1)
Dividends to parent —  (700) —  —  —  (700) —  (700)
Other 6  —  —  —  —  6  (1) 5 
Balance at December 31, 2021 $ 9,149 $8,007 $ (2)$ (2)$ (7)$ 17,145 $ 3 $17,148 
Net income —  1,828  —  —  —  1,828  —  1,828 
Other comprehensive income (loss) —  —  1  (6) 5  —  —  — 
Distributions to noncontrolling
interests —  —  —  —  —  —  (34) (34)
Dividends to parent (175) (250) —  —  —  (425) —  (425)
Equitization of certain notes payable
to aﬃliates 2,907  —  —  —  —  2,907  —  2,907 
Purchase of a noncontrolling interest (51) —  —  —  —  (51) 31  (20)
Other 2  —  —  —  —  2  —  2 
Balance at December 31, 2022 $11,832 $9,585 $ (1)$ (8)$ (2)$ 21,406 $ — $21,406 
    
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
89
REPORTS
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholder and the Board of Directors of Duke Energy Progress, LLC
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Duke Energy Progress, LLC and subsidiaries (the "Company") as of December 31, 2022,
and 2021, the related consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income, changes in equity, and cash ﬂows, for each of the three years in
the period ended December 31, 2022, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "ﬁnancial statements"). In our opinion, the ﬁnancial statements
present fairly, in all material respects, the ﬁnancial position of the Company as of December 31, 2022, and 2021, and the results of its operations and its
cash ﬂows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2022, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United
States of America.
Basis for Opinion
These ﬁnancial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company's ﬁnancial
statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting ﬁrm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB)
and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations
of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable
assurance about whether the ﬁnancial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. The Company is not required to have,
nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over ﬁnancial reporting. As part of our audits, we are required to obtain an understanding of
internal control over ﬁnancial reporting but not for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the eﬀectiveness of the Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial
reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the ﬁnancial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and
performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in
the ﬁnancial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and signiﬁcant estimates made by management, as well as
evaluating the overall presentation of the ﬁnancial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matter
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current-period audit of the ﬁnancial statements that was communicated or
required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relates to accounts or disclosures that are material to the ﬁnancial statements and (2)
involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on
the ﬁnancial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matter below, providing a separate opinion on the critical
audit matter or on the accounts or disclosures to which it relates.
Regulatory Matters – Impact of Rate Regulation on the Financial Statements – Refer to Notes 1, 4 and 10 to the ﬁnancial statements.
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company is subject to rate regulation by the North Carolina Utilities Commission and by the South Carolina Public Service Commission (collectively the
“Commissions”), which have jurisdiction with respect to the electric rates of the Company. Management has determined it meets the criteria for the
application of regulated operations accounting in preparing its ﬁnancial statements under accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of
America. Signiﬁcant judgment can be required to determine if otherwise recognizable incurred costs qualify to be presented as a regulatory asset and
deferred because such costs are probable of future recovery in customer rates. As discussed in Note 4, regulatory proceedings in recent years have focused
on the recoverability of storm costs, fuel costs, and asset retirement obligations speciﬁc to coal ash. As a result, assessing the potential outcomes of future
regulatory orders requires signiﬁcant management judgment. As of December 31, 2022, the Company has approximately $5.4 billion recorded as regulatory
assets.
We identiﬁed the impact of rate regulation related to regulatory assets as a critical audit matter due to the signiﬁcant judgments made by management,
including assumptions regarding the outcome of future decisions by the Commissions, to support its assertions on the likelihood of future recovery for
deferred costs. Given that management’s accounting judgments are based on assumptions about the outcome of future decisions by the Commissions,
auditing these judgments required specialized knowledge of accounting for rate regulation and the ratemaking process due to its inherent complexities as it
relates to regulatory assets.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the recovery of regulatory assets included the following, among others:
• We tested the eﬀectiveness of management’s controls over the evaluation of the likelihood of the recovery in future rates and the monitoring
and evaluation of regulatory developments that may aﬀect the likelihood of recovering costs in future rates.
• We evaluated the Company’s disclosures related to the impacts of rate regulation, including the balances recorded and regulatory
developments.
• We read relevant regulatory orders issued by the Commissions, regulatory statutes, interpretations, procedural memorandums, ﬁlings made by
interveners, and other publicly available information to assess the likelihood of recovery in future rates based on precedents of the
Commissions’ treatment of similar costs under similar circumstances. We evaluated the external information and compared it to management’s
recorded balances for completeness.
90
REPORTS
• For regulatory matters in process, we inspected the Company’s and intervenors’ ﬁlings with the Commissions, that may impact the
Company’s future rates, for any evidence that might contradict management’s assertions.
• We evaluated the reasonableness of management’s judgments regarding the recoverability of regulatory asset balances by performing the
following:
–We inquired of management regarding changes in regulatory orders and regulatory asset balances during the year.
–We evaluated the reasonableness of such changes based on our knowledge of commission-approved amortization, expected incurred
costs, and recently approved regulatory orders, as applicable.
–We utilized trend analyses to evaluate the historical consistency of regulatory asset balances.
–We compared the recorded regulatory asset balance to an independently developed expectation of the corresponding balance.
• We obtained an analysis from management and letters from internal legal counsel for asset retirement obligations speciﬁc to coal ash costs,
regarding probability of recovery for deferred costs not yet addressed in a regulatory order to assess management’s assertion that amounts are
probable of recovery.
• We obtained representation from management asserting that regulatory assets recorded in the ﬁnancial statements are probable of recovery.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Charlotte, North Carolina
February 27, 2023
We have served as the Company's auditor since 1930.
91
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY PROGRESS, LLC
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS AND COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Operating Revenues $ 6,753 $ 5,780 $ 5,422 
Operating Expenses      
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 2,492  1,778  1,743 
Operation, maintenance and other 1,475  1,467  1,332 
Depreciation and amortization 1,187  1,097  1,116 
Property and other taxes 190  159  167 
Impairment of assets and other charges 7  63  499 
Total operating expenses 5,351  4,564  4,857 
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 4  13  8 
Operating Income 1,406  1,229  573 
Other Income and Expenses, net 114  143  75 
Interest Expense 354  306  269 
Income Before Income Taxes 1,166  1,066  379 
Income Tax Expense (Beneﬁt) 158  75  (36)
Net Income and Comprehensive Income $ 1,008 $ 991 $ 415 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
92
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY PROGRESS, LLC
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
  December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021
ASSETS    
Current Assets    
Cash and cash equivalents $ 49 $ 35 
Receivables (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $4 at 2022 and 2021) 167  127 
Receivables of VIEs (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $40 at 2022 and $17 at 2021) 793  574 
Receivables from aﬃliated companies 25  65 
Inventory 1,006  921 
Regulatory assets (includes $39 at 2022 and 2021 related to VIEs) 690  533 
Other (includes $42 at 2022 related to VIEs) 174  83 
Total current assets 2,904  2,338 
Property, Plant and Equipment
Cost 38,875  37,018 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (14,201) (13,387)
Facilities to be retired, net —  26 
Net property, plant and equipment 24,674  23,657 
Other Noncurrent Assets
Regulatory assets (includes $681 at 2022 and $720 at 2021 related to VIEs) 4,724  4,118 
Nuclear decommissioning trust funds 3,430  4,089 
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net 370  389 
Other 650  792 
Total other noncurrent assets 9,174  9,388 
Total Assets $ 36,752 $ 35,383 
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY
Current Liabilities
Accounts payable $ 601 $ 476 
Accounts payable to aﬃliated companies 508  310 
Notes payable to aﬃliated companies 238  172 
Taxes accrued 77  163 
Interest accrued 101  96 
Current maturities of long-term debt (includes $34 at 2022 and $15 at 2021 related to VIEs) 369  556 
Asset retirement obligations 288  274 
Regulatory liabilities 332  381 
Other 384  448 
Total current liabilities 2,898  2,876 
Long-Term Debt (includes $1,114 at 2022 and $1,097 at 2021 related to VIEs) 10,568  9,543 
Long-Term Debt Payable to Aﬃliated Companies 150  150 
Other Noncurrent Liabilities
Deferred income taxes 2,477  2,208 
Asset retirement obligations 5,535  5,401 
Regulatory liabilities 4,120  4,868 
Operating lease liabilities 335  350 
Accrued pension and other post-retirement beneﬁt costs 160  221 
Investment tax credits 124  128 
Other 76  87 
Total other noncurrent liabilities 12,827  13,263 
Commitments and Contingencies
Equity
Member's Equity 10,309  9,551 
Total Liabilities and Equity $ 36,752 $ 35,383 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
93
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY PROGRESS, LLC
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES      
Net income $ 1,008 $ 991 $ 415 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:      
Depreciation and amortization (including amortization of nuclear fuel) 1,371  1,286  1,299 
Equity component of AFUDC (52) (34) (29)
Impairment of assets and other charges 7  63  499 
Deferred income taxes 121  (46) (234)
Contributions to qualiﬁed pension plans (8) —  — 
Payments for asset retirement obligations (193) (187) (304)
Provisions for rate refunds (58) (36) 2 
(Increase) decrease in
Net realized and unrealized mark-to-market and hedging transactions —  48  1 
Receivables (228) (52) (4)
Receivables from aﬃliated companies 58  (33) 2 
Inventory (85) (11) 23 
Other current assets (207) (147) 98 
Increase (decrease) in
Accounts payable 20  12  (127)
Accounts payable to aﬃliated companies 198  95  12 
Taxes accrued (86) 83  68 
Other current liabilities 13  (23) 157 
Other assets (416) (37) (215)
Other liabilities 38  (16) 3 
Net cash provided by operating activities 1,501  1,956  1,666 
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES      
Capital expenditures (2,070) (1,746) (1,581)
Purchases of debt and equity securities (1,148) (1,931) (1,555)
Proceeds from sales and maturities of debt and equity securities 1,138  1,914  1,516 
Other (29) (20) (57)
Net cash used in investing activities (2,109) (1,783) (1,677)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES
Proceeds from the issuance of long-term debt 1,477  1,959  1,296 
Payments for the redemption of long-term debt (645) (1,308) (1,085)
Notes payable to aﬃliated companies 67  (123) 229 
Distributions to parent (250) (700) (400)
Other (1) (1) (12)
Net cash provided by (used in) ﬁnancing activities 648  (173) 28 
Net increase in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash 40  —  17 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at beginning of period 39  39  22 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at end of period $ 79 $ 39 $ 39 
Supplemental Disclosures:      
Cash paid for interest, net of amount capitalized $ 386 $ 335 $ 301 
Cash paid for income taxes 157  83  123 
Signiﬁcant non-cash transactions:
Accrued capital expenditures 269  163  149 
(a)    Includes approximately $402 million for impacts of under-collected deferred fuel regulatory assets for the year ended December 31, 2022.
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements(a)
(a)
94
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY PROGRESS, LLC
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CHANGES IN EQUITY
  Member's
(in millions) Equity
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 9,246 
Net income 415 
Distribution to parent (400)
Other (1)
Balance at December 31, 2020 $ 9,260 
Net income 991 
Distribution to parent (700)
Balance at December 31, 2021 $ 9,551 
Net income 1,008 
Distribution to parent (250)
Balance at December 31, 2022 $ 10,309 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
95
REPORTS
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholder and the Board of Directors of Duke Energy Florida, LLC
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Duke Energy Florida, LLC and subsidiaries (the "Company") as of December 31, 2022,
and 2021, the related consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income, changes in equity, and cash ﬂows, for each of the three years in
the period ended December 31, 2022, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "ﬁnancial statements"). In our opinion, the ﬁnancial statements
present fairly, in all material respects, the ﬁnancial position of the Company as of December 31, 2022, and 2021, and the results of its operations and its
cash ﬂows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2022, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United
States of America.
Basis for Opinion
These ﬁnancial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company's ﬁnancial
statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting ﬁrm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB)
and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations
of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable
assurance about whether the ﬁnancial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. The Company is not required to have,
nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over ﬁnancial reporting. As part of our audits, we are required to obtain an understanding of
internal control over ﬁnancial reporting but not for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the eﬀectiveness of the Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial
reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the ﬁnancial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and
performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in
the ﬁnancial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and signiﬁcant estimates made by management, as well as
evaluating the overall presentation of the ﬁnancial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matter
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current-period audit of the ﬁnancial statements that was communicated or
required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relates to accounts or disclosures that are material to the ﬁnancial statements and (2)
involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on
the ﬁnancial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matter below, providing a separate opinion on the critical
audit matter or on the accounts or disclosures to which it relates.
Regulatory Matters – Impact of Rate Regulation on the Financial Statements – Refer to Notes 1 and 4 to the ﬁnancial statements.
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company is subject to rate regulation by the Florida Public Service Commission (the “Commission”), which has jurisdiction with respect to the electric
rates of the Company. Management has determined it meets the criteria for the application of regulated operations accounting in preparing its ﬁnancial
statements under accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. Signiﬁcant judgment can be required to determine if otherwise
recognizable incurred costs qualify to be presented as a regulatory asset and deferred because such costs are probable of future recovery in customer rates.
As discussed in Note 4, regulatory proceedings in recent years have focused on the recoverability of storm and fuel costs. As a result, assessing the potential
outcomes of future regulatory orders in Florida requires signiﬁcant management judgment. As of December 31, 2022, the Company has approximately $3.6
billion recorded as regulatory assets.
We identiﬁed the impact of rate regulation related to regulatory assets as a critical audit matter due to the signiﬁcant judgments made by management,
including assumptions regarding the outcome of future decisions by the Commission, to support its assertions on the likelihood of future recovery for
deferred costs. Given that management’s accounting judgments are based on assumptions about the outcome of future decisions by the Commission,
auditing these judgments required specialized knowledge of accounting for rate regulation and the ratemaking process due to its inherent complexities as it
relates to regulatory assets.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the recovery of regulatory assets included the following, among others:
• We tested the eﬀectiveness of management’s controls over the evaluation of the likelihood of the recovery in future rates and the monitoring and
evaluation of regulatory developments that may aﬀect the likelihood of recovering costs in future rates.
• We evaluated the Company’s disclosures related to the impacts of rate regulation, including the balances recorded and regulatory developments.
• We read relevant regulatory orders issued by the Commission, regulatory statutes, interpretations, procedural memorandums, ﬁlings made by
interveners, and other publicly available information to assess the likelihood of recovery in future rates based on precedents of the Commission’s
treatment of similar costs under similar circumstances. We evaluated the external information and compared it to management’s recorded balances
for completeness.
• For regulatory matters in process, we inspected the Company’s and intervenors’ ﬁlings with the Commission, that may impact the Company’s
future rates, for any evidence that might contradict management’s assertions.
96
REPORTS
• We evaluated the reasonableness of management’s judgments regarding the recoverability of regulatory asset balances by performing the
following:
–We inquired of management regarding changes in regulatory orders and regulatory asset balances during the year.
–We evaluated the reasonableness of such changes based on our knowledge of commission-approved amortization, expected incurred costs,
and recently approved regulatory orders, as applicable.
–We utilized trend analyses to evaluate the historical consistency of regulatory asset balances.
–We compared the recorded regulatory asset balance to an independently developed expectation of the corresponding balance.
• We obtained representation from management asserting that regulatory assets recorded in the ﬁnancial statements are probable of recovery.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Charlotte, North Carolina
February 27, 2023
We have served as the Company's auditor since 2001.
97
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY FLORIDA, LLC
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS AND COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Operating Revenues $ 6,353 $ 5,259 $ 5,188 
Operating Expenses      
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 2,586  1,806  1,737 
Operation, maintenance and other 967  1,048  1,131 
Depreciation and amortization 955  831  702 
Property and other taxes 421  383  381 
Impairment of assets and other charges 4  19  (4)
Total operating expenses 4,933  4,087  3,947 
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 2  1  1 
Operating Income 1,422  1,173  1,242 
Other Income and Expenses, net 74  71  53 
Interest Expense 362  319  326 
Income Before Income Taxes 1,134  925  969 
Income Tax Expense 225  187  198 
Net Income $ 909 $ 738 $ 771 
Other Comprehensive Loss, net of tax      
Unrealized losses on available-for-sale securities (5) (1) (1)
Other Comprehensive Loss, net of tax (5) (1) (1)
Comprehensive Income $ 904 $ 737 $ 770 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
98
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY FLORIDA, LLC
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
  December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021
ASSETS    
Current Assets    
Cash and cash equivalents $ 45 $ 23 
Receivables (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $8 at 2022 and 2021) 148  117 
Receivables of VIEs (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $28 at 2022 and $8 at 2021) 496  432 
Receivables from aﬃliated companies 2  16 
Inventory 573  477 
Regulatory assets (includes $55 at 2022 and $54 at 2021 related to VIEs) 1,143  497 
Other (includes $46 at 2022 and $39 at 2021 related to VIEs) 108  80 
Total current assets 2,515  1,642 
Property, Plant and Equipment    
Cost 25,940  23,865 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (6,377) (5,819)
Net property, plant and equipment 19,563  18,046 
Other Noncurrent Assets    
Regulatory assets (includes $826 at 2022 and $883 at 2021 related to VIEs) 2,422  1,791 
Nuclear decommissioning trust funds 424  553 
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net 258  302 
Other 372  399 
Total other noncurrent assets 3,476  3,045 
Total Assets $ 25,554 $ 22,733 
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY    
Current Liabilities    
Accounts payable $ 880 $ 623 
Accounts payable to aﬃliated companies 177  209 
Notes payable to aﬃliated companies 605  199 
Taxes accrued 53  51 
Interest accrued 80  68 
Current maturities of long-term debt (includes $306 at 2022 and $56 at 2021 related to VIEs) 328  76 
Asset retirement obligations 1  1 
Regulatory liabilities 244  98 
Other 363  408 
Total current liabilities 2,731  1,733 
Long-Term Debt (includes $890 at 2022 and $1,196 at 2021 related to VIEs) 9,381  8,406 
Other Noncurrent Liabilities    
Deferred income taxes 2,789  2,434 
Asset retirement obligations 357  436 
Regulatory liabilities 633  698 
Operating lease liabilities 211  256 
Accrued pension and other post-retirement beneﬁt costs 111  166 
Investment tax credits 234  236 
Other 84  73 
Total other noncurrent liabilities 4,419  4,299 
Commitments and Contingencies
Equity    
Member's equity 9,031  8,298 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (8) (3)
Total equity 9,023  8,295 
Total Liabilities and Equity $ 25,554 $ 22,733 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
99
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY FLORIDA, LLC
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES      
Net income $ 909 $ 738 $ 771 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:      
Depreciation, amortization and accretion 1,032  1,011  1,019 
Equity component of AFUDC (16) (16) (12)
Impairment of assets and other charges 4  19  (4)
Deferred income taxes 285  279  27 
Contributions to qualiﬁed pension plans (5) —  — 
Payments for asset retirement obligations (98) (101) (80)
(Increase) decrease in
Net realized and unrealized mark-to-market and hedging transactions —  —  (14)
Receivables (93) (45) (64)
Receivables from aﬃliated companies 14  (13) (3)
Inventory (98) (15) 26 
Other current assets (640) (451) 40 
Increase (decrease) in
Accounts payable 202  47  66 
Accounts payable to aﬃliated companies (32) 124  (46)
Taxes accrued 2  (30) 39 
Other current liabilities 62  (7) (7)
Other assets (704) (69) 84 
Other liabilities 18  (69) (181)
Net cash provided by operating activities 842  1,402  1,661 
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES
Capital expenditures (2,247) (1,923) (1,907)
Purchases of debt and equity securities (193) (302) (4,443)
Proceeds from sales and maturities of debt and equity securities 279  408  4,495 
Notes receivable from aﬃliated companies —  —  173 
Other (108) (136) (103)
Net cash used in investing activities (2,269) (1,953) (1,785)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES
Proceeds from the issuance of long-term debt 1,298  1,135  495 
Payments for the redemption of long-term debt (77) (575) (572)
Notes payable to aﬃliated companies 406  3  196 
Distributions to parent (175) —  — 
Other (1) —  (1)
Net cash provided by ﬁnancing activities 1,451  563  118 
Net increase (decrease) in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash 24  12  (6)
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at beginning of period 62  50  56 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at end of period $ 86 $ 62 $ 50 
Supplemental Disclosures:      
Cash paid for interest, net of amount capitalized $ 339 $ 308 $ 321 
Cash (received from) paid for income taxes (83) (15) 138 
Signiﬁcant non-cash transactions:
Accrued capital expenditures 394  337  214 
(a)    Includes approximately $942 million for impacts of under-collected deferred fuel regulatory assets for the year ended December 31, 2022.
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements(a)
(a)
100
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY FLORIDA, LLC
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CHANGES IN EQUITY
Accumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)
Net Unrealized
Gains (Losses) on
  Member's Available-for- Total
(in millions) Equity Sale Securities Equity
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 6,789 $ (1)$ 6,788 
Net income 771  —  771 
Other comprehensive loss —  (1) (1)
Balance at December 31, 2020 $ 7,560 $ (2)$ 7,558 
Net income 738  —  738 
Other comprehensive loss —  (1) (1)
Balance at December 31, 2021 $ 8,298 $ (3)$ 8,295 
Net income 909  —  909 
Other comprehensive loss —  (5) (5)
Distribution to parent (175) —  (175)
Other (1) —  (1)
Balance at December 31, 2022 $ 9,031 $ (8)$ 9,023 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
101
REPORTS
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholder and the Board of Directors of Duke Energy Ohio, Inc.
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Duke Energy Ohio, Inc. and subsidiaries (the "Company") as of December 31, 2022, and
2021, the related consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income, changes in equity, and cash ﬂows, for each of the three years in the
period ended December 31, 2022, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "ﬁnancial statements"). In our opinion, the ﬁnancial statements
present fairly, in all material respects, the ﬁnancial position of the Company as of December 31, 2022, and 2021, and the results of its operations and its
cash ﬂows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2022, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United
States of America.
Basis for Opinion
These ﬁnancial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company's ﬁnancial
statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting ﬁrm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB)
and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations
of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable
assurance about whether the ﬁnancial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. The Company is not required to have,
nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over ﬁnancial reporting. As part of our audits, we are required to obtain an understanding of
internal control over ﬁnancial reporting but not for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the eﬀectiveness of the Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial
reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the ﬁnancial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and
performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in
the ﬁnancial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and signiﬁcant estimates made by management, as well as
evaluating the overall presentation of the ﬁnancial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matter
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current-period audit of the ﬁnancial statements that was communicated or
required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relates to accounts or disclosures that are material to the ﬁnancial statements and (2)
involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on
the ﬁnancial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matter below, providing a separate opinion on the critical
audit matter or on the accounts or disclosures to which it relates.
Regulatory Matters – Impact of Rate Regulation on the Financial Statements – Refer to Notes 1 and 4 to the ﬁnancial statements.
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company is subject to rate regulation by the Public Utilities Commission of Ohio and by the Kentucky Public Service Commission (collectively the
“Commissions”), which have jurisdiction with respect to the electric and natural gas rates of the Company. Management has determined it meets the criteria
for the application of regulated operations accounting in preparing its ﬁnancial statements under accounting principles generally accepted in the United
States of America. Signiﬁcant judgment can be required to determine if otherwise recognizable incurred costs qualify to be presented as a regulatory asset
and deferred because such costs are probable of future recovery in customer rates. As of December 31, 2022, the Company has approximately $684 million
recorded as regulatory assets.
We identiﬁed the impact of rate regulation related to regulatory assets as a critical audit matter due to the signiﬁcant judgments made by management,
including assumptions regarding the outcome of future decisions by the Commissions, to support its assertions on the likelihood of future recovery for
deferred costs. Given that management’s accounting judgments are based on assumptions about the outcome of future decisions by the Commissions,
auditing these judgments required specialized knowledge of accounting for rate regulation and the ratemaking process due to its inherent complexities as it
relates to regulatory assets.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the recovery of regulatory assets included the following, among others:
• We tested the eﬀectiveness of management’s controls over the evaluation of the likelihood of recovery in future rates and the monitoring and
evaluation of regulatory developments that may aﬀect the likelihood of recovering costs in future rates.
• We evaluated the Company’s disclosures related to the impacts of rate regulation, including the balances recorded and regulatory developments.
• We read relevant regulatory orders issued by the Commissions, regulatory statutes, interpretations, procedural memorandums, ﬁlings made by
interveners, and other publicly available information to assess the likelihood of recovery in future rates based on precedents of the Commissions’
treatment of similar costs under similar circumstances. We evaluated the external information and compared it to management’s recorded balances
for completeness.
• For regulatory matters in process, we inspected the Company’s and intervenors’ ﬁlings with the Commissions, that may impact the Company’s
future rates, for any evidence that might contradict management’s assertions.
102
REPORTS
• We evaluated the reasonableness of management’s judgments regarding the recoverability of regulatory asset balances by performing the
following:
–We inquired of management regarding changes in regulatory orders and regulatory asset balances during the year.
–We evaluated the reasonableness of such changes based on our knowledge of commission-approved amortization, expected incurred costs,
and recently approved regulatory orders, as applicable.
–We utilized trend analyses to evaluate the historical consistency of regulatory asset balances.
–We compared the recorded regulatory asset balance to an independently developed expectation of the corresponding balance.
• We obtained representation from management asserting that regulatory assets recorded in the ﬁnancial statements are probable of recovery.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Charlotte, North Carolina
February 27, 2023
We have served as the Company's auditor since 2002.
103
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY OHIO, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS AND COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Operating Revenues      
Regulated electric $ 1,798 $ 1,493 $ 1,405 
Regulated natural gas 716  544  453 
Total operating revenues 2,514  2,037  1,858 
Operating Expenses      
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 657  409  339 
Cost of natural gas 261  136  73 
Operation, maintenance and other 523  479  463 
Depreciation and amortization 324  307  278 
Property and other taxes 369  355  324 
Impairment of assets and other charges (10) 25  — 
Total operating expenses 2,124  1,711  1,477 
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 1  1  — 
Operating Income 391  327  381 
Other Income and Expenses, net 19  18  16 
Interest Expense 129  111  102 
Income Before Income Taxes 281  234  295 
Income Tax (Beneﬁt) Expense (21) 30  43 
Net Income and Comprehensive Income $ 302 $ 204 $ 252 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
104
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY OHIO, INC.
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
  December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021
ASSETS    
Current Assets    
Cash and cash equivalents $ 16 $ 13 
Receivables (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $6 at 2022 and $4 at 2021) 73  96 
Receivables from aﬃliated companies 247  122 
Notes receivable from aﬃliated companies —  15 
Inventory 144  116 
Regulatory assets 103  72 
Other 86  57 
Total current assets 669  491 
Property, Plant and Equipment    
Cost 12,497  11,725 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (3,250) (3,106)
Facilities to be retired, net —  6 
Net property, plant and equipment 9,247  8,625 
Other Noncurrent Assets    
Goodwill 920  920 
Regulatory assets 581  635 
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net 18  19 
Other 71  84 
Total other noncurrent assets 1,590  1,658 
Total Assets $ 11,506 $ 10,774 
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY    
Current Liabilities    
Accounts payable $ 380 $ 348 
Accounts payable to aﬃliated companies 72  64 
Notes payable to aﬃliated companies 497  103 
Taxes accrued 317  275 
Interest accrued 29  30 
Current maturities of long-term debt 475  — 
Asset retirement obligations 17  13 
Regulatory liabilities 99  62 
Other 74  82 
Total current liabilities 1,960  977 
Long-Term Debt 2,745  3,168 
Long-Term Debt Payable to Aﬃliated Companies 25  25 
Other Noncurrent Liabilities    
Deferred income taxes 1,136  1,050 
Asset retirement obligations 137  123 
Regulatory liabilities 534  739 
Operating lease liabilities 17  18 
Accrued pension and other post-retirement beneﬁt costs 90  109 
Other 96  101 
Total other noncurrent liabilities 2,010  2,140 
Commitments and Contingencies
Equity    
Common stock, $8.50 par value, 120 million shares authorized; 90 million shares outstanding at 2022 and 2021 762  762 
Additional paid-in capital 3,100  3,100 
Retained earnings 904  602 
Total equity 4,766  4,464 
Total Liabilities and Equity $ 11,506 $ 10,774 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
105
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY OHIO, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES      
Net income $ 302 $ 204 $ 252 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:      
Depreciation, amortization and accretion 328  311  283 
Equity component of AFUDC (7) (7) (7)
Impairment of assets and other charges (10) 25  — 
Deferred income taxes (22) 42  31 
Contributions to qualiﬁed pension plans (3) —  — 
Payments for asset retirement obligations (12) (2) (2)
Provision for rate refunds 5  16  14 
(Increase) decrease in      
Receivables 23  6  (13)
Receivables from aﬃliated companies (5) (25) 9 
Inventory (28) (6) 25 
Other current assets (55) (60) (18)
Increase (decrease) in      
Accounts payable 44  38  2 
Accounts payable to aﬃliated companies 8  (4) — 
Taxes accrued 42  26  30 
Other current liabilities (63) 11  3 
Other assets (29) (43) (32)
Other liabilities 64  27  (2)
Net cash provided by operating activities 582  559  575 
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES      
Capital expenditures (850) (848) (834)
Notes receivable from aﬃliated companies (105) (10) (19)
Other (67) (60) (48)
Net cash used in investing activities (1,022) (918) (901)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES      
Proceeds from the issuance of long-term debt 50  150  467 
Payments for the redemption of long-term debt —  (50) — 
Notes payable to aﬃliated companies 395  (67) (144)
Capital contribution from parent —  325  — 
Other (2) —  — 
Net cash provided by ﬁnancing activities 443  358  323 
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents 3  (1) (3)
Cash and cash equivalents at beginning of period 13  14  17 
Cash and cash equivalents at end of period $ 16 $ 13 $ 14 
Supplemental Disclosures:      
Cash paid for interest, net of amount capitalized $ 126 $ 107 $ 97 
Cash (received from) paid for income taxes (35) 9  — 
Signiﬁcant non-cash transactions:
Accrued capital expenditures 123  135  104 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
106
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY OHIO, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CHANGES IN EQUITY
Additional
Common Paid-in Retained Total
(in millions) Stock Capital Earnings Equity
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 762 $ 2,776 $ 145 $ 3,683 
Net income —  —  252  252 
Balance at December 31, 2020 $ 762 $ 2,776 $ 397 $ 3,935 
Net income —  —  204  204 
Contribution from parent —  325  —  325 
Other —  (1) 1  — 
Balance at December 31, 2021 $ 762 $ 3,100 $ 602 $ 4,464 
Net income —  —  302  302 
Balance at December 31, 2022 $ 762 $ 3,100 $ 904 $ 4,766 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
107
REPORTS
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholder and the Board of Directors of Duke Energy Indiana, LLC
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Duke Energy Indiana, LLC and subsidiary (the "Company") as of December 31, 2022, and
2021, the related consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income, changes in equity, and cash ﬂows, for each of the three years in the
period ended December 31, 2022, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "ﬁnancial statements"). In our opinion, the ﬁnancial statements
present fairly, in all material respects, the ﬁnancial position of the Company as of December 31, 2022, and 2021, and the results of its operations and its
cash ﬂows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2022, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United
States of America.
Basis for Opinion
These ﬁnancial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company's ﬁnancial
statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting ﬁrm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB)
and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations
of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable
assurance about whether the ﬁnancial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. The Company is not required to have,
nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over ﬁnancial reporting. As part of our audits, we are required to obtain an understanding of
internal control over ﬁnancial reporting but not for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the eﬀectiveness of the Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial
reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the ﬁnancial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and
performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in
the ﬁnancial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and signiﬁcant estimates made by management, as well as
evaluating the overall presentation of the ﬁnancial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matter
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current-period audit of the ﬁnancial statements that was communicated or
required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relates to accounts or disclosures that are material to the ﬁnancial statements and (2)
involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on
the ﬁnancial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matter below, providing a separate opinion on the critical
audit matter or on the accounts or disclosures to which it relates.
Regulatory Matters – Impact of Rate Regulation on the Financial Statements – Refer to Notes 1, 4 and 10 to the ﬁnancial statements.
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company is subject to rate regulation by the Indiana Utility Regulatory Commission (the “Commission”), which has jurisdiction with respect to the
electric rates of the Company. Management has determined it meets the criteria for the application of regulated operations accounting in preparing its
ﬁnancial statements under accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. Signiﬁcant judgment can be required to determine if
otherwise recognizable incurred costs qualify to be presented as a regulatory asset and deferred because such costs are probable of future recovery in
customer rates. As discussed in Note 4, regulatory proceedings in recent years in Indiana have focused on the recoverability of fuel costs and asset
retirement obligations speciﬁc to coal ash. As a result, assessing the potential outcomes of future regulatory orders requires signiﬁcant management
judgment. As of December 31, 2022, the Company has approximately $1.1 billion recorded as regulatory assets.
We identiﬁed the impact of rate regulation related to regulatory assets as a critical audit matter due to the signiﬁcant judgments made by management,
including assumptions regarding the outcome of future decisions by the Commission, to support its assertions on the likelihood of future recovery for
deferred costs. Given that management’s accounting judgments are based on assumptions about the outcome of future decisions by the Commission,
auditing these judgments required specialized knowledge of accounting for rate regulation and the ratemaking process due to its inherent complexities as it
relates to regulatory assets.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the recovery of regulatory assets included the following, among others:
• We tested the eﬀectiveness of management’s controls over the evaluation of the likelihood of the recovery in future rates and the monitoring and
evaluation of regulatory developments that may aﬀect the likelihood of recovering costs in future rates.
• We evaluated the Company’s disclosures related to the impacts of rate regulation, including the balances recorded and regulatory developments.
• We read relevant regulatory orders issued by the Commission, regulatory statutes, interpretations, procedural memorandums, ﬁlings made by
interveners, and other publicly available information to assess the likelihood of recovery in future rates based on precedents of the Commission’s
treatment of similar costs under similar circumstances. We evaluated the external information and compared it to management’s recorded balances
for completeness.
108
REPORTS
• For regulatory matters in process, we inspected the Company’s and intervenors’ ﬁlings with the Commission, that may impact the Company’s
future rates, for any evidence that might contradict management’s assertions.
• We evaluated the reasonableness of management’s judgments regarding the recoverability of regulatory asset balances by performing the
following:
–We inquired of management regarding changes in regulatory orders and regulatory asset balances during the year.
–We evaluated the reasonableness of such changes based on our knowledge of commission-approved amortization, expected incurred costs,
and recently approved regulatory orders, as applicable.
–We utilized trend analyses to evaluate the historical consistency of regulatory asset balances.
–We compared the recorded regulatory asset balance to an independently developed expectation of the corresponding balance.
• We obtained an analysis from management and letters from internal legal counsel for asset retirement obligations speciﬁc to coal ash costs, regarding
probability of recovery for deferred costs not yet addressed in a regulatory order to assess management’s assertion that amounts are probable of
recovery.
• We obtained representation from management asserting that regulatory assets recorded in the ﬁnancial statements are probable of recovery.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Charlotte, North Carolina
February 27, 2023
We have served as the Company's auditor since 2002.
109
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY INDIANA, LLC
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS AND COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Operating Revenues $ 3,922 $ 3,174 $ 2,795 
Operating Expenses      
Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power 1,819  985  767 
Operation, maintenance and other 729  750  762 
Depreciation and amortization 645  615  569 
Property and other taxes 75  73  81 
Impairment of assets and other charges 388  9  — 
Total operating expenses 3,656  2,432  2,179 
Operating Income 266  742  616 
Other Income and Expenses, net 36  42  37 
Interest Expense 189  196  161 
Income Before Income Taxes 113  588  492 
Income Tax (Beneﬁt) Expense (24) 107  84 
Net Income and Comprehensive Income $ 137 $ 481 $ 408 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
110
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY INDIANA, LLC
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
  December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021
ASSETS    
Current Assets    
Cash and cash equivalents $ 31 $ 6 
Receivables (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $4 at 2022 and $3 at 2021) 112  100 
Receivables from aﬃliated companies 298  98 
Notes receivable from aﬃliated companies —  134 
Inventory 489  418 
Regulatory assets 249  277 
Other 197  68 
Total current assets 1,376  1,101 
Property, Plant and Equipment    
Cost 18,121  17,343 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (6,021) (5,583)
Net property, plant and equipment 12,100  11,760 
Other Noncurrent Assets  
Regulatory assets 875  1,278 
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net 49  53 
Other 254  296 
Total other noncurrent assets 1,178  1,627 
Total Assets $14,654 $ 14,488 
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY    
Current Liabilities    
Accounts payable $ 391 $ 282 
Accounts payable to aﬃliated companies 206  221 
Notes payable to aﬃliated companies 435  — 
Taxes accrued 92  73 
Interest accrued 48  49 
Current maturities of long-term debt 303  84 
Asset retirement obligations 207  110 
Regulatory liabilities 187  127 
Other 161  105 
Total current liabilities 2,030  1,051 
Long-Term Debt 3,854  4,089 
Long-Term Debt Payable to Aﬃliated Companies 150  150 
Other Noncurrent Liabilities    
Deferred income taxes 1,299  1,303 
Asset retirement obligations 744  877 
Regulatory liabilities 1,454  1,565 
Operating lease liabilities 47  50 
Accrued pension and other post-retirement beneﬁt costs 122  167 
Investment tax credits 186  177 
Other 65  44 
Total other noncurrent liabilities 3,917  4,183 
Commitments and Contingencies
Equity    
Member's equity 4,702  5,015 
Accumulated other comprehensive income 1  — 
Total equity 4,703  5,015 
Total Liabilities and Equity $14,654 $ 14,488 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
111
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY INDIANA, LLC
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES      
Net income $ 137 $ 481 $ 408 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:      
Depreciation, amortization and accretion 648  619  572 
Equity component of AFUDC (13) (27) (23)
Impairment of assets and other charges 388  9  — 
Deferred income taxes (64) 34  29 
Contributions to qualiﬁed pension plans (5) —  — 
Payments for asset retirement obligations (82) (67) (63)
(Increase) decrease in      
Receivables (3) (33) 8 
Receivables from aﬃliated companies 20  —  — 
Inventory (70) 55  44 
Other current assets (3) (181) (3)
Increase (decrease) in      
Accounts payable 105  76  (12)
Accounts payable to aﬃliated companies (3) 8  1 
Taxes accrued 34  12  13 
Other current liabilities 9  13  6 
Other assets (10) 20  (68)
Other liabilities 13  (15) 26 
Net cash provided by operating activities 1,101  1,004  938 
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES      
Capital expenditures (877) (818) (888)
Purchases of debt and equity securities (61) (142) (37)
Proceeds from sales and maturities of debt and equity securities 48  65  22 
Notes receivable from aﬃliated companies (86) (120) (33)
Other (55) 36  48 
Net cash used in investing activities (1,031) (979) (888)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES      
Proceeds from the issuance of long-term debt 67  300  544 
Payments for the redemption of long-term debt (84) (70) (513)
Notes payable to aﬃliated companies 435  (131) 101 
Distributions to parent (462) (125) (200)
Other (1) —  — 
Net cash used in ﬁnancing activities (45) (26) (68)
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents 25  (1) (18)
Cash and cash equivalents at beginning of period 6  7  25 
Cash and cash equivalents at end of period $ 31 $ 6 $ 7 
Supplemental Disclosures:      
Cash paid for interest, net of amount capitalized $ 186 $ 194 $ 164 
Cash paid for income taxes 35  56  36 
Signiﬁcant non-cash transactions:
Accrued capital expenditures 122  118  101 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
112
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
DUKE ENERGY INDIANA, LLC
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CHANGES IN EQUITY
  Accumulated  
Other
Comprehensive
Income
Pension
Member's and OPEB Total
(in millions) Equity Adjustments Equity
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 4,575 $ — $ 4,575 
Net income 408  —  408 
Distributions to parent (200) —  (200)
Balance at December 31, 2020 $ 4,783 $ — $ 4,783 
Net income 481  —  481 
Distributions to parent (250) —  (250)
Other 1  —  1 
Balance at December 31, 2021 $ 5,015 $ — $ 5,015 
Net income 137  —  137 
Distributions to parent (450) —  (450)
Other —  1  1 
Balance at December 31, 2022 $ 4,702 $ 1 $ 4,703 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements  
113
REPORTS
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholder and the Board of Directors of Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc.
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc. and subsidiaries (the "Company") as of December
31, 2022, and 2021, the related consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income, changes in equity, and cash ﬂows, for each of the three
years in the period ended December 31, 2022, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "ﬁnancial statements"). In our opinion, the ﬁnancial
statements present fairly, in all material respects, the ﬁnancial position of the Company as of December 31, 2022, and 2021, and the results of its operations
and its cash ﬂows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2022, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the
United States of America.
Basis for Opinion
These ﬁnancial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company's ﬁnancial
statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting ﬁrm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB)
and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations
of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable
assurance about whether the ﬁnancial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. The Company is not required to have,
nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over ﬁnancial reporting. As part of our audits, we are required to obtain an understanding of
internal control over ﬁnancial reporting but not for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the eﬀectiveness of the Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial
reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the ﬁnancial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and
performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in
the ﬁnancial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and signiﬁcant estimates made by management, as well as
evaluating the overall presentation of the ﬁnancial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matter
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current-period audit of the ﬁnancial statements that was communicated or
required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relates to accounts or disclosures that are material to the ﬁnancial statements and (2)
involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on
the ﬁnancial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matter below, providing a separate opinion on the critical
audit matter or on the accounts or disclosures to which it relates.
Regulatory Matters – Impact of Rate Regulation on the Financial Statements – Refer to Notes 1 and 4 to the ﬁnancial statements.
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company is subject to rate regulation by the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of South Carolina, and the Tennessee
Public Utility Commission (collectively the “Commissions”), which have jurisdiction with respect to the gas rates of the Company. Management has
determined it meets the criteria for the application of regulated operations accounting in preparing its ﬁnancial statements under accounting principles
generally accepted in the United States of America. Signiﬁcant judgment can be required to determine if otherwise recognizable incurred costs qualify to be
presented as a regulatory asset and deferred because such costs are probable of future recovery in customer rates. As of December 31, 2022, the Company
has approximately $511 million recorded as regulatory assets.
We identiﬁed the impact of rate regulation related to regulatory assets as a critical audit matter due to the signiﬁcant judgments made by management,
including assumptions regarding the outcome of future decisions by the Commissions, to support its assertions on the likelihood of future recovery for
deferred costs. Given that management’s accounting judgments are based on assumptions about the outcome of future decisions by the Commissions,
auditing these judgments required specialized knowledge of accounting for rate regulation and the ratemaking process due to its inherent complexities as it
relates to regulatory assets.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the recovery of regulatory assets included the following, among others:
• We tested the eﬀectiveness of management’s controls over the evaluation of the likelihood of recovery in future rates and the monitoring and
evaluation of regulatory developments that may aﬀect the likelihood of recovering costs in future rates.
• We evaluated the Company’s disclosures related to the impacts of rate regulation, including the balances recorded and regulatory developments.
• We read relevant regulatory orders issued by the Commission, regulatory statutes, interpretations, procedural memorandums, ﬁlings made by
interveners, and other publicly available information to assess the likelihood of recovery in future rates based on precedents of the Commissions’
treatment of similar costs under similar circumstances. We evaluated the external information and compared it to management’s recorded balances
for completeness.
• For regulatory matters in process, we inspected the Company’s and intervenors’ ﬁlings with the Commissions, that may impact the Company’s
future rates, for any evidence that might contradict management’s assertions.
114
REPORTS
• We evaluated the reasonableness of management’s judgments regarding the recoverability of regulatory asset balances by performing the
following:
–We inquired of management regarding changes in regulatory orders and regulatory asset balances during the year.
–We evaluated the reasonableness of such changes based on our knowledge of commission-approved amortization, expected incurred costs,
and recently approved regulatory orders, as applicable.
–We utilized trend analyses to evaluate the historical consistency of regulatory asset balances.
–We compared the recorded regulatory asset balance to an independently developed expectation of the corresponding balance.
• We obtained representation from management asserting that regulatory assets recorded in the ﬁnancial statements are probable of recovery.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Charlotte, North Carolina
February 27, 2023
We have served as the Company's auditor since 1951.
115
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
PIEDMONT NATURAL GAS COMPANY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS AND COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Operating Revenues
Regulated natural gas $ 2,100 $ 1,555 $ 1,286 
Nonregulated natural gas and other 24  14  11 
Total operating revenues 2,124  1,569  1,297 
Operating Expenses  
Cost of natural gas 1,015  569  386 
Operation, maintenance and other 368  327  322 
Depreciation and amortization 222  213  180 
Property and other taxes 57  55  53 
Impairment of assets and other charges 18  10  7 
Total operating expenses 1,680  1,174  948 
Gains on Sales of Other Assets and Other, net 4  —  — 
Operating Income 448  395  349 
Equity in earnings of unconsolidated aﬃliates 8  9  9 
Other income and expense, net 46  55  51 
Total other income and expenses 54  64  60 
Interest Expense 140  119  118 
Income Before Income Taxes 362  340  291 
Income Tax Expense 39  30  18 
Net Income and Comprehensive Income $ 323 $ 310 $ 273 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
116
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
PIEDMONT NATURAL GAS COMPANY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021
ASSETS
Current Assets
Receivables (net of allowance for doubtful accounts of $14 at 2022 and $15 at 2021) $ 436 $ 318 
Receivables from aﬃliated companies 11  11 
Inventory 172  109 
Regulatory assets 119  141 
Other 4  9 
Total current assets 742  588 
Property, Plant and Equipment
Cost 10,869  9,918 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (2,081) (1,899)
Facilities to be retired, net 9  11 
Net property, plant and equipment 8,797  8,030 
Other Noncurrent Assets
Goodwill 49  49 
Regulatory assets 392  316 
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net 4  16 
Investments in equity method unconsolidated aﬃliates 79  95 
Other 272  288 
Total other noncurrent assets 796  764 
Total Assets $ 10,335 $ 9,382 
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY
Current Liabilities
Accounts payable $ 345 $ 196 
Accounts payable to aﬃliated companies 51  40 
Notes payable to aﬃliated companies 514  518 
Taxes accrued 74  63 
Interest accrued 40  37 
Current maturities of long-term debt 45  — 
Regulatory liabilities 74  56 
Other 81  81 
Total current liabilities 1,224  991 
Long-Term Debt 3,318  2,968 
Other Noncurrent Liabilities
Deferred income taxes 870  815 
Asset retirement obligations 26  22 
Regulatory liabilities 1,024  1,058 
Operating lease liabilities 13  14 
Accrued pension and other post-retirement beneﬁt costs 7  7 
Other 180  158 
Total other noncurrent liabilities 2,120  2,074 
Commitments and Contingencies
Equity
Common stock, no par value: 100 shares authorized and outstanding at 2022 and 2021 1,635  1,635 
Retained earnings 2,037  1,714 
Total Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc. stockholder's equity 3,672  3,349 
Noncontrolling interests 1  — 
Total equity 3,673  3,349 
Total Liabilities and Equity $ 10,335 $ 9,382 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
117
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
PIEDMONT NATURAL GAS COMPANY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES
Net income $ 323 $ 310 $ 273 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:
Depreciation and amortization 225  216  182 
Equity component of AFUDC (11) (20) (19)
Gains on sales of other assets (4) —  — 
Impairment of assets and other charges 18  10  7 
Deferred income taxes 5  4  53 
Contributions to qualiﬁed pension plans (2) —  — 
Equity in earnings from unconsolidated aﬃliates (8) (9) (9)
Provision for rate refunds (3) (4) (33)
(Increase) decrease in
Receivables (111) (77) 10 
Receivables from aﬃliated companies —  (1) — 
Inventory (63) (40) 3 
Other current assets 32  33  (66)
Increase (decrease) in
Accounts payable 40  (25) 16 
Accounts payable to aﬃliated companies 11  (39) 76 
Taxes accrued 11  37  3 
Other current liabilities 36  (26) (11)
Other assets 9  26  (11)
Other liabilities (1) (4) 7 
Net cash provided by operating activities 507  391  481 
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES
Capital expenditures (862) (850) (901)
Contributions to equity method investments (8) (9) — 
Other (26) (31) (28)
Net cash used in investing activities (896) (890) (929)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES
Proceeds from the issuance of long-term debt 394  347  394 
Payments for the redemption of long-term debt —  (160) — 
Notes payable to aﬃliated companies (4) (13) 54 
Capital contribution from parent —  325  — 
Other (1) —  — 
Net cash provided by ﬁnancing activities 389  499  448 
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents —  —  — 
Cash and cash equivalents at beginning of period —  —  — 
Cash and cash equivalents at end of period $ — $ — $ — 
Supplemental Disclosures:
Cash paid for interest, net of amount capitalized $ 135 $ 114 $ 115 
Cash paid for (received from) income taxes 23  (13) (36)
Signiﬁcant non-cash transactions:
Accrued capital expenditures 207  97  106 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
118
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
PIEDMONT NATURAL GAS COMPANY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CHANGES IN EQUITY
Total
Piedmont
Natural Gas
Common Retained Company, Inc. Noncontrolling Total
(in millions) Stock Earnings Equity Interests Equity
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 1,310 $ 1,133 $ 2,443 $ — $ 2,443 
Net income —  273  273  —  273 
Other —  (1) (1) —  (1)
Balance at December 31, 2020 $ 1,310 $ 1,405 $ 2,715 $ — $ 2,715 
Net income —  310  310  —  310 
Contribution from parent 325  —  325  —  325 
Other —  (1) (1) —  (1)
Balance at December 31, 2021 $ 1,635 $ 1,714 $ 3,349 $ — $ 3,349 
Net income —  323  323  —  323 
Other —  —  —  1  1 
Balance at December 31, 2022 $ 1,635 $ 2,037 $ 3,672 $ 1 $ 3,673 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
119
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Index to Combined Notes To Consolidated Financial Statements
The notes to the consolidated ﬁnancial statements are a combined presentation. The following table indicates the registrants to which the notes apply.
  Applicable Notes
Registrant 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627
Duke Energy •••••••••• • • •  • • • • • • • • • • • • •
Duke Energy Carolinas • ••••• •• • •  • • • • • •  • • • • • •
Progress Energy • ••••• • • •  • • • • • •  • • • • • •
Duke Energy Progress • •••••   • • •  • • • • • •  • • • • • •
Duke Energy Florida • ••••• • • •  • • • • • •  • • • • • •
Duke Energy Ohio • •••••   • • •  • •  • • •  • • • • • •
Duke Energy Indiana •••••••  •• • •  • • • • • •  • • • • • •
Piedmont • ••••• • • • • • • • • • • • • • •
Tables within the notes may not sum across due to (i) Progress Energy's consolidation of Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida and other subsidiaries
that are not registrants and (ii) subsidiaries that are not registrants but included in the consolidated Duke Energy balances.
1. SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Nature of Operations and Basis of Consolidation
Duke Energy is an energy company headquartered in Charlotte, North Carolina, subject to regulation by the FERC and other regulatory agencies listed below.
Duke Energy operates in the U.S. primarily through its direct and indirect subsidiaries. Certain Duke Energy subsidiaries are also subsidiary registrants,
including Duke Energy Carolinas; Progress Energy; Duke Energy Progress; Duke Energy Florida; Duke Energy Ohio; Duke Energy Indiana and Piedmont. When
discussing Duke Energy’s consolidated ﬁnancial information, it necessarily includes the results of its separate Subsidiary Registrants, which along with Duke
Energy, are collectively referred to as the Duke Energy Registrants.
The information in these combined notes relates to each of the Duke Energy Registrants as noted in the Index to Combined Notes to Consolidated Financial
Statements. However, none of the Subsidiary Registrants make any representation as to information related solely to Duke Energy or the Subsidiary
Registrants of Duke Energy other than itself.
These Consolidated Financial Statements include, after eliminating intercompany transactions and balances, the accounts of the Duke Energy Registrants
and subsidiaries or VIEs where the respective Duke Energy Registrants have control. See Note 18 for additional information on VIEs. These Consolidated
Financial Statements also reﬂect the Duke Energy Registrants’ proportionate share of certain jointly owned generation and transmission facilities. See Note 9
for additional information on joint ownership. Substantially all of the Subsidiary Registrants' operations qualify for regulatory accounting.
Duke Energy Carolinas is a regulated public utility primarily engaged in the generation, transmission, distribution and sale of electricity in portions of North
Carolina and South Carolina. Duke Energy Carolinas is subject to the regulatory provisions of the NCUC, PSCSC, NRC and FERC.
Progress Energy is a public utility holding company, which conducts operations through its wholly owned subsidiaries, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy
Florida. Progress Energy is subject to regulation by FERC and other regulatory agencies listed below.
Duke Energy Progress is a regulated public utility primarily engaged in the generation, transmission, distribution and sale of electricity in portions of North
Carolina and South Carolina. Duke Energy Progress is subject to the regulatory provisions of the NCUC, PSCSC, NRC and FERC.
Duke Energy Florida is a regulated public utility primarily engaged in the generation, transmission, distribution and sale of electricity in portions of Florida.
Duke Energy Florida is subject to the regulatory provisions of the FPSC, NRC and FERC.
Duke Energy Ohio is a regulated public utility primarily engaged in the transmission and distribution of electricity in portions of Ohio and Kentucky, the
generation and sale of electricity in portions of Kentucky and the transportation and sale of natural gas in portions of Ohio and Kentucky. Duke Energy Ohio
conducts competitive auctions for retail electricity supply in Ohio whereby the energy price is recovered from retail customers and recorded in Operating
Revenues on the Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income. Operations in Kentucky are conducted through its wholly owned
subsidiary, Duke Energy Kentucky. References herein to Duke Energy Ohio collectively include Duke Energy Ohio and its subsidiaries, unless otherwise noted.
Duke Energy Ohio is subject to the regulatory provisions of the PUCO, KPSC and FERC.
Duke Energy Indiana is a regulated public utility primarily engaged in the generation, transmission, distribution and sale of electricity in portions of Indiana.
Duke Energy Indiana is subject to the regulatory provisions of the IURC and FERC.
Piedmont is a regulated public utility primarily engaged in the distribution of natural gas in portions of North Carolina, South Carolina and Tennessee.
Piedmont is subject to the regulatory provisions of the NCUC, PSCSC, TPUC and FERC.
Certain prior year amounts have been reclassiﬁed to conform to the current year presentation.
120
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Other Current Assets and Liabilities
The following table provides a description of amounts included in Other within Current Assets or Current Liabilities that exceed 5% of total Current Assets or
Current Liabilities on the Duke Energy Registrants' Consolidated Balance Sheets at either December 31, 2022, or 2021.
December 31,
(in millions) Location 2022 2021
Duke Energy
Accrued compensation Current Liabilities$ 778 $ 915 
Duke Energy Carolinas
Accrued compensation Current Liabilities$ 247 $ 277 
Duke Energy Progress  
Customer deposits Current Liabilities$ 106 $ 144 
Other accrued liabilities Current Liabilities 124  163 
Duke Energy Florida  
Customer deposits Current Liabilities$ 200 $ 200 
Other accrued liabilities Current Liabilities 61  89 
Duke Energy Ohio  
Gas Storage Current Assets$ 57 $ 25 
Collateral liabilities Current Liabilities 53  57 
Duke Energy Indiana      
Mark-to-market transactions Current Assets$ 110 $ 23 
Discontinued Operations
Duke Energy has elected to present cash ﬂows of discontinued operations combined with cash ﬂows of continuing operations. Unless otherwise noted, the
notes to these consolidated ﬁnancial statements exclude amounts related to discontinued operations for all periods presented. For the years ended
December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, the Loss From Discontinued Operations, net of tax on Duke Energy's Consolidated Statements of Operations includes
amounts related to noncontrolling interests. A portion of Noncontrolling interests on Duke Energy's Consolidated Balance Sheets relates to discontinued
operations for the periods presented. See Note 2 for discussion of discontinued operations related to the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups.
Noncontrolling Interest
Duke Energy maintains a controlling ﬁnancial interest in certain less than wholly owned regulated and nonregulated subsidiaries. As a result, Duke Energy
consolidates these subsidiaries and presents the third-party investors' portion of Duke Energy's net income (loss), net assets and comprehensive income
(loss) as noncontrolling interest. Noncontrolling interest is included as a component of equity on the Consolidated Balance Sheet. Operating agreements of
Duke Energy's subsidiaries with noncontrolling interest allocate proﬁt and loss based on their pro rata shares of the ownership interest in the respective
subsidiary. Therefore, Duke Energy allocates net income or loss and other comprehensive income or loss of these subsidiaries to the owners based on their
pro rata shares.
Signiﬁcant Accounting Policies
Use of Estimates
In preparing ﬁnancial statements that conform to GAAP, the Duke Energy Registrants must make estimates and assumptions that aﬀect the reported
amounts of assets and liabilities, the reported amounts of revenues and expenses and the disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the
ﬁnancial statements. Actual results could diﬀer from those estimates.
Regulatory Accounting
The majority of the Duke Energy Registrants’ operations are subject to price regulation for the sale of electricity and natural gas by state utility commissions
or FERC. When prices are set on the basis of speciﬁc costs of the regulated operations and an eﬀective franchise is in place such that suﬃcient natural gas or
electric services can be sold to recover those costs, the Duke Energy Registrants apply regulatory accounting. Regulatory accounting changes the timing of
the recognition of costs or revenues relative to a company that does not apply regulatory accounting. As a result, regulatory assets and regulatory liabilities
are recognized on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Regulatory assets and liabilities are amortized consistent with the treatment of the related cost in the
ratemaking process. Regulatory assets are reviewed for recoverability each reporting period. If a regulatory asset is no longer deemed probable of recovery,
the deferred cost is charged to earnings. See Note 4 for further information.
Regulatory accounting rules also require recognition of a disallowance (also called "impairment") loss if it becomes probable that part of the cost of a plant
under construction (or a recently completed plant or an abandoned plant) will be disallowed for ratemaking purposes and a reasonable estimate of the
amount of the disallowance can be made. For example, if a cost cap is set for a plant still under construction, the amount of the disallowance is a result of a
judgment as to the ultimate cost of the plant. These disallowances can require judgments on allowed future rate recovery.
121
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
When it becomes probable that regulated generation, transmission or distribution assets will be abandoned, the cost of the asset is removed from plant in
service. The value that may be retained as a regulatory asset on the balance sheet for the abandoned property is dependent upon amounts that may be
recovered through regulated rates, including any return. As such, an impairment charge could be partially or fully oﬀset by the establishment of a regulatory
asset if rate recovery is probable. The impairment charge for a disallowance of costs for regulated plants under construction, recently completed or
abandoned is based on discounted cash ﬂows.
The Duke Energy Registrants utilize cost-tracking mechanisms, commonly referred to as fuel adjustment clauses or PGA clauses. These clauses allow for the
recovery of fuel and fuel-related costs, portions of purchased power, natural gas costs and hedging costs through surcharges on customer rates. The
diﬀerence between the costs incurred and the surcharge revenues is recorded either as an adjustment to Operating Revenues, Operating Expenses – Fuel
used in electric generation or Operating Expenses – Cost of natural gas on the Consolidated Statements of Operations, with an oﬀ-setting impact on
regulatory assets or liabilities.
Cash, Cash Equivalents and Restricted Cash
All highly liquid investments with maturities of three months or less at the date of acquisition are considered cash equivalents. Duke Energy, Progress Energy
and Duke Energy Florida have restricted cash balances related primarily to collateral assets, escrow deposits and VIEs. Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke
Energy Progress have restricted cash balances related to VIEs from storm recovery bonds issued. See Note 18 for additional information. Restricted cash
amounts are included in Other within Current Assets and Other Noncurrent Assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. The following table presents the
components of cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash included in the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy
Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida
Current Assets
Cash and cash equivalents $ 409 $ 44 $ 108 $ 49 $ 45 
Other 173  8  74  28  41 
Other Noncurrent Assets
Other 11  1  2  2  — 
Total cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash $ 593 $ 53 $ 184 $ 79 $ 86 
December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy
Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida
Current Assets
Cash and cash equivalents $ 341 $ 7 $ 70 $ 35 $ 23 
Other 170  —  39  —  39 
Other Noncurrent Assets
Other 6  1  4  4  — 
Total cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash $ 517 $ 8 $ 113 $ 39 $ 62 
Inventory
Inventory related to regulated operations is valued at historical cost. Inventory related to nonregulated operations is valued at the lower of cost or market.
Inventory is charged to expense or capitalized to property, plant and equipment when issued, primarily using the average cost method. Excess or obsolete
inventory is written down to the lower of cost or net realizable value. Once inventory has been written down, it creates a new cost basis for the inventory
that is not subsequently written up. Provisions for inventory write-oﬀs were not material at December 31, 2022, and 2021, respectively. The components of
inventory are presented in the tables below.
  December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Materials and supplies $ 2,604 $ 876 $ 1,232 $ 819 $ 413 $ 105 $ 342 $ 12 
Coal 620  253  190  99  91  34  144  — 
Natural gas, oil and other 360  35  157  88  69  5  3  160 
Total inventory $ 3,584 $ 1,164 $ 1,579 $ 1,006 $ 573 $ 144 $ 489 $ 172 
122
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
  December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Materials and supplies $ 2,309 $ 793 $ 1,067 $ 729 $ 338 $ 80 $ 311 $ 14 
Coal 486  195  167  94  73  19  105  — 
Natural gas, oil and other 316  38  164  98  66  17  2  95 
Total inventory $ 3,111 $ 1,026 $ 1,398 $ 921 $ 477 $ 116 $ 418 $ 109 
Investments in Debt and Equity Securities
The Duke Energy Registrants classify investments in equity securities as FV-NI and investments in debt securities as AFS. Both categories are recorded at fair
value on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Realized and unrealized gains and losses on securities classiﬁed as FV-NI are reported through net income.
Unrealized gains and losses for debt securities classiﬁed as AFS are included in AOCI until realized, unless it is determined the carrying value of an
investment has a credit loss. For certain investments of regulated operations, such as substantially all of the NDTF, realized and unrealized gains and losses
(including any credit losses) on debt securities are recorded as a regulatory asset or liability. The credit loss portion of debt securities of nonregulated
operations are included in earnings. Investments in debt and equity securities are classiﬁed as either current or noncurrent based on management’s intent
and ability to sell these securities, taking into consideration current market liquidity. See Note 16 for further information.
Goodwill
Duke Energy, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Ohio and Piedmont perform annual goodwill impairment tests as of August 31 each year at the reporting unit
level, which is determined to be a business segment or one level below. Duke Energy, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Ohio and Piedmont update these tests
between annual tests if events or circumstances occur that would more likely than not reduce the fair value of a reporting unit below its carrying value. See
Note 12 for further information.
Intangible Assets
Intangible assets are included in Other in Other Noncurrent Assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Generally, intangible assets are amortized using an
amortization method that reﬂects the pattern in which the economic beneﬁts of the intangible asset are consumed or on a straight-line basis if that pattern is
not readily determinable. Amortization of intangibles is reﬂected in Depreciation and amortization on the Consolidated Statements of Operations. Intangible
assets are subject to impairment testing and if impaired, the carrying value is accordingly reduced.
RECs are used to measure compliance with renewable energy standards and are held primarily for consumption. See Note 12 for further information.
Long-Lived Asset Impairments
The Duke Energy Registrants evaluate long-lived assets that are held and used, excluding goodwill, for impairment when circumstances indicate the carrying
value of those assets may not be recoverable. An impairment exists when a long-lived asset’s carrying value exceeds the estimated undiscounted cash ﬂows
expected to result from the use and eventual disposition of the asset. The estimated cash ﬂows may be based on alternative expected outcomes that are
probability weighted. If the carrying value of the long-lived asset is not recoverable based on these estimated future undiscounted cash ﬂows, the carrying
value of the asset is written down to its then current estimated fair value and an impairment charge is recognized.
The Duke Energy Registrants assess fair value of long-lived assets that are held and used using various methods, including recent comparable third-party
sales, internally developed discounted cash ﬂow analysis and analysis from outside advisors. Triggering events to reassess cash ﬂows may include, but are
not limited to, signiﬁcant changes in commodity prices, the condition of an asset or management’s interest in selling the asset.
123
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Property, Plant and Equipment
Property, plant and equipment are stated at the lower of depreciated historical cost net of any disallowances or fair value, if impaired. The Duke Energy
Registrants capitalize all construction-related direct labor and material costs, as well as indirect construction costs such as general engineering, taxes and
ﬁnancing costs. See “Allowance for Funds Used During Construction and Interest Capitalized” section below for information on capitalized ﬁnancing costs.
Costs of renewals and betterments that extend the useful life of property, plant and equipment are also capitalized. The cost of repairs, replacements and
major maintenance projects, which do not extend the useful life or increase the expected output of the asset, are expensed as incurred. Depreciation is
generally computed over the estimated useful life of the asset using the composite straight-line method. Depreciation studies are conducted periodically to
update composite rates and are approved by state utility commissions and/or the FERC when required. The composite weighted average depreciation rates,
excluding nuclear fuel, are included in the table that follows.
  Years Ended December 31,
  2022 2021 2020
Duke Energy 3.0 % 2.9 % 3.0 %
Duke Energy Carolinas 2.7 % 2.7 % 2.8 %
Progress Energy 3.2 % 3.1 % 3.2 %
Duke Energy Progress 3.0 % 3.0 % 3.1 %
Duke Energy Florida 3.5 % 3.3 % 3.3 %
Duke Energy Ohio 2.9 % 2.9 % 2.9 %
Duke Energy Indiana 3.6 % 3.6 % 3.5 %
Piedmont 2.1 % 2.1 % 2.3 %
In general, when the Duke Energy Registrants retire regulated property, plant and equipment, the original cost plus the cost of retirement, less salvage value
and any depreciation already recognized, is charged to accumulated depreciation. However, when it becomes probable the asset will be retired substantially
in advance of its original expected useful life or is abandoned, the cost of the asset and the corresponding accumulated depreciation is recognized as a
separate asset. If the asset is still in operation, the net amount is classiﬁed as Facilities to be retired, net on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. If the asset is
no longer operating, the net amount is classiﬁed in Regulatory assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheets if deemed recoverable (see discussion of long-
lived asset impairments above). The carrying value of the asset is based on historical cost if the Duke Energy Registrants are allowed to recover the
remaining net book value and a return equal to at least the incremental borrowing rate. If not, an impairment is recognized to the extent the net book value
of the asset exceeds the present value of future revenues discounted at the incremental borrowing rate.
When the Duke Energy Registrants sell entire regulated operating units, or retire or sell nonregulated properties, the original cost and accumulated
depreciation and amortization balances are removed from Property, Plant and Equipment on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Any gain or loss is recorded in
earnings, unless otherwise required by the applicable regulatory body. See Note 11 for additional information.
Other Noncurrent Assets
Duke Energy, through a nonregulated subsidiary, was the winner of the Carolina Long Bay oﬀshore wind auction in May 2022 and recorded an
asset of $150 million related to the contract in Other within Other noncurrent assets. In November 2022, Duke Energy committed to a plan to sell the
Commercial Renewables business segment, excluding the oﬀshore wind contract for Carolina Long Bay, which was moved to the Electric Utilities and
Infrastructure (EU&I) segment. See Notes 2 and 3 for further information.
Leases
Duke Energy determines if an arrangement is a lease at contract inception based on whether the arrangement involves the use of a physically distinct
identiﬁed asset and whether Duke Energy has the right to obtain substantially all of the economic beneﬁts from the use of the asset throughout the period as
well as the right to direct the use of the asset. As a policy election, Duke Energy does not evaluate arrangements with initial contract terms of less than one
year as leases.
Operating leases are included in Operating lease ROU assets, net, Other current liabilities and Operating lease liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Finance leases are included in Property, plant and equipment, Current maturities of long-term debt and Long-Term Debt on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
For lessee and lessor arrangements, Duke Energy has elected a policy to not separate lease and non-lease components for all asset classes. For lessor
arrangements, lease and non-lease components are only combined under one arrangement and accounted for under the lease accounting framework if the
non-lease components are not the predominant component of the arrangement and the lease component would be classiﬁed as an operating lease.
Nuclear Fuel
Nuclear fuel is classiﬁed as Property, Plant and Equipment on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Nuclear fuel in the front-end fuel processing phase is considered work in progress and not amortized until placed in service. Amortization of nuclear fuel is
included within Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power on the Consolidated Statements of Operations. Amortization is recorded using the
units-of-production method.
124
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Allowance for Funds Used During Construction and Interest Capitalized
For regulated operations, the debt and equity costs of ﬁnancing the construction of property, plant and equipment are reﬂected as AFUDC and capitalized as
a component of the cost of property, plant and equipment. AFUDC equity is reported on the Consolidated Statements of Operations as non-cash income in
Other income and expenses, net. AFUDC debt is reported as a non-cash oﬀset to Interest Expense. After construction is completed, the Duke Energy
Registrants are permitted to recover these costs through their inclusion in rate base and the corresponding subsequent depreciation or amortization of those
regulated assets.
AFUDC equity, a permanent diﬀerence for income taxes, reduces the ETR when capitalized and increases the ETR when depreciated or amortized. See Note
24 for additional information.
Asset Retirement Obligations
AROs are recognized for legal obligations associated with the retirement of property, plant and equipment. Substantially all AROs are related to regulated
operations. When recording an ARO, the present value of the projected liability is recognized in the period in which it is incurred, if a reasonable estimate of
fair value can be made. The liability is accreted over time. For operating plants, the present value of the liability is added to the cost of the associated asset
and depreciated over the remaining life of the asset. For retired plants, the present value of the liability is recorded as a regulatory asset unless determined
not to be probable of recovery.
The present value of the initial obligation and subsequent updates are based on discounted cash ﬂows, which include estimates regarding timing of future
cash ﬂows, selection of discount rates and cost escalation rates, among other factors. These estimates are subject to change. Depreciation expense is
adjusted prospectively for any changes to the carrying amount of the associated asset. The Duke Energy Registrants receive amounts to fund the cost of the
ARO for regulated operations through a combination of regulated revenues and earnings on the NDTF. As a result, amounts recovered in regulated revenues,
earnings on the NDTF, accretion expense and depreciation of the associated asset are netted and deferred as a regulatory asset or liability.
Accounts Payable
During 2020, Duke Energy established a supply chain ﬁnance program (the “program”) with a global ﬁnancial institution. The program is voluntary and
allows Duke Energy suppliers, at their sole discretion, to sell their receivables from Duke Energy to the ﬁnancial institution at a rate that leverages Duke
Energy’s credit rating and, which may result in favorable terms compared to the rate available to the supplier on their own credit rating. Suppliers
participating in the program, determine at their sole discretion which invoices they will sell to the ﬁnancial institution. Suppliers’ decisions on which invoices
are sold do not impact Duke Energy’s payment terms, which are based on commercial terms negotiated between Duke Energy and the supplier regardless of
program participation. The commercial terms negotiated between Duke Energy and its suppliers are consistent regardless of whether the supplier elects to
participate in the program. Duke Energy does not issue any guarantees with respect to the program and does not participate in negotiations between
suppliers and the ﬁnancial institution. Duke Energy does not have an economic interest in the supplier’s decision to participate in the program and receives
no interest, fees or other beneﬁt from the ﬁnancial institution based on supplier participation in the program.
The following table presents the outstanding accounts payable balance sold to the ﬁnancial institution by our suppliers and the supplier invoices sold to the
ﬁnancial institution under the program included within Net cash provided by operating activities on the Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows as of
December 31, 2022, and December 31, 2021.
  December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress EnergyEnergyEnergy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas EnergyProgressFlorida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Outstanding Accounts Payable Balance Sold $ 87 $ 6 $ 19 $ 8 $ 11 $ 5 $ — $ 57 
Suppliers Invoices Settled Through The Program 301  29  85  26  59  38  2  147 
December 30, 2021
Duke Duke
DukeProgressEnergyEnergy
(in millions) Energy EnergyFlorida OhioPiedmont
Outstanding Accounts Payable Balance Sold $ 19 $ 9 $ 9 $ 6 $ 4 
Suppliers Invoices Settled Through The Program 122  10  10  12  100 
Revenue Recognition
Duke Energy recognizes revenue as customers obtain control of promised goods and services in an amount that reﬂects consideration expected in exchange
for those goods or services. Generally, the delivery of electricity and natural gas results in the transfer of control to customers at the time the commodity is
delivered and the amount of revenue recognized is equal to the amount billed to each customer, including estimated volumes delivered when billings have
not yet occurred. See Note 19 for further information.
125
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Derivatives and Hedging
Derivative and non-derivative instruments may be used in connection with commodity price and interest rate activities, including swaps, futures, forwards
and options. All derivative instruments, except those that qualify for the NPNS exception, are recorded on the Consolidated Balance Sheets at fair value.
Qualifying derivative instruments may be designated as either cash ﬂow hedges or fair value hedges. Other derivative instruments (undesignated contracts)
either have not been designated or do not qualify as hedges. The eﬀective portion of the change in the fair value of cash ﬂow hedges is recorded in AOCI.
The eﬀective portion of the change in the fair value of a fair value hedge is oﬀset in net income by changes in the hedged item. For activity subject to
regulatory accounting, gains and losses on derivative contracts are reﬂected as regulatory assets or liabilities and not as other comprehensive income or
current period income. As a result, changes in fair value of these derivatives have no immediate earnings impact.
Formal documentation, including transaction type and risk management strategy, is maintained for all contracts accounted for as a hedge. At inception and
at least every three months thereafter, the hedge contract is assessed to see if it is highly eﬀective in oﬀsetting changes in cash ﬂows or fair values of
hedged items.
See Note 15 for further information.
Captive Insurance Reserves
Duke Energy has captive insurance subsidiaries that provide coverage, on an indemnity basis, to the Subsidiary Registrants as well as certain third parties,
on a limited basis, for ﬁnancial losses, primarily related to property, workers’ compensation and general liability. Liabilities include provisions for estimated
losses incurred but not reported (IBNR), as well as estimated provisions for known claims. IBNR reserve estimates are primarily based upon historical loss
experience, industry data and other actuarial assumptions. Reserve estimates are adjusted in future periods as actual losses diﬀer from experience.
Duke Energy, through its captive insurance entities, also has reinsurance coverage with third parties for certain losses above a per occurrence and/or
aggregate retention. Receivables for reinsurance coverage are recognized when realization is deemed probable.
Preferred Stock
Preferred stock is reviewed to determine the appropriate balance sheet classiﬁcation and embedded features, such as call options, are evaluated to
determine if they should be bifurcated and accounted for separately. Costs directly related to the issuance of preferred stock are recorded as a reduction of
the proceeds received. The liability for the dividend is recognized when declared. The accumulated dividends on the cumulative preferred stock is recognized
to net income available to Duke Energy Corporation in the EPS calculation. See Note 20 for further information.
Loss Contingencies and Environmental Liabilities
Contingent losses are recorded when it is probable a loss has occurred and the loss can be reasonably estimated. When a range of the probable loss exists
and no amount within the range is a better estimate than any other amount, the minimum amount in the range is recorded. Unless otherwise required by
GAAP, legal fees are expensed as incurred.
Environmental liabilities are recorded on an undiscounted basis when environmental remediation or other liabilities become probable and can be reasonably
estimated. Environmental expenditures related to past operations that do not generate current or future revenues are expensed. Environmental expenditures
related to operations that generate current or future revenues are expensed or capitalized, as appropriate. Certain environmental expenditures receive
regulatory accounting treatment and are recorded as regulatory assets.
See Notes 4 and 5 for further information.
Severance and Special Termination Beneﬁts
Duke Energy maintains severance plans for the general employee population under which, in general, the longer a terminated employee worked prior to
termination the greater the amount of severance beneﬁts provided. A liability for involuntary severance is recorded once an involuntary severance plan is
committed to by management if involuntary severances are probable and can be reasonably estimated. For involuntary severance beneﬁts incremental to its
ongoing severance plan beneﬁts, the fair value of the obligation is expensed at the communication date if there are no future service requirements or over
the required future service period. Duke Energy also oﬀers special termination beneﬁts under voluntary severance programs. Special termination beneﬁts are
recorded immediately upon employee acceptance absent a signiﬁcant retention period. Otherwise, the cost is recorded over the remaining service period.
Employee acceptance of voluntary severance beneﬁts is determined by management based on the facts and circumstances of the beneﬁts being oﬀered.
See Note 21 for further information.
Guarantees
If necessary, liabilities are recognized at the time of issuance or material modiﬁcation of a guarantee for the estimated fair value of the obligation it
assumes. Fair value is estimated using a probability weighted approach. The obligation is reduced over the term of the guarantee or related contract in a
systematic and rational method as risk is reduced. Duke Energy recognizes a liability for the best estimate of its loss due to the nonperformance of the
guaranteed party. This liability is recognized at the inception of a guarantee and is updated periodically. See Note 8 for further information.
Income Taxes
Duke Energy and its subsidiaries ﬁle a consolidated federal income tax return and other state and foreign jurisdictional returns. The Subsidiary Registrants
are parties to a tax-sharing agreement with Duke Energy. Income taxes recorded represent amounts the Subsidiary Registrants would incur as separate C-
Corporations. Deferred income taxes have been provided for temporary diﬀerences between GAAP and tax bases of assets and liabilities because the
diﬀerences create taxable or tax-deductible amounts for future periods. ITCs associated with regulated operations are deferred and amortized as a reduction
of income tax expense over the estimated useful lives of the related properties.
126
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Accumulated deferred income taxes are valued using the enacted tax rate expected to apply to taxable income in the periods in which the deferred tax asset
or liability is expected to be settled or realized. In the event of a change in tax rates, deferred tax assets and liabilities are remeasured as of the enactment
date of the new rate. To the extent that the change in the value of the deferred tax represents an obligation to customers, the impact of the remeasurement
is deferred to a regulatory liability. Remaining impacts are recorded in income from continuing operations. Duke Energy's results of operations could be
impacted if the estimate of the tax eﬀect of reversing temporary diﬀerences is not reﬂective of actual outcomes, is modiﬁed to reﬂect new developments or
interpretations of the tax law, revised to incorporate new accounting principles, or changes in the expected timing or manner of a reversal.
Tax-related interest and penalties are recorded in Interest Expense and Other Income and Expenses, net in the Consolidated Statements of Operations.
See Note 24 for further information.
Excise Taxes
Certain excise taxes levied by state or local governments are required to be paid even if not collected from the customer. These taxes are recognized on a
gross basis. Taxes for which Duke Energy operates merely as a collection agent for the state and local government are accounted for on a net basis. Excise
taxes accounted for on a gross basis within both Operating Revenues and Property and other taxes in the Consolidated Statements of Operations were as
follows.
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Duke Energy $ 449 $ 420 $ 415 
Duke Energy Carolinas 47  44  43 
Progress Energy 290  250  249 
Duke Energy Progress 25  22  26 
Duke Energy Florida 265  228  223 
Duke Energy Ohio 104  102  96 
Duke Energy Indiana 7  23  25 
Piedmont 1  1  2 
Dividend Restrictions and Unappropriated Retained Earnings
Duke Energy does not have any current legal, regulatory or other restrictions on paying common stock dividends to shareholders. However, if Duke Energy
were to defer dividend payments on the preferred stock, the declaration of common stock dividends would be prohibited. See Note 20 for more information.
Additionally, as further described in Note 4, Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Ohio, Duke Energy Indiana and Piedmont have
restrictions on paying dividends or otherwise advancing funds to Duke Energy due to conditions established by regulators in conjunction with merger
transaction approvals. At December 31, 2022, and 2021, an insigniﬁcant amount of Duke Energy’s consolidated Retained earnings balance represents
undistributed earnings of equity method investments.
New Accounting Standards
The following accounting standard was adopted by the Duke Energy Registrants in 2021.
Leases with Variable Lease Payments. In July 2021, the FASB issued new accounting guidance requiring lessors to classify a lease with variable lease
payments that do not depend on a reference index or rate as an operating lease if both of the following are met: (1) the lease would have to be classiﬁed as
a sales-type or direct ﬁnancing lease under prior guidance, and (2) the lessor would have recognized a day-one loss. Duke Energy elected to adopt the
guidance immediately upon issuance of the new standard and will be applying the new standard prospectively to new lease arrangements meeting the
criteria. Duke Energy did not have any lease arrangements that this new accounting guidance materially impacted.
The following accounting standard was adopted by the Duke Energy Registrants in 2020.
Current Expected Credit Losses. In June 2016, the FASB issued new accounting guidance for credit losses. Duke Energy adopted the new accounting
guidance for credit losses eﬀective January 1, 2020, using the modiﬁed retrospective method of adoption, which does not require restatement of prior year
results. Duke Energy did not adopt any practical expedients.
Duke Energy recognizes allowances for credit losses based on management's estimate of losses expected to be incurred over the lives of certain assets or
guarantees. Management monitors credit quality, changes in expected credit losses and the appropriateness of the allowance for credit losses on a forward-
looking basis. Management reviews the risk of loss periodically as part of the existing assessment of collectability of receivables.
Duke Energy reviews the credit quality of its counterparties as part of its regular risk management process and requires credit enhancements, such as
deposits or letters of credit, as appropriate and as allowed by regulators.
Duke Energy recorded cumulative eﬀects of changes in accounting principles related to the adoption of the new credit loss standard for allowances and
credit losses of trade and other receivables, insurance receivables and ﬁnancial guarantees. These amounts are included in the Consolidated Balance Sheets
in Receivables, Receivables of VIEs, Other Noncurrent Assets and Other Noncurrent Liabilities. See Notes 8 and 19 for more information.
127
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Duke Energy recorded an adjustment for the cumulative eﬀect of a change in accounting principle due to the adoption of this standard on January 1, 2020,
as shown in the table below:
  January 1, 2020
Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Piedmont
Total pretax impact to Retained Earnings $ 120 $ 16 $ 2 $ 1 $ 1 $ 1 
2. DISPOSITIONS
The following table summarizes the Loss from Discontinued Operations, net of tax recorded on Duke Energy's Consolidated Statements of Operations:
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups $ (1,349)$ (151)$ (14)
Other 26  7  7 
Loss from Discontinued Operations, net of tax $ (1,323)$ (144)$ (7)
(a)     Amount represents an income tax beneﬁt resulting from tax adjustments for previously sold businesses not related to the Commercial Renewables
Disposal Groups.
Sale of Commercial Renewables Segment
In August 2022, Duke Energy announced a strategic review of its commercial renewables business. Since 2007, Duke Energy has built a portfolio of
commercial wind, solar and battery projects across the U.S., and established a development pipeline. Duke Energy has developed a strategy to focus on
renewables, grid and other investment opportunities within its regulated operations. In November 2022, Duke Energy committed to a plan to sell the
Commercial Renewables business segment, excluding the oﬀshore wind contract for Carolina Long Bay, which was moved to the Electric Utilities and
Infrastructure (EU&I) segment. Duke Energy is actively marketing the business as two separate disposal groups, the utility-scale solar and wind group and
the distributed generation group (collectively, Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups). The sales processes for both Disposal Groups are ongoing and Duke
Energy expects to dispose of these groups in the second half of 2023.
Assets Held For Sale and Discontinued Operations
The Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups were classiﬁed as held for sale and as discontinued operations in the fourth quarter of 2022. No adjustments
were made to the historical activity within the Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income, Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows or the
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity. Unless otherwise noted, the notes to these consolidated ﬁnancial statements exclude amounts related to
discontinued operations for all periods presented.(a)
128
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DISPOSITIONS
The following table presents the carrying values of the major classes of Assets held for sale and Liabilities associated with assets held for sale included in
Duke Energy's Consolidated Balance Sheets.
December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021
Current Assets Held for Sale
Cash and cash equivalents $ 10 $ 3 
Receivables, net 107  87 
Inventory 88  86 
Other 57  56 
Total current assets held for sale 262  232 
Noncurrent Assets Held for Sale
Property, Plant and Equipment
Cost 6,444  7,323 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (1,651) (1,452)
Net property, plant and equipment 4,793  5,871 
Operating lease right-of-use assets, net 140  130 
Investments in equity method unconsolidated aﬃliates 522  513 
Other 179  181 
Total other noncurrent assets held for sale 841  824 
Total Assets Held for Sale $ 5,896 $ 6,927 
Current Liabilities Associated with Assets Held for Sale
Accounts payable $ 122 $ 98 
Taxes accrued 17  18 
Other 120  51 
Total current liabilities associated with assets held for sale 259  167 
Noncurrent Liabilities Associated with Assets Held for Sale
Operating lease liabilities 150  134 
Asset retirement obligations 190  175 
Other 399  303 
Total other noncurrent liabilities associated with assets held for sale 739  612 
Total Liabilities Associated with Assets Held for Sale $ 998 $ 779 
As of December 31, 2022, the noncontrolling interest balance is $1.6 billion.
The following table presents the results of the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups, which are included in Loss from Discontinued Operations, net of tax
in Duke Energy's Consolidated Statements of Operations.
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Operating revenues $ 465 $ 476 $ 502 
Operation, maintenance and other 337 343 292
Depreciation and amortization 201 227 200
Property and other taxes 36 34 26
Other income and expenses, net 2  (27) 1
Interest expense 10 72 66
Loss on disposal 1,748  —  — 
Loss before income taxes (1,865) (227) (81)
Income tax beneﬁt (516) (76) (67)
Loss from discontinued operations $ (1,349)$ (151)$ (14)
Add: Net loss attributable to noncontrolling interest included in discontinued operations 108  344  296 
Net income from discontinued operations attributable to Duke Energy Corporation $ (1,241)$ 193 $ 282 
(a)    Upon meeting the criteria for assets held for sale, beginning in November 2022 depreciation and amortization expense were ceased.(a)
129
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DISPOSITIONS
The Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups' held for sale assets included pretax impairments of approximately $1.7 billion for the year ended December
31, 2022. The impairment was recorded to write-down the carrying amount of the property, plant and equipment assets to the estimated fair value of the
business, based on the expected selling price less estimated cost to sell. These losses were included in Loss from Discontinued Operations, net of tax in Duke
Energy's Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income. The fair value was primarily determined from the income approach using
discounted cash ﬂows but also considered market information obtained through the bidding process. The discounted cash ﬂow model utilized Level 2 and
Level 3 inputs. The fair value hierarchy levels are further discussed in Note 17. The impairment will be updated, if necessary, based on the ﬁnal sales price,
after any adjustments at closing for working capital and capital expenditures.
Duke Energy has elected not to separately disclose discontinued operations on Duke Energy's Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows. The following table
summarizes Duke Energy's cash ﬂows from discontinued operations related to the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups.
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Cash ﬂows provided by (used in):
Operating activities $ 213 $ 62 $ 466 
Investing activities (802) (542) (1,102)
Other Sale Related Matters
Several Duke Energy renewables project companies, located in the Electric Reliability Council of Texas (ERCOT) market, were named in several lawsuits
arising out of Texas Storm Uri, which occurred in February 2021. The legal actions related to these lawsuits will remain with Duke Energy and any future
activity related to the matters will be presented in discontinued operations. See Note 5 for more information.
The Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups' debt and related interest rate swaps have not been classiﬁed as held for sale as they are not currently
expected transfer to the buyer, but would be required to be extinguished as a result of the disposition. As of December 31, 2022, the balance of long-term
debt including current maturities is $1.5 billion. If the debt and related interest rate swaps do not transfer to the buyer and are terminated early, the
expected total loss on extinguishment is approximately $100 million, of which approximately $55 million is expected to be attributable to Duke Energy. The
loss would be recorded in discontinued operations when the debt and swaps are terminated. Hedge accounting was discontinued on the related interest rate
swaps when the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups were classiﬁed as held for sale as the forecasted transactions being hedged are no longer
probable. As a result, a gain of $72 million was recorded in Loss from Discontinued Operations, net of tax in Duke Energy's Consolidated Statements of
Operations as of December 31, 2022, of which $54 million is attributable to Duke Energy.
Interest expense and debt issuance costs directly associated with the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups was allocated to discontinued operations. No
interest from corporate level debt was allocated to discontinued operations.
The Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups have entered into negotiations to modify or terminate certain PPAs under which the Commercial Renewables
Disposal Groups sell power and RECs from renewable projects to oﬀtakers. Duke Energy expects to pay oﬀtakers approximately $95 million to modify the
agreements. Charges related to the modiﬁcations will be reﬂected within Loss From Discontinued Operations in Duke Energy's Consolidated Statements of
Operations.
Sale of Minority Interest in Duke Energy Indiana Holdco, LLC
On January 28, 2021, Duke Energy executed an agreement providing for an investment by an aﬃliate of GIC in Duke Energy Indiana in exchange for a 19.9%
minority interest issued by Duke Energy Indiana Holdco, LLC, the holding company for Duke Energy Indiana. The transaction was completed following two
closings for an aggregate purchase price of approximately $2.05 billion. The ﬁrst closing, which occurred on September 8, 2021, resulted in Duke Energy
Indiana Holdco, LLC issuing 11.05% of its membership interests in exchange for approximately $1.03 billion or 50% of the purchase price. The diﬀerence
between the cash consideration received, net of transaction costs of approximately $27 million, and the carrying value of the noncontrolling interest is
$545 million and was recorded as an increase to equity. The second closing was completed in December 2022 and resulted in Duke Energy Indiana Holdco,
LLC issuing an additional 8.85% of its membership interests in exchange for approximately $1.03 billion. The diﬀerence between the cash consideration
received, net of transaction costs of approximately $6 million, and the carrying value of the noncontrolling interest is $492 million and was recorded as an
increase to equity. Duke Energy retained indirect control of these assets, and, therefore, no gain or loss was recognized on the Consolidated Statements of
Operations for either transaction.
3. BUSINESS SEGMENTS
Reportable segments are determined based on information used by the chief operating decision-maker in deciding how to allocate resources and evaluate
the performance of the business. Duke Energy evaluates segment performance based on segment income. Segment income is deﬁned as income from
continuing operations net of income attributable to noncontrolling interests and preferred stock dividends. Segment income, as discussed below, includes
intercompany revenues and expenses that are eliminated on the Consolidated Financial Statements. Certain governance costs are allocated to each
segment. In addition, direct interest expense and income taxes are included in segment income.
Products and services are sold between aﬃliate companies and reportable segments of Duke Energy at cost. Segment assets as presented in the tables that
follow exclude all intercompany assets.
Duke Energy
Due to Duke Energy's commitment in the fourth quarter of 2022 to sell the Commercial Renewables business segment, Duke Energy's segment structure
now includes the following two segments: EU&I and GU&I. Prior period information has been recast to conform to the current segment structure. See Note 2
for further information on the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups.
130
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS BUSINESS SEGMENTS
The EU&I segment includes Duke Energy's regulated electric utilities in the Carolinas, Florida and the Midwest. The regulated electric utilities conduct
operations through the Subsidiary Registrants that are substantially all regulated and, accordingly, qualify for regulatory accounting treatment. EU&I also
includes Duke Energy's electric transmission infrastructure investments and the oﬀshore wind contract for Carolina Long Bay. Refer to Note 2 for further
information.
The GU&I segment includes Piedmont, Duke Energy's natural gas local distribution companies in Ohio and Kentucky, and Duke Energy's natural gas storage,
midstream pipeline, and renewable natural gas investments. GU&I's operations are substantially all regulated and, accordingly, qualify for regulatory
accounting treatment.
The remainder of Duke Energy’s operations is presented as Other, which is primarily comprised of interest expense on holding company debt, unallocated
corporate costs and Duke Energy’s wholly owned captive insurance company, Bison. Other also includes Duke Energy's interest in NMC. See Note 13 for
additional information on the investment in NMC.
Business segment information is presented in the following tables. Segment assets presented exclude intercompany assets.
Year Ended December 31, 2022
Electric Gas Total
Utilities and Utilities and Reportable
(in millions) Infrastructure Infrastructure Segments Other Eliminations Total
Unaﬃliated Revenues $ 25,990 $ 2,748 $ 28,738 $ 30 $ — $ 28,768 
Intersegment Revenues 34  92  126  92  (218) — 
Total Revenues $ 26,024 $ 2,840 $ 28,864 $ 122 $ (218)$ 28,768 
Interest Expense $ 1,565 $ 182 $ 1,747 $ 778 $ (86)$ 2,439 
Depreciation and amortization 4,550  327  4,877  236  (27) 5,086 
Equity in earnings of unconsolidated
aﬃliates 7  20  27  86  —  113 
Income tax expense (beneﬁt) 536  8  544  (244) —  300 
Segment income (loss) 3,929  468  4,397  (737) (1) 3,659 
Less noncontrolling interest 95 
Add back preferred stock dividend 106 
Discontinued operations (1,215)
Net income $ 2,455 
Capital investments expenditures and
acquisitions $ 8,985 $ 1,295 $ 10,280 $ 1,139 $ — $ 11,419 
Segment assets 152,104  16,411  168,515  9,571  —  178,086 
(a)    EU&I includes $386 million recorded within Impairment of assets and other charges, $46 million within Regulated electric revenues and $34 million
within Noncontrolling Interests related to the Duke Energy Indiana court rulings on coal ash on the Consolidated Statements of Operations. See Note
4 for additional information.
(b)    Other includes $72 million recorded within Impairment of assets and other charges, $71 million within Operations, maintenance and other and a
$7 million gain within Gains on sales of other assets related to costs attributable to business transformation, including long-term real estate strategy
changes and workforce realignment on the Consolidated Statements of Operations; it also includes $25 million recorded within Operations,
maintenance and other related to litigation on the Consolidated Statements of Operations.
(c)    Other includes capital investments expenditures and acquisitions related to the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups.
(d)    Other includes Assets Held for Sale balances related to the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups. Refer to Note 2 for further information.(a)(b)
(c)
(d)
131
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS BUSINESS SEGMENTS
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Electric Gas Total
Utilities and Utilities and Reportable
(in millions) Infrastructure Infrastructure Segments Other Eliminations Total
Unaﬃliated Revenues $ 22,570 $ 2,022 $ 24,592 $ 29 $ — $ 24,621 
Intersegment Revenues 33  90  123  84  (207) — 
Total Revenues $ 22,603 $ 2,112 $ 24,715 $ 113 $ (207)$ 24,621 
Interest Expense $ 1,432 $ 142 $ 1,574 $ 643 $ (10)$ 2,207 
Depreciation and amortization 4,251  303  4,554  236  (28) 4,762 
Equity in earnings of unconsolidated
aﬃliates 7  8  15  47  —  62 
Income tax expense (beneﬁt) 494  55  549  (281) —  268 
Segment income (loss) 3,850  396  4,246  (641) (3) 3,602 
Less noncontrolling interest 329 
Add back preferred stock dividend 106 
Discontinued operations 200 
Net income $ 3,579 
Capital investments expenditures and
acquisitions $ 7,653 $ 1,271 $ 8,924 $ 828 $ — $ 9,752 
Segment assets 143,841  15,179  159,020  10,567  —  169,587 
(a)    EU&I includes $160 million of expense recorded within Impairment of assets and other charges, $77 million of income within Other Income and
expenses, $5 million of expense within Operations, maintenance and other, $13 million of income within regulated operating revenues, $3 million of
expense within interest expense and $6 million of expense within Depreciation and amortization on the Duke Energy Carolinas' Consolidated
Statement of Operations related to the South Carolina Supreme Court decision on coal ash and insurance proceeds; it also includes $42 million of
expense recorded within Impairment of assets and other charges, $34 million of income within Other Income and expenses, $7 million of expense
within Operations, maintenance, and other, $15 million of income within Regulated electric operating revenues, $5 million of expense within interest
expense and $1 million of expense within Depreciation and amortization on the Duke Energy Progress' Consolidated Statement of Operations. See
Notes 4 and 5 for more information.
(b)    GU&I includes $20 million, recorded within Equity in earnings (losses) of unconsolidated aﬃliates on the Consolidated Statements of Operations, related
to natural gas pipeline investments. See Note 4 for additional information.
(c)    Other includes $133 million recorded within Impairment of assets and other charges, $42 million within Operations, maintenance and other, and
$17 million within Depreciation and amortization on the Consolidated Statements of Operations, related to the workplace and workforce
realignment. See Note 11 for additional information.
(d)    Other includes capital investments expenditures and acquisitions related to the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups.
(e)    Other includes Assets Held for Sale balances related to the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups. Refer to Note 2 for further information.
Year Ended December 31, 2020
Electric Gas Total
Utilities and Utilities and Reportable
(in millions) InfrastructureInfrastructure Segments OtherEliminations Total
Unaﬃliated Revenues $ 21,687 $ 1,653 $ 23,340 $ 26 $ — $ 23,366 
Intersegment Revenues 33  95  128  73  (201) — 
Total Revenues $ 21,720 $ 1,748 $ 23,468 $ 99 $ (201)$ 23,366 
Interest Expense $ 1,320 $ 135 $ 1,455 $ 657 $ (15)$ 2,097 
Depreciation and amortization 4,068  258  4,326  207  (29) 4,504 
Equity in (losses) earnings of
unconsolidated aﬃliates (1) (2,017) (2,018) 13  —  (2,005)
Income tax expense (beneﬁt) 340  (349) (9) (160) —  (169)
Segment income (loss) 2,669  (1,266) 1,403  (418) (4) 981 
Less noncontrolling interest 295 
Add back preferred stock dividend 107 
Discontinued operations 289 
Net income $ 1,082 
Capital investments expenditures and
acquisitions $ 7,629 $ 1,309 $ 8,938 $ 1,483 $ — $ 10,421 
Segment assets 138,225  13,849  152,074  10,314  —  162,388 (a)(b)(c)
(d)
(e)
(a)(b)(c)
(d)
(e)
132
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS BUSINESS SEGMENTS
(a)    EU&I includes $948 million of Impairment of assets and other charges and a reversal of $152 million included in Regulated electric operating revenue
related to the CCR Settlement Agreement ﬁled with the NCUC. Additionally, EU&I includes $19 million of Impairment of assets and other charges
related to the Clemson University Combined Heat and Power Plant, $5 million of Impairment charges related to the natural gas pipeline assets and
$16 million of shareholder contributions within Operations, maintenance and other related to Duke Energy Carolinas' and Duke Energy Progress'
2019 North Carolina rate cases. See Note 4 for additional information.
(b)    GU&I includes $2.1 billion recorded within Equity in (losses) earnings of unconsolidated aﬃliates and $7 million of Impairment of assets and other
charges related to natural gas pipeline investments. See Notes 4 and 13 for additional information.
(c)    Other includes a $98 million reversal of 2018 severance costs due to a partial settlement in the Duke Energy Carolinas' 2019 North Carolina rate case.
See Note 21 for additional information.
(d)    Other includes capital investments expenditures and acquisitions related to the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups.
(e)    Other includes Assets Held for Sale balances related to the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups. Refer to Note 2 for further information.
Geographical Information
Substantially all assets and revenues from continuing operations are within the U.S.
Major Customers
For the year ended December 31, 2022, revenues from one customer of Duke Energy Progress are $684 million. Duke Energy Progress has one reportable
segment, Electric Utilities and Infrastructure. No other Subsidiary Registrant has an individual customer representing more than 10% of its revenues for the
year ended December 31, 2022.
Products and Services
The following table summarizes revenues of the reportable segments by type.
Retail Wholesale Retail Total
(in millions) Electric Electric Natural Gas Other Revenues
2022
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure $ 22,036 $ 2,882 $ — $ 1,106 $ 26,024 
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure —  —  2,535  305  2,840 
Total Reportable Segments $ 22,036 $ 2,882 $ 2,535 $ 1,411 $ 28,864 
2021
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure $ 19,410 $ 2,216 $ — $ 977 $ 22,603 
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure —  —  2,025  87  2,112 
Total Reportable Segments $ 19,410 $ 2,216 $ 2,025 $ 1,064 $ 24,715 
2020
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure $ 18,898 $ 1,878 $ — $ 944 $ 21,720 
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure —  —  1,691  57  1,748 
Total Reportable Segments $ 18,898 $ 1,878 $ 1,691 $ 1,001 $ 23,468 
Duke Energy Ohio
Duke Energy Ohio has two reportable segments, EU&I and GU&I.
EU&I transmits and distributes electricity in portions of Ohio and generates, distributes and sells electricity in portions of Northern Kentucky. GU&I transports
and sells natural gas in portions of Ohio and Northern Kentucky. Both reportable segments conduct operations primarily through Duke Energy Ohio and its
wholly owned subsidiary, Duke Energy Kentucky. The remainder of Duke Energy Ohio's operations is presented as Other.
All Duke Energy Ohio assets and revenues from continuing operations are within the U.S.
Year Ended December 31, 2022
Electric Gas Total
Utilities and Utilities and Reportable
(in millions) Infrastructure Infrastructure Segments Other Eliminations Total
Total revenues $ 1,798 $ 716 $ 2,514 $ — $ — $ 2,514 
Interest expense $ 86 $ 43 $ 129 $ — $ — $ 129 
Depreciation and amortization 221  103  324  —  —  324 
Income tax expense (beneﬁt) 24  (43) (19) (2) —  (21)
Segment income (loss)/Net income 189  121  310  (8) —  302 
Capital expenditures $ 488 $ 362 $ 850 $ — $ — $ 850 
Segment assets 7,504  4,164  11,668  14  (176) 11,506 
133
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS BUSINESS SEGMENTS
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Electric Gas Total
Utilities and Utilities and Reportable
(in millions) Infrastructure Infrastructure Segments Other Eliminations Total
Total revenues $ 1,493 $ 544 $ 2,037 $ — $ — $ 2,037 
Interest expense $ 87 $ 24 $ 111 $ — $ — $ 111 
Depreciation and amortization 217  90  307  —  —  307 
Income tax expense (beneﬁt) 15  19  34  (4) —  30 
Segment income (loss)/Net Income 141  78  219  (15) —  204 
Capital expenditures $ 486 $ 362 $ 848 $ — $ — $ 848 
Segment assets 6,882  3,892  10,774  29  (29) 10,774 
Year Ended December 31, 2020
Electric Gas Total
Utilities and Utilities and Reportable
(in millions) Infrastructure Infrastructure Segments Other Eliminations Total
Total revenues $ 1,405 $ 453 $ 1,858 $ — $ — $ 1,858 
Interest expense $ 85 $ 17 $ 102 $ — $ — $ 102 
Depreciation and amortization 200  78  278  —  —  278 
Income tax expense (beneﬁt) 19  26  45  (2) —  43 
Segment income (loss) 162  96  258  (6) —  252 
Capital expenditures $ 548 $ 286 $ 834 $ — $ — $ 834 
Segment assets 6,615  3,380  9,995  32  (2) 10,025 
4. REGULATORY MATTERS
REGULATORY ASSETS AND LIABILITIES
The Duke Energy Registrants record regulatory assets and liabilities that result from the ratemaking process. See Note 1 for further information.
134
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
The following tables present the regulatory assets and liabilities recorded on the Consolidated Balance Sheets of Duke Energy and Progress Energy. See
separate tables below for balances by individual registrant.
Duke Energy Progress Energy
December 31, December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021
Regulatory Assets
AROs – coal ash $ 3,205 $ 3,408 $ 1,429 $ 1,399 
AROs – nuclear and other 945  684  884  620 
Deferred fuel and purchased power 3,866  1,253  2,060  718 
Accrued pension and OPEB 2,336  2,017  759  725 
Storm cost securitized balance, net 940  991  720  759 
Nuclear asset securitized balance, net 881  937  881  937 
Debt fair value adjustment 829  884  —  — 
Storm cost deferrals 666  213  559  189 
Hedge costs deferrals 378  348  128  137 
Post-in-service carrying costs (PISCC) and deferred operating expenses 342  356  42  47 
Retired generation facilities 316  357  243  265 
Deferred asset – Lee and Harris COLA 288  317  21  21 
Advanced metering infrastructure (AMI) 283  311  111  130 
Customer connect project 271  242  136  124 
Costs of removal regulatory asset 221  107  221  107 
Vacation accrual 222  221  43  42 
Incremental COVID-19 expenses 210  87  78  28 
CEP deferral 190  161  —  — 
Demand side management (DSM)/Energy eﬃciency (EE) 189  235  188  230 
Derivatives – natural gas supply contracts 168  139  —  — 
NCEMPA deferrals 157  165  157  165 
Nuclear deferral 154  120  64  42 
Deferred pipeline integrity costs 121  108  —  — 
COR settlement 120  123  32  32 
Deferred coal ash handling system costs 92  90  25  23 
Qualifying facility contract buyouts 81  94  81  94 
Amounts due from customers 57  85  —  — 
Propane caverns 26  —  —  — 
Deferred severance charges 21  54  7  18 
Manufactured gas plant (MGP) —  104  —  — 
Other 555  426  110  87 
Total regulatory assets 18,130  14,637  8,979  6,939 
Less: current portion 3,485  2,150  1,833  1,030 
Total noncurrent regulatory assets $14,645 $ 12,487 $ 7,146 $ 5,909 
Regulatory Liabilities
Net regulatory liability related to income taxes $ 6,462 $ 7,199 $ 2,192 $ 2,394 
Costs of removal 5,151  6,150  2,269  2,955 
AROs – nuclear and other 1,038  2,053  —  — 
Hedge cost deferrals 683  364  252  155 
Accrued pension and OPEB 211  213  —  — 
DOE Settlement 154  —  154  — 
Provision for rate refunds 78  274  28  87 
Amounts to be refunded to customers 45  —  —  — 
Other 1,226  1,110  434  453 
Total regulatory liabilities 15,048  17,363  5,329  6,044 
Less: current portion 1,466  1,211  576  478 
Total noncurrent regulatory liabilities $13,582 $ 16,152 $ 4,753 $ 5,566 
Descriptions of regulatory assets and liabilities summarized in the tables above and below follow. See tables below for recovery and amortization periods at
the separate registrants.
AROs – coal ash. Represents deferred depreciation and accretion related to the legal obligation to close ash basins. The costs are deferred until recovery
treatment has been determined. See Notes 1 and 10 for additional information.
135
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
AROs – nuclear and other. Represents regulatory assets or liabilities, including deferred depreciation and accretion, related to legal obligations associated
with the future retirement of property, plant and equipment, excluding amounts related to coal ash. The AROs relate primarily to decommissioning nuclear
power facilities. The amounts also include certain deferred gains and losses on NDTF investments. See Notes 1 and 10 for additional information.
Deferred fuel and purchased power. Represents certain energy-related costs that are recoverable or refundable as approved by the applicable regulatory
body.
Accrued pension and OPEB. Accrued pension and OPEB represent regulatory assets and liabilities related to each of the Duke Energy Registrants’
respective shares of unrecognized actuarial gains and losses and unrecognized prior service cost and credit attributable to Duke Energy’s pension plans and
OPEB plans. The regulatory asset or liability is amortized with the recognition of actuarial gains and losses and prior service cost and credit to net periodic
beneﬁt costs for pension and OPEB plans. The accrued pension and OPEB regulatory assets are expected to be recovered primarily over the average
remaining service periods or life expectancies of employees covered by the beneﬁt plans. See Note 23 for additional detail.
Storm cost securitized balance, net. Represents the North Carolina portion of storm restoration expenditures related to Hurricane Florence, Hurricane
Michael, Hurricane Dorian and Winter Storm Diego (2018 and 2019 events).
Nuclear asset securitized balance, net. Represents the balance associated with Crystal River Unit 3 retirement approved for recovery by the FPSC on
September 15, 2015, and the upfront ﬁnancing costs securitized in 2016 with issuance of the associated bonds. The regulatory asset balance is net of the
AFUDC equity portion.
Debt fair value adjustment. Purchase accounting adjustments recorded to state the carrying value of Progress Energy and Piedmont at fair value in
connection with the 2012 and 2016 mergers, respectively. Amount is amortized over the life of the related debt.
Storm cost deferrals. Represents deferred incremental costs incurred related to major weather-related events.
Hedge costs deferrals. Amounts relate to unrealized gains and losses on derivatives recorded as a regulatory asset or liability, respectively, until the
contracts are settled.
Post-in-service carrying costs (PISCC) and deferred operating expenses. Represents deferred depreciation and operating expenses as well as
carrying costs on the portion of capital expenditures placed in service but not yet reﬂected in retail rates as plant in service.
Retired generation facilities. Represents amounts to be recovered for facilities that have been retired and are probable of recovery.
Deferred asset – Lee and Harris COLA. Represents deferred costs incurred for the canceled Lee and Harris nuclear projects.
AMI. Represents deferred costs related to the installation of AMI meters and remaining net book value of non-AMI meters to be replaced at Duke Energy
Carolinas, net book value of existing meters at Duke Energy Florida, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Ohio and future recovery of net book value of
electromechanical meters that have been replaced with AMI meters at Duke Energy Indiana.
Customer connect project. Represents incremental operating expenses and carrying costs on deferred amounts related to the deployment of the new
customer information system.
Vacation accrual. Represents vacation entitlement, which is generally recovered in the following year.
Incremental COVID-19 expenses. Represents incremental costs related to ensuring continuity and quality of service in a safe manner during the COVID-
19 pandemic.
CEP deferral. Represents deferred depreciation, PISCC and deferred property tax for Duke Energy Ohio Gas capital assets for the Capital Expenditure
Program (CEP).
DSM/EE. Deferred costs related to various DSM and EE programs recoverable through various mechanisms.
Derivatives – natural gas supply contracts. Represents costs for certain long-dated, ﬁxed quantity forward natural gas supply contracts, which are
recoverable through PGA clauses.
NCEMPA deferrals. Represents retail allocated cost deferrals and returns associated with the additional ownership interest in assets acquired from NCEMPA
in 2015.
Nuclear deferral. Includes amounts related to levelizing nuclear plant outage costs, which allows for the recognition of nuclear outage expenses over the
refueling cycle rather than when the outage occurs, resulting in the deferral of operations and maintenance costs associated with refueling.
Deferred pipeline integrity costs. Represents pipeline integrity management costs in compliance with federal regulations.
COR settlement. Represents approved COR settlements that are being amortized over the average remaining lives, at the time of approval, of the
associated assets.
Deferred coal ash handling system costs. Represents deferred depreciation and returns associated with capital assets related to converting the ash
handling system from wet to dry.
Qualifying facility contract buyouts. Represents termination payments for regulatory recovery through the capacity clause.
Amounts due from customers. Relates primarily to margin decoupling and IMR recovery mechanisms.
136
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
Costs of removal regulatory asset. Represents the excess of spend over funds received from customers to cover the future removal of property, plant
and equipment from retired or abandoned sites as property is retired, net of certain deferred gains on NDTF investments.
Propane Caverns. Represents amounts for costs related to propane inventory, the net book value of remaining assets and decommissioning costs at Duke
Energy Ohio.
MGP. Represents remediation costs incurred at former MGP sites and the deferral of costs to be incurred at Duke Energy Ohio's East End and West End sites.
Net regulatory liability related to income taxes. Amounts for all registrants include regulatory liabilities related primarily to impacts from the Tax Act.
See Note 24 for additional information. Amounts have no immediate impact on rate base as regulatory assets are oﬀset by deferred tax liabilities.
Costs of removal. Represents funds received from customers to cover the future removal of property, plant and equipment from retired or abandoned sites
as property is retired. Also includes certain deferred gains on NDTF investments.
DOE Settlement. Represents litigation settlement funds received resulting from the DOE’s failure to accept spent nuclear fuel and other radioactive waste
from the Crystal River Unit 3 during 2014-2018 as required under the Nuclear Waste Policy Act.
Provision for rate refunds. Represents estimated amounts due to customers based on recording interim rates subject to refund.
RESTRICTIONS ON THE ABILITY OF CERTAIN SUBSIDIARIES TO MAKE DIVIDENDS, ADVANCES AND LOANS TO DUKE ENERGY
As a condition to the approval of merger transactions, the NCUC, PSCSC, PUCO, KPSC and IURC imposed conditions on the ability of Duke Energy Carolinas,
Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Ohio, Duke Energy Kentucky, Duke Energy Indiana and Piedmont to transfer funds to Duke Energy through loans or
advances, as well as restricted amounts available to pay dividends to Duke Energy. Certain subsidiaries may transfer funds to the Parent by obtaining
approval of the respective state regulatory commissions. These conditions imposed restrictions on the ability of the public utility subsidiaries to pay cash
dividends as discussed below.
Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida also have restrictions imposed by their ﬁrst mortgage bond indentures, which in certain circumstances, limit
their ability to make cash dividends or distributions on common stock. Amounts restricted as a result of these provisions were not material at December 31,
2022.
Additionally, certain other subsidiaries of Duke Energy have restrictions on their ability to dividend, loan or advance funds to Duke Energy due to speciﬁc
legal or regulatory restrictions, including, but not limited to, minimum working capital and tangible net worth requirements.
The restrictions discussed below were not a material amount of Duke Energy's and Progress Energy's net assets at December 31, 2022.
Duke Energy Carolinas
Duke Energy Carolinas must limit cumulative distributions subsequent to mergers to (i) the amount of retained earnings on the day prior to the closing of the
mergers, plus (ii) any future earnings recorded.
Duke Energy Progress
Duke Energy Progress must limit cumulative distributions subsequent to the mergers between Duke Energy and Progress Energy and Duke Energy and
Piedmont to (i) the amount of retained earnings on the day prior to the closing of the respective mergers, plus (ii) any future earnings recorded.
Duke Energy Ohio
Duke Energy Ohio will not declare and pay dividends out of capital or unearned surplus without the prior authorization of the PUCO. Duke Energy Ohio
received FERC and PUCO approval to pay dividends from its equity accounts that are reﬂective of the amount that it would have in its retained earnings
account had push-down accounting for the Cinergy merger not been applied to Duke Energy Ohio’s balance sheet. The conditions include a commitment
from Duke Energy Ohio that equity, adjusted to remove the impacts of push-down accounting, will not fall below 30% of total capital.
Duke Energy Kentucky is required to pay dividends solely out of retained earnings and to maintain a minimum of 35% equity in its capital structure.
Duke Energy Indiana
Duke Energy Indiana must limit cumulative distributions subsequent to the merger between Duke Energy and Cinergy to (i) the amount of retained earnings
on the day prior to the closing of the merger, plus (ii) any future earnings recorded. In addition, Duke Energy Indiana will not declare and pay dividends out of
capital or unearned surplus without prior authorization of the IURC.
Piedmont
Piedmont must limit cumulative distributions subsequent to the acquisition of Piedmont by Duke Energy to (i) the amount of retained earnings on the day
prior to the closing of the merger, plus (ii) any future earnings recorded.
RATE-RELATED INFORMATION
The NCUC, PSCSC, FPSC, IURC, PUCO, TPUC and KPSC approve rates for retail electric and natural gas services within their states. The FERC approves rates
for electric sales to wholesale customers served under cost-based rates (excluding Ohio and Indiana), as well as sales of transmission service. The FERC also
regulates certiﬁcation and siting of new interstate natural gas pipeline projects.
137
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress
Hurricane Ian
In late September and early October 2022, Hurricane Ian inﬂicted severe damage to the Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress territories in North
Carolina and South Carolina. Approximately 950,000 customers were impacted. Total estimated operation and maintenance expenses incurred for restoration
eﬀorts for the year ended December 31, 2022, were approximately $100 million, with an additional $9 million in capital investments. Approximately
$83 million of the operation and maintenance expenses are deferred in Regulatory assets within Other Noncurrent Assets on the Consolidated Balance
Sheets as of December 31, 2022 ($40 million and $43 million for Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress, respectively). Duke Energy Carolinas and
Duke Energy Progress have regulatory tools to recover storm costs including deferral and securitization. These estimates could change as Duke Energy
Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress receive additional information on actual costs.
Carbon Plan Proceeding
On October 13, 2021, North Carolina enacted legislation (Energy Solutions for North Carolina or HB 951) that established a framework overseen by the NCUC
to advance North Carolina CO emission reductions from electric generating facilities in the state through the use of least cost planning while providing for
continued reliability and aﬀordable rates for customers. Among other things, HB 951 directed that the NCUC approve an initial carbon plan (Carbon Plan) by
December 31, 2022, taking all reasonable steps to achieve a 70% reduction in CO emissions from public utilities’ electric generating facilities in the state by
2030 (from 2005 levels) and achieve carbon neutrality from electric generating facilities by 2050 while maintaining aﬀordability and reliability for customers.
On May 16, 2022, Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress ﬁled their proposed Carolinas Carbon Plan (Proposed Plan) with the NCUC.
The NCUC issued an order on December 30, 2022, adopting the ﬁrst Carbon Plan. The order recognizes the value of an “all-of-the-above” approach to
achieving CO emission reductions and established a set of near-term procurement and development activities needed to continue progress towards the
targeted CO reductions, along with the schedule for the future biennial updates to the Carbon Plan. The approved near-term action plan includes
procurement and development of solar, storage and hydrogen-capable natural gas generation at levels consistent with the Proposed Plan, along with
upgrading key transmission facilities to strengthen the grid, improve resilience for customers and interconnect new solar generation and stakeholder
engagement activities for onshore wind generation (in all cases, subject to any further applicable regulatory processes). The order also approved early
development activities for long lead-time resources, including new nuclear, pumped-hydro storage and oﬀshore wind transmission development. The NCUC
aﬃrmed the utility ownership structure required in HB 951; all new generation facilities or other resources selected by the NCUC to achieve the CO emission
reductions shall be owned and recovered on a cost-of-service basis by the utilities, with a carveout for 45% of solar and solar plus storage generation to be
procured through long-term purchase power agreements with third parties. The order approves continued utilization of the remaining coal-ﬁred generation
assets, ensuring that appropriate replacement generating units and associated transmission infrastructure are in service before existing generating units are
retired and providing an orderly transition out of coal generation by 2035.
Storm Cost Securitization Legislation
On June 15, 2022, the South Carolina General Assembly unanimously adopted S. 1077 (Act 227) in both the House and Senate and the bill was signed into
law on June 17, 2022. The legislation enables the PSCSC to permit the issuance of bonds for the payment of storm costs and the creation of a storm charge
for repayment.
On August 5, 2022, Duke Energy Progress ﬁled a petition with the PSCSC for review and approval of deferred storm costs to be securitized of approximately
$223 million. The evidentiary hearing is scheduled to begin on or after March 1, 2023. On February 7, 2023, a stipulation was reached with all parties in the
proceeding regarding certain items identiﬁed through the Oﬃce of Regulatory Staﬀ (ORS) audit of storm costs. The ﬁnal amount for securitization will depend
on the outcome of the hearing. Duke Energy Progress cannot predict the outcome of this matter.2
2
2
2
2
138
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
Duke Energy Carolinas
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
The following tables present the regulatory assets and liabilities recorded on Duke Energy Carolinas' Consolidated Balance Sheets.
December 31, Earns/PaysRecovery/Refund
(in millions) 2022 2021 a Return Period Ends
Regulatory Assets
AROs – coal ash $ 1,391 $ 1,227  (g) (b)
Deferred fuel and purchased power 1,614  339  (e) 2024
Accrued pension and OPEB 614  365  Yes (h)
Storm cost securitized balance, net 220  232  2041
Storm cost deferrals 93  22  Yes (b)
Hedge costs deferrals 228  171  Yes (b)
PISCC and deferred operating expenses 30  31  Yes (b)
Retired generation facilities 39  54  Yes (b)
Deferred asset – Lee COLA 267  296  (b)
AMI 139  140  Yes (b)
Customer connect project 62  66  Yes (b)
Vacation accrual 84  83  2023
Incremental COVID-19 expenses 127  51  Yes (b)
Nuclear deferral 90  78  2024
COR settlement 88  91  Yes (b)
Deferred coal ash handling system costs 67  67  Yes (b)
Other 235  166  (b)
Total regulatory assets 5,388  3,479 
Less: current portion 1,095  544 
Total noncurrent regulatory assets $ 4,293 $ 2,935 
Regulatory Liabilities
Net regulatory liability related to income taxes $ 2,475 $ 2,785  (b)
Costs of removal 1,769  2,009  Yes (f)
AROs – nuclear and other 1,038  2,053  (b)
Hedge cost deferrals 350  209  (b)
Accrued pension and OPEB 44  44  Yes (h)
Provision for rate refunds 50  124  Yes (b)
Other 587  461  (b)
Total regulatory liabilities 6,313  7,685 
Less: current portion 530  487 
Total noncurrent regulatory liabilities $ 5,783 $ 7,198 
(a)    Regulatory assets and liabilities are excluded from rate base unless otherwise noted.
(b)    The expected recovery or refund period varies or has not been determined.
(c)     Included in rate base.
(d)    Includes regulatory liabilities related to the change in the federal tax rate as a result of the Tax Act and the change in the North Carolina tax rate, both
discussed in Note 24. Portions are included in rate base.
(e)    Pays interest on over-recovered costs in North Carolina. Includes certain purchased power costs in North Carolina and South Carolina and costs of
distributed energy in South Carolina.
(f)    Recovered over the life of the associated assets.
(g)    Earns a debt and equity return on coal ash expenditures for North Carolina and South Carolina retail customers as permitted by various regulatory
orders.
(h)    Recovered primarily over the average remaining service periods or life expectancies of employees covered by the beneﬁt plans. See Note 23 for
additional detail.
(i)    Duke Energy Carolinas submitted a fuel ﬁling to the NCUC in May 2022 for recovery of $327 million, which included deferrals through January 2022. This
amount is expected to be recovered through August 2023. The next ﬁling will be made in the ﬁrst quarter of 2023. Duke Energy Carolinas submitted
a fuel ﬁling to the PSCSC in July 2022 for recovery of $79 million, which included deferrals through May 2022. The amount is expected to be
recovered through September 2023. The next ﬁling will be made in the third quarter of 2023.
2023 North Carolina Rate Case
On January 19, 2023, Duke Energy Carolinas ﬁled a PBR application with the NCUC to request an increase in base rate retail revenues. The PBR Application
includes an MYRP to recover projected capital investments during the three year MYRP period. In addition to the MYRP, the PBR Application includes an
Earnings Sharing Mechanism, Residential Decoupling Mechanism and Performance Incentive Mechanisms as required by HB 951. If approved, the overall
retail revenue increase would be $501 million in Year 1, $172 million in Year 2 and $150 million in Year 3, for a combined total of $823 million or 15.7% by
early 2026. The rate increase is driven primarily by major transmission and distribution investments since the last rate case and projected in the MYRP, as
well as investments in energy storage and solar assets included in the MYRP consistent with the Carbon Plan. Duke Energy Carolinas plans to implement
temporary rates, subject to refund, on September 1, 2023, and has requested permanent rates be eﬀective by January 1, 2024. Duke Energy Carolinas
cannot predict the outcome of this matter.(a)
(i)
(c)
(c)
(c)
(c)
(a)
(d)
(c)
(c)
139
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
Oconee Nuclear Station Subsequent License Renewal
On June 7, 2021, Duke Energy Carolinas ﬁled a subsequent license renewal (SLR) application for the Oconee Nuclear Station (ONS) with the U.S. Nuclear
Regulatory Commission (NRC) to renew ONS’s operating license for an additional 20 years. The SLR would extend operations of the facility from 60 to 80
years. The current licenses for units 1 and 2 expire in 2033 and the license for unit 3 expires in 2034. By a Federal Register Notice dated July 28, 2021, the
NRC provided a 60-day comment period for persons whose interest may be aﬀected by the issuance of a subsequent renewed license for ONS to ﬁle a
request for a hearing and a petition for leave to intervene. On September 27, 2021, Beyond Nuclear and Sierra Club (Petitioners) ﬁled a Hearing Request and
Petition to Intervene (Hearing Request) and a Petition for Waiver. The Hearing Request proposed three contentions and claimed that Duke Energy Carolinas
did not satisfy the National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) of 1969, as amended, or the NRC’s NEPA-implementing regulations. Following Duke Energy
Carolinas' answer and the Petitioners' reply, on February 11, 2022, the Atomic Safety and Licensing Board (ASLB) issued its decision on the Hearing Request
and found that the Petitioners failed to establish that the proposed contentions are litigable. The ASLB also denied the Petitioners' Petition for Waiver and
terminated the proceeding.
On February 24, 2022, the NRC issued a decision in the SLR appeal related to Florida Power and Light's Turkey Point nuclear generating station in Florida. The
NRC ruled that the NRC’s license renewal Generic Environmental Impact Statement (GEIS) does not apply to SLR because the GEIS does not address SLR. The
decision overturned a 2020 NRC decision that found the GEIS applies to SLR. Although Turkey Point is not owned or operated by a Duke Energy Registrant,
the NRC’s order applies to all SLR applicants, including ONS. The NRC order also indicated no subsequent renewed licenses will be issued until the NRC staﬀ
has completed an adequate NEPA review for each application. On April 5, 2022, the NRC approved a 24-month rulemaking plan that will enable the NRC staﬀ
to complete an adequate NEPA review. Although an SLR applicant may wait until the rulemaking is completed, the NRC also noted that an applicant may
submit a supplement to its environmental report providing information on environmental impacts during the SLR period prior to the rulemaking being
completed. On November 7, 2022, Duke Energy Carolinas submitted a supplement to its environmental report addressing environmental impacts during the
SLR period. On December 19, 2022, the NRC published a notice in the Federal Register that the NRC will conduct a limited scoping process to gather
additional information necessary to prepare an environmental impact statement (EIS) to evaluate the environmental impacts at ONS during the SLR period.
The NRC received comments from the EPA and the Petitioners and these comments identify eighteen potential impacts that should be considered by the NRC
in the EIS, which include, but are not limited to, climate change and ﬂooding, environmental justice, severe accidents, and external events. Currently, the
NRC expects to publish a draft EIS in October 2023.
On December 19, 2022, the NRC issued the Safety Evaluation Report (SER) for the safety portion of the SLR application. The NRC determined Duke Energy
Carolinas met the requirements of the applicable regulations and identiﬁed actions that have been taken or will be taken to manage the eﬀects of aging and
address time-limited analyses. Duke Energy Carolinas and the NRC met with the Advisory Committee on Reactor Safeguards (ACRS) on February 2, 2023, to
discuss issues regarding the SER and SLR application, after which the ACRS will issue a report discussing the result of its review.
Although the NRC’s GEIS applicability decision will delay completion of the SLR proceeding, Duke Energy Carolinas does not believe it changes the probability
that the ONS subsequent renewed licenses will ultimately be issued, although Duke Energy Carolinas cannot guarantee the outcome of the license
application process.
Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress intend to seek renewal of operating licenses and 20-year license extensions for all of their nuclear stations.
New depreciation rates were implemented for all of the nuclear facilities during the second quarter of 2021. Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress
cannot predict the outcome of these additional relicensing proceedings.
140
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
Duke Energy Progress
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
The following tables present the regulatory assets and liabilities recorded on Duke Energy Progress' Consolidated Balance Sheets.
December 31, Earns/PaysRecovery/Refund
(in millions) 2022 2021 a Return Period Ends
Regulatory Assets
AROs – coal ash $ 1,418 $ 1,389  (g) (b)
AROs – nuclear and other 869  613  (c)
Deferred fuel and purchased power 705  303  (e) 2024
Accrued pension and OPEB 417  351  Yes (j)
Storm cost securitized balance, net 720  759  2041
Storm cost deferrals 234  170  Yes (b)
Hedge costs deferrals 55  60  (b)
PISCC and deferred operating expenses 42  47  Yes 2054
Retired generation facilities 149  171  Yes (b)
Deferred asset - Harris COLA 21  21  (b)
AMI 81  92  Yes (b)
Customer connect project 54  57  Yes (b)
Vacation accrual 43  42  2023
Incremental COVID-19 expenses 78  28  Yes (b)
DSM/EE 180  218  (h) (h)
NCEMPA deferrals 157  165  (f) 2042
Nuclear deferral 64  42  2024
COR settlement 32  32  Yes (b)
Deferred coal ash handling system costs 25  23  Yes (b)
Other 70  68  (b)
Total regulatory assets 5,414  4,651 
Less: current portion 690  533 
Total noncurrent regulatory assets $ 4,724 $ 4,118 
Regulatory Liabilities
Net regulatory liability related to income taxes $ 1,559 $ 1,695  (b)
Costs of removal 2,269  2,955  Yes (i)
Hedge cost deferrals 252  155  (b)
Provision for rate refunds 28  87  Yes (b)
Other 344  357  (b)
Total regulatory liabilities 4,452  5,249 
Less: current portion 332  381 
Total noncurrent regulatory liabilities $ 4,120 $ 4,868 
(a)    Regulatory assets and liabilities are excluded from rate base unless otherwise noted.
(b)    The expected recovery or refund period varies or has not been determined.
(c)    Recovery period for costs related to nuclear facilities runs through the decommissioning period of each unit.
(d)    Included in rate base.
(e)    Pays interest on over-recovered costs in North Carolina. Includes certain purchased power costs in North Carolina and South Carolina and costs of
distributed energy in South Carolina.
(f)    South Carolina retail allocated costs are earning a return.
(g)    Earns a debt and equity return on coal ash expenditures for North Carolina and South Carolina retail customers as permitted by various regulatory
orders.
(h)    Includes incentives on DSM/EE investments and is recovered through an annual rider mechanism.
(i)    Recovered over the life of the associated assets.
(j)    Recovered primarily over the average remaining service periods or life expectancies of employees covered by the beneﬁt plans. See Note 23 for
additional detail.
(k)    Includes regulatory liabilities related to the change in the federal tax rate as a result of the Tax Act and the change in the North Carolina tax rate, both
discussed in Note 24. Portions are included in rate base.
(l)    Duke Energy Progress submitted a fuel ﬁling to the NCUC in August 2022 for recovery of $251 million, which included deferrals through June 2022. This
amount is expected to be recovered through November 2023. The next ﬁling will be made in the second quarter of 2023. Duke Energy Progress
submitted a fuel ﬁling to the PSCSC in April 2022 for recovery of $44 million, which included deferrals through February 2022. This amount is
expected to be recovered through June 2023. The next ﬁling will be made in the second quarter of 2023.(a)
(l)
(d)
(d)
(a)
(k)
(d)
141
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
2022 North Carolina Rate Case
On October 6, 2022, Duke Energy Progress ﬁled a PBR application with the NCUC to request an increase in base rate retail revenues. The rate request before
the NCUC includes an MYRP to recover projected capital investments during the three year MYRP period. In addition to the MYRP, the PBR Application
includes an Earnings Sharing Mechanism, Residential Decoupling Mechanism and Performance Incentive Mechanisms as required by HB 951. If approved, the
overall retail revenue increase would be $326 million in Year 1, $151 million in Year 2 and $138 million in Year 3, for a combined total of $615 million or 16%
by late 2025. The rate increase is driven primarily by major transmission and distribution investments since the last rate case and projected in the MYRP, as
well as investments in energy storage and solar assets included in the MYRP consistent with the Carbon Plan. Duke Energy Progress plans to implement
temporary rates, subject to refund, on June 1, 2023, and has requested permanent rates be eﬀective by October 1, 2023. The evidentiary hearing has been
scheduled to begin on May 1, 2023. Duke Energy Progress cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
2022 South Carolina Rate Case
On September 1, 2022, Duke Energy Progress ﬁled an application with the PSCSC to request an increase in base rate retail revenues. On January 12, 2023,
Duke Energy Progress and the ORS, as well as other consumer, environmental, and industrial intervening parties, ﬁled a comprehensive Agreement and
Stipulation of Settlement resolving all issues in the base rate proceeding. The major components of the stipulation include:
• A $52 million annual customer rate increase prior to the reduction from the accelerated return to customers of federal unprotected Property, Plant
and Equipment related EDIT. After extending the remaining EDIT giveback to customers to 33 months, the net annual retail rate increase is
approximately $36 million.
• ROE of 9.6% based upon a capital structure of 52.43% equity and 47.57% debt.
• Continuation of deferral treatment of coal ash basin closure costs. Supports an amortization period for remaining coal ash closure costs in this rate
case of seven years. Duke Energy Progress agreed not to seek recovery of approximately $50 million of deferred coal ash expenditures related to
retired sites in this rate case (South Carolina retail allocation).
• Accepts the 2021 Depreciation Study as proposed in this case, as adjusted for certain recommendations from ORS and includes accelerated
retirement dates for certain coal units as originally proposed.
• Establishment of a storm reserve to help oﬀset the costs of major storms.
The PSCSC held a hearing on January 17, 2023, to consider evidence supporting the stipulation and unanimously voted to approve the comprehensive
agreement on February 9, 2023. The PSCSC voted to allow Duke Energy Progress to implement new customer rates by April 1, 2023. A ﬁnal written order is
due from the PSCSC by March 1, 2023.
FERC Return on Equity Complaint
On October 16, 2020, North Carolina Electric Membership Corporation (NCEMC) ﬁled a complaint at the FERC against Duke Energy Progress pursuant to
Section 206 of the Federal Power Act (FPA), alleging that the 11% stated ROE component in the demand formula rate in the Power Supply and Coordination
Agreement between NCEMC and Duke Energy Progress is unjust and unreasonable. On June 16, 2022, Duke Energy Progress submitted to the FERC an Oﬀer
of Settlement and Settlement Agreement (Settlement Agreement) between NCEMC and Duke Energy Progress. The Settlement Agreement provides for an
ROE of 10%, eﬀective January 1, 2022, among other contract modiﬁcations. On November 7, 2022, the FERC approved the Settlement Agreement.
142
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
Duke Energy Florida
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
The following tables present the regulatory assets and liabilities recorded on Duke Energy Florida's Consolidated Balance Sheets.
December 31, Earns/PaysRecovery/Refund
(in millions) 2022 2021 a Return Period Ends
Regulatory Assets
AROs – coal ash $ 11 $ 10  (b)
AROs – nuclear and other 15  7  (b)
Deferred fuel and purchased power 1,355  415  (f) 2024
Accrued pension and OPEB 342  374  Yes (g)
Nuclear asset securitized balance, net 881  937  2036
Storm cost deferrals 325  19  (f) (b)
Hedge costs deferrals 73  77  Yes 2038
Retired generation facilities 94  94  Yes 2044
AMI 30  38  Yes 2032
Customer connect project 82  67  Yes 2037
Costs of removal regulatory asset 221  107  (d) (b)
Qualifying facility contract buyouts 81  94  Yes 2034
Other 55  49  (d) (b)
Total regulatory assets 3,565  2,288 
Less: current portion 1,143  497 
Total noncurrent regulatory assets $ 2,422 $ 1,791 
Net regulatory liability related to income taxes $ 633 $ 699  (b)
DOE Settlement 154  — 
Other 90  97  (d) (b)
Total regulatory liabilities 877  796 
Less: current portion 244  98 
Total noncurrent regulatory liabilities $ 633 $ 698 
(a)    Regulatory assets and liabilities are excluded from rate base unless otherwise noted.
(b)    The expected recovery or refund period varies or has not been determined.
(c)    Included in rate base.
(d)    Certain costs earn/pay a return.
(e)    Earns a debt return/interest once collections begin.
(f)    Earns commercial paper rate.
(g)    Recovered primarily over the average remaining service periods or life expectancies of employees covered by the beneﬁt plans. See Note 23 for
additional detail.
(h)    Duke Energy Florida submitted a fuel ﬁling to the FPSC in January 2023 for recovery of $795 million, which included the 2022 actual under-recovery of
$1.2 billion, oﬀset by projected declining fuel costs in 2023 due to lower natural gas prices. The expected recovery period is April 2023 through
March 2024.
2021 Settlement Agreement
On January 14, 2021, Duke Energy Florida ﬁled a Settlement Agreement (the “2021 Settlement”) with the FPSC. The parties to the 2021 Settlement include
Duke Energy Florida, the Oﬃce of Public Counsel (OPC), the Florida Industrial Power Users Group, White Springs Agricultural Chemicals, Inc. d/b/a PCS
Phosphate and NUCOR Steel Florida, Inc. (collectively, the “Parties”).
Pursuant to the 2021 Settlement, the Parties agreed to a base rate stay-out provision that expires year-end 2024; however, Duke Energy Florida is allowed an
increase to its base rates of an incremental $67 million in 2022, $49 million in 2023 and $79 million in 2024, subject to adjustment in the event of tax reform
during the years 2021, 2022 and 2023. The Parties also agreed to an ROE band of 8.85% to 10.85% with a midpoint of 9.85% based on a capital structure of
53% equity and 47% debt. The ROE band can be increased by 25 basis points if the average 30-year U.S. Treasury rate increases 50 basis points or more
over a six-month period in which case the midpoint ROE would rise from 9.85% to 10.10%. On July 25, 2022, this provision was triggered. Duke Energy
Florida ﬁled a petition with the FPSC on August 12, 2022, to increase the ROE eﬀective August 2022 with a base rate increase eﬀective January 1, 2023. The
FPSC approved this request on October 4, 2022. The 2021 Settlement Agreement also provided that Duke Energy Florida will be able to retain the
$173 million retail portion of the expected DOE award from its lawsuit to recover spent nuclear fuel to mitigate customer rates over the term of the 2021
Settlement. In return, Duke Energy Florida is permitted to recognize the $173 million into earnings through the approved settlement period. The full amount
of the $173 million is expected to be recognized between the years of 2023 and 2024, while also remaining within the approved ROE band. Duke Energy
Florida settled the DOE lawsuit and received payment of approximately $180 million on June 15, 2022, of which the retail portion was approximately
$154 million. The 2021 Settlement authorizes Duke Energy Florida to collect the diﬀerence between $173 million and the $154 million retail portion of the
amount received through the capacity cost recovery clause.(a)
(h)
(c)
(c)
(c)
(c)
(c)
(c)
(c)
(c)
(c)
143
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
The 2021 Settlement also contained a provision to recover or ﬂow-back the eﬀects of tax law changes. As a result of the IRA enacted on August 16, 2022,
Duke Energy Florida is eligible for PTCs associated with solar facilities placed in service beginning in January 2022. Duke Energy Florida ﬁled a petition with
the FPSC on October 17, 2022, to reduce base rates eﬀective January 1, 2023, by $56 million to ﬂow back the expected 2023 PTCs and to ﬂow back the
expected 2022 PTCs via an adjustment to the capacity cost recovery clause. On December 14, 2022, the FPSC issued an order approving Duke Energy
Florida’s petition. See Note 24 for additional information on the IRA.
In addition to these terms, the 2021 Settlement contained provisions related to the accelerated depreciation of Crystal River Units 4-5, the approval of
approximately $1 billion in future investments in new cost-eﬀective solar power, the implementation of a new Electric Vehicle Charging Station Program and
the deferral and recovery of costs in connection with the implementation of Duke Energy Florida’s Vision Florida program, which explores various emerging
non-carbon emitting generation technology, distributed technologies and resiliency projects, among other things. The 2021 Settlement also resolved
remaining unrecovered storm costs for Hurricane Michael and Hurricane Dorian.
The FPSC approved the 2021 Settlement on May 4, 2021, issuing an order on June 4, 2021. Revised customer rates became eﬀective January 1, 2022, with
subsequent base rate increases eﬀective January 1, 2023, and January 1, 2024.
Clean Energy Connection
On July 1, 2020, Duke Energy Florida petitioned the FPSC for approval of a voluntary solar program. The program consists of 10 new solar generating facilities
with combined capacity of approximately 750 MW. The program allows participants to support cost-eﬀective solar development in Florida by paying a
subscription fee based on per kilowatt subscriptions and receiving a credit on their bill based on the actual generation associated with their portion of the
solar portfolio. The estimated cost of the 10 new solar generation facilities is approximately $1 billion and the projects are expected to be completed by the
end of 2024. This investment will be included in base rates oﬀset by the revenue from the subscription fees and the credits will be included for recovery in
the fuel cost recovery clause. The FPSC approved the program in January 2021.
On February 24, 2021, the League of United Latin American Citizens (LULAC) ﬁled a notice of appeal of the FPSC’s order approving the Clean Energy
Connection to the Supreme Court of Florida. The Supreme Court of Florida heard the oral argument on February 9, 2022. On May 27, 2022, the Supreme
Court of Florida issued an order remanding the case back to the FPSC so that the FPSC can amend its order to better address some of the arguments raised
by LULAC. On September 23, 2022, the FPSC issued a revised order and submitted it on September 26, 2022, to the Supreme Court of Florida. The Supreme
Court of Florida requested that the parties ﬁle supplemental briefs regarding the revised order, which were ﬁled February 6, 2023. The FPSC approval order
remains in eﬀect pending the outcome of the appeal. Duke Energy Florida cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
Storm Protection Plan
On April 11, 2022, Duke Energy Florida ﬁled a Storm Protection Plan for approval with the FPSC. The plan, which covers investments for the 2023-2032 time
frame, reﬂects approximately $7 billion of capital investment in transmission and distribution meant to strengthen its infrastructure, reduce outage times
associated with extreme weather events, reduce restoration costs and improve overall service reliability. The evidentiary hearing began on August 2, 2022.
On October 4, 2022, the FPSC voted to approve Duke Energy Florida's plan with one modiﬁcation to remove the transmission loop radially fed program,
representing a reduction of approximately $80 million over the 10-year period starting in 2025. On December 9, 2022, the Oﬃce of Public Counsel ﬁled a
notice of appeal of this order to the Florida Supreme Court. Duke Energy Florida cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
Hurricane Ian
On September 28, 2022, much of Duke Energy Florida’s service territory was impacted by Hurricane Ian, which caused signiﬁcant damage resulting in more
than 1.1 million outages. Duke Energy Florida's December 31, 2022 Consolidated Balance Sheets include an estimate of approximately $353 million related
to deferred Hurricane Ian storm costs, consistent with the FPSC's storm rule, in Regulatory assets within Other Noncurrent Assets. After depleting any existing
storm reserves, which were approximately $107 million before Hurricane Ian, Duke Energy Florida is permitted to petition the FPSC for recovery of additional
incremental operation and maintenance costs resulting from the storm and to replenish the retail customer storm reserve to approximately $132 million.
Duke Energy Florida ﬁled its petition for cost recovery of various storms, including Hurricane Ian, and replenishment of the storm reserve on January 23,
2023, seeking recovery of $442 million, for recovery over 12 months beginning with the ﬁrst billing cycle in April 2023. Duke Energy Florida cannot predict
the outcome of this matter.
144
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
Duke Energy Ohio
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
The following tables present the regulatory assets and liabilities recorded on Duke Energy Ohio's Consolidated Balance Sheets.
December 31, Earns/PaysRecovery/Refund
(in millions) 2022 2021 a Return Period Ends
Regulatory Assets
AROs – coal ash $ — $ 33  Yes (b)
Deferred fuel and purchased power 54  38  2023
Accrued pension and OPEB 129  133  (e)
Storm cost deferrals 14  2  2023
Hedge costs deferrals 2  5  (b)
PISCC and deferred operating expenses 15  16  Yes 2083
AMI 18  24  (b)
Customer connect project 54  41  (b)
CEP deferral 190  161  Yes (b)
Deferred pipeline integrity costs 28  24  Yes (b)
Propane caverns 26  —  (b)
Manufactured gas plant (MGP) —  104  (b)
Other 154  126  (b)
Total regulatory assets 684  707 
Less: current portion 103  72 
Total noncurrent regulatory assets $ 581 $ 635 
Regulatory Liabilities
Net regulatory liability related to income taxes $ 496 $ 602  (b)
Costs of removal 9  39  (d)
Accrued pension and OPEB 21  21  (e)
Provision for rate refunds —  61 
Other 107  78  (b)
Total regulatory liabilities 633  801 
Less: current portion 99  62 
Total noncurrent regulatory liabilities $ 534 $ 739 
(a)    Regulatory assets and liabilities are excluded from rate base unless otherwise noted.
(b)    The expected recovery or refund period varies or has not been determined.
(c)    Included in rate base.
(d)    Recovery over the life of the associated assets.
(e)    Recovered primarily over the average remaining service periods or life expectancies of employees covered by the beneﬁt plans. See Note 23 for
additional detail.
Duke Energy Ohio Electric Base Rate Case
Duke Energy Ohio ﬁled with the PUCO an electric distribution base rate case application on October 1, 2021, with supporting testimony ﬁled on October 15,
2021, requesting an increase in electric distribution base rates of approximately $55 million and an ROE of 10.3%. This is an approximate 3.3% average
increase in the customer's total bill across all customer classes. The drivers for this case are capital invested since Duke Energy Ohio's last electric
distribution base rate case in 2017. Duke Energy Ohio is also seeking to adjust the caps on its Distribution Capital Investment Rider (DCI Rider). The Staﬀ of
the PUCO (Staﬀ) report was issued on May 19, 2022, recommending an increase in electric distribution base rates of $2 million to $15 million with an ROE
range of 8.84% to 9.85%. On September 19, 2022, Duke Energy Ohio ﬁled a Stipulation and Recommendation with the PUCO, which includes an increase in
overall electric distribution base rates of approximately $23 million and an ROE of 9.5%. The stipulation is among all but one party to the proceeding. The
PUCO issued an order on December 14, 2022, approving the Stipulation without material modiﬁcation. Rates went into eﬀect on January 3, 2023. The Ohio
Consumers' Counsel (OCC) ﬁled an application for rehearing on January 13, 2023. On February 8, 2023, the Commission granted the OCC's application for
rehearing for further consideration. Duke Energy Ohio cannot predict the outcome of this matter.(a)
(c)
(a)
145
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
Energy Eﬃciency Cost Recovery
In response to changes in Ohio law that eliminated Ohio's energy eﬃciency mandates, the PUCO issued an order on February 26, 2020, directing utilities to
wind down their demand-side management programs by September 30, 2020, and to terminate the programs by December 31, 2020. Duke Energy Ohio took
the following actions:
• On March 27, 2020, Duke Energy Ohio ﬁled an application for rehearing seeking clariﬁcation on the ﬁnal true up and reconciliation process after
2020. On November 18, 2020, the PUCO issued an order replacing the cost cap previously imposed upon Duke Energy Ohio with a cap on shared
savings recovery. On December 18, 2020, Duke Energy Ohio ﬁled an additional application for rehearing challenging, among other things, the
imposition of the cap on shared savings. On January 13, 2021, the application for rehearing was granted for further consideration.
• On October 9, 2020, Duke Energy Ohio ﬁled an application to implement a voluntary energy eﬃciency program portfolio to commence on January 1,
2021. The application proposed a mechanism for recovery of program costs and a beneﬁt associated with avoided transmission and distribution
costs. This application remains under review.
• On November 18, 2020, the PUCO issued an order directing all utilities to set their energy eﬃciency riders to zero eﬀective January 1, 2021, and to
ﬁle a separate application for ﬁnal reconciliation of all energy eﬃciency costs prior to December 31, 2020. Eﬀective January 1, 2021, Duke Energy
Ohio suspended its energy eﬃciency programs.
• On June 14, 2021, the PUCO requested each utility to ﬁle by July 15, 2021, a proposal to reestablish low-income programs through December 31,
2021. Duke Energy Ohio ﬁled its application on July 14, 2021.
• On February 23, 2022, the PUCO issued its Fifth Entry on Rehearing that 1) aﬃrmed its reduction in Duke Energy Ohio's shared savings cap; 2)
denied rehearing/clariﬁcation regarding lost distribution revenues and shared savings recovery for periods after December 31, 2020; and 3) directed
Duke Energy Ohio to submit an updated application with exhibits.
• On March 25, 2022, Duke Energy Ohio ﬁled its Amended Application consistent with the PUCO's order.
Duke Energy Ohio cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
Duke Energy Ohio Natural Gas Base Rate Case
Duke Energy Ohio ﬁled with the PUCO a natural gas base rate case application on June 30, 2022, with supporting testimony ﬁled on July 14, 2022, requesting
an increase in natural gas base rates of approximately $49 million and an ROE of 10.3%. This is an approximate 5.6% average increase in the customer's
total bill across all customer classes. The drivers for this case are capital invested since Duke Energy Ohio's last natural gas base rate case in 2012. Duke
Energy Ohio is also seeking to adjust the caps on its Capital Expenditure Program Rider (CEP Rider). The Staﬀ of the PUCO (Staﬀ) report was issued on
December 21, 2022, recommending an increase in natural gas base rates of $24 million to $36 million, with an equity ratio of 52% and an ROE range of
9.03% to 10.04%. A procedural schedule was issued on December 22, 2022, scheduling the evidentiary hearing to commence on March 28, 2023. Duke
Energy Ohio cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
Natural Gas Pipeline Extension
Duke Energy Ohio installed a new natural gas pipeline (the Central Corridor Project) in its Ohio service territory to increase system reliability and enable the
retirement of older infrastructure. Construction of the pipeline extension was completed and placed in service on March 14, 2022, with a total cost of
approximately $170 million (excluding overheads and AFUDC).
MGP Cost Recovery
In an order issued in 2013, the PUCO approved Duke Energy Ohio's deferral and recovery of costs related to environmental remediation at two sites (East End
and West End) that housed former MGP operations. Duke Energy Ohio made annual applications with the PUCO to recover its incremental remediation costs
consistent with the PUCO’s directive in Duke Energy Ohio’s 2012 natural gas base rate case.
A Stipulation and Recommendation was ﬁled jointly by Duke Energy Ohio, the Staﬀ, the Oﬃce of the Ohio Consumers' Counsel and the Ohio Energy Group on
August 31, 2021, which was approved without modiﬁcation by the PUCO on April 20, 2022. The Stipulation and Recommendation resolved all open issues
regarding MGP remediation costs incurred between 2013 and 2019, Duke Energy Ohio’s request for additional deferral authority beyond 2019 and the
pending issues related to the Tax Act described below as it related to Duke Energy Ohio’s natural gas operations. As a result of the approval of the Stipulation
and Recommendation, Duke Energy Ohio recognized pretax charges of approximately $15 million to Operating revenues, regulated natural gas and
$58 million to Operation, maintenance and other and a tax beneﬁt of $72 million to Income Tax (Beneﬁt) Expense in the Consolidated Statements of
Operations for the year ended December 31, 2022. The Stipulation and Recommendation further acknowledged Duke Energy Ohio’s ability to ﬁle a request
for additional deferral authority in the future related to environmental remediation of any MGP impacts in the Ohio River, if necessary, subject to speciﬁc
conditions. On June 15, 2022, the PUCO granted the rehearing requests of Interstate Gas Supply, Inc. (IGS) and The Retail Energy Supply Association (RESA),
which were ﬁled on May 20, 2022, for further consideration. Duke Energy Ohio cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
146
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
Tax Act – Ohio
On December 21, 2018, Duke Energy Ohio ﬁled an application to change its base rate tariﬀs and establish a new rider to implement the beneﬁts of the Tax
Act for natural gas customers. The new rider would ﬂow through to customers the beneﬁt of the reduction in the statutory federal tax rate from 35% to 21%
since January 1, 2018, all future beneﬁts of the lower tax rates and a full refund of deferred income taxes collected at the higher tax rates in prior years.
Deferred income taxes subject to normalization rules would be refunded consistent with federal law and deferred income taxes not subject to normalization
rules will be refunded over a 10-year period. An evidentiary hearing occurred on August 7, 2019. The Stipulation and Recommendation ﬁled on August 31,
2021, and approved on April 20, 2022, disclosed in the MGP Cost Recovery matter above, resolves the outstanding issues in this proceeding by providing
customers a one-time bill credit for the reduction in the statutory federal tax rate from 35% to 21% since January 1, 2018, through June 1, 2022, and
reducing base rates going forward. Deferred income taxes subject to normalization rules will be refunded consistent with federal law through a new rider.
Deferred income taxes not subject to normalization rules were written oﬀ. The commission granted the rehearing requests of IGS and RESA for further
consideration. Duke Energy Ohio cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
Midwest Propane Caverns
Duke Energy Ohio used propane stored in caverns to meet peak demand during winter for several decades. Once the Central Corridor Project was complete
and placed in service, the propane peaking facilities were no longer necessary and were retired. On October 7, 2021, Duke Energy Ohio requested deferral
treatment of the property, plant and equipment as well as costs related to propane inventory and decommissioning costs. On January 6, 2022, the Staﬀ
issued a report recommending deferral authority for costs related to propane inventory and decommissioning costs, but not for the net book value of the
remaining plant assets. As a result of the Staﬀ's report, Duke Energy Ohio recorded a $19 million charge to Impairment of assets and other charges on the
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the year ended December 31, 2021. A Stipulation and Recommendation was ﬁled
jointly by Duke Energy Ohio and the Staﬀ on April 27, 2022, recommending, among other things, approval of deferral treatment of a portion of the net book
value of the property, plant and equipment prior to the 2021 impairment at the time of the next natural gas base rate case, excluding operations and
maintenance savings, decommissioning costs not to exceed $7 million and costs related to propane inventory. The Stipulation and Recommendation states
that Duke Energy Ohio will seek recovery of the deferral through its next natural gas base rate case proceeding with a proposed amortization period of at
least 10 years and include an independent engineering study analyzing the necessity and prudency of the incremental investments made at the facilities
since March 31, 2012. Duke Energy Ohio will not seek a return on the deferred amounts. An evidentiary hearing was held on September 8, 2022. On October
5, 2022, the PUCO issued an order approving the Stipulation and Recommendation as ﬁled. As a result of the order, Duke Energy Ohio recorded a reversal of
$12 million to Impairment of assets and other charges on the Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the year ended
December 31, 2022.
Duke Energy Kentucky Electric Base Rate Case
On December 1, 2022, Duke Energy Kentucky ﬁled a rate case with the KPSC requesting an annualized increase in electric base rates of approximately
$75 million and an ROE of 10.35%. This is an overall increase in rates of approximately 17.8%. The request for rate increase is driven by capital investments
to strengthen the electricity generation and delivery systems along with adjusted depreciation rates for the East Bend and Woodsdale generation stations to
support the energy transition. Duke Energy Kentucky is also requesting new programs and tariﬀ updates, including a voluntary community-based renewable
subscription program and two EV charging programs. A procedural schedule was issued on December 19, 2022, scheduling the evidentiary hearing for May
9, 2023. New rates are anticipated to go into eﬀect around July 15, 2023. Duke Energy Kentucky cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
147
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
Duke Energy Indiana
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
The following tables present the regulatory assets and liabilities recorded on Duke Energy Indiana's Consolidated Balance Sheets.
December 31, Earns/PaysRecovery/Refund
(in millions) 2022 2021 a Return Period Ends
Regulatory Assets
AROs – coal ash $ 385 $ 749  Yes (b)
Deferred fuel and purchased power 138  158  2023
Accrued pension and OPEB 214  222  (e)
Hedge costs deferrals 20  35  (b)
PISCC and deferred operating expenses 255  262  Yes (b)
Retired generation facilities 34  38  Yes 2030
AMI 15  17  2031
Customer connect project 19  11  (b)
Other 44  63  (b)
Total regulatory assets 1,124  1,555 
Less: current portion 249  277 
Total noncurrent regulatory assets $ 875 $ 1,278 
Regulatory Liabilities
Net regulatory liability related to income taxes $ 840 $ 908  (b)
Costs of removal 531  575  (d)
Hedge cost deferrals 81  —  (b)
Accrued pension and OPEB 104  113  (e)
Other 85  96  (b)
Total regulatory liabilities 1,641  1,692 
Less: current portion 187  127 
Total noncurrent regulatory liabilities $ 1,454 $ 1,565 
(a)    Regulatory assets and liabilities are excluded from rate base unless otherwise noted.
(b)    The expected recovery or refund period varies or has not been determined.
(c)    Included in rate base.
(d)    Refunded over the life of the associated assets.
(e)    Recovered primarily over the average remaining service periods or life expectancies of employees covered by the beneﬁt plans. See Note 23 for
additional detail.
2019 Indiana Rate Case
On July 2, 2019, Duke Energy Indiana ﬁled a general rate case with the IURC for a rate increase for retail customers of approximately $395 million. The
rebuttal case, ﬁled on December 4, 2019, updated the requested revenue requirement to result in a 15.6% or $396 million average retail rate increase,
including the impacts of the utility receipts tax. On June 29, 2020, the IURC issued an order in the rate case approving a revenue increase of $146 million
before certain adjustments and ratemaking reﬁnements. The order approved Duke Energy Indiana's requested forecasted rate base of $10.2 billion as of
December 31, 2020, including the Edwardsport Integrated Gasiﬁcation Combined Cycle (IGCC) Plant. The IURC reduced Duke Energy Indiana's request by
slightly more than $200 million, when accounting for the utility receipts tax and other adjustments. Approximately 50% of the reduction was due to a
prospective change in depreciation and use of regulatory asset for the end-of-life inventory at retired generating plants, approximately 20% was due to the
approved ROE of 9.7% versus the requested ROE of 10.4% and approximately 20% was related to miscellaneous earnings neutral adjustments. Step one
rates were estimated to be approximately 75% of the total and became eﬀective on July 30, 2020. Step two rates estimated to be the remaining 25% of the
total rate increase were approved on July 28, 2021, and implemented in August 2021.
Several groups appealed the IURC order to the Indiana Court of Appeals. The Indiana Court of Appeals aﬃrmed the IURC decision on May 13, 2021. However,
upon appeal by the Indiana Oﬃce of Utility Consumer Counselor (OUCC) and the Duke Industrial Group on March 10, 2022, the Indiana Supreme Court found
that the IURC erred in allowing Duke Energy Indiana to recover coal ash costs incurred before the IURC’s rate case order in June 2020. The Indiana Supreme
Court found that allowing Duke Energy Indiana to recover coal ash costs incurred between rate cases that exceeded the amount built into base rates violated
the prohibition against retroactive ratemaking. The IURC’s order has been remanded to the IURC for additional proceedings consistent with the Indiana
Supreme Court’s opinion. As a result of the court's opinion, Duke Energy Indiana recognized pretax charges of approximately $211 million to Impairment of
assets and other charges and $46 million to Operating revenues in the Consolidated Statements of Operations for the year ended December 31, 2022. Duke
Energy Indiana ﬁled a request for rehearing with the Supreme Court on April 11, 2022, which the court denied on May 26, 2022. Duke Energy Indiana ﬁled its
testimony in the remand proceeding on August 18, 2022. An evidentiary hearing is scheduled to begin March 3, 2023. Duke Energy Indiana cannot predict
the outcome of this matter.(a)
(c)
(c)
(a)
148
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
2020 Indiana Coal Ash Recovery Case
In Duke Energy Indiana’s 2019 rate case, the IURC also opened a subdocket for post-2018 coal ash related expenditures. Duke Energy Indiana ﬁled testimony
on April 15, 2020, in the coal ash subdocket requesting recovery for the post-2018 coal ash basin closure costs for plans that have been approved by the
Indiana Department of Environmental Management (IDEM) as well as continuing deferral, with carrying costs, on the balance. An evidentiary hearing was
held on September 14, 2020. Brieﬁng was completed by mid-September 2021. On November 3, 2021, the IURC issued an order allowing recovery for post-
2018 coal ash basin closure costs for the plans that have been approved by IDEM, as well as continuing deferral, with carrying costs, on the balance. The
OUCC and the Duke Industrial Group appealed. The Indiana Court of Appeals issued its opinion on February 21, 2023, reversing the IURC's order to the extent
that it allowed Duke Energy Indiana to recover federally mandated costs incurred prior to the IURC's November 3, 2021 order. In addition, the court found
that any costs incurred pre-petition to determine federally mandated compliance options were not speciﬁcally authorized by the statute and should also be
disallowed. Duke Energy Indiana is assessing its appellate options and must ﬁle a petition to transfer to the Indiana Supreme Court by April 7, 2023. As a
result of the court's opinion, Duke Energy Indiana recognized a pretax charge of approximately $175 million to Impairment of assets and other charges for
the year ended December 31, 2022. Duke Energy Indiana cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
TDSIC 2.0
On November 23, 2021, Duke Energy Indiana ﬁled for approval of the Transmission, Distribution, Storage Improvement Charge 2.0 investment plan for 2023-
2028 (TDSIC 2.0). On June 15, 2022, the IURC approved, without modiﬁcation, TDSIC 2.0, which includes approximately $2 billion in transmission and
distribution investments selected to improve customer reliability, harden and improve resiliency of the grid, enable expansion of renewable and distributed
energy projects and encourage economic development. In addition, the IURC set up a subdocket to consider the targeted economic development project,
which the IURC approved on March 2, 2022. On July 15, 2022, the OUCC ﬁled a notice of appeal to the Indiana Court of Appeals in Duke Energy Indiana’s
TDSIC 2.0 proceeding. An appellant brief was ﬁled on October 28, 2022, and Duke Energy Indiana ﬁled its responsive brief on December 28, 2022. Duke
Energy Indiana cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
Piedmont
Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
The following tables present the regulatory assets and liabilities recorded on Piedmont's Consolidated Balance Sheets.
December 31, Earns/PaysRecovery/Refund
(in millions) 2022 2021 a Return Period Ends
Regulatory Assets
AROs – nuclear and other $ 27 $ 22  (d)
Accrued pension and OPEB 119  82  (g)
Vacation accrual 12  12  2023
Derivatives – natural gas supply contracts 168  139 
Deferred pipeline integrity costs 93  84  2025
Amounts due from customers 57  85  (e) (b)
Other 35  33  (b)
Total regulatory assets 511  457 
Less: current portion 119  141 
Total noncurrent regulatory assets $ 392 $ 316 
Regulatory Liabilities
Net regulatory liability related to income taxes $ 459 $ 510  (b)
Costs of removal 573  572  (d)
Other 66  32  (e) (b)
Total regulatory liabilities 1,098  1,114 
Less: current portion 74  56 
Total noncurrent regulatory liabilities $ 1,024 $ 1,058 
(a)    Regulatory assets and liabilities are excluded from rate base unless otherwise noted.
(b)    The expected recovery or refund period varies or has not been determined.
(c)    Included in rate base.
(d)    Recovery over the life of the associated assets.
(e)    Certain costs earn/pay a return.
(f)    Balance will ﬂuctuate with changes in the market. Current contracts extend into 2031.
(g)    Recovered primarily over the average remaining service periods or life expectancies of employees covered by the beneﬁt plans. See Note 23 for
additional detail.
2022 South Carolina Rate Case
On April 1, 2022, Piedmont ﬁled an application with the PSCSC for a rate increase for retail customers of approximately $7 million, which represents an
approximate 3.4% increase in retail revenues. An evidentiary hearing was held on August 15, 2022. On September 15, 2022, the PSCSC delivered its
decision, which included an ROE of 9.3% and a capital structure of 52.2% equity and 47.8% debt and issued its ﬁnal order on October 6, 2022. Revised
customer rates became eﬀective in October 2022 and resulted in a rate decrease for retail customers of approximately $1 million.(a)
(c)
(f)
(c)
(a)
(c)
149
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
Tennessee Annual Review Mechanism
On October 10, 2022, the TPUC approved Piedmont’s petition to adopt an Annual Review Mechanism (ARM) as allowed by Tennessee law. Under the ARM,
Piedmont will adjust rates annually to achieve its allowed 9.80% ROE over the upcoming year and to true up any variance between its allowed ROE and
actual ROE from the prior calendar year. The initial year subject to the true up is 2022, and the initial rate adjustments request will be ﬁled in May 2023 for
rates eﬀective October 1, 2023.
OTHER REGULATORY MATTERS
Atlantic Coast Pipeline, LLC
Atlantic Coast Pipeline (ACP pipeline) was planned to be an approximately 600-mile interstate natural gas pipeline running from West Virginia to North
Carolina. Duke Energy indirectly owns a 47% interest, which is accounted for as an equity method investment through its Gas Utilities and Infrastructure
segment.
As a result of the uncertainty created by various legal rulings, the potential impact on the cost and schedule for the project, the ongoing legal challenges and
the risk of additional legal challenges and delays through the construction period and Dominion’s decision to sell substantially all of its gas transmission and
storage segment assets, Duke Energy's Board of Directors and management decided that it was not prudent to continue to invest in the project. On July 5,
2020, Duke Energy and Dominion announced the cancellation of the ACP pipeline project.
As part of the pretax charges to earnings of approximately $2.1 billion recorded for the year ended December 31, 2020, within Equity in earnings (losses) of
unconsolidated aﬃliates on the Duke Energy Consolidated Statements of Operations, Duke Energy established liabilities related to the cancellation of the
ACP pipeline project. In February 2021, Duke Energy paid approximately $855 million to fund ACP's outstanding debt, relieving Duke Energy of its guarantee.
At December 31, 2022, there is $59 million and $47 million within Other Current Liabilities and Other Noncurrent Liabilities, respectively, in the Gas Utilities
and Infrastructure segment. The liabilities represent Duke Energy's obligation of approximately $106 million to satisfy remaining ARO requirements to restore
construction sites.
See Notes 8 and 13 for additional information regarding this transaction.
Potential Coal Plant Retirements
The Subsidiary Registrants periodically ﬁle IRPs with their state regulatory commissions. The IRPs provide a view of forecasted energy needs over a long term
(10 to 20 years) and options being considered to meet those needs. IRPs ﬁled by the Subsidiary Registrants included planning assumptions to potentially
retire certain coal-ﬁred generating facilities in North Carolina and Indiana earlier than their current estimated useful lives. The NCUC concluded in its Carbon
Plan order that the projected retirements dates presented by Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress in their Carbon Plan for coal-ﬁred generating
facilities were reasonable for planning purposes and further directed that appropriate steps be taken to optimally retire the coal ﬂeet according to such
schedule. Duke Energy continues to evaluate the potential need to retire these coal-ﬁred generating facilities earlier than the current estimated useful lives
and plans to seek regulatory recovery for amounts that would not be otherwise recovered when any of these assets are retired.
The table below contains the net carrying value of generating facilities planned for retirement or included in recent IRPs or Carbon Plan as evaluated for
potential retirement. Dollar amounts in the table below are included in Net property, plant and equipment on the Consolidated Balance Sheets as of
December 31, 2022, and exclude capitalized asset retirement costs.
Remaining Net
Capacity Book Value
(in MW) (in millions)
Duke Energy Carolinas
Allen Steam Station Unit 1 167 $ 10 
Allen Steam Station Unit 5 259  233 
Cliﬀside Unit 5 546  344 
Marshall Units 1-2 760 428
Duke Energy Progress
Mayo Unit 1 713  639 
Roxboro Units 3-4 1,409  425 
Duke Energy Florida
Crystal River Units 4-5 1,442  1,549 
Duke Energy Indiana
Gibson Units 1-5 2,845  2,043 
Cayuga Units 1-2 1,005  622 
Total Duke Energy 9,146 $ 6,293 
(a)    As part of the 2015 resolution of a lawsuit involving alleged New Source Review violations, Duke Energy Carolinas must retire Allen Steam Station Unit 1
by December 31, 2024.
(b)    These units were included in the IRP ﬁled by Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress in South Carolina on September 1, 2020, and in the
Carbon Plan adopted by the NCUC in December 2022. The long-term energy options considered could result in retirement of these units earlier than
their current estimated useful lives.(a)
(b)
(b)
(b)
(b)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(d)
150
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REGULATORY MATTERS
(c)    On January 14, 2021, Duke Energy Florida ﬁled the 2021 Settlement agreement with the FPSC, which proposed depreciation rates reﬂecting retirement
dates for Duke Energy Florida's last two coal-ﬁred generating facilities, Crystal River Units 4-5, eight years ahead of schedule in 2034 rather than in
2042. The FPSC approved the 2021 Settlement on May 4, 2021. The remaining net book value reﬂected in the table above excludes $200 million of
accelerated deprecation collected from retail customers pursuant to Duke Energy Florida's 2017 Settlement.
(d)    The rate case ﬁled July 2, 2019, included proposed depreciation rates reﬂecting retirement dates from 2026 to 2038. The depreciation rates reﬂecting
these updated retirement dates were approved by the IURC as part of the rate case order issued on June 29, 2020.
5. COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
INSURANCE
General Insurance
The Duke Energy Registrants have insurance and reinsurance coverage either directly or through indemniﬁcation from Duke Energy’s captive insurance
company, Bison, and its aﬃliates, consistent with companies engaged in similar commercial operations with similar type properties. The Duke Energy
Registrants’ coverage includes (i) commercial general liability coverage for liabilities arising to third parties for bodily injury and property damage; (ii)
workers’ compensation; (iii) automobile liability coverage; and (iv) property coverage for all real and personal property damage. Real and personal property
damage coverage excludes electric transmission and distribution lines, but includes damages arising from boiler and machinery breakdowns, earthquakes,
ﬂood damage and extra expense, but not outage or replacement power coverage. All coverage is subject to certain deductibles or retentions, sublimits,
exclusions, terms and conditions common for companies with similar types of operations. The Duke Energy Registrants self-insure their electric transmission
and distribution lines against loss due to storm damage and other natural disasters. As discussed further in Note 4, Duke Energy Florida maintains a storm
damage reserve and has a regulatory mechanism to recover the cost of named storms on an expedited basis.
The cost of the Duke Energy Registrants’ coverage can ﬂuctuate from year to year reﬂecting claims history and conditions of the insurance and reinsurance
markets.
In the event of a loss, terms and amounts of insurance and reinsurance available might not be adequate to cover claims and other expenses incurred.
Uninsured losses and other expenses, to the extent not recovered by other sources, could have a material eﬀect on the Duke Energy Registrants’ results of
operations, cash ﬂows or ﬁnancial position. Each company is responsible to the extent losses may be excluded or exceed limits of the coverage available.
Nuclear Insurance
Duke Energy Carolinas owns and operates McGuire and Oconee and operates and has a partial ownership interest in Catawba. McGuire and Catawba each
have two reactors. Oconee has three reactors. The other joint owners of Catawba reimburse Duke Energy Carolinas for certain expenses associated with
nuclear insurance per the Catawba joint owner agreements.
Duke Energy Progress owns and operates Robinson, Brunswick and Harris. Robinson and Harris each have one reactor. Brunswick has two reactors.
Duke Energy Florida owns Crystal River Unit 3, which permanently ceased operation in 2013 and achieved a SAFSTOR condition in July 2019. On October 1,
2020, Crystal River Unit 3 changed decommissioning strategies from SAFSTOR to DECON.
In the event of a loss, terms and amounts of insurance available might not be adequate to cover property damage and other expenses incurred. Uninsured
losses and other expenses, to the extent not recovered by other sources, could have a material eﬀect on Duke Energy Carolinas’, Duke Energy Progress’ and
Duke Energy Florida’s results of operations, cash ﬂows or ﬁnancial position. Each company is responsible to the extent losses may be excluded or exceed
limits of the coverage available.
Nuclear Liability Coverage
The Price-Anderson Act requires owners of nuclear reactors to provide for public nuclear liability protection per nuclear incident up to a maximum total
ﬁnancial protection liability. The maximum total ﬁnancial protection liability, which is approximately $13.7 billion, is subject to change every ﬁve years for
inﬂation and for the number of licensed reactors. Total nuclear liability coverage consists of a combination of private primary nuclear liability insurance
coverage and a mandatory industry risk-sharing program to provide for excess nuclear liability coverage above the maximum reasonably available private
primary coverage. The U.S. Congress could impose revenue-raising measures on the nuclear industry to pay claims.
Primary Liability Insurance
Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress have purchased the maximum reasonably available private primary nuclear liability insurance as required
by law, which is $450 million per station. Duke Energy Florida has purchased $100 million primary nuclear liability insurance for Crystal River in compliance
with the law.
Excess Liability Program
This program provides $13.2 billion of coverage per incident through the Price-Anderson Act’s mandatory industrywide excess secondary ﬁnancial protection
program of risk pooling. This amount is the product of potential cumulative retrospective premium assessments of $138 million times the current 96 licensed
commercial nuclear reactors in the U.S. Under this program, operating unit licensees could be assessed retrospective premiums to compensate for public
nuclear liability damages in the event of a nuclear incident at any licensed facility in the U.S. Retrospective premiums may be assessed at a rate not to
exceed $20.5 million per year per licensed reactor for each incident. The assessment may be subject to state premium taxes.
151
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
Nuclear Property and Accidental Outage Coverage
Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida are members of Nuclear Electric Insurance Limited (NEIL), an industry mutual
insurance company, which provides property damage, nuclear accident decontamination and premature decommissioning insurance for each station for
losses resulting from damage to its nuclear plants, either due to accidents or acts of terrorism. Additionally, NEIL provides accidental outage coverage for
losses in the event of a major accidental outage at an insured nuclear station.
Pursuant to regulations of the NRC, each company’s property damage insurance policies provide that all proceeds from such insurance be applied, ﬁrst, to
place the plant in a safe and stable condition after a qualifying accident and second, to decontaminate the plant before any proceeds can be used for
decommissioning, plant repair or restoration.
Losses resulting from acts of terrorism are covered as common occurrences, such that if terrorist acts occur against one or more commercial nuclear power
plants insured by NEIL within a 12-month period, they would be treated as one event and the owners of the plants where the act occurred would share one
full limit of liability. The full limit of liability is currently $3.2 billion. NEIL sublimits the total aggregate for all of their policies for non-nuclear terrorist events to
approximately $1.8 billion.
Each nuclear facility has accident property damage, nuclear accident decontamination and premature decommissioning liability insurance from NEIL with
limits of $1.5 billion, except for Crystal River Unit 3. Crystal River Unit 3’s limit is $50 million and is on an actual cash value basis. All nuclear facilities except
for Catawba and Crystal River Unit 3 also share an additional $1.25 billion nuclear accident insurance limit above their dedicated underlying limit. This
shared additional excess limit is not subject to reinstatement in the event of a loss. Catawba has a dedicated $1.25 billion of additional nuclear accident
insurance limit above its dedicated underlying limit. Catawba and Oconee also have an additional $750 million of non-nuclear accident property damage
limit. All coverages are subject to sublimits and signiﬁcant deductibles.
NEIL’s Accidental Outage policy provides some coverage, similar to business interruption, for losses in the event of a major accident property damage outage
of a nuclear unit. Coverage is provided on a weekly limit basis after a signiﬁcant waiting period deductible and at 100% of the applicable weekly limits for 52
weeks and 80% of the applicable weekly limits for up to the next 110 weeks. Coverage is provided until these applicable weekly periods are met, where the
accidental outage policy limit will not exceed $490 million for Catawba, McGuire, Harris, Brunswick, Oconee and Robinson. NEIL sublimits the accidental
outage recovery up to the ﬁrst 104 weeks of coverage not to exceed $328 million from non-nuclear accidental property damage. Coverage amounts
decrease in the event more than one unit at a station is out of service due to a common accident. All coverages are subject to sublimits and signiﬁcant
deductibles.
Potential Retroactive Premium Assessments
In the event of NEIL losses, NEIL’s board of directors may assess member companies' retroactive premiums of amounts up to 10 times their annual premiums
for up to six years after a loss. NEIL has never exercised this assessment. The maximum aggregate annual retrospective premium obligations for Duke
Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida are $151 million, $93 million and $1 million, respectively. Duke Energy Carolinas' maximum
assessment amount includes 100% of potential obligations to NEIL for jointly owned reactors. Duke Energy Carolinas would seek reimbursement from the
joint owners for their portion of these assessment amounts.
ENVIRONMENTAL
The Duke Energy Registrants are subject to federal, state and local regulations regarding air and water quality, hazardous and solid waste disposal, coal ash
and other environmental matters. These regulations can be changed from time to time, imposing new obligations on the Duke Energy Registrants. The
following environmental matters impact all of the Duke Energy Registrants.
Remediation Activities
In addition to AROs recorded as a result of various environmental regulations, discussed in Note 10, the Duke Energy Registrants are responsible for
environmental remediation at various sites. These include certain properties that are part of ongoing operations and sites formerly owned or used by Duke
Energy entities. These sites are in various stages of investigation, remediation and monitoring. Managed in conjunction with relevant federal, state and local
agencies, remediation activities vary based upon site conditions and location, remediation requirements, complexity and sharing of responsibility. If
remediation activities involve joint and several liability provisions, strict liability, or cost recovery or contribution actions, the Duke Energy Registrants could
potentially be held responsible for environmental impacts caused by other potentially responsible parties and may also beneﬁt from insurance policies or
contractual indemnities that cover some or all cleanup costs. Liabilities are recorded when losses become probable and are reasonably estimable. The total
costs that may be incurred cannot be estimated because the extent of environmental impact, allocation among potentially responsible parties, remediation
alternatives and/or regulatory decisions have not yet been determined at all sites. Additional costs associated with remediation activities are likely to be
incurred in the future and could be signiﬁcant. Costs are typically expensed as Operation, maintenance and other in the Consolidated Statements of
Operations unless regulatory recovery of the costs is deemed probable.
152
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
The following table contains information regarding reserves for probable and estimable costs related to the various environmental sites. These reserves are
recorded in Other within Other Noncurrent Liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
(in millions) December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
Reserves for Environmental Remediation
Duke Energy $ 84 $ 88 
Duke Energy Carolinas 22  19 
Progress Energy 19  23 
Duke Energy Progress 8  11 
Duke Energy Florida 11  11 
Duke Energy Ohio 33  34 
Duke Energy Indiana 3  4 
Piedmont 7  9 
Additional losses in excess of recorded reserves that could be incurred for the stages of investigation, remediation and monitoring for environmental sites
that have been evaluated at this time are not material.
LITIGATION
Duke Energy
Michael Johnson et al. v. Duke Energy Corporation et al.
On September 23, 2020, plaintiﬀ Michael Johnson, a former Duke Energy employee and participant in the Duke Energy Retirement Savings Plan (Plan)
brought suit on his own behalf and on behalf of other participants and beneﬁciaries similarly situated against Duke Energy Corporation, the Duke Energy
Beneﬁts Committee, and other unnamed individual defendants. The complaint, which was subsequently amended to add a current participant as a plaintiﬀ
on November 23, 2020, alleges that the defendants breached their ﬁduciary duties with respect to certain fees associated with the Plan in violation of the
Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 and seeks certiﬁcation of a class of all individuals who were participants or beneﬁciaries of the Plan at any
time on or after September 23, 2014. The defendants ﬁled a motion to dismiss the plaintiﬀs’ amended complaint on December 18, 2020. On January 31,
2022, the court denied the defendants' motion to dismiss. On February 28, 2022, Duke Energy responded to the amended complaint. Discovery commenced
and the parties exchanged preliminary disclosures. After review of these disclosures, the plaintiﬀs agreed to voluntarily dismiss the suit and the parties
subsequently ﬁled a joint stipulation of voluntary dismissal with prejudice on April 29, 2022, ending this litigation.
Texas Storm Uri Tort Litigation
Duke Energy Corporation and several Duke Energy renewables project companies in the ERCOT market were named in more than thirty lawsuits arising out
of Texas Storm Uri, which occurred in February 2021. Duke Energy Corporation was dismissed from the suits, leaving two suits in which individual wind and
solar projects are named. These lawsuits seek recovery for property damages, personal injury and wrongful death allegedly caused by the power outages
that plaintiﬀs claim were the collective failure of generators, transmission and distribution utilities ("TDUs"), retail energy providers, natural gas providers,
co-ops and municipalities that generate power and ERCOT, all of which were originally sued by all plaintiﬀs. The cases were consolidated into a Texas state
court multidistrict litigation (MDL) proceeding for discovery and pre-trial motions. Five cases were designated for motions to dismiss and all other cases were
stayed. On January 28, 2023, the Court denied the generators' and TDUs' motions to dismiss the negligence claims but dismissed the tortious interference
and conspiracy claims. The motions to dismiss ERCOT and the natural gas defendants were also granted. The generator and TDU defendants ﬁled a petition
for mandamus in each of the ﬁve cases seeking to overturn the denials on February 10, 2023. If the Texas Court of Appeals accepts the appeals, it will set a
brieﬁng schedule. The remaining cases that are part of the MDL are currently stayed, except that plaintiﬀs have been given leave to amend their pleadings.
Plaintiﬀs began amending existing lawsuits and ﬁling new lawsuits on behalf of hundreds of plaintiﬀs against hundreds of defendants, including in some
cases, by again naming Duke Energy Corporation and naming, for the ﬁrst time, Duke Energy Renewables, LLC. Plaintiﬀs have also re-named ERCOT as a
defendant. As new cases are served, they are being brought into the MDL and are subject to the stay in the MDL proceeding. Duke Energy cannot predict the
outcomes of these matters. See Note 2 for more information related to the sale of the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups.
Duke Energy Carolinas
Ruben Villano, et al. v. Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC
On June 16, 2021, a group of nine individuals went over a low head dam adjacent to the Dan River Steam Station in Eden, North Carolina, while water tubing.
Emergency personnel rescued four people and ﬁve others were conﬁrmed deceased. On August 11, 2021, Duke Energy Carolinas was served with the
complaint ﬁled in Durham County Superior Court on behalf of four survivors, which was later amended to include all the decedents along with the survivors.
The lawsuit alleges that Duke Energy Carolinas knew that the river was used for recreational purposes and that Duke Energy did not adequately warn about
the dam and that Duke Energy Carolinas created a dangerous and hidden hazard on the Dan River in building and maintaining the low head dam. Discovery
has commenced and is scheduled to be completed on or before August 23, 2023. The parties are preparing for mediation, which is scheduled for March 22,
2023. Dispositive motions are due to be ﬁled by September 6, 2023, and the case is scheduled to be trial-ready by October 2, 2023. Duke Energy Carolinas
cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
153
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
NTE Carolinas II, LLC Litigation
In November 2017, Duke Energy Carolinas entered into a standard FERC large generator interconnection agreement (LGIA) with NTE Carolinas II, LLC (NTE), a
company that proposed to build a combined-cycle natural gas plant in Rockingham County, North Carolina. On September 6, 2019, Duke Energy Carolinas
ﬁled a lawsuit in Mecklenburg County Superior Court against NTE for breach of contract, alleging that NTE's failure to pay benchmark payments for Duke
Energy Carolinas' transmission system upgrades required under the interconnection agreement constituted a termination of the interconnection agreement.
Duke Energy Carolinas sought a monetary judgment against NTE because NTE failed to make multiple milestone payments. The lawsuit was moved to
federal court in North Carolina. NTE ﬁled a motion to dismiss Duke Energy Carolinas’ complaint and brought counterclaims alleging anti-competitive conduct
and violations of state and federal statutes. Duke Energy Carolinas ﬁled a motion to dismiss NTE's counterclaims. Both NTE's and Duke Energy Carolinas'
motions to dismiss were subsequently denied by the court.
On May 21, 2020, in response to an NTE petition challenging Duke Energy Carolinas' termination of the LGIA, FERC issued a ruling that 1) it has exclusive
jurisdiction to determine whether a transmission provider may terminate a LGIA; 2) FERC approval is required to terminate a conforming LGIA if objected to
by the interconnection customer; and 3) Duke Energy may not announce the termination of a conforming LGIA unless FERC has approved the termination.
FERC's Oﬃce of Enforcement also initiated an investigation of Duke Energy Carolinas into matters pertaining to the LGIA. Duke Energy Carolinas is
cooperating with the Oﬃce of Enforcement but cannot predict the outcome of this investigation.
Following completion of discovery, Duke Energy Carolinas ﬁled a motion for summary judgment seeking a ruling in its favor as to some of its aﬃrmative
claims against NTE and to all of NTE’s counterclaims. On June 24, 2022, the court issued an order partially granting Duke Energy Carolinas' motion by
dismissing NTE's counterclaims that Duke Energy Carolinas engaged in anti-competitive behavior in violation of state and federal statutes. On October 12,
2022, the parties executed a settlement agreement with respect to the remaining breach of contract claims in the litigation and a Stipulation of Dismissal
was ﬁled with the court on October 13, 2022. On November 11, 2022, NTE ﬁled its Notice of Appeal to the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Fourth Circuit as to
the District Court's summary judgment ruling in Duke Energy Carolinas' favor on NTE's antitrust and unfair competition claims. Brieﬁng on NTE's appeal will
be completed on May 3, 2023. Duke Energy Carolinas cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
Asbestos-related Injuries and Damages Claims
Duke Energy Carolinas has experienced numerous claims for indemniﬁcation and medical cost reimbursement related to asbestos exposure. These claims
relate to damages for bodily injuries alleged to have arisen from exposure to or use of asbestos in connection with construction and maintenance activities
conducted on its electric generation plants prior to 1985.
Duke Energy Carolinas has recognized asbestos-related reserves of $457 million and $501 million at December 31, 2022, and 2021, respectively. These
reserves are classiﬁed in Other within Other Noncurrent Liabilities and Other within Current Liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. The change in the
reserves is a result of a third-party study completed in 2021 as well as settlements made throughout the year. These reserves are based upon Duke Energy
Carolinas' best estimate for current and future asbestos claims through 2042 and are recorded on an undiscounted basis. In light of the uncertainties
inherent in a longer-term forecast, management does not believe they can reasonably estimate the indemnity and medical costs that might be incurred after
2042 related to such potential claims. It is possible Duke Energy Carolinas may incur asbestos liabilities in excess of the recorded reserves.
Duke Energy Carolinas has third-party insurance to cover certain losses related to asbestos-related injuries and damages above an aggregate self-insured
retention. Receivables for insurance recoveries were $595 million and $644 million at December 31, 2022, and 2021, respectively. These amounts are
classiﬁed in Other within Other Noncurrent Assets and Receivables within Current Assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Any future payments up to the
policy limit will be reimbursed by the third-party insurance carrier. Duke Energy Carolinas is not aware of any uncertainties regarding the legal suﬃciency of
insurance claims. Duke Energy Carolinas believes the insurance recovery asset is probable of recovery as the insurance carrier continues to have a strong
ﬁnancial strength rating.
The reserve for credit losses for insurance receivables for the asbestos-related injuries and damages is $12 million for Duke Energy and Duke Energy
Carolinas as of December 31, 2022, and December 31, 2021. The insurance receivable is evaluated based on the risk of default and the historical losses,
current conditions and expected conditions around collectability. Management evaluates the risk of default annually based on payment history, credit rating
and changes in the risk of default from credit agencies.
Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida
Spent Nuclear Fuel Matters
On June 18, 2018, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida sued the U.S. in the U.S. Court of Federal Claims for damages incurred for the period 2014
through 2018. The lawsuit claimed the DOE breached a contract in failing to accept spent nuclear fuel under the Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982 and
asserted damages for the cost of on-site storage in the amount of $100 million and $200 million for Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida,
respectively.
On March 30, 2022, the DOE and Duke Energy Progress executed a settlement agreement, pursuant to which Duke Energy Progress would receive damages
for costs incurred between 2014 and 2018 and would be able to submit future costs on a deﬁned schedule. In April 2022, Duke Energy Progress received
$87 million in proceeds that related to damages incurred in 2014 through 2018.
On May 2, 2022, the DOE and Duke Energy Florida executed a settlement agreement, pursuant to which Duke Energy Florida would receive damages for
costs incurred between 2014 and 2018 and would be able to submit costs incurred in 2019 and 2020 pursuant to an audit process. In June 2022, Duke
Energy Florida received $180 million in proceeds that related to damages incurred in 2014 through 2018.
154
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
Duke Energy Indiana
Coal Ash Basin Closure Plan Appeal
On January 27, 2020, Hoosier Environmental Council (HEC) ﬁled a Petition for Administrative Review with the Indiana Oﬃce of Environmental Adjudication
challenging the Indiana Department of Environmental Management’s (IDEM's) December 10, 2019 partial approval of Duke Energy Indiana’s ash pond
closure plan at Duke Energy's Gallagher power station. After hearing oral arguments in early April 2021 on Duke Energy Indiana's and HEC's competing
Motions for Summary Judgment, on May 4, 2021, the administrative court rejected all of HEC’s claims and issued a ruling in favor of Duke Energy Indiana. On
June 3, 2021, HEC ﬁled an appeal in Superior Court to seek judicial review of the order. Brieﬁng on the appeal was completed on December 13, 2021.
On January 11, 2022, Duke Energy Indiana received a compliance obligation letter from the EPA notifying the company that the two basins at issue in the
litigation are subject to requirements of the CCR Rule. The letter does not provide a deadline for compliance. Duke Energy Indiana is proceeding with surface
impoundment closure at its Indiana sites consistent with EPA’s guidance, the federal CCR rule, and Indiana law, as applicable.
On April 21, 2022, HEC ﬁled a motion requesting that the court hold a hearing within 45 days and also take judicial notice of the EPA's January 11, 2022
letter. On April 22, 2022, Duke Energy Indiana sent IDEM a letter withdrawing the closure plans for the Gallagher North Ash Pond and Primary Pond Ash Fill.
After acknowledgment by IDEM of withdrawal of these closure plans, Duke Energy Indiana ﬁled a Motion to Dismiss the litigation as moot on April 28, 2022,
which IDEM supported, and the court granted the Motion to Dismiss on July 8, 2022.
Coal Ash Insurance Coverage Litigation
In June 2022, Duke Energy Indiana ﬁled a civil action in Indiana Superior Court against various insurance companies seeking declaratory relief with respect to
insurance coverage for coal combustion residuals-related expenses and liabilities covered by third-party liability insurance policies. The insurance policies
cover the 1969-1972 and 1984-1985 periods and provide third-party liability insurance for claims and suits alleging property damage, bodily injury and
personal injury (or a combination thereof). A trial date has not yet been set. Duke Energy Indiana cannot predict the outcome of this matter.
Other Litigation and Legal Proceedings
The Duke Energy Registrants are involved in other legal, tax and regulatory proceedings arising in the ordinary course of business, some of which involve
signiﬁcant amounts. The Duke Energy Registrants believe the ﬁnal disposition of these proceedings will not have a material eﬀect on their results of
operations, cash ﬂows or ﬁnancial position for the years presented. Reserves are classiﬁed on the Consolidated Balance Sheets in Other within Other
Noncurrent Liabilities and Other within Current Liabilities.
OTHER COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
General
As part of their normal business, the Duke Energy Registrants are party to various ﬁnancial guarantees, performance guarantees and other contractual
commitments to extend guarantees of credit and other assistance to various subsidiaries, investees and other third parties. These guarantees involve
elements of performance and credit risk, which are not fully recognized on the Consolidated Balance Sheets and have uncapped maximum potential
payments. However, the Duke Energy Registrants do not believe these guarantees will have a material eﬀect on their results of operations, cash ﬂows or
ﬁnancial position. See Note 8 for more information.
Purchase Obligations
Purchased Power
Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida and Duke Energy Ohio have ongoing purchased power contracts, including renewable energy contracts, with
other utilities, wholesale marketers, co-generators and qualiﬁed facilities. These purchased power contracts generally provide for capacity and energy
payments. In addition, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida have various contracts to secure transmission rights.
The following table presents executory purchased power contracts with terms exceeding one year, excluding contracts classiﬁed as leases.
    Minimum Purchase Amount at December 31, 2022
Contract
(in millions) Expiration 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 Thereafter Total
Duke Energy Progress 2028-2032$ 22 $ 21 $ 22 $ 18 $ 19 $ 27 $ 129 
Duke Energy Florida 2024-2025 300  267  91  —  —  —  658 
Duke Energy Ohio 2024 55  36  —  —  —  —  91 
(a)    Contracts represent between 18% and 100% of net plant output.
(b)    Contracts represent 100% of net plant output.
(c)    Share of net plant output varies. Excludes PPA with OVEC.(a)
(b)
(c)
155
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
Gas Supply and Capacity Contracts
Duke Energy Ohio and Piedmont routinely enter into long-term natural gas supply commodity and capacity commitments and other agreements that commit
future cash ﬂows to acquire services needed in their businesses. These commitments include pipeline and storage capacity contracts and natural gas supply
contracts to provide service to customers. Costs arising from the natural gas supply commodity and capacity commitments, while signiﬁcant, are pass-
through costs to customers and are generally fully recoverable through the fuel adjustment or PGA procedures and prudence reviews in North Carolina and
South Carolina and under the Tennessee Incentive Plan in Tennessee. In the Midwest, these costs are recovered via the Gas Cost Recovery Rate in Ohio or the
Gas Cost Adjustment Clause in Kentucky. The time periods for ﬁxed payments under pipeline and storage capacity contracts are up to 20 years. The time
periods for ﬁxed payments under natural gas supply contracts are up to four years. The time period for the natural gas supply purchase commitments is up
to nine years.
Certain storage and pipeline capacity contracts require the payment of demand charges that are based on rates approved by the FERC in order to maintain
rights to access the natural gas storage or pipeline capacity on a ﬁrm basis during the contract term. The demand charges that are incurred in each period
are recognized in the Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income as part of natural gas purchases and are included in Cost of natural
gas.
The following table presents future unconditional purchase obligations under natural gas supply and capacity contracts as of December 31, 2022.
(in millions) 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027Thereafter Total
Duke Energy Ohio $ 85 $ 101 $ 85 $ 56 $ 52 $ 616 $ 995 
Piedmont 319  313  267  213  203  587  1,902 
6. LEASES
As part of its operations, Duke Energy leases certain aircraft, space on communication towers, industrial equipment, ﬂeet vehicles, fuel transportation
(barges and railcars), land and oﬃce space under various terms and expiration dates. Additionally, Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke
Energy Indiana have ﬁnance leases related to ﬁrm natural gas pipeline transportation capacity. Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida have entered
into certain PPAs, which are classiﬁed as ﬁnance and operating leases.
Duke Energy has certain lease agreements, which include variable lease payments that are based on the usage of an asset. These variable lease payments
are not included in the measurement of the ROU assets or operating lease liabilities on the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Certain Duke Energy lease agreements include options for renewal and early termination. The intent to renew a lease varies depending on the lease type and
asset. Renewal options that are reasonably certain to be exercised are included in the lease measurements. The decision to terminate a lease early is
dependent on various economic factors. No termination options have been included in any of the lease measurements.
Duke Energy Carolinas entered into a sale-leaseback arrangement in December 2019, to construct and occupy an oﬃce tower. The lease agreement was
evaluated as a sale-leaseback of real estate and it was determined that the transaction did not qualify for sale-leaseback accounting. As a result, the
transaction is being accounted for as a ﬁnancing. For this transaction, Duke Energy Carolinas will continue to record the real estate on the Consolidated
Balance Sheets within Property, Plant and Equipment as if it were the legal owner and will continue to recognize depreciation expense over the estimated
useful life. In addition, the failed sale-leaseback obligation is reported within Long-Term Debt on the Consolidated Balance Sheets, with the monthly lease
payments commencing after the construction phase being split between interest expense and principal pay down of the debt.
Piedmont has certain agreements with Duke Energy Carolinas for the construction and transportation of natural gas pipelines to supply its natural gas plant
needs. Piedmont accounts for these pipeline lateral contracts as sales-type leases since the present value of the sum of the lease payments equals the fair
value of the assets. These pipeline lateral assets owned by Piedmont had a current net investment basis of $2 million as of December 31, 2022, and 2021,
and a long-term net investment basis of $201 million and $203 million as of December 31, 2022, and 2021, respectively. These assets are classiﬁed in Other,
within Current Assets and Other Noncurrent Assets, respectively, on Piedmont's Consolidated Balance Sheets. Duke Energy Carolinas accounts for the
contracts as ﬁnance leases. The activity for these contracts is eliminated in consolidation at Duke Energy.
156
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS LEASES
The following tables present the components of lease expense.
Year Ended December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Operating lease expense $ 229 $ 39 $ 153 $ 83 $ 70 $ 10 $ 19 $ 6 
Short-term lease expense 4  —  1  —  1  —  2  — 
Variable lease expense 61  (1) 60  37  23  —  —  1 
Finance lease expense
Amortization of leased assets 151  6  61  41  20  —  —  — 
Interest on lease liabilities 50  32  49  45  4  —  1  — 
Total ﬁnance lease expense 201  38  110  86  24  —  1  — 
Total lease expense $ 495 $ 76 $ 324 $ 206 $ 118 $ 10 $ 22 $ 7 
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Operating lease expense $ 245 $ 43 $ 155 $ 83 $ 72 $ 11 $ 18 $ 7 
Short-term lease expense 5  —  2  1  1  —  2  — 
Variable lease expense 41  17  22  10  12  —  —  1 
Finance lease expense
Amortization of leased assets 219  5  37  18  19  —  1  — 
Interest on lease liabilities 55  33  48  42  6  —  —  — 
Total ﬁnance lease expense 274  38  85  60  25  —  1  — 
Total lease expense $ 565 $ 98 $ 264 $ 154 $ 110 $ 11 $ 21 $ 8 
(a)    Included in Operations, maintenance and other or, for barges and railcars, Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power on the Consolidated
Statements of Operations.
(b)    Included in Depreciation and amortization on the Consolidated Statements of Operations.
(c)    Included in Interest Expense on the Consolidated Statements of Operations.
The following table presents operating lease maturities and a reconciliation of the undiscounted cash ﬂows to operating lease liabilities.
December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
2023 $ 225 $ 23 $ 118 $ 64 $ 54 $ 2 $ 6 $ 4 
2024 207  21  110  56  54  2  5  4 
2025 175  14  96  42  54  2  5  4 
2026 161  13  99  45  54  2  4  — 
2027 134  9  73  46  27  2  4  — 
Thereafter 322  37  253  209  44  15  45  1 
Total operating lease payments 1,224  117  749  462  287  25  69  13 
Less: present value discount (169) (20) (107) (76) (31) (7) (18) — 
Total operating lease liabilities $1,055 $ 97 $ 642 $ 386 $ 256 $ 18 $ 51 $ 13 
(a)    Certain operating lease payments include renewal options that are reasonably certain to be exercised.(a)
(a)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(a)
157
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS LEASES
The following table presents ﬁnance lease maturities and a reconciliation of the undiscounted cash ﬂows to ﬁnance lease liabilities.
December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Indiana
2023 $ 198 $ 38 $ 103 $ 78 $ 25 $ 1 
2024 143  38  88  79  9  1 
2025 76  38  85  80  5  1 
2026 77  38  86  81  5  1 
2027 74  38  82  81  1  1 
Thereafter 584  427  555  555  —  23 
Total ﬁnance lease payments 1,152  617  999  954  45  28 
Less: amounts representing interest (388) (333) (371) (367) (4) (19)
Total ﬁnance lease liabilities $ 764 $ 284 $ 628 $ 587 $ 41 $ 9 
The following tables contain additional information related to leases.
December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Classiﬁcation Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Assets
OperatingOperating lease ROU
assets, net $1,042 $ 78 $ 628 $ 370 $258 $ 18 $ 49 $ 4 
FinanceNet property, plant and
equipment 810  284  674  590  84  —  6  — 
Total lease assets $1,852 $ 362 $1,302 $ 960 $342 $ 18 $ 55 $ 4 
Liabilities
Current
Operating Other current liabilities $179 $ 14 $ 96 $ 51 $ 45 $ 1 $ 4 $ — 
FinanceCurrent maturities of long-
term debt 153  7  57  35  22  —  —  — 
Noncurrent
Operating Operating lease liabilities 876  83  546  335  211  17  47  13 
Finance Long-Term Debt 611  277  571  552  19  —  9  — 
Total lease liabilities $1,819 $ 381 $1,270 $ 973 $297 $ 18 $ 60 $ 13 
December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Classiﬁcation Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Assets
OperatingOperating lease ROU
assets, net $1,136 $ 92 $ 691 $ 389 $ 302 $ 19 $ 53 $ 16 
FinanceNet property, plant and
equipment 950  302  729  627  102  —  7  — 
Total lease assets $2,086 $ 394 $ 1,420 $ 1,016 $ 404 $ 19 $ 60 $ 16 
Liabilities
Current
Operating Other current liabilities $ 184 $ 22 $ 94 $ 50 $ 44 $ 1 $ 4 $ 5 
FinanceCurrent maturities of long-
term debt 151  6  61  41  20  —  —  — 
Noncurrent
Operating Operating lease liabilities 940  78  606  350  256  18  50  14 
Finance Long-Term Debt 764  283  629  588  41  —  10  — 
Total lease liabilities $2,039 $ 389 $ 1,390 $ 1,029 $ 361 $ 19 $ 64 $ 19 
158
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS LEASES
Year Ended December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Cash paid for amounts included in the
measurement of lease liabilities
Operating cash ﬂows from operating leases$230 $ 24 $ 118 $ 63 $ 55 $ 2 $ 6 $ 4 
Operating cash ﬂows from ﬁnance leases 50  32  49  45  4  —  1  — 
Financing cash ﬂows from ﬁnance leases 151  6  61  41  20  —  —  — 
Lease assets obtained in exchange for
new lease liabilities (non-cash)
Operating $111 $ 10 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Cash paid for amounts included in the
measurement of lease liabilities
Operating cash ﬂows from operating
leases $ 245 $ 25 $ 117 $ 62 $ 55 $ 2 $ 6 $ 5 
Operating cash ﬂows from ﬁnance leases 55  33  48  42  6  —  —  — 
Financing cash ﬂows from ﬁnance leases 219  5  37  18  19  —  1  — 
Lease assets obtained in exchange for
new lease liabilities (non-cash)
Operating $ 182 $ 4 $ 99 $ 99 $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Finance 322  —  322  322  —  —  —  — 
(a)    No amounts were classiﬁed as investing cash ﬂows from operating leases.
(b)    Does not include ROU assets recorded as a result of the adoption of the new lease standard.
December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Weighted average remaining lease
term (years)
Operating leases 8 10 8 9 6 15 15 1
Finance leases 10 17 12 12 12 —  23 — 
Weighted average discount rate
Operating leases 3.4 % 3.8 % 3.6 % 3.5 % 3.8 % 4.2 % 4.0 % 3.3 %
Finance leases 7.7 % 11.5 % 9.1 % 9.1 % 8.0 % — % 11.9 % — %
December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Weighted average remaining lease
term (years)
Operating leases 8 9 8 10 7 16 16 4
Finance leases 10 18 13 13 11 —  24 — 
Weighted average discount rate
Operating leases 3.5 % 3.5 % 3.6 % 3.4 % 3.8 % 4.2 % 4.1 % 3.6 %
Finance leases 7.3 % 11.6 % 9.0 % 9.0 % 8.2 % — % 11.9 % — %
(a)    The discount rate is calculated using the rate implicit in a lease if it is readily determinable. Generally, the rate used by the lessor is not provided to
Duke Energy and in these cases the incremental borrowing rate is used. Duke Energy will typically use its fully collateralized incremental borrowing
rate as of the commencement date to calculate and record the lease. The incremental borrowing rate is inﬂuenced by the lessee’s credit rating and
lease term and as such may diﬀer for individual leases, embedded leases or portfolios of leased assets.(a)
(b)
(a)
(b)
(a)
(a)
159
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DEBT AND CREDIT FACILITIES
7. DEBT AND CREDIT FACILITIES
Summary of Debt and Related Terms
The following tables summarize outstanding debt and includes debt attributable to the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups. See Note 2 for further
details.
  December 31, 2022
Weighted
Average Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Interest Duke EnergyProgress Energy EnergyEnergy Energy
(in millions) Rate EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgress Florida OhioIndianaPiedmont
Unsecured debt, maturing 2023-2082 4.20 %$29,585 $ 1,150 $ 2,600 $ — $ 950 $1,330 $ 697 $ 3,390 
Secured debt, maturing 2023-2052 4.11 % 5,632  1,317  2,383  1,155  1,228  —  —  — 
First mortgage bonds, maturing 2023-
2052 3.89 % 32,645  11,306  16,350  8,776  7,576 1,850  3,138  — 
Finance leases, maturing 2023-2051 7.90 % 764  284  628  587  41  —  9  — 
Tax-exempt bonds, maturing 2027-2046 3.84 % 1,331  —  500  500  —  77  352  — 
Notes payable and commercial paper 4.50 % 4,582  —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Money pool/intercompany borrowings   —  1,533  993  389  605  522  585  514 
Fair value hedge carrying value
adjustment   (5) —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Unamortized debt discount and premium,
net   1,016  (21) (40) (23) (16) (25) (17) (9)
Unamortized debt issuance costs (383) (70) (132) (59) (70) (12) (22) (18)
Total debt 4.09 %$75,167 $15,499 $23,282 $11,325 $10,314 $3,742 $4,742 $ 3,877 
Short-term notes payable and
commercial paper   (3,952) —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Short-term money pool/intercompany
borrowings —  (1,233) (843) (238) (605) (497) (435) (514)
Current maturities of long-term debt   (4,154) (1,018) (697) (369) (328) (475) (303) (45)
Total long-term debt $67,061 $13,248 $21,742 $10,718 $9,381 $2,770 $4,004 $ 3,318 
(a) Substantially all electric utility property is mortgaged under mortgage bond indentures.
(b) Duke Energy includes $164 million of ﬁnance lease purchase accounting adjustments related to Duke Energy Florida related to PPAs that are not
accounted for as ﬁnance leases in their respective ﬁnancial statements because of grandfathering provisions in GAAP.
(c) Substantially all tax-exempt bonds are secured by ﬁrst mortgage bonds, letters of credit or the Master Credit Facility.
(d) Includes $625 million classiﬁed as Long-Term Debt on the Consolidated Balance Sheets due to the existence of long-term credit facilities that
backstop these commercial paper balances, along with Duke Energy’s ability and intent to reﬁnance these balances on a long-term basis. The
weighted average days to maturity for Duke Energy's commercial paper program was 15 days.
(e) Duke Energy includes $1,057 million and $85 million in purchase accounting adjustments related to Progress Energy and Piedmont, respectively.
(f) Duke Energy includes $27 million in purchase accounting adjustments primarily related to the merger with Progress Energy.
(g) Refer to Note 18 for additional information on amounts from consolidated VIEs.(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
(f)
(g)
(g)
160
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DEBT AND CREDIT FACILITIES
  December 31, 2021
Weighted
Average Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Interest Duke EnergyProgress Energy EnergyEnergy Energy
(in millions) Rate EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgressFlorida OhioIndianaPiedmont
Unsecured debt, maturing 2022-2082 3.71 %$24,564 $ 1,150 $ 2,250 $ — $ 150 $1,330 $ 700 $ 2,990 
Secured debt, maturing 2022-2052 2.50 % 5,584  1,094  2,397  1,120  1,278  —  —  — 
First mortgage bonds, maturing 2022-
2051 3.87 % 31,026  10,507  15,450  8,375  7,075 1,850  3,219  — 
Finance leases, maturing 2022-2051 5.81 % 915  289  690  629  61  —  10  — 
Tax-exempt bonds, maturing 2027-2041 0.65 % 360  —  48  48  —  27  285  — 
Notes payable and commercial paper 0.35 % 3,929  —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Money pool/intercompany borrowings   —  526  2,959  322  199  128  150  518 
Fair value hedge carrying value
adjustment   4  4  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Unamortized debt discount and premium,
net   1,119  (21) (34) (19) (14) (27) (18) (6)
Unamortized debt issuance costs (362) (67) (128) (54) (68) (13) (23) (16)
Total debt 3.50 %$67,139 $ 13,482 $23,632 $10,421 $ 8,681 $3,295 $ 4,323 $ 3,486 
Short-term notes payable and commercial
paper   (3,304) —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Short-term money pool/intercompany
borrowings —  (226) (2,809) (172) (199) (103) —  (518)
Current maturities of long-term debt   (3,387) (362) (1,082) (556) (76) —  (84) — 
Total long-term debt $60,448 $ 12,894 $19,741 $ 9,693 $ 8,406 $3,192 $ 4,239 $ 2,968 
(a)    Substantially all electric utility property is mortgaged under mortgage bond indentures.
(b)    Duke Energy includes $256 million of ﬁnance lease purchase accounting adjustments related to Duke Energy Florida related to PPAs that are not
accounted for as ﬁnance leases in their respective ﬁnancial statements because of grandfathering provisions in GAAP.
(c)    Substantially all tax-exempt bonds are secured by ﬁrst mortgage bonds, letters of credit or the Master Credit Facility.
(d)    Includes $625 million that was classiﬁed as Long-Term Debt on the Consolidated Balance Sheets due to the existence of long-term credit facilities that
backstop these commercial paper balances, along with Duke Energy’s ability and intent to reﬁnance these balances on a long-term basis. The
weighted average days to maturity for Duke Energy's commercial paper programs was 15 days.
(e)    Duke Energy includes $1,121 million and $100 million in purchase accounting adjustments related to Progress Energy and Piedmont, respectively.
(f)    Duke Energy includes $29 million in purchase accounting adjustments primarily related to the merger with Progress Energy.
(g)     Refer to Note 18 for additional information on amounts from consolidated VIEs.
Current Maturities of Long-Term Debt
The following table shows the signiﬁcant components of Current maturities of Long-Term Debt on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. The Duke Energy
Registrants currently anticipate satisfying these obligations with cash on hand and proceeds from additional borrowings.
(in millions) Maturity Date Interest Rate December 31, 2022
Unsecured Debt
Duke Energy (Parent) April 2023 2.875 %$ 350 
Duke Energy (Parent) June 2023 3.469 % 500 
Duke Energy (Parent) October 2023 3.950 % 400 
Duke Energy Ohio October 2023 4.272 % 150 
Duke Energy Indiana October 2023 4.118 % 300 
First Mortgage Bonds
Duke Energy Carolinas March 2023 2.500 % 500 
Duke Energy Carolinas March 2023 3.050 % 500 
Duke Energy Progress September 2023 3.375 % 300 
Duke Energy Ohio September 2023 3.800 % 300 
Other 854 
Current maturities of long-term debt $ 4,154 
(a)    Debt has a ﬂoating interest rate.
(b)    Includes ﬁnance lease obligations, amortizing debt, tax-exempt bonds with mandatory put options and small bullet maturities.(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
(f)
(g)
(g)
(a)
(a)
(a)
(b)
161
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DEBT AND CREDIT FACILITIES
Maturities and Call Options
The following table shows the annual maturities of long-term debt for the next ﬁve years and thereafter. Amounts presented exclude short-term notes
payable, commercial paper and money pool borrowings and debt issuance costs for the Subsidiary Registrants.
  December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
2023 $4,154 $ 1,018 $ 697 $ 369 $ 328 $475 $ 303 $ 45 
2024 3,216  19  939  72  867  —  4  40 
2025 4,322  491  1,040  975  65  245  4  205 
2026 2,682  621  345  279  66  45  4  40 
2027 3,203  323  947  233  714  102  177  300 
Thereafter 52,999  11,884  18,642  9,238  7,753  2,415  3,853  2,760 
Total long-term debt, including current
maturities $70,576 $14,356 $22,610 $11,166 $9,793 $3,282 $4,345 $ 3,390 
(a)    Excludes $1,169 million in purchase accounting adjustments related to the Progress Energy merger and the Piedmont acquisition.
The Duke Energy Registrants have the ability under certain debt facilities to call and repay the obligation prior to its scheduled maturity. Therefore, the actual
timing of future cash repayments could be materially diﬀerent than as presented above.
Short-Term Obligations Classiﬁed as Long-Term Debt
Tax-exempt bonds that may be put to the Duke Energy Registrants at the option of the holder and certain commercial paper issuances and money pool
borrowings are classiﬁed as Long-Term Debt on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. These tax-exempt bonds, commercial paper issuances and money pool
borrowings, which are short-term obligations by nature, are classiﬁed as long-term due to Duke Energy’s intent and ability to utilize such borrowings as long-
term ﬁnancing. As Duke Energy’s Master Credit Facility and other bilateral letter of credit agreements have non-cancelable terms in excess of one year as of
the balance sheet date, Duke Energy has the ability to reﬁnance these short-term obligations on a long-term basis. The following tables show short-term
obligations classiﬁed as long-term debt.
  December 31, 2022 and 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Progress Ohio Indiana
Tax-exempt bonds $ 312 $ — $ — $ 27 $ 285 
Commercial paper 625  300  150  25  150 
Total $ 937 $ 300 $ 150 $ 52 $ 435 
(a)    Progress Energy amounts are equal to Duke Energy Progress amounts.
Summary of Signiﬁcant Debt Issuances
In January 2023, Duke Energy Carolinas issued $1.8 billion of ﬁrst mortgage bonds. The issuance was split between a $900 million,10-year tranche at 4.95%
and a $900 million, 30-year tranche at 5.35%. The net proceeds will be used to reﬁnance $1 billion of Duke Energy Carolinas bonds maturing in March 2023,
to pay down short-term debt and for general company purposes.(a)
(a)
162
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DEBT AND CREDIT FACILITIES
The following tables summarize signiﬁcant debt issuances (in millions).
Year Ended December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke
Maturity Interest Duke Energy Energy Energy Energy
Issuance Date Date Rate Energy (Parent) Carolinas Progress Florida Piedmont
Unsecured Debt
May 2022 May 2052 5.050 %$ 400 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 400 
June 2022 June 2028 4.750 % 645  645  —  —  —  — 
June 2022 June 2034 5.306 % 537  537  —  —  —  — 
August 2022 March 2028 4.300 % 900  900  —  —  —  — 
August 2022 August 2032 4.500 % 1,150  1,150  —  —  —  — 
August 2022 August 2052 5.000 % 1,150  1,150  —  —  — 
December 2022 December 2025 5.000 % 500  500  —  —  —  — 
December 2022 December 2027 5.000 % 500  500  —  —  —  — 
First Mortgage Bonds
March 2022 March 2032 2.850 % 500  —  500  —  —  — 
March 2022 March 2052 3.550 % 650  —  650  —  —  — 
March 2022 April 2032 3.400 % 500  —  —  500  —  — 
March 2022 April 2052 4.000 % 400  —  —  400  —  — 
November 2022 November 2052 5.950 % 500  —  —  —  500  — 
Tax-exempt Bonds
June 2022 September 2030 4.000 % 168  168  —  —  —  — 
June 2022 November 2039 4.250 % 234  234  —  —  —  — 
September 2022 October 2046 3.300 % 200  —  —  200  — 
September 2022 October 2046 3.700 % 210  —  —  210  — 
September 2022 October 2046 4.000 % 42  —  —  42  — 
Total issuances $ 9,186 $5,784 $ 1,150 $ 1,352 $ 500 $ 400 
(a) Debt issued to repay a portion of outstanding intercompany short-term debt and for general corporate purposes.
(b) Duke Energy (Parent) issued 600 million euros aggregate principal amount of 3.10% senior notes due June 2028 and 500 million euros aggregate
principal amount of 3.85% senior notes due June 2034. Debt issued to repay a $500 million debt maturity, pay down short-term debt and for general
corporate purposes. Duke Energy's obligations under its euro-denominated ﬁxed-rate notes were eﬀectively converted to ﬁxed-rate U.S. dollars at
issuance through cross-currency swaps, mitigating foreign currency exchange risk associated with the interest and principal payments. See Note 15
for additional information.
(c) Debt issued to repay a portion of short-term debt and for general corporate purposes.
(d) Proceeds will be used to repay a portion of commercial paper and for general corporate purposes.
(e) Debt issued to ﬁnance or reﬁnance, in whole or in part, existing or new eligible projects under the sustainable ﬁnancing framework.
(f) Debt issued to repay a portion of outstanding intercompany short-term debt and for general company purposes.
(g) Debt issued to refund the Ohio Air Quality Development Revenue Refunding bonds, previously held in treasury, which were used to ﬁnance or
reﬁnance portions of certain solid waste disposal facilities. The mandatory purchase date of these bonds is June 1, 2027.
(h) Debt issued to provide funds to refund the prior bonds, which were used to ﬁnance or reﬁnance portions of certain air and water pollution control
equipment and solid waste disposal equipment. The mandatory purchase date of these bonds is October 1, 2026.
(i) Debt issued to provide funds to refund the prior bonds, which were used to ﬁnance or reﬁnance portions of certain air and water pollution control
equipment and solid waste disposal equipment. The mandatory purchase date of these bonds is October 1, 2030.(a)
(b)
(b)
(c)
(c)
(c)
(d)
(d)
(e)
(e)
(e)
(e)
(f)
(g)
(g)
(h)
(i)
(i)
163
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DEBT AND CREDIT FACILITIES
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke
Maturity Interest Duke Energy Energy EnergyEnergy
Issuance Date Date Rate Energy(Parent) Carolinas ProgressFlorida Piedmont
Unsecured Debt
March 2021 March 2031 2.500 %$ 350 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 350 
June 2021 June 2023 0.299 % 500  500  —  —  —  — 
June 2021 June 2031 2.550 % 1,000  1,000  —  —  —  — 
June 2021 June 2041 3.300 % 750  750  —  —  —  — 
June 2021 June 2051 3.500 % 750  750  —  —  —  — 
September 2021 January 2082 3.250 % 500  500  —  —  —  — 
Secured Debt
November 2021 July 2031 1.679 % 100  —  100  —  —  — 
November 2021 July 2041 2.617 % 137  —  137  —  —  — 
November 2021 July 2028 1.295 % 221  —  —  221  —  — 
November 2021 July 2037 2.387 % 352  —  —  352  —  — 
November 2021 July 2041 2.799 % 197  —  —  197  —  — 
First Mortgage Bonds
April 2021 April 2031 2.550 % 550  —  550  —  —  — 
April 2021 April 2051 3.450 % 450  —  450  —  —  — 
August 2021 August 2031 2.000 % 650  —  —  650  —  — 
August 2021 August 2051 2.900 % 450  —  —  450  —  — 
December 2021 December 2031 2.400 % 650  —  —  —  650  — 
December 2021 December 2051 3.000 % 500  —  —  —  500  — 
Total issuances $ 8,107 $3,500 $ 1,237 $ 1,870 $1,150 $ 350 
(a) Debt issued to repay at maturity $160 million senior unsecured notes due June 2021, pay down short-term debt and for general corporate purposes.
(b) Debt has a ﬂoating interest rate.
(c) Debt issued to repay $1.75 billion of Duke Energy (Parent) debt maturities, to repay a portion of short-term debt and for general corporate
purposes.
(d) Debt issued to repay in October 2021 $500 million of Duke Energy (Parent) unsecured notes. The interest rate resets every ﬁve years.
(e) Debt issued to ﬁnance the North Carolina portion of storm restoration expenditures related to Hurricane Florence, Hurricane Michael, Hurricane
Dorian and Winter Storm Diego.
(f) Debt issued to repay at maturity $500 million ﬁrst mortgage bonds due June 2021, pay down short-term debt and for general company purposes.
(g) Debt issued to repay at maturity a total of $600 million ﬁrst mortgage bonds due September 2021, pay down short-term debt and for general
company purposes.
(h) Proceeds were used to ﬁnance or reﬁnance, in whole or in part, existing or new eligible projects under the sustainable ﬁnancing framework.
AVAILABLE CREDIT FACILITIES
Master Credit Facility
In March 2022, Duke Energy amended its existing Master Credit Facility to increase the amount of the facility from $8 billion to $9 billion and to extend the
termination date to March 2027. The Duke Energy Registrants, excluding Progress Energy, have borrowing capacity under the Master Credit Facility up to a
speciﬁed sublimit for each borrower. Duke Energy has the unilateral ability at any time to increase or decrease the borrowing sublimits of each borrower,
subject to a maximum sublimit for each borrower. The amount available under the Master Credit Facility has been reduced to backstop issuances of
commercial paper, certain letters of credit and variable-rate demand tax-exempt bonds that may be put to the Duke Energy Registrants at the option of the
holder.a)
(b)(c)
(c)
(c)
(c)
(d)
(e)
(e)
(e)
(e)
(e)
(f)
(f)
(g)
(g)
(h)
(h)
164
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DEBT AND CREDIT FACILITIES
The table below includes the current borrowing sublimits and available capacity under these credit facilities.
  December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Energy Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy (Parent) Carolinas Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Facility size $9,000 $2,375 $ 1,925 $ 800 $1,150 $900 $1,050 $ 800 
Reduction to backstop issuances
Commercial paper (3,685) 463  (1,533) (389) (605) (522) (585) (514)
Outstanding letters of credit (40) (27) (4) (2) (7) —  —  — 
Tax-exempt bonds (81) —  —  —  —  —  (81) — 
Available capacity $5,194 $2,811 $ 388 $ 409 $ 538 $378 $ 384 $ 286 
(a)    Represents the sublimit of each borrower.
(b)    Duke Energy issued $625 million of commercial paper and loaned the proceeds through the money pool to Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy
Progress, Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana. The balances are classiﬁed as Long-Term Debt Payable to Aﬃliated Companies in the
Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Duke Energy (Parent) Term Loan Facility
On March 9, 2022, Duke Energy (Parent) entered into a Term Loan Credit Agreement (Credit Agreement) with commitments totaling $1.4 billion maturing on
March 9, 2024. The maturity date of the Credit Agreement may be extended for up to two years by request of Duke Energy (Parent), upon satisfaction of
certain conditions contained in the Credit Agreement. Borrowings under the facility were used to repay amounts drawn under the Three-Year Revolving Credit
Facility and for general corporate purposes, including repayment of a portion of Duke Energy's outstanding commercial paper. In December 2022, Duke
Energy (Parent) repaid $400 million of the term loan. The balance is classiﬁed as Long-Term Debt on Duke Energy's Consolidated Balance Sheets. The Three-
Year Revolving Credit Facility was terminated in March 2022.
Duke Energy Florida Term Loan Facility
In October 2022, Duke Energy Florida entered into a term loan facility with commitments totaling $800 million expiring in April 2024. The term loan was fully
drawn at the time of closing In October and borrowings were used for storm costs, under-collected fuel and general company purposes. The balance is
classiﬁed as Long-Term Debt on Duke Energy Florida's Consolidated Balance Sheet.
Other Debt Matters
In September 2022, Duke Energy ﬁled a Form S-3 with the SEC. Under this Form S-3, which is uncapped, the Duke Energy Registrants, excluding Progress
Energy, may issue debt and other securities, including preferred stock, in the future at amounts, prices and with terms to be determined at the time of future
oﬀerings. The registration statement was ﬁled to replace a similar prior ﬁling upon expiration of its three-year term and also allows for the issuance of
common and preferred stock by Duke Energy.
Also in September 2022, to replace another similar prior ﬁling, Duke Energy ﬁled an eﬀective Form S-3 with the SEC to sell up to $4 billion of variable
denomination ﬂoating-rate demand notes, called PremierNotes. The Form S-3 states that no more than $2 billion of the notes will be outstanding at any
particular time. The notes are oﬀered on a continuous basis and bear interest at a ﬂoating rate per annum determined by the Duke Energy PremierNotes
Committee, or its designee, on a weekly basis. The interest rate payable on notes held by an investor may vary based on the principal amount of the
investment. The notes have no stated maturity date, are non-transferable and may be redeemed in whole or in part by Duke Energy or at the investor’s
option at any time. The balance as of December 31, 2022, and 2021, was $897 million and $1,066 million, respectively. The notes are short-term debt
obligations of Duke Energy and are reﬂected as Notes payable and commercial paper on Duke Energy’s Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Money Pool and Intercompany Credit Agreements
The Subsidiary Registrants, excluding Progress Energy, are eligible to receive support for their short-term borrowing needs through participation with Duke
Energy and certain of its subsidiaries in a money pool arrangement. Under this arrangement, those companies with short-term funds may provide short-term
loans to aﬃliates participating in this arrangement. The money pool is structured such that the Subsidiary Registrants, excluding Progress Energy, separately
manage their cash needs and working capital requirements. Accordingly, there is no net settlement of receivables and payables between money pool
participants. Duke Energy (Parent), may loan funds to its participating subsidiaries, but may not borrow funds through the money pool. Accordingly, as the
money pool activity is between Duke Energy and its subsidiaries, all money pool balances are eliminated within Duke Energy’s Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Money pool receivable balances are reﬂected within Notes receivable from aﬃliated companies on the Subsidiary Registrants’ Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Money pool payable balances are reﬂected within either Notes payable to aﬃliated companies or Long-Term Debt Payable to Aﬃliated Companies on the
Subsidiary Registrants’ Consolidated Balance Sheets.
In March 2022, Progress Energy closed a revolving credit agreement with Duke Energy (Parent), which allowed up to $2.5 billion in intercompany borrowings.(a)
(b)
165
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DEBT AND CREDIT FACILITIES
Restrictive Debt Covenants
The Duke Energy Registrants’ debt and credit agreements contain various ﬁnancial and other covenants. Duke Energy's Master Credit Facility contains a
covenant requiring the debt-to-total capitalization ratio not to exceed 65% for each borrower, excluding Piedmont, and 70% for Piedmont. Failure to meet
those covenants beyond applicable grace periods could result in accelerated due dates and/or termination of the agreements. As of December 31, 2022,
Duke Energy presented approximately $131 million of long-term debt as current on the Consolidated Balance Sheet as a result of a technical default due to
the bankruptcy ﬁling of a Duke Energy customer. The Duke Energy Registrants were in compliance with all other covenants related to their debt agreements
as of December 31, 2022. In addition, some credit agreements may allow for acceleration of payments or termination of the agreements due to nonpayment,
or acceleration of other signiﬁcant indebtedness of the borrower or some of its subsidiaries. None of the debt or credit agreements contain material adverse
change clauses.
Other Loans
As of December 31, 2022, and 2021, Duke Energy had loans outstanding of $852 million, including $33 million at Duke Energy Progress and $819 million,
including $34 million at Duke Energy Progress, respectively, against the cash surrender value of life insurance policies it owns on the lives of its executives.
The amounts outstanding were carried as a reduction of the related cash surrender value that is included in Other within Other Noncurrent Assets on the
Consolidated Balance Sheets.
8. GUARANTEES AND INDEMNIFICATIONS
Duke Energy has various ﬁnancial and performance guarantees and indemniﬁcations with non-consolidated entities, which are issued in the normal course of
business. As discussed below, these contracts include performance guarantees, standby letters of credit, debt guarantees and indemniﬁcations and include
guarantees and indemniﬁcations related to Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups. Duke Energy enters into these arrangements to facilitate commercial
transactions with third parties by enhancing the value of the transaction to the third party. At December 31, 2022, Duke Energy does not believe conditions
are likely for signiﬁcant performance under these guarantees. To the extent liabilities are incurred as a result of the activities covered by the guarantees,
such liabilities are included on the accompanying Consolidated Balance Sheets.
On January 2, 2007, Duke Energy completed the spin-oﬀ of its previously wholly owned natural gas businesses to shareholders. Guarantees issued by Duke
Energy or its aﬃliates, or assigned to Duke Energy prior to the spin-oﬀ, remained with Duke Energy subsequent to the spin-oﬀ. Guarantees issued by Spectra
Energy Capital, LLC (Spectra Capital) or its aﬃliates prior to the spin-oﬀ remained with Spectra Capital subsequent to the spin-oﬀ, except for guarantees that
were later assigned to Duke Energy. Duke Energy has indemniﬁed Spectra Capital against any losses incurred under certain of the guarantee obligations that
remain with Spectra Capital. At December 31, 2022, the maximum potential amount of future payments associated with these guarantees were $40 million,
the majority of which expire by 2028.
In October 2017, ACP executed a $3.4 billion revolving credit facility with a stated maturity date of October 2021. Duke Energy entered into a guarantee
agreement to support its share of the ACP revolving credit facility. In July 2020, ACP reduced the size of the credit facility to $1.9 billion. Duke Energy's
maximum exposure to loss under the terms of the guarantee was $860 million as of December 31, 2020. This amount represented 47% of the outstanding
borrowings under the credit facility and was recognized within Other Current Liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets at December 31, 2020, of which
$95 million was previously recognized due the adoption of new guidance for credit losses eﬀective January 1, 2020. In February 2021, Duke Energy paid
approximately $855 million to fund ACP's outstanding debt, relieving Duke Energy of its guarantee. See Notes 4 and 13 for more information.
In addition to the Spectra Capital and ACP revolving credit facility guarantees above, Duke Energy has issued performance guarantees to customers and
other third parties that guarantee the payment and performance of other parties, including certain non-wholly owned entities, as well as guarantees of debt
of certain non-consolidated entities. If such entities were to default on payments or performance, Duke Energy would be required under the guarantees to
make payments on the obligations of these entities. The maximum potential amount of future payments required under these guarantees as of
December 31, 2022, was $33 million of which all expire between 2024 and 2030, with the remaining performance guarantees having no contractual
expiration. Additionally, certain guarantees have uncapped maximum potential payments; however, Duke Energy does not believe these guarantees will
have a material eﬀect on its results of operations, cash ﬂows or ﬁnancial position.
Duke Energy uses bank-issued standby letters of credit to secure the performance of wholly owned and non-wholly owned entities to a third party or
customer. Under these arrangements, Duke Energy has payment obligations to the issuing bank that are triggered by a draw by the third party or customer
due to the failure of the wholly owned or non-wholly owned entity to perform according to the terms of its underlying contract. At December 31, 2022, Duke
Energy had issued a total of $667 million in letters of credit, which expire between 2023 and 2028. The unused amount under these letters of credit was $35
million.
Duke Energy recognized $2 million and $3 million as of December 31, 2022, and 2021, respectively, primarily in Other within Other Noncurrent Liabilities on
the Consolidated Balance Sheets, for the guarantees discussed above. As current estimates change, additional losses related to guarantees and
indemniﬁcations to third parties, which could be material, may be recorded by the Duke Energy Registrants in the future.
9. JOINT OWNERSHIP OF GENERATING AND TRANSMISSION FACILITIES
The Duke Energy Registrants maintain ownership interests in certain jointly owned generating and transmission facilities. The Duke Energy Registrants are
entitled to a share of the generating capacity and output of each unit equal to their respective ownership interests. The Duke Energy Registrants pay their
ownership share of additional construction costs, fuel inventory purchases and operating expenses. The Duke Energy Registrants share of revenues and
operating costs of the jointly owned facilities is included within the corresponding line in the Consolidated Statements of Operations. Each participant in the
jointly owned facilities must provide its own ﬁnancing.
166
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS JOINT OWNERSHIP OF GENERATING AND TRANSMISSION FACILITIES
The following table presents the Duke Energy Registrants' interest of jointly owned plant or facilities and amounts included on the Consolidated Balance
Sheets. All facilities are operated by the Duke Energy Registrants and are included in the Electric Utilities and Infrastructure segment.
  December 31, 2022
Construction
Ownership Property, Plant Accumulated Work in
(in millions except for ownership interest) Interestand Equipment Depreciation Progress
Duke Energy Carolinas       
Catawba (units 1 and 2) 19.25 %$ 1,047 $ 546 $ 32 
W.S. Lee CC 87.27 % 613  86  48 
Duke Energy Indiana        
Gibson (unit 5) 50.05 % 450  241  2 
Vermillion 62.50 % 182  113  1 
Transmission and local facilities Various 6,718  1,510  157 
(a)    Jointly owned with North Carolina Municipal Power Agency Number 1, NCEMC and PMPA.
(b)    Jointly owned with NCEMC.
(c)    Jointly owned with WVPA and IMPA.
(d)    Jointly owned with WVPA.
10. ASSET RETIREMENT OBLIGATIONS
Duke Energy records an ARO when it has a legal obligation to incur retirement costs associated with the retirement of a long-lived asset and the obligation
can be reasonably estimated. Certain assets of the Duke Energy Registrants have an indeterminate life, such as transmission and distribution facilities, and
thus the fair value of the retirement obligation is not reasonably estimable. A liability for these AROs will be recorded when a fair value is determinable.
The Duke Energy Registrants’ regulated operations accrue costs of removal for property that does not have an associated legal retirement obligation based
on regulatory orders from state commissions. These costs of removal are recorded as a regulatory liability in accordance with regulatory accounting
treatment. The Duke Energy Registrants do not accrue the estimated cost of removal for any nonregulated assets. See Note 4 for the estimated cost of
removal for assets without an associated legal retirement obligation, which are included in Regulatory liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
The following table presents the AROs recorded on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Decommissioning of nuclear power facilities $7,261 $ 3,009 $ 4,217 $ 3,948 $ 270 $ — $ — $ — 
Closure of ash impoundments 5,176  2,309  1,862  1,833  29  95  911  — 
Other 291  64  102  42  59  59  40  26 
Total asset retirement obligation $12,728 $ 5,382 $ 6,181 $ 5,823 $ 358 $ 154 $ 951 $ 26 
Less: Current portion 773  261  289  288  1  17  207  — 
Total noncurrent asset retirement obligation $11,955 $ 5,121 $ 5,892 $ 5,535 $ 357 $ 137 $ 744 $ 26 
(a)    Duke Energy amount includes purchase accounting adjustments related to the merger with Progress Energy.
Nuclear Decommissioning Liability
AROs related to nuclear decommissioning are based on site-speciﬁc cost studies. The NCUC, PSCSC and FPSC require updated cost estimates for
decommissioning nuclear plants every ﬁve years.
The following table summarizes information about the most recent site-speciﬁc nuclear decommissioning cost studies. Decommissioning costs are stated in
2018 or 2019 dollars, depending on the year of the cost study, and include costs to decommission plant components not subject to radioactive
contamination.
Annual Funding Decommissioning
(in millions) Requirement Costs Year of Cost Study
Duke Energy $ 10 $ 9,105  2018 or 2019
Duke Energy Carolinas —  4,365  2018
Duke Energy Progress 10  4,181  2019
Duke Energy Florida —  559  N/A(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(c)
(a)
(a) (a)
(b)(c)
(d)
(e)
167
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS ASSET RETIREMENT OBLIGATIONS
(a)    Amount represents annual funding requirement for the current ﬁscal year. Amounts for Progress Energy equal the sum of Duke Energy Progress and
Duke Energy Florida.
(b)    Decommissioning costs for Duke Energy Carolinas reﬂects its ownership interest in jointly owned reactors. Other joint owners are responsible for
decommissioning costs related to their interest in the reactors.
(c)    Duke Energy Carolinas' site-speciﬁc nuclear decommissioning cost study completed in 2018 was ﬁled with the NCUC and PSCSC in 2019. A new funding
study was also completed and ﬁled with the NCUC and PSCSC in 2019.
(d)    Duke Energy Progress' site-speciﬁc nuclear decommissioning cost study completed in 2019 was ﬁled with the NCUC and PSCSC in March 2020. Duke
Energy Progress also completed a funding study, which was ﬁled with the NCUC and PSCSC in July 2020. In October 2021, Duke Energy Progress
ﬁled the 2019 nuclear decommissioning cost study with the FERC, as well as a revised rate schedule for decommissioning expense to be collected
from wholesale customers. The FERC accepted the ﬁling, as ﬁled on December 9, 2021.
(e)    During 2019, Duke Energy Florida reached an agreement to transfer decommissioning work for Crystal River Unit 3 to a third party and
decommissioning costs are based on the agreement with this third party rather than a cost study. Regulatory approval was received from the NRC
and the FPSC in April 2020 and August 2020, respectively.
Nuclear Decommissioning Trust Funds
Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida each maintain NDTFs that are intended to pay for the decommissioning costs of their
respective nuclear power plants. The NDTF investments are managed and invested in accordance with applicable requirements of various regulatory bodies
including the NRC, FERC, NCUC, PSCSC, FPSC and the IRS.
Use of the NDTF investments is restricted to nuclear decommissioning activities including license termination, spent fuel and site restoration. The license
termination and spent fuel obligations relate to contaminated decommissioning and are recorded as AROs. The site restoration obligation relates to non-
contaminated decommissioning and is recorded to cost of removal within Regulatory liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
The following table presents the fair value of NDTF assets legally restricted for purposes of settling AROs associated with nuclear decommissioning. Duke
Energy Florida entered into an agreement with a third party to decommission Crystal River Unit 3 and was granted an exemption from the NRC, which allows
for use of the NDTF for all aspects of nuclear decommissioning. The entire balance of Duke Energy Florida's NDTF may be applied toward license termination,
spent fuel and site restoration costs incurred to decommission Crystal River Unit 3 and is excluded from the table below. See Note 17 for additional
information related to the fair value of the Duke Energy Registrants' NDTFs.
December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021
Duke Energy $ 7,466 $ 8,933 
Duke Energy Carolinas 4,208  5,068 
Duke Energy Progress 3,258  3,865 
Nuclear Operating Licenses
As described in Note 4, Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress intend to seek renewal of operating licenses and 20-year license extensions for all
of their nuclear stations. The following table includes the current expiration of nuclear operating licenses.
Unit Year of Expiration
Duke Energy Carolinas
Catawba Units 1 and 2 2043
McGuire Unit 1 2041
McGuire Unit 2 2043
Oconee Units 1 and 2 2033
Oconee Unit 3 2034
Duke Energy Progress
Brunswick Unit 1 2036
Brunswick Unit 2 2034
Harris 2046
Robinson 2030
The NRC has acknowledged permanent cessation of operation and permanent removal of fuel from the reactor vessel at Crystal River Unit 3. Therefore, the
license no longer authorizes operation of the reactor. During 2019, Duke Energy Florida entered into an agreement for the accelerated decommissioning of
Crystal River Unit 3. Regulatory approval was received from the NRC and the FPSC in April 2020 and August 2020, respectively. See Note 4 for more
information.
Closure of Ash Impoundments
The Duke Energy Registrants are subject to state and federal regulations covering the closure of coal ash impoundments, including the EPA CCR rule and the
Coal Ash Act, and other agreements. AROs recorded on the Duke Energy Registrants' Consolidated Balance Sheets include the legal obligation for closure of
coal ash basins and the disposal of related ash as a result of these regulations and agreements.
168
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS ASSET RETIREMENT OBLIGATIONS
The ARO amount recorded on the Consolidated Balance Sheets is based upon estimated closure costs for impacted ash impoundments. The amount recorded
represents the discounted cash ﬂows for estimated closure costs based upon speciﬁc closure plans. Actual costs to be incurred will be dependent upon
factors that vary from site to site. The most signiﬁcant factors are the method and time frame of closure at the individual sites. Closure methods considered
include removing the water from ash basins, consolidating material as necessary and capping the ash with a synthetic barrier, excavating and relocating the
ash to a lined structural ﬁll or lined landﬁll or recycling the ash for concrete or some other beneﬁcial use. The ultimate method and timetable for closure will
be in compliance with standards set by federal and state regulations and other agreements. The ARO amount will be adjusted as additional information is
gained through the closure and post-closure process, including acceptance and approval of compliance approaches, which may change management
assumptions, and may result in a material change to the balance. See ARO Liability Rollforward section below for information on revisions made to the coal
ash liability during 2022 and 2021.
Asset retirement costs associated with the AROs for operating plants and retired plants are included in Net property, plant and equipment and Regulatory
assets, respectively, on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. See Note 4 for additional information on Regulatory assets related to AROs and Note 5 for
additional information on commitments and contingencies.
Cost recovery for future expenditures will be pursued through the normal ratemaking process with federal and state utility commissions, which permit
recovery of necessary and prudently incurred costs associated with Duke Energy’s regulated operations. See Note 4 for additional information on recovery of
coal ash costs.
ARO Liability Rollforward
The following tables present changes in the liability associated with AROs.
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Balance at December 31, 2020 $12,854 $ 5,350 $ 6,149 $ 5,635 $ 514 $ 111 $ 1,176 $ 20 
Accretion expense 504  242  229  212  17  4  35  1 
Liabilities settled (613) (210) (324) (214) (110) (3) (77) — 
Liabilities incurred in the current year 14  8  6  —  6  —  —  — 
Revisions in estimates of cash ﬂows (159) (89) 52  42  10  24  (147) 1 
Balance at December 31, 2021 12,600  5,301  6,112  5,675  437  136  987  22 
Accretion expense 501  242  229  215  14  6  30  1 
Liabilities settled (680) (234) (334) (228) (106) (13) (98) — 
Liabilities incurred in the current year 22  —  18  —  18  —  5  — 
Revisions in estimates of cash ﬂows 285  73  156  161  (5) 25  27  3 
Balance at December 31, 2022 $12,728 $ 5,382 $ 6,181 $ 5,823 $ 358 $ 154 $ 951 $ 26 
(a)    Substantially all accretion expense for the years ended December 31, 2022, and 2021, relates to Duke Energy’s regulated operations and has been
deferred in accordance with regulatory accounting treatment.
(b)    Amounts primarily relate to ash impoundment closures and nuclear decommissioning.
(c)    The amounts recorded represent the discounted cash ﬂows for estimated closure costs as evaluated on a site-by-site basis. The increases in 2022
primarily relate to higher unit costs associated with basin closure and routine maintenance. The decreases in 2021 primarily relate to revised basin
closure cost estimates, partially oﬀset by increases related to new closure plan approvals, post closure maintenance and beneﬁciation costs.(a)
(b)
(c)
(a)
(b)
(c)
169
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS PROPERTY, PLANT AND EQUIPMENT
11. PROPERTY, PLANT AND EQUIPMENT
The following tables summarize the property, plant and equipment for Duke Energy and its subsidiary registrants.
December 31, 2022
Average
Remaining Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Useful Life Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) (Years) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Land $2,232 $ 565 $ 993 $ 496 $ 497 $230 $ 124 $ 295 
Plant – Regulated
Electric generation,
distribution and
transmission 39 126,016  46,640  55,872  33,336  22,536  6,900  16,604  — 
Natural gas
transmission and
distribution 56 13,174  —  —  —  —  3,773  —  9,401 
Other buildings and
improvements 40 2,537  973  647  341  306  398  336  183 
Plant – Nonregulated  
Other buildings and
improvements 10 369  —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Nuclear fuel 3,081  1,723  1,358  1,358  —  —  —  — 
Equipment 13 2,959  710  936  567  369  441  356  125 
Construction in process 7,381  2,671  3,073  1,317  1,756  375  381  478 
Other 15 6,090  1,368  1,943  1,460  476  380  320  387 
Total property, plant and
equipment 163,839  54,650  64,822  38,875  25,940 12,497  18,121  10,869 
Total accumulated depreciation
– regulated (50,544) (18,669) (20,584) (14,201) (6,377)(3,250) (6,021) (2,081)
Total accumulated depreciation
– nonregulated (1,556) —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Facilities to be retired, net 9  —  —  —  —  —  —  9 
Total net property, plant and
equipment $111,748 $35,981 $44,238 $24,674 $19,563 $9,247 $12,100 $ 8,797 
(a)    Includes ﬁnance leases of $816 million, $335 million, $674 million, $590 million, $84 million and $10 million at Duke Energy, Duke Energy Carolinas,
Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida and Duke Energy Indiana, respectively, primarily within Plant – Regulated. The Progress
Energy, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida amounts are net of $233 million, $81 million and $152 million, respectively, of accumulated
amortization of ﬁnance leases.
(b)    Includes $1,683 million, $934 million, $749 million and $749 million of accumulated amortization of nuclear fuel at Duke Energy, Duke Energy Carolinas,
Progress Energy and Duke Energy Progress, respectively.
(c)    Includes accumulated amortization of ﬁnance leases of $7 million, $51 million and $4 million at Duke Energy, Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy
Indiana, respectively.
(d)    Includes accumulated amortization of ﬁnance leases of ($1 million) at Duke Energy.(a)
(b)(c)
(d)
170
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS PROPERTY, PLANT AND EQUIPMENT
December 31, 2021
Average
Remaining Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Useful Life Duke Energy Progress Energy EnergyEnergy Energy
(in millions) (Years) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Land $ 2,145 $ 543 $ 957 $ 482 $ 475 $ 219 $ 122 $ 279 
Plant – Regulated
Electric generation,
distribution and
transmission 40 120,855  44,910  53,447  32,417  21,030  6,573  15,925  — 
Natural gas
transmission and
distribution 54 12,079  —  —  —  —  3,347  —  8,732 
Other buildings and
improvements 37 1,921  550  514  228  286  381  321  155 
Plant – Nonregulated
Other buildings and
improvements 11 401  —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Nuclear fuel 3,181  1,856  1,325  1,325  —  —  —  — 
Equipment 13 2,659  614  791  497  294  403  262  122 
Construction in process 5,979  2,078  2,297  954  1,343  515  460  262 
Other 14 5,276  1,323  1,563  1,115  437  287  253  368 
Total property, plant and
equipment 154,496  51,874  60,894  37,018  23,865 11,725  17,343  9,918 
Total accumulated depreciation
– regulated (47,611) (17,854) (19,214) (13,387) (5,819) (3,106) (5,583) (1,899)
Total accumulated depreciation
– nonregulated (1,493) —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Facilities to be retired, net 144  102  26  26  —  6  —  11 
Total net property, plant and
equipment $105,536 $ 34,122 $41,706 $23,657 $18,046 $8,625 $11,760 $ 8,030 
(a)    Includes ﬁnance leases of $958 million, $335 million, $729 million, $627 million, $102 million, and $10 million at Duke Energy, Duke Energy Carolinas,
Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida and Duke Energy Indiana, respectively, primarily within Plant – Regulated. The Progress
Energy, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida amounts are net of $178 million, $45 million and $133 million, respectively, of accumulated
amortization of ﬁnance leases.
(b)    Includes $1,799 million, $1,064 million, $735 million and $735 million of accumulated amortization of nuclear fuel at Duke Energy, Duke Energy
Carolinas, Progress Energy and Duke Energy Progress, respectively.
(c)    Includes accumulated amortization of ﬁnance leases of $9 million, $33 million, and $3 million at Duke Energy, Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy
Indiana, respectively.
(d)    Includes accumulated amortization of ﬁnance leases of ($1 million) at Duke Energy.
Duke Energy continues to execute on its business transformation strategy, including the evaluation of in-oﬃce work policies considering the experience with
the COVID-19 pandemic and also workforce realignment of roles and responsibilities. In May 2021, Duke Energy management approved the sale of certain
properties and entered into an agreement to exit certain leased space on December 31, 2021. The sale of the properties is subject to abandonment
accounting and resulted in an impairment charge. Additionally, the exit of the leased space resulted in the impairment of related furniture, ﬁxtures and
equipment. During the year ended December 31, 2021, Duke Energy recorded a pretax charge to earnings of $192 million on the Consolidated Statements of
Operations, which includes $133 million within Impairment of assets and other charges, $42 million within Operations, maintenance and other and
$17 million within Depreciation and amortization.
The following table presents capitalized interest, which includes the debt component of AFUDC.
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Duke Energy $ 118 $ 66 $ 96 
Duke Energy Carolinas 50  29  28 
Progress Energy 26  20  17 
Duke Energy Progress 19  14  12 
Duke Energy Florida 7  6  5 
Duke Energy Ohio 14  20  26 
Duke Energy Indiana 3  (17) 10 
Piedmont 4  9  8 
(a)    In 2021, Duke Energy Indiana is primarily compromised of ($24 million) of PISCC amortization, which is partially oﬀset by $7 million of the debt
component of AFUDC.(a)
(b)(c)
(d)
(a)
171
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS GOODWILL AND INTANGIBLE ASSETS
12. GOODWILL AND INTANGIBLE ASSETS
GOODWILL
Duke Energy
Duke Energy's Goodwill balance of $19.3 billion is allocated $17.4 billion to EU&I and $1.9 billion to GU&I on Duke Energy's Consolidated Balance Sheets at
December 31, 2022, and 2021. There are no accumulated impairment charges.
Duke Energy Ohio
Duke Energy Ohio's Goodwill balance of $920 million, allocated $596 million to EU&I and $324 million to GU&I, is presented net of accumulated impairment
charges of $216 million on the Consolidated Balance Sheets at December 31, 2022, and 2021.
Progress Energy
Progress Energy's Goodwill is included in the EU&I segment and there are no accumulated impairment charges.
Piedmont
Piedmont's Goodwill is included in the GU&I segment and there are no accumulated impairment charges.
Goodwill Impairment Testing
Duke Energy, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Ohio and Piedmont are required to perform an annual goodwill impairment test as of the same date each year
and, accordingly, perform their annual impairment testing of goodwill as of August 31. Duke Energy, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Ohio and Piedmont
update their test between annual tests if events or circumstances occur that would more likely than not reduce the fair value of a reporting unit below its
carrying value. As the fair value for Duke Energy, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Ohio and Piedmont exceeded their respective carrying values at the date of
the annual impairment analysis, no goodwill impairment charges were recorded in 2022.
INTANGIBLE ASSETS
The following tables show the carrying amount and accumulated amortization of intangible assets included in Other within Other Noncurrent Assets on the
Consolidated Balance Sheets of the Duke Energy Registrants at December 31, 2022, and 2021.
  December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Emission allowances $ 8 $ — $ 5 $ 2 $ 3 $ — $ 2 $ — 
Renewable energy certiﬁcates 210  84  124  124  —  2  —  — 
Other 55  —  4  1  3  —  —  22 
Total gross carrying amounts 273  84  133  127  6  2  2  22 
Accumulated amortization – other (8) —  (1) —  (1) —  —  (2)
Total accumulated amortization (8) —  (1) —  (1) —  —  (2)
Total intangible assets, net $ 265 $ 84 $ 132 $ 127 $ 5 $ 2 $ 2 $ 20 
  December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Emission allowances $ 8 $ — $ 5 $ 2 $ 3 $ — $ 2 $ — 
Renewable energy certiﬁcates 204  73  131  131  —  —  —  — 
Natural gas, coal and power contracts 24  —  —  —  —  —  24  — 
Other 28  —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Total gross carrying amounts 264  73  136  133  3  —  26  — 
Accumulated amortization – natural
gas, coal and power contracts (24) —  —  —  —  —  (24) — 
Accumulated amortization – other (4) —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Total accumulated amortization (28) —  —  —  —  —  (24) — 
Total intangible assets, net $ 236 $ 73 $ 136 $ 133 $ 3 $ — $ 2 $ — 
Amortization Expense
Amortization expense amounts for other intangible assets are immaterial for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, and are expected to be
immaterial for the next ﬁve years as of December 31, 2022.
172
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS INVESTMENTS IN UNCONSOLIDATED AFFILIATES
13. INVESTMENTS IN UNCONSOLIDATED AFFILIATES
EQUITY METHOD INVESTMENTS
Investments in aﬃliates that are not controlled by Duke Energy, but over which it has signiﬁcant inﬂuence, are accounted for using the equity method.
The following table presents Duke Energy’s investments in unconsolidated aﬃliates accounted for under the equity method, as well as the respective equity
in earnings, by segment, for periods presented in this ﬁling.
  Years Ended December 31,
  2022 2021 2020
Equity in Equity in Equity in
earnings earnings earnings
(in millions) Investments (losses) Investments (losses) (losses)
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure $ 99 $ 7 $ 104 $ 7 $ (1)
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure 240  21  231  8  (2,017)
Other 116  85  122  47  13 
Total $ 455 $ 113 $ 457 $ 62 $ (2,005)
During the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, Duke Energy received distributions from equity investments of $111 million, $56 million and
$34 million, respectively, which are included in Other assets within Cash Flows from Operating Activities on the Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows.
During the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, Duke Energy received distributions from equity investments of $6 million, $14 million and $23
million, respectively, which are included in Return of investment capital within Cash Flows from Investing Activities on the Consolidated Statements of Cash
Flows.
During the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, Piedmont received distributions from equity investments of $31 million, $8 million and $2
million, respectively, which are included in Other assets within Cash Flows from Operating Activities. During the years ended December 31, 2021, and 2020,
Piedmont received distributions from equity investments of $2 million and $2 million, respectively, which are included within Cash Flows from Investing
Activities on the Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows. Amounts received during the year ended December 31, 2022, included in Cash Flows from Investing
Activities on the Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows were immaterial.
Signiﬁcant investments in aﬃliates accounted for under the equity method are discussed below.
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure
Duke Energy owns 50% interests in both DATC and Pioneer, which build, own and operate electric transmission facilities in North America.
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure
Pipeline Investments
Piedmont owns a 21.49% investment in Cardinal, an intrastate pipeline located in North Carolina.
Duke Energy owns a 7.5% interest in Sabal Trail, a 517-mile interstate natural gas pipeline, which provides natural gas to Duke Energy Florida and Florida
Power and Light.
Duke Energy owns a 47% interest in the ACP pipeline. In 2020, Duke Energy determined it would no longer continue its investment in the construction of the
ACP pipeline. See Notes 4 and 8 for further information.
Storage Facilities
Piedmont owns a 45% interest in Pine Needle, an interstate LNG storage facility located in North Carolina, and a 50% interest in Hardy Storage, an
underground interstate natural gas storage facility located in West Virginia.
Renewable Natural Gas Investments
Duke Energy owns a 29.68% investment in SustainRNG, a developer of renewable natural gas projects, a 70% interest in Sustain T&W, SustainRNG's
renewable natural gas project located in Georgia, and a 70% interest in Sustain Liberty, SustainRNG's renewable natural gas project located in North
Carolina.
Other
Duke Energy has a 17.5% indirect economic ownership interest and a 25% board representation and voting rights interest in NMC, which owns and operates
a methanol and MTBE business in Jubail, Saudi Arabia.
173
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS INVESTMENTS IN UNCONSOLIDATED AFFILIATES
Signiﬁcant Subsidiaries
For the year ended December 31, 2020, Duke Energy's investment in ACP met the requirements of S-X Rule 4-08(g) to provide summarized ﬁnancial
information. The following table provides summary information for ACP as required under S-X Rule 1-02(bb) for the period of signiﬁcance in Duke Energy's
consolidated statements of operations. For the years ended December 31, 2022, and 2021, there were no investments that met the signiﬁcance
requirements.
Year Ended
December 31, 2020
Net revenues $ — 
Operating loss (4,612)
Net loss (4,512)
Net loss attributable to Duke Energy $ (2,121)
14. RELATED PARTY TRANSACTIONS
The Subsidiary Registrants engage in related party transactions in accordance with the applicable state and federal commission regulations. Refer to the
Consolidated Balance Sheets of the Subsidiary Registrants for balances due to or due from related parties. Material amounts related to transactions with
related parties included in the Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income are presented in the following table.
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Duke Energy Carolinas      
Corporate governance and shared service expenses $ 838 $ 894 $ 753 
Indemniﬁcation coverages 28  24  20 
Joint Dispatch Agreement (JDA) revenue 109  41  25 
JDA expense 600  207  114 
Intercompany natural gas purchases 12  11  15 
Progress Energy  
Corporate governance and shared service expenses $ 818 $ 856 $ 715 
Indemniﬁcation coverages 43  41  36 
JDA revenue 600  207  114 
JDA expense 109  41  25 
Intercompany natural gas purchases 76  75  75 
Duke Energy Progress  
Corporate governance and shared service expenses $ 469 $ 504 $ 420 
Indemniﬁcation coverages 20  19  17 
JDA revenue 600  207  114 
JDA expense 109  41  25 
Intercompany natural gas purchases 76  75  75 
Duke Energy Florida  
Corporate governance and shared service expenses $ 349 $ 352 $ 295 
Indemniﬁcation coverages 23  22  19 
Duke Energy Ohio  
Corporate governance and shared service expenses $ 334 $ 329 $ 326 
Indemniﬁcation coverages 5  4  4 
Duke Energy Indiana  
Corporate governance and shared service expenses $ 447 $ 409 $ 401 
Indemniﬁcation coverages 8  8  8 
Piedmont
Corporate governance and shared service expenses $ 155 $ 139 $ 140 
Indemniﬁcation coverages 3  3  3 
Intercompany natural gas sales 88  86  90 
Natural gas storage and transportation costs 23  22  23 (a)
(b)
(c)
(c)
(d)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(c)
(d)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(c)
(d)
(a)
(b)
(a)
(b)
(a)
(b)
(a)
(b)
(d)
(e)
174
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS RELATED PARTY TRANSACTIONS
(a) The Subsidiary Registrants are charged their proportionate share of corporate governance and other shared services costs, primarily related to
human resources, employee beneﬁts, information technology, legal and accounting fees, as well as other third-party costs. These amounts are
primarily recorded in Operation, maintenance and other on the Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income.
(b) The Subsidiary Registrants incur expenses related to certain indemniﬁcation coverages through Bison, Duke Energy’s wholly owned captive
insurance subsidiary. These expenses are recorded in Operation, maintenance and other on the Consolidated Statements of Operations and
Comprehensive Income.
(c) Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress participate in a JDA, which allows the collective dispatch of power plants between the service
territories to reduce customer rates. Revenues from the sale of power and expenses from the purchase of power pursuant to the JDA are recorded in
Operating Revenues and Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power, respectively, on the Consolidated Statements of Operations and
Comprehensive Income.
(d) Piedmont provides long-term natural gas delivery service to certain Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress natural gas-ﬁred generation
facilities. Piedmont records the sales in Operating Revenues, and Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress record the related purchases as
a component of Fuel used in electric generation and purchased power on their respective Consolidated Statements of Operations and
Comprehensive Income. These intercompany revenues and expenses are eliminated in consolidation.
(e) Piedmont has related party transactions as a customer of its equity method investments in Pine Needle, Hardy Storage, and Cardinal natural gas
storage and transportation facilities. These expenses are included in Cost of natural gas on Piedmont's Consolidated Statements of Operations and
Comprehensive Income.
In addition to the amounts presented above, the Subsidiary Registrants have other aﬃliate transactions, including rental of oﬃce space, participation in a
money pool arrangement, other operational transactions and their proportionate share of certain charged expenses. See Note 7 for more information
regarding money pool. These transactions of the Subsidiary Registrants are incurred in the ordinary course of business and are eliminated in consolidation.
As discussed in Note 18, certain trade receivables have been sold by Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana to CRC, an aﬃliate formed by a subsidiary
of Duke Energy. The proceeds obtained from the sales of receivables are largely cash but do include a subordinated note from CRC for a portion of the
purchase price.
Intercompany Income Taxes
Duke Energy and the Subsidiary Registrants ﬁle a consolidated federal income tax return and other state and jurisdictional returns. The Subsidiary
Registrants have a tax sharing agreement with Duke Energy for the allocation of consolidated tax liabilities and beneﬁts. Income taxes recorded represent
amounts the Subsidiary Registrants would incur as separate C-Corporations. The following table includes the balance of intercompany income tax receivables
and payables for the Subsidiary Registrants.
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
December 31, 2022
Intercompany income tax receivable $ — $ 95 $ 36 $ 17 $ — $ — $ — 
Intercompany income tax payable 37  —  —  —  17  18  38 
December 31, 2021
Intercompany income tax receivable $ — $ — $ — $ 40 $ 19 $ — $ — 
Intercompany income tax payable 62  —  84  —  —  10  27 
15. DERIVATIVES AND HEDGING
The Duke Energy Registrants use commodity, interest rate and foreign currency contracts to manage commodity price risk, interest rate risk and foreign
currency exchange rate risk. The primary use of commodity derivatives is to hedge the generation portfolio against changes in the prices of electricity and
natural gas. Piedmont enters into natural gas supply contracts to provide diversiﬁcation, reliability and natural gas cost beneﬁts to its customers. Interest
rate derivatives are used to manage interest rate risk associated with borrowings. Foreign currency derivatives are used to manage risk related to foreign
currency exchange rates on certain issuances of debt. Derivatives related to interest rate risk for the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups are included
in the following disclosures. See Note 2 for further information.
All derivative instruments not identiﬁed as NPNS are recorded at fair value as assets or liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Cash collateral related
to derivative instruments executed under master netting arrangements is oﬀset against the collateralized derivatives on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
The cash impacts of settled derivatives are recorded as operating activities on the Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows.
INTEREST RATE RISK
The Duke Energy Registrants are exposed to changes in interest rates as a result of their issuance or anticipated issuance of variable-rate and ﬁxed-rate debt
and commercial paper. Interest rate risk is managed by limiting variable-rate exposures to a percentage of total debt and by monitoring changes in interest
rates. To manage risk associated with changes in interest rates, the Duke Energy Registrants may enter into interest rate swaps, U.S. Treasury lock
agreements and other ﬁnancial contracts. In anticipation of certain ﬁxed-rate debt issuances, a series of forward-starting interest rate swaps or Treasury
locks may be executed to lock in components of current market interest rates. These instruments are later terminated prior to or upon the issuance of the
corresponding debt.
175
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DERIVATIVES AND HEDGING
Cash Flow Hedges
For a derivative designated as hedging the exposure to variable cash ﬂows of a future transaction, referred to as a cash ﬂow hedge, the eﬀective portion of
the derivative's gain or loss is initially reported as a component of other comprehensive income and subsequently reclassiﬁed into earnings once the future
transaction impacts earnings. Amounts for interest rate contracts are reclassiﬁed to earnings as interest expense over the term of the related debt. See Note
2 for information on the de-designation of interest rate swaps and related gain reclassiﬁed out of AOCI for the year ended December 31, 2022, related to the
Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups. Gains and losses reclassiﬁed out of AOCI for the years ended December 31, 2021, and 2020, were not material.
Duke Energy's interest rate derivatives designated as hedges include forward-starting interest rate swaps not accounted for under regulatory accounting.
Undesignated Contracts
Undesignated contracts primarily include contracts not designated as a hedge because they are accounted for under regulatory accounting or contracts that
do not qualify for hedge accounting.
Duke Energy’s interest rate swaps for its regulated operations employ regulatory accounting. With regulatory accounting, the mark-to-market gains or losses
on the swaps are deferred as regulatory liabilities or regulatory assets, respectively. Regulatory assets and liabilities are amortized consistent with the
treatment of the related costs in the ratemaking process. The accrual of interest on the swaps is recorded as Interest Expense on the Duke Energy
Registrant's Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income.
The following tables show notional amounts of outstanding derivatives related to interest rate risk.
December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Indiana Ohio
Cash ﬂow hedges $ 500 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Undesignated contracts 2,979  1,250  800  500  300  300  27 
Total notional amount $ 3,479 $ 1,250 $ 800 $ 500 $ 300 $ 300 $ 27 
December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Indiana Ohio
Cash ﬂow hedges $ 2,415 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Undesignated contracts 1,177  350  500  500  300  27 
Total notional amount $ 3,592 $ 350 $ 500 $ 500 $ 300 $ 27 
COMMODITY PRICE RISK
The Duke Energy Registrants are exposed to the impact of changes in the prices of electricity purchased and sold in bulk power markets and natural gas
purchases, including Piedmont's natural gas supply contracts. Exposure to commodity price risk is inﬂuenced by a number of factors including the term of
contracts, the liquidity of markets and delivery locations. To manage risk associated with commodity prices, the Duke Energy Registrants may enter into
long-term power purchase or sales contracts and long-term natural gas supply agreements.
Undesignated Contracts
For the Subsidiary Registrants, bulk power electricity and natural gas purchases ﬂow through fuel adjustment clauses, formula-based contracts or other cost
sharing mechanisms. Diﬀerences between the costs included in rates and the incurred costs, including undesignated derivative contracts, are largely
deferred as regulatory assets or regulatory liabilities. Piedmont policies allow for the use of ﬁnancial instruments to hedge commodity price risks. The
strategy and objective of these hedging programs are to use the ﬁnancial instruments to reduce natural gas cost volatility for customers.
Volumes
The tables below include volumes of outstanding commodity derivatives. Amounts disclosed represent the absolute value of notional volumes of commodity
contracts excluding NPNS. The Duke Energy Registrants have netted contractual amounts where oﬀsetting purchase and sale contracts exist with identical
delivery locations and times of delivery. Where all commodity positions are perfectly oﬀset, no quantities are shown.
December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy
Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Electricity (GWh) 14,086  —  —  —  1,820 12,266  — 
Natural gas (millions of Dth) 909  307  292  292  —  11  299 
176
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DERIVATIVES AND HEDGING
December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy
Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Electricity (GWh) 12,369  —  —  —  1,681  10,688  — 
Natural gas (millions of Dth) 823  264  215  215  —  8  336 
FOREIGN CURRENCY RISK
Duke Energy may enter into foreign currency derivatives to hedge exposure to changes in foreign currency exchange rates, such as that arising from the
issuance of debt denominated in a currency other than U.S. dollars.
Fair Value Hedges
Derivatives related to existing ﬁxed rate securities are accounted for as fair value hedges, where the derivatives’ fair value gains or losses and hedged items’
fair value gains or losses are both recorded directly to earnings on the same income statement line item, including foreign currency gains or losses arising
from changes in the U.S. currency exchange rates. Duke Energy has elected to exclude the cross-currency basis spread from the assessment of eﬀectiveness
in the fair value hedges of its foreign currency risk and record any diﬀerence between the change in the fair value of the excluded components and the
amounts recognized in earnings as a component of other comprehensive income or loss.
The following table shows Duke Energy's outstanding derivatives related to foreign currency risk. There were no fair value hedges in 2021.
December 31, 2022
Receive Fair Value
Pay Notional Notional Receive Hedge Gain (Loss)
(in millions) Pay Rate (in millions) Rate Maturity Date (in millions)
Fair value hedges
$ 645  4.75 % 600 euros 3.10 % June 2028$ (3)
537  5.31 % 500 euros 3.85 % June 2034 (2)
Total notional amount $ 1,182  1,100 euros $ (5)
(a)    Amounts are recorded in Other Income and expenses, net on the Consolidated Statement of Operations, which oﬀsets an equal translation adjustment
of the foreign denominated debt. See the Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for amounts excluded from the assessment of
eﬀectiveness for which the diﬀerence between changes in fair value and periodic amortization is recorded.
LOCATION AND FAIR VALUE OF DERIVATIVE ASSETS AND LIABILITIES RECOGNIZED IN THE CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
The following tables show the fair value and balance sheet location of derivative instruments. Although derivatives subject to master netting arrangements
are netted on the Consolidated Balance Sheets, the fair values presented below are shown gross and cash collateral on the derivatives has not been netted
against the fair values shown.
Derivative Assets December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Commodity Contracts
Not Designated as Hedging Instruments
Current $ 265 $ 132 $ 99 $ 99 $ — $ 5 $ 29 $ — 
Noncurrent 213  104  108  108  —  —  —  — 
Total Derivative Assets – Commodity
Contracts $ 478 $ 236 $ 207 $ 207 $ — $ 5 $ 29 $ — 
Interest Rate Contracts
Designated as Hedging Instruments
Current $ 101 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Not Designated as Hedging Instruments
Current $ 228 $ 94 $ 41 $ 23 $ 17 $ — $ 81 $ — 
Noncurrent 29  —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Total Derivative Assets – Interest Rate
Contracts $ 358 $ 94 $ 41 $ 23 $ 17 $ — $ 81 $ — 
Total Derivative Assets $ 836 $ 330 $ 248 $ 230 $ 17 $ 5 $ 110 $ — (a)
177
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DERIVATIVES AND HEDGING
Derivative Liabilities December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Commodity Contracts
Not Designated as Hedging Instruments
Current $ 175 $ 96 $ 36 $ 18 $ 19 $ — $ 16 $ 27 
Noncurrent 202  31  30  30  —  —  —  141 
Total Derivative Liabilities – Commodity
Contracts $ 377 $ 127 $ 66 $ 48 $ 19 $ — $ 16 $ 168 
Interest Rate Contracts
Not Designated as Hedging Instruments
Noncurrent 2  —  —  —  —  2  —  — 
Total Derivative Liabilities – Interest
Rate Contracts $ 2 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 2 $ — $ — 
Foreign Currency Contracts
Designated as Hedging Instruments
Current $ 18 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Noncurrent 40  —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Total Derivative Liabilities – Foreign
Currency Contracts $ 58 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Total Derivative Liabilities $ 437 $ 127 $ 66 $ 48 $ 19 $ 2 $ 16 $ 168 
Derivative Assets December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Commodity Contracts
Not Designated as Hedging Instruments
Current $ 199 $ 99 $ 72 $ 72 $ — $ 2 $ 23 $ 3 
Noncurrent 113  63  50  50  —  —  —  — 
Total Derivative Assets – Commodity
Contracts $ 312 $ 162 $ 122 $ 122 $ — $ 2 $ 23 $ 3 
Interest Rate Contracts
Designated as Hedging Instruments
Current $ 3 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Noncurrent 3  —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Not Designated as Hedging Instruments
Current $ 2 $ — $ 2 $ 2 $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Total Derivative Assets – Interest Rate
Contracts $ 8 $ — $ 2 $ 2 $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Total Derivative Assets $ 320 $ 162 $ 124 $ 124 $ — $ 2 $ 23 $ 3 
178
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DERIVATIVES AND HEDGING
Derivative Liabilities December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Not Designated as Hedging Instruments
Current $ 72 $ 18 $ 19 $ 5 $ 14 $ — $ 13 $ 21 
Noncurrent 132  9  5  5  —  —  —  118 
Total Derivative Liabilities – Commodity
Contracts $ 204 $ 27 $ 24 $ 10 $ 14 $ — $ 13 $ 139 
Interest Rate Contracts
Designated as Hedging Instruments
Current $ 75 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Noncurrent 21  —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Not Designated as Hedging Instruments
Current 10  8  —  —  —  1  —  — 
Noncurrent 18  —  —  —  —  4  14  — 
Total Derivative Liabilities – Interest
Rate Contracts $ 124 $ 8 $ — $ — $ — $ 5 $ 14 $ — 
Total Derivative Liabilities $ 328 $ 35 $ 24 $ 10 $ 14 $ 5 $ 27 $ 139 
OFFSETTING ASSETS AND LIABILITIES
The following tables present the line items on the Consolidated Balance Sheets where derivatives are reported. Substantially all of Duke Energy's outstanding
derivative contracts are subject to enforceable master netting arrangements. The gross amounts oﬀset in the tables below show the eﬀect of these netting
arrangements on ﬁnancial position and include collateral posted to oﬀset the net position. The amounts shown are calculated by counterparty. Accounts
receivable or accounts payable may also be available to oﬀset exposures in the event of bankruptcy. These amounts are not included in the tables below.
Derivative Assets December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Current
Gross amounts recognized $ 594 $ 226 $ 140 $ 122 $ 17 $ 5 $ 110 $ — 
Gross amounts oﬀset (64) (33) (30) (30) —  —  —  — 
Net amounts presented in Current Assets:
Other $ 530 $ 193 $ 110 $ 92 $ 17 $ 5 $ 110 $ — 
Noncurrent
Gross amounts recognized $ 242 $ 104 $ 108 $ 108 $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Gross amounts oﬀset (97) (40) (57) (57) —  —  —  — 
Net amounts presented in Other
Noncurrent Assets: Other $ 145 $ 64 $ 51 $ 51 $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Derivative Liabilities December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Current
Gross amounts recognized $ 193 $ 96 $ 36 $ 18 $ 19 $ — $ 16 $ 27 
Gross amounts oﬀset (49) (15) (18) (18) —  —  (16) — 
Net amounts presented in Current
Liabilities: Other $ 144 $ 81 $ 18 $ — $ 19 $ — $ — $ 27 
Noncurrent
Gross amounts recognized $ 244 $ 31 $ 30 $ 30 $ — $ 2 $ — $ 141 
Gross amounts oﬀset (59) (29) (30) (30) —  —  —  — 
Net amounts presented in Other
Noncurrent Liabilities: Other $ 185 $ 2 $ — $ — $ — $ 2 $ — $ 141 
179
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DERIVATIVES AND HEDGING
Derivative Assets December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Current
Gross amounts recognized $ 204 $ 99 $ 74 $ 74 $ — $ 2 $ 23 $ 3 
Gross amounts oﬀset (25) (16) (9) (9) —  —  —  — 
Net amounts presented in Current Assets:
Other $ 179 $ 83 $ 65 $ 65 $ — $ 2 $ 23 $ 3 
Noncurrent
Gross amounts recognized $ 116 $ 63 $ 50 $ 50 $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Gross amounts oﬀset (23) (15) (8) (8) —  —  —  — 
Net amounts presented in Other Noncurrent
Assets: Other $ 93 $ 48 $ 42 $ 42 $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Derivative Liabilities December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Current
Gross amounts recognized $ 157 $ 26 $ 19 $ 5 $ 14 $ 1 $ 13 $ 21 
Gross amounts oﬀset (11) (6) (5) (5) —  —  —  — 
Net amounts presented in Current Liabilities:
Other $ 146 $ 20 $ 14 $ — $ 14 $ 1 $ 13 $ 21 
Noncurrent
Gross amounts recognized $ 171 $ 9 $ 5 $ 5 $ — $ 4 $ 14 $ 118 
Gross amounts oﬀset (12) (8) (5) (5) —  —  —  — 
Net amounts presented in Other Noncurrent
Liabilities: Other $ 159 $ 1 $ — $ — $ — $ 4 $ 14 $ 118 
OBJECTIVE CREDIT CONTINGENT FEATURES
Certain derivative contracts contain objective credit contingent features. These features include the requirement to post cash collateral or letters of credit if
speciﬁc events occur, such as a credit rating downgrade below investment grade. The following tables show information with respect to derivative contracts
that are in a net liability position and contain objective credit risk-related payment provisions.
December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida
Aggregate fair value of derivatives in a net liability position $ 141 $ 86 $ 55 $ 48 $ 7 
Fair value of collateral already posted —  —  —  —  — 
Additional cash collateral or letters of credit in the event credit risk-related
contingent features were triggered 141  86  55  48  7 
December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida
Aggregate fair value of derivatives in a net liability position $ 32 $ 18 $ 14 $ 10 $ 4 
Fair value of collateral already posted —  —  —  —  — 
Additional cash collateral or letters of credit in the event credit risk-related
contingent features were triggered 32  18  14  10  4 
The Duke Energy Registrants have elected to oﬀset cash collateral and fair values of derivatives. For amounts to be netted, the derivative and cash collateral
must be executed with the same counterparty under the same master netting arrangement.
180
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS INVESTMENTS IN DEBT AND EQUITY SECURITIES
16. INVESTMENTS IN DEBT AND EQUITY SECURITIES
Duke Energy’s investments in debt and equity securities are primarily comprised of investments held in (i) the NDTF at Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy
Progress and Duke Energy Florida, (ii) the grantor trusts at Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida and Duke Energy Indiana related to OPEB plans and
(iii) Bison. The Duke Energy Registrants classify investments in debt securities as AFS and investments in equity securities as FV-NI.
For investments in debt securities classiﬁed as AFS, the unrealized gains and losses are included in other comprehensive income until realized, at which time
they are reported through net income. For investments in equity securities classiﬁed as FV-NI, both realized and unrealized gains and losses are reported
through net income. Substantially all of Duke Energy’s investments in debt and equity securities qualify for regulatory accounting, and accordingly, all
associated realized and unrealized gains and losses on these investments are deferred as a regulatory asset or liability.
Duke Energy classiﬁes the majority of investments in debt and equity securities as long term, unless otherwise noted.
Investment Trusts
The investments within the Investment Trusts are managed by independent investment managers with discretion to buy, sell and invest pursuant to the
objectives set forth by the investment manager agreements and trust agreements. The Duke Energy Registrants have limited oversight of the day-to-day
management of these investments. As a result, the ability to hold investments in unrealized loss positions is outside the control of the Duke Energy
Registrants. Accordingly, all unrealized losses associated with debt securities within the Investment Trusts are recognized immediately and deferred to
regulatory accounts where appropriate.
Other AFS Securities
Unrealized gains and losses on all other AFS securities are included in other comprehensive income until realized, unless it is determined the carrying value
of an investment has a credit loss. The Duke Energy Registrants analyze all investment holdings each reporting period to determine whether a decline in fair
value is related to a credit loss. If a credit loss exists, the unrealized credit loss is included in earnings. There were no material credit losses as of
December 31, 2022, and 2021.
Other Investments amounts are recorded in Other within Other Noncurrent Assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
DUKE ENERGY
The following table presents the estimated fair value of investments in debt and equity securities; equity investments are classiﬁed as FV-NI and debt
investments are classiﬁed as AFS.
December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
Gross Gross Gross Gross
Unrealized Unrealized Unrealized Unrealized
Holding Holding Estimated Holding Holding Estimated
(in millions) Gains Losses Fair Value Gains Losses Fair Value
NDTF           
Cash and cash equivalents $ — $ — $ 215 $ — $ — $ 160 
Equity securities 3,658  105  5,871  4,905  43  7,350 
Corporate debt securities 1  85  641  39  6  829 
Municipal bonds —  39  330  14  1  314 
U.S. government bonds 2  112  1,423  31  12  1,568 
Other debt securities —  18  156  3  1  180 
Total NDTF Investments $ 3,661 $ 359 $ 8,636 $ 4,992 $ 63 $ 10,401 
Other Investments            
Cash and cash equivalents $ — $ — $ 22 $ — $ — $ 36 
Equity securities 21  16  128  36  —  156 
Corporate debt securities —  12  84  2  1  119 
Municipal bonds —  3  78  3  1  80 
U.S. government bonds —  2  62  —  —  56 
Other debt securities —  3  41  —  1  45 
Total Other Investments $ 21 $ 36 $ 415 $ 41 $ 3 $ 492 
Total Investments $ 3,682 $ 395 $ 9,051 $ 5,033 $ 66 $ 10,893 
181
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS INVESTMENTS IN DEBT AND EQUITY SECURITIES
Realized gains and losses, which were determined on a speciﬁc identiﬁcation basis, from sales of FV-NI and AFS securities for the years ended December 31,
2022, 2021 and 2020, were as follows.
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
FV-NI:
Realized gains $ 201 $ 724 $ 366 
Realized losses 316  141  174 
AFS:
Realized gains 28  56  96 
Realized losses 151  54  51 
DUKE ENERGY CAROLINAS
The following table presents the estimated fair value of investments in debt and equity securities; equity investments are classiﬁed as FV-NI and debt
investments are classiﬁed as AFS.
  December 31, 2022   December 31, 2021
Gross Gross Gross Gross
Unrealized Unrealized Unrealized Unrealized
Holding Holding Estimated Holding Holding Estimated
(in millions) Gains Losses Fair Value Gains Losses Fair Value
NDTF            
Cash and cash equivalents $ — $ — $ 117 $ — $ — $ 53 
Equity securities 2,147  51  3,367  2,887  19  4,265 
Corporate debt securities 1  62  401  24  4  506 
Municipal bonds —  10  64  2  —  48 
U.S. government bonds 1  51  685  16  3  712 
Other debt securities —  18  148  3  1  175 
Total NDTF Investments $ 2,149 $ 192 $ 4,782 $ 2,932 $ 27 $ 5,759 
Realized gains and losses, which were determined on a speciﬁc identiﬁcation basis, from sales of FV-NI and AFS securities for the years ended December 31,
2022, 2021 and 2020, were as follows.
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
FV-NI:
Realized gains $ 124 $ 440 $ 64 
Realized losses 177  96  99 
AFS:
Realized gains 22  38  60 
Realized losses 86  37  37 
182
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS INVESTMENTS IN DEBT AND EQUITY SECURITIES
PROGRESS ENERGY
The following table presents the estimated fair value of investments in debt and equity securities; equity investments are classiﬁed as FV-NI and debt
investments are classiﬁed as AFS.
December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
Gross Gross Gross Gross
Unrealized Unrealized Unrealized Unrealized
Holding Holding Estimated Holding Holding Estimated
(in millions) Gains Losses Fair Value Gains Losses Fair Value
NDTF            
Cash and cash equivalents $ — $ — $ 98 $ — $ — $ 107 
Equity securities 1,511  54  2,504  2,018  24  3,085 
Corporate debt securities —  23  240  15  2  323 
Municipal bonds —  29  266  12  1  266 
U.S. government bonds 1  61  738  15  9  856 
Other debt securities —  —  8  —  —  5 
Total NDTF Investments $ 1,512 $ 167 $ 3,854 $ 2,060 $ 36 $ 4,642 
Other Investments            
Cash and cash equivalents $ — $ — $ 11 $ — $ — $ 20 
Municipal bonds —  —  25  2  —  26 
Total Other Investments $ — $ — $ 36 $ 2 $ — $ 46 
Total Investments $ 1,512 $ 167 $ 3,890 $ 2,062 $ 36 $ 4,688 
Realized gains and losses, which were determined on a speciﬁc identiﬁcation basis, from sales of FV-NI and AFS securities for the years ended December 31,
2022, 2021 and 2020, were as follows.
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
FV-NI:
Realized gains $ 77 $ 284 $ 302 
Realized losses 139  45  75 
AFS:
Realized gains 6  16  24 
Realized losses 48  14  13 
DUKE ENERGY PROGRESS
The following table presents the estimated fair value of investments in debt and equity securities; equity investments are classiﬁed as FV-NI and debt
investments are classiﬁed as AFS.
  December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
Gross Gross Gross Gross
Unrealized Unrealized Unrealized Unrealized
Holding Holding Estimated Holding Holding Estimated
(in millions) Gains Losses Fair Value Gains Losses Fair Value
NDTF            
Cash and cash equivalents $ — $ — $ 56 $ — $ — $ 94 
Equity securities 1,431  54  2,411  1,915  23  2,970 
Corporate debt securities —  22  230  15  2  282 
Municipal bonds —  29  266  12  1  266 
U.S. government bonds 1  37  460  15  3  472 
Other debt securities —  —  7  —  —  5 
Total NDTF Investments $ 1,432 $ 142 $ 3,430 $ 1,957 $ 29 $ 4,089 
Other Investments            
Cash and cash equivalents $ — $ — $ 9 $ — $ — $ 16 
Total Other Investments $ — $ — $ 9 $ — $ — $ 16 
Total Investments $ 1,432 $ 142 $ 3,439 $ 1,957 $ 29 $ 4,105 
183
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS INVESTMENTS IN DEBT AND EQUITY SECURITIES
Realized gains and losses, which were determined on a speciﬁc identiﬁcation basis, from sales of FV-NI and AFS securities for the years ended December 31,
2022, 2021 and 2020, were as follows.
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
FV-NI:
Realized gains $ 76 $ 283 $ 52 
Realized losses 136  44  59 
AFS:
Realized gains 6  15  24 
Realized losses 44  13  13 
DUKE ENERGY FLORIDA
The following table presents the estimated fair value of investments in debt and equity securities; equity investments are classiﬁed as FV-NI and debt
investments are classiﬁed as AFS.
  December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
Gross Gross Gross Gross
Unrealized Unrealized Unrealized Unrealized
Holding Holding Estimated Holding Holding Estimated
(in millions) Gains Losses Fair Value Gains Losses Fair Value
NDTF             
Cash and cash equivalents $ — $ — $ 42 $ — $ — $ 13 
Equity securities 80  —  93  103  1  115 
Corporate debt securities —  1  10  —  —  41 
U.S. government bonds —  24  278  —  6  384 
Other debt securities —  —  1  —  —  — 
Total NDTF Investments $ 80 $ 25 $ 424 $ 103 $ 7 $ 553 
Other Investments      
Cash and cash equivalents $ — $ — $ 1 $ — $ — $ 3 
Municipal bonds —  —  25  2  —  26 
Total Other Investments $ — $ — $ 26 $ 2 $ — $ 29 
Total Investments $ 80 $ 25 $ 450 $ 105 $ 7 $ 582 
(a)    During the years ended December 31, 2022, and 2021, Duke Energy Florida continued to receive reimbursements from the NDTF for costs related to
ongoing decommissioning activity of the Crystal River Unit 3.
Realized gains and losses, which were determined on a speciﬁc identiﬁcation basis, from sales of FV-NI and AFS securities for the years ended December 31,
2022, 2021 and 2020, were as follows.
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
FV-NI:
Realized gains $ 1 $ 1 $ 250 
Realized losses 3  1  16 
AFS:
Realized gains —  1  — 
Realized losses 4  1  — (a)
184
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS INVESTMENTS IN DEBT AND EQUITY SECURITIES
DUKE ENERGY INDIANA
The following table presents the estimated fair value of investments in debt and equity securities; equity investments are measured at FV-NI and debt
investments are classiﬁed as AFS.
  December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
Gross Gross Gross Gross
Unrealized Unrealized Unrealized Unrealized
Holding Holding Estimated Holding Holding Estimated
(in millions) Gains Losses Fair Value Gains Losses Fair Value
Investments            
Cash and cash equivalents $ — $ — $ 1 $ — $ — $ — 
Equity securities 2  16  79  6  —  97 
Corporate debt securities —  1  8  —  —  6 
Municipal bonds —  3  45  1  1  46 
U.S. government bonds —  —  7  —  —  12 
Total Investments $ 2 $ 20 $ 140 $ 7 $ 1 $ 161 
Realized gains and losses, which were determined on a speciﬁc identiﬁcation basis, from sales of FV-NI and AFS securities for the years ended December 31,
2022, 2021 and 2020, were immaterial.
DEBT SECURITY MATURITIES
The table below summarizes the maturity date for debt securities.
December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Indiana
Due in one year or less $ 137 $ 7 $ 89 $ 24 $ 65 $ 8 
Due after one through ﬁve years 807  287  443  244  199  22 
Due after ﬁve through 10 years 469  230  193  178  15  6 
Due after 10 years 1,402  774  552  517  35  24 
Total $ 2,815 $ 1,298 $ 1,277 $ 963 $ 314 $ 60 
17. FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS
Fair value is the exchange price to sell an asset or transfer a liability in an orderly transaction between market participants at the measurement date. The fair
value deﬁnition focuses on an exit price versus the acquisition cost. Fair value measurements use market data or assumptions market participants would use
in pricing the asset or liability, including assumptions about risk and the risks inherent in the inputs to the valuation technique. These inputs may be readily
observable, corroborated by market data, or generally unobservable. Valuation techniques maximize the use of observable inputs and minimize the use of
unobservable inputs. A midmarket pricing convention (the midpoint price between bid and ask prices) is permitted for use as a practical expedient.
Fair value measurements are classiﬁed in three levels based on the fair value hierarchy as deﬁned by GAAP. Certain investments are not categorized within
the fair value hierarchy. These investments are measured at fair value using the net asset value per share practical expedient. The net asset value is derived
based on the investment cost, less any impairment, plus or minus changes resulting from observable price changes for an identical or similar investment of
the same issuer.
Fair value accounting guidance permits entities to elect to measure certain ﬁnancial instruments that are not required to be accounted for at fair value, such
as equity method investments or the company’s own debt, at fair value. The Duke Energy Registrants have not elected to record any of these items at fair
value.
Valuation methods of the primary fair value measurements disclosed below are as follows.
Investments in equity securities
The majority of investments in equity securities are valued using Level 1 measurements. Investments in equity securities are typically valued at the closing
price in the principal active market as of the last business day of the quarter. Principal active markets for equity prices include published exchanges such as
the NYSE and Nasdaq Stock Market. Foreign equity prices are translated from their trading currency using the currency exchange rate in eﬀect at the close of
the principal active market. There was no after-hours market activity that was required to be reﬂected in the reported fair value measurements.
Investments in debt securities
Most investments in debt securities are valued using Level 2 measurements because the valuations use interest rate curves and credit spreads applied to the
terms of the debt instrument (maturity and coupon interest rate) and consider the counterparty credit rating. If the market for a particular ﬁxed-income
security is relatively inactive or illiquid, the measurement is Level 3.
185
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS
Commodity derivatives
Commodity derivatives with clearinghouses are classiﬁed as Level 1. Commodity derivatives with observable forward curves are classiﬁed as Level 2. If
forward price curves are not observable for the full term of the contract and the unobservable period had more than an insigniﬁcant impact on the valuation,
the commodity derivative is classiﬁed as Level 3. In isolation, increases (decreases) in natural gas forward prices result in favorable (unfavorable) fair value
adjustments for natural gas purchase contracts; and increases (decreases) in electricity forward prices result in unfavorable (favorable) fair value
adjustments for electricity sales contracts. Duke Energy regularly evaluates and validates pricing inputs used to estimate the fair value of natural gas
commodity contracts by a market participant price veriﬁcation procedure. This procedure provides a comparison of internal forward commodity curves to
market participant generated curves.
Interest rate derivatives
Most over-the-counter interest rate contract derivatives are valued using ﬁnancial models that utilize observable inputs for similar instruments and are
classiﬁed as Level 2. Inputs include forward interest rate curves, notional amounts, interest rates and credit quality of the counterparties. Derivatives related
to interest rate risk for the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups are included in the following disclosures. See Note 2 for further information.
Other fair value considerations
See Note 2 for further information on the valuation of the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups. See Note 12 for a discussion of the valuation of goodwill
and intangible assets.
DUKE ENERGY
The following tables provide recorded balances for assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Derivative amounts in the tables below for all Duke Energy Registrants exclude cash collateral, which is disclosed in Note 15. See Note 16 for additional
information related to investments by major security type for the Duke Energy Registrants.
  December 31, 2022
(in millions) Total Fair Value Level 1 Level 2 Level 3Not Categorized
NDTF cash and cash equivalents $ 215 $ 215 $ — $ — $ — 
NDTF equity securities 5,871  5,829  —  —  42 
NDTF debt securities 2,550  780  1,770  —  — 
Other equity securities 128  128  —  —  — 
Other debt securities 265  55  210  —  — 
Other cash and cash equivalents 22  22  —  —  — 
Derivative assets 836  1  801  34  — 
Total assets 9,887  7,030  2,781  34  42 
Derivative liabilities (437) (16) (421) —  — 
Net assets (liabilities) $ 9,450 $ 7,014 $ 2,360 $ 34 $ 42 
  December 31, 2021
(in millions) Total Fair Value Level 1 Level 2 Level 3Not Categorized
NDTF cash and cash equivalents $ 160 $ 160 $ — $ — $ — 
NDTF equity securities 7,350  7,300  —  —  50 
NDTF debt securities 2,891  967  1,924  —  — 
Other equity securities 156  156  —  —  — 
Other debt securities 300  45  255  —  — 
Other cash and cash equivalents 36  36  —  —  — 
Derivative assets 320  3  293  24  — 
Total assets 11,213  8,667  2,472  24  50 
Derivative liabilities (327) (13) (314) —  — 
Net assets (liabilities) $ 10,886 $ 8,654 $ 2,158 $ 24 $ 50 
186
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS
The following table provides reconciliations of beginning and ending balances of assets and liabilities measured at fair value using Level 3 measurements.
Derivatives (net)
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021
Balance at beginning of period $ 24 $ 8 
Purchases, sales, issuances and settlements:
Purchases 78  21 
Settlements (36) (20)
Total gains (losses) included on the Consolidated Balance Sheet (32) 15 
Balance at end of period $ 34 $ 24 
DUKE ENERGY CAROLINAS
The following tables provide recorded balances for assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
  December 31, 2022
(in millions) Total Fair Value Level 1 Level 2Not Categorized
NDTF cash and cash equivalents $ 117 $ 117 $ — $ — 
NDTF equity securities 3,367  3,325  —  42 
NDTF debt securities 1,298  323  975  — 
Derivative assets 330  —  330  — 
Total assets 5,112  3,765  1,305  42 
Derivative liabilities (127) —  (127) — 
Net assets $ 4,985 $ 3,765 $ 1,178 $ 42 
  December 31, 2021
(in millions) Total Fair Value Level 1 Level 2Not Categorized
NDTF cash and cash equivalents $ 53 $ 53 $ — $ — 
NDTF equity securities 4,265  4,215  —  50 
NDTF debt securities 1,441  339  1,102  — 
Derivative assets 162  —  162  — 
Total assets 5,921  4,607  1,264  50 
Derivative liabilities (35) —  (35) — 
Net assets $ 5,886 $ 4,607 $ 1,229 $ 50 
PROGRESS ENERGY
The following table provides recorded balances for assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
  December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
(in millions)Total Fair
Value Level 1 Level 2Total Fair
Value Level 1 Level 2
NDTF cash and cash equivalents $ 98 $ 98 $ — $ 107 $ 107 $ — 
NDTF equity securities 2,504  2,504  —  3,085  3,085  — 
NDTF debt securities 1,252  457  795  1,450  628  822 
Other debt securities 25  —  25  26  —  26 
Other cash and cash equivalents 11  11  —  20  20  — 
Derivative assets 248  —  248  124  —  124 
Total assets 4,138  3,070  1,068  4,812  3,840  972 
Derivative liabilities (66) —  (66) (24) —  (24)
Net assets $ 4,072 $ 3,070 $ 1,002 $ 4,788 $ 3,840 $ 948 
187
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS
DUKE ENERGY PROGRESS
The following table provides recorded balances for assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
  December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
(in millions)Total Fair
Value Level 1 Level 2Total Fair
Value Level 1 Level 2
NDTF cash and cash equivalents $ 56 $ 56 $ — $ 94 $ 94 $ — 
NDTF equity securities 2,411  2,411  —  2,970  2,970  — 
NDTF debt securities 963  225  738  1,025  289  736 
Other cash and cash equivalents 9  9  —  16  16  — 
Derivative assets 230  —  230  124  —  124 
Total assets 3,669  2,701  968  4,229  3,369  860 
Derivative liabilities (48) —  (48) (10) —  (10)
Net assets $ 3,621 $ 2,701 $ 920 $ 4,219 $ 3,369 $ 850 
DUKE ENERGY FLORIDA
The following table provides recorded balances for assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
  December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
(in millions)Total Fair
Value Level 1 Level 2Total Fair
Value Level 1 Level 2
NDTF cash and cash equivalents $ 42 $ 42 $ — $ 13 $ 13 $ — 
NDTF equity securities 93  93  —  115  115  — 
NDTF debt securities 289  232  57  425  339  86 
Other debt securities 25  —  25  26  —  26 
Other cash and cash equivalents 1  1  —  3  3  — 
Derivative assets 17  —  17  —  —  — 
Total assets 467  368  99  582  470  112 
Derivative liabilities (19) —  (19) (14) —  (14)
Net assets $ 448 $ 368 $ 80 $ 568 $ 470 $ 98 
DUKE ENERGY OHIO
The recorded balances for assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis on the Consolidated Balance Sheets were not material at
December 31, 2022, and 2021.
DUKE ENERGY INDIANA
The following table provides recorded balances for assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
  December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
(in millions) Total Fair Value Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total Fair Value Level 1 Level 2 Level 3
Other equity securities $ 79 $ 79 $ — $ — $ 97 $ 97 $ — $ — 
Other debt securities 60  —  60  —  64  —  64  — 
Other cash equivalents 1  1  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Derivative assets 110  —  81  29  23  1  —  22 
Total assets 250  80  141  29  184  98  64  22 
Derivative liabilities (16) (16) —  —  (27) (13) (14) — 
Net assets $ 234 $ 64 $ 141 $ 29 $ 157 $ 85 $ 50 $ 22 
188
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS
The following table provides a reconciliation of beginning and ending balances of assets and liabilities measured at fair value using Level 3 measurements.
  Derivatives (net)
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021
Balance at beginning of period $ 22 $ 6 
Purchases, sales, issuances and settlements:
Purchases 74  18 
Settlements (32) (16)
Total (losses) gains included on the Consolidated Balance Sheet (35) 14 
Balance at end of period $ 29 $ 22 
PIEDMONT
The following table provides recorded balances for assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
  December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
(in millions) Total Fair Value Level 1 Level 2 Total Fair ValueLevel 1Level 2
Derivative assets $ — $ — $ — $ 3 $ 3 $ — 
Derivative liabilities (168) —  (168) (139) —  (139)
Net (liabilities) assets $ (168)$ — $ (168)$ (136)$ 3 $ (139)
QUANTITATIVE INFORMATION ABOUT UNOBSERVABLE INPUTS
The following tables include quantitative information about the Duke Energy Registrants' derivatives classiﬁed as Level 3.
December 31, 2022
Weighted
Fair Value Average
Investment Type (in millions)Valuation Technique Unobservable Input Range Range
Duke Energy Ohio
FTRs $ 5 RTO auction pricing FTR price – per MWh $0.89 –$6.25 $ 3.35 
Duke Energy Indiana
FTRs 29 RTO auction pricing FTR price – per MWh 0.09 – 21.79  2.74 
Duke Energy
Total Level 3 derivatives$ 34 
December 31, 2021
Weighted
Fair Value Average
Investment Type (in millions)Valuation Technique Unobservable Input Range Range
Duke Energy Ohio
FTRs $ 2 RTO auction pricing FTR price – per MWh $0.06 –$ 1.79 $ 0.96 
Duke Energy Indiana
FTRs 22 RTO auction pricing FTR price – per MWh (1.18)– 13.11  2.68 
Duke Energy
Total Level 3 derivatives $ 24 
189
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS
OTHER FAIR VALUE DISCLOSURES
The fair value and book value of long-term debt, including current maturities, is summarized in the following table. The following disclosures include debt
attributable to the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups. See Note 2 for further details. Estimates determined are not necessarily indicative of amounts
that could have been settled in current markets. Fair value of long-term debt uses Level 2 measurements.
  December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
(in millions) Book Value Fair Value Book Value Fair Value
Duke Energy $ 71,215 $ 63,454 $ 63,835 $ 69,683 
Duke Energy Carolinas 14,266  12,943  13,275  15,101 
Progress Energy 22,439  20,467  20,823  23,751 
Duke Energy Progress 11,087  9,689  10,249  11,252 
Duke Energy Florida 9,709  8,991  8,482  9,772 
Duke Energy Ohio 3,245  2,927  3,193  3,570 
Duke Energy Indiana 4,307  3,913  4,323  5,067 
Piedmont 3,363  2,940  2,968  3,278 
(a)    Book value of long-term debt includes $1.17 billion as of December 31, 2022, and $1.25 billion as of December 31, 2021, of unamortized debt discount
and premium, net in purchase accounting adjustments related to the mergers with Progress Energy and Piedmont that are excluded from fair value
of long-term debt.
At both December 31, 2022, and December 31, 2021, fair value of cash and cash equivalents, accounts and notes receivable, accounts payable, notes
payable and commercial paper, and nonrecourse notes payable of VIEs are not materially diﬀerent from their carrying amounts because of the short-term
nature of these instruments and/or because the stated rates approximate market rates.
18. VARIABLE INTEREST ENTITIES
A VIE is an entity that is evaluated for consolidation using more than a simple analysis of voting control. The analysis to determine whether an entity is a VIE
considers contracts with an entity, credit support for an entity, the adequacy of the equity investment of an entity and the relationship of voting power to the
amount of equity invested in an entity. This analysis is performed either upon the creation of a legal entity or upon the occurrence of an event requiring
reevaluation, such as a signiﬁcant change in an entity’s assets or activities. A qualitative analysis of control determines the party that consolidates a VIE.
This assessment is based on (i) what party has the power to direct the activities of the VIE that most signiﬁcantly impact its economic performance and (ii)
what party has rights to receive beneﬁts or is obligated to absorb losses that could potentially be signiﬁcant to the VIE. The analysis of the party that
consolidates a VIE is a continual reassessment.
CONSOLIDATED VIEs
The obligations of the consolidated VIEs discussed in the following paragraphs are nonrecourse to the Duke Energy Registrants. The registrants have no
requirement to provide liquidity to, purchase assets of or guarantee performance of these VIEs unless noted in the following paragraphs.
No ﬁnancial support was provided to any of the consolidated VIEs during the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, or is expected to be provided
in the future, that was not previously contractually required.
Receivables Financing – DERF/DEPR/DEFR
DERF, DEPR and DEFR are bankruptcy remote, special purpose subsidiaries of Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida,
respectively. DERF, DEPR and DEFR are wholly owned LLCs with separate legal existence from their parent companies, and their assets are not generally
available to creditors of their parent companies. On a revolving basis, DERF, DEPR and DEFR buy certain accounts receivable arising from the sale of
electricity and related services from their parent companies.
DERF, DEPR and DEFR borrow amounts under credit facilities to buy these receivables. Borrowing availability from the credit facilities is limited to the amount
of qualiﬁed receivables purchased, which generally exclude receivables past due more than a predetermined number of days and reserves for expected past-
due balances. The sole source of funds to satisfy the related debt obligations is cash collections from the receivables. Amounts borrowed under the credit
facilities are reﬂected on the Consolidated Balance Sheets as Long-Term Debt.
The most signiﬁcant activity that impacts the economic performance of DERF, DEPR and DEFR are the decisions made to manage delinquent receivables.
Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and Duke Energy Florida are considered the primary beneﬁciaries and consolidate DERF, DEPR and DEFR,
respectively, as they make those decisions.
Receivables Financing – CRC
CRC is a bankruptcy remote, special purpose entity indirectly owned by Duke Energy. On a revolving basis, CRC buys certain accounts receivable arising from
the sale of electricity, natural gas and related services from Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana. CRC borrows amounts under a credit facility to buy
the receivables from Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana. Borrowing availability from the credit facility is limited to the amount of qualiﬁed
receivables sold to CRC, which generally exclude receivables past due more than a predetermined number of days and reserves for expected past-due
balances. The sole source of funds to satisfy the related debt obligation is cash collections from the receivables. Amounts borrowed under the credit facility
are reﬂected on Duke Energy's Consolidated Balance Sheets as Long-Term Debt.(a)
190
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS VARIABLE INTEREST ENTITIES
The proceeds Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana receive from the sale of receivables to CRC are approximately 75% cash and 25% in the form of a
subordinated note from CRC. The subordinated note is a retained interest in the receivables sold. Depending on collection experience, additional equity
infusions to CRC may be required by Duke Energy to maintain a minimum equity balance of $3 million.
CRC is considered a VIE because (i) equity capitalization is insuﬃcient to support its operations, (ii) power to direct the activities that most signiﬁcantly
impact the economic performance of the entity is not held by the equity holder and (iii) deﬁciencies in net worth of CRC are funded by Duke Energy. The
most signiﬁcant activities that impact the economic performance of CRC are decisions made to manage delinquent receivables. Duke Energy is considered
the primary beneﬁciary and consolidates CRC as it makes these decisions. Neither Duke Energy Ohio nor Duke Energy Indiana consolidate CRC.
Receivables Financing – Credit Facilities
The following table summarizes the amounts and expiration dates of the credit facilities and associated restricted receivables described above.
Duke Energy
Duke Energy Duke Energy Duke Energy
Carolinas Progress Florida
(in millions) CRC DERF DEPR DEFR
Expiration date February 2025 January 2025 April 2025 April 2023
Credit facility amount $ 350 $ 500 $ 400 $ 250 
Amounts borrowed at December 31, 2022 350  471  400  250 
Amounts borrowed at December 31, 2021 350  475  350  250 
Restricted Receivables at December 31, 2022 917  928  793  490 
Restricted Receivables at December 31, 2021 587  844  574  427 
Nuclear Asset-Recovery Bonds – Duke Energy Florida Project Finance, LLC (DEFPF)
DEFPF is a bankruptcy remote, wholly owned special purpose subsidiary of Duke Energy Florida. DEFPF was formed in 2016 for the sole purpose of issuing
nuclear asset-recovery bonds to ﬁnance Duke Energy Florida's unrecovered regulatory asset related to Crystal River Unit 3.
In 2016, DEFPF issued senior secured bonds and used the proceeds to acquire nuclear asset-recovery property from Duke Energy Florida. The nuclear asset-
recovery property acquired includes the right to impose, bill, collect and adjust a non-bypassable nuclear asset-recovery charge from all Duke Energy Florida
retail customers until the bonds are paid in full and all ﬁnancing costs have been recovered. The nuclear asset-recovery bonds are secured by the nuclear
asset-recovery property and cash collections from the nuclear asset-recovery charges are the sole source of funds to satisfy the debt obligation. The
bondholders have no recourse to Duke Energy Florida.
DEFPF is considered a VIE primarily because the equity capitalization is insuﬃcient to support its operations. Duke Energy Florida has the power to direct the
signiﬁcant activities of the VIE as described above and therefore Duke Energy Florida is considered the primary beneﬁciary and consolidates DEFPF.
The following table summarizes the impact of DEFPF on Duke Energy Florida's Consolidated Balance Sheets.
December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021
Receivables of VIEs $ 6 $ 5 
Regulatory Assets: Current 55  54 
Current Assets: Other 41  39 
Other Noncurrent Assets: Regulatory assets 826  883 
Current Liabilities: Other 9  9 
Current maturities of long-term debt 56  56 
Long-Term Debt 890  946 
Storm Recovery Bonds – Duke Energy Carolinas NC Storm Funding and Duke Energy Progress NC Storm Funding
Duke Energy Carolinas NC Storm Funding, LLC. (DECNCSF) and Duke Energy Progress NC Storm Funding, LLC. (DEPNCSF) are bankruptcy remote, wholly
owned special purpose subsidiaries of Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress, respectively. These entities were formed in 2021 for the sole
purpose of issuing storm recovery bonds to ﬁnance certain of Duke Energy Carolinas’ and Duke Energy Progress’ unrecovered regulatory assets related to
storm costs.
In November 2021, DECNCSF and DEPNCSF issued $237 million and $770 million of senior secured bonds, respectively and used the proceeds to acquire
storm recovery property from Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy Progress. The storm recovery property was created by state legislation and NCUC
ﬁnancing orders for the purpose of ﬁnancing storm costs incurred in 2018 and 2019. The storm recovery property acquired includes the right to impose, bill,
collect and adjust a non-bypassable charge from all Duke Energy Carolinas’ and Duke Energy Progress’ retail customers until the bonds are paid in full and all
ﬁnancing costs have been recovered. The storm recovery bonds are secured by the storm recovery property and cash collections from the storm recovery
charges are the sole source of funds to satisfy the debt obligation. The bondholders have no recourse to Duke Energy Carolinas or Duke Energy Progress. For
additional information, see Notes 4 and 7.
191
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS VARIABLE INTEREST ENTITIES
DECNCSF and DEPNCSF are considered VIEs primarily because the equity capitalization is insuﬃcient to support their operations. Duke Energy Carolinas and
Duke Energy Progress have the power to direct the signiﬁcant activities of the VIEs as described above and therefore Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke Energy
Progress are considered the primary beneﬁciaries and consolidate DECNCSF and DEPNCSF, respectively.
The following table summarizes the impact of these VIEs on Duke Energy Carolinas’ and Duke Energy Progress’ Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Duke Energy Carolinas Duke Energy Progress
December 31, December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021
Regulatory Assets: Current $ 12 $ 12 $ 39 $ 39 
Current Assets: Other 8  —  29  — 
Other Noncurrent Assets: Regulatory assets 208  220  681  720 
Other Noncurrent Assets: Other 1  1  2  4 
Current maturities of long-term debt 10  5  34  15 
Current Liabilities: Other 3  1  8  2 
Long-Term Debt 219  228  714  747 
NON-CONSOLIDATED VIEs
The following tables summarize the impact of non-consolidated VIEs on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
  December 31, 2022
  Duke Energy Duke Duke
Natural Gas Energy Energy
(in millions) Investments Ohio Indiana
Receivables from aﬃliated companies $ — $ 198 $ 317 
Investments in equity method unconsolidated aﬃliates 43  —  — 
Other noncurrent assets 45  —  — 
Total assets $ 88 $ 198 $ 317 
Other current liabilities 59  —  — 
Other noncurrent liabilities 47  —  — 
Total liabilities $ 106 $ — $ — 
Net (liabilities) assets $ (18)$ 198 $ 317 
  December 31, 2021
  Duke Energy Duke Duke
Natural Gas Energy Energy
(in millions) Investments Ohio Indiana
Receivables from aﬃliated companies $ — $ 79 $ 97 
Investments in equity method unconsolidated aﬃliates 15  —  — 
Other noncurrent assets 61  —  — 
Total assets $ 76 $ 79 $ 97 
Other current liabilities 47  —  — 
Other noncurrent liabilities 54  —  — 
Total liabilities $ 101 $ — $ — 
Net (liabilities) assets $ (25)$ 79 $ 97 
The Duke Energy Registrants are not aware of any situations where the maximum exposure to loss signiﬁcantly exceeds the carrying values shown above.
Natural Gas Investments
Duke Energy has investments in various joint ventures including pipeline and renewable natural gas projects. These entities are considered VIEs due to
having insuﬃcient equity to ﬁnance their own activities without subordinated ﬁnancial support. Duke Energy does not have the power to direct the activities
that most signiﬁcantly impact the economic performance, the obligation to absorb losses or the right to receive beneﬁts of these VIEs and therefore does not
consolidate these entities.
Duke Energy has a 47% ownership interest in ACP. In 2020, Duke Energy determined that it would no longer invest in the construction of the ACP pipeline. In
February 2021, Duke Energy paid approximately $855 million to fund ACP's outstanding debt, relieving Duke Energy of its guarantee. See Notes 4, 8 and 13
for further information regarding this transaction.
192
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS VARIABLE INTEREST ENTITIES
CRC
See discussion under Consolidated VIEs for additional information related to CRC.
Amounts included in Receivables from aﬃliated companies in the above table for Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana reﬂect their retained interest in
receivables sold to CRC. These subordinated notes held by Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana are stated at fair value. Carrying values of retained
interests are determined by allocating carrying value of the receivables between assets sold and interests retained based on relative fair value. The allocated
bases of the subordinated notes are not materially diﬀerent than their face value because (i) the receivables generally turnover in less than two months, (ii)
credit losses are reasonably predictable due to the broad customer base and lack of signiﬁcant concentration and (iii) the equity in CRC is subordinate to all
retained interests and thus would absorb losses ﬁrst. The hypothetical eﬀect on fair value of the retained interests assuming both a 10% and a 20%
unfavorable variation in credit losses or discount rates is not material due to the short turnover of receivables and historically low credit loss history. Interest
accrues to Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana on the retained interests using the acceptable yield method. This method generally approximates the
stated rate on the notes since the allocated basis and the face value are nearly equivalent. An impairment charge is recorded against the carrying value of
both retained interests and purchased beneﬁcial interest whenever it is determined that an other-than-temporary impairment has occurred.
Key assumptions used in estimating fair value are detailed in the following table.
  Duke Energy Ohio Duke Energy Indiana
  2022 2021 2022 2021
Anticipated credit loss ratio 0.5 % 0.5 % 0.3 % 0.3 %
Discount rate 2.7 % 1.1 % 2.7 % 1.1 %
Receivable turnover rate 13.5 % 13.5 % 11.3 % 11.3 %
The following table shows the gross and net receivables sold.
  Duke Energy Ohio Duke Energy Indiana
December 31, December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021
Receivables sold $ 423 $ 269 $ 508 $ 328 
Less: Retained interests 198  79  317  97 
Net receivables sold $ 225 $ 190 $ 191 $ 231 
The following table shows sales and cash ﬂows related to receivables sold.
  Duke Energy Ohio Duke Energy Indiana
  Years Ended December 31, Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Sales            
Receivables sold $ 2,562 $ 2,023 $ 1,905 $ 3,744 $ 2,909 $ 2,631 
Loss recognized on sale 18  10  10  26  13  12 
Cash ﬂows    
Cash proceeds from receivables sold 2,424  2,018  1,875  3,498  2,909  2,586 
Collection fees received 1  1  1  2  1  1 
Return received on retained interests 10  4  4  15  6  5 
Cash ﬂows from sales of receivables are reﬂected within Cash Flows From Operating Activities and Cash Flows from Investing Activities on Duke Energy
Ohio’s and Duke Energy Indiana’s Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows.
Collection fees received in connection with servicing transferred accounts receivable are included in Operation, maintenance and other on Duke Energy
Ohio’s and Duke Energy Indiana’s Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income. The loss recognized on sales of receivables is
calculated monthly by multiplying receivables sold during the month by the required discount. The required discount is derived monthly utilizing a three-year
weighted average formula that considers charge-oﬀ history, late charge history and turnover history on the sold receivables, as well as a component for the
time value of money. The discount rate, or component for the time value of money, is the prior month-end Daily Simple SOFR plus a ﬁxed rate of 1%.
19. REVENUE
Duke Energy recognizes revenue consistent with amounts billed under tariﬀ oﬀerings or at contractually agreed upon rates based on actual physical
delivery of electric or natural gas service, including estimated volumes delivered when billings have not yet occurred. As such, the majority of Duke
Energy’s revenues have ﬁxed pricing based on the contractual terms of the published tariﬀs, with variability in expected cash ﬂows attributable to the
customer’s volumetric demand and ultimate quantities of energy or natural gas supplied and used during the billing period. The stand-alone selling price of
related sales are designed to support recovery of prudently incurred costs and an appropriate return on invested assets and are primarily governed by
published tariﬀ rates or contractual agreements approved by relevant regulatory bodies. As described in Note 1, certain excise taxes and franchise fees
levied by state or local governments are required to be paid even if not collected from the customer. These taxes are recognized on a gross basis as part of
revenues. Duke Energy elects to account for all other taxes net of revenues.
193
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REVENUE
Performance obligations are satisﬁed over time as energy or natural gas is delivered and consumed with billings generally occurring monthly and related
payments due within 30 days, depending on regulatory requirements. In no event does the timing between payment and delivery of the goods and services
exceed one year. Using this output method for revenue recognition provides a faithful depiction of the transfer of electric and natural gas service as
customers obtain control of the commodity and beneﬁt from its use at delivery. Additionally, Duke Energy has an enforceable right to consideration for
energy or natural gas delivered at any discrete point in time and will recognize revenue at an amount that reﬂects the consideration to which Duke Energy
is entitled for the energy or natural gas delivered.
As described above, the majority of Duke Energy’s tariﬀ revenues are at-will and, as such, related contracts with customers have an expected duration of
one year or less and will not have future performance obligations for disclosure. Additionally, other long-term revenue streams, including wholesale
contracts, generally provide services that are part of a single performance obligation, the delivery of electricity or natural gas. As such, other than material
ﬁxed consideration under long-term contracts, related disclosures for future performance obligations are also not applicable.
Duke Energy earns substantially all of its revenues through its reportable segments, EU&I and GU&I.
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure
EU&I earns the majority of its revenues through retail and wholesale electric service through the generation, transmission, distribution and sale of
electricity. Duke Energy generally provides retail and wholesale electric service customers with their full electric load requirements or with supplemental
load requirements when the customer has other sources of electricity.
Retail electric service is generally marketed throughout Duke Energy's electric service territory through standard service oﬀers. The standard service oﬀers
are through tariﬀs determined by regulators in Duke Energy's regulated service territory. Each tariﬀ, which is assigned to customers based on customer
class, has multiple components such as an energy charge, a demand charge, a basic facilities charge and applicable riders. Duke Energy considers each of
these components to be aggregated into a single performance obligation for providing electric service, or in the case of distribution only customers in Duke
Energy Ohio, for delivering electricity. Electricity is considered a single performance obligation satisﬁed over time consistent with the series guidance and is
provided and consumed over the billing period, generally one month. Retail electric service is typically provided to at-will customers who can cancel service
at any time, without a substantive penalty. Additionally, Duke Energy adheres to applicable regulatory requirements in each jurisdiction to ensure the
collectability of amounts billed and appropriate mitigating procedures are followed when necessary. As such, revenue from contracts with customers for
such contracts is equivalent to the electricity supplied and billed in that period (including unbilled estimates).
Wholesale electric service is generally provided under long-term contracts using cost-based pricing. FERC regulates costs that may be recovered from
customers and the amount of return companies are permitted to earn. Wholesale contracts include both energy and demand charges. For full requirements
contracts, Duke Energy considers both charges as a single performance obligation for providing integrated electric service. For contracts where energy and
demand charges are considered separate performance obligations, energy and demand are each a distinct performance obligation under the series
guidance and are satisﬁed as energy is delivered and stand-ready service is provided on a monthly basis. This service represents consumption over the
billing period and revenue is recognized consistent with billings and unbilled estimates, which generally occur monthly. Contractual amounts owed are
typically trued up annually based upon incurred costs in accordance with FERC published ﬁlings and the speciﬁc customer’s actual peak demand. Estimates
of variable consideration related to potential additional billings or refunds owed are updated quarterly.
The majority of wholesale revenues are full requirements contracts where the customers purchase the substantial majority of their energy needs and do
not have a ﬁxed quantity of contractually required energy or capacity. As such, related forecasted revenues are considered optional purchases.
Supplemental requirements contracts that include contracted blocks of energy and capacity at contractually ﬁxed prices have the following estimated
remaining performance obligations:
Remaining Performance Obligations
(in millions) 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 Thereafter Total
Progress Energy $ 61 $ 66 $ 7 $ 7 $ 7 $ 36 $ 184 
Duke Energy Progress 8  8  —  —  —  —  16 
Duke Energy Florida 53  58  7  7  7  36  168 
Duke Energy Indiana 11  16  17  15  7  5  71 
Revenues for block sales are recognized monthly as energy is delivered and stand-ready service is provided, consistent with invoiced amounts and unbilled
estimates.
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure
GU&I earns its revenue through retail and wholesale natural gas service through the transportation, distribution and sale of natural gas. Duke Energy
generally provides retail and wholesale natural gas service customers with all natural gas load requirements. Additionally, while natural gas can be stored,
substantially all natural gas provided by Duke Energy is consumed by customers simultaneously with receipt of delivery.
Retail natural gas service is marketed throughout Duke Energy's natural gas service territory using published tariﬀ rates. The tariﬀ rates are established by
regulators in Duke Energy's service territories. Each tariﬀ, which is assigned to customers based on customer class, have multiple components, such as a
commodity charge, demand charge, customer or monthly charge and transportation costs. Duke Energy considers each of these components to be
aggregated into a single performance obligation for providing natural gas service. For contracts where Duke Energy provides all of the customer’s natural
gas needs, the delivery of natural gas is considered a single performance obligation satisﬁed over time, and revenue is recognized monthly based on
billings and unbilled estimates as service is provided and the commodity is consumed over the billing period. Additionally, natural gas service is typically
at-will and customers can cancel service at any time, without a substantive penalty. Duke Energy also adheres to applicable regulatory requirements to
ensure the collectability of amounts billed and receivable and appropriate mitigating procedures are followed when necessary.
194
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REVENUE
Certain long-term individually negotiated contracts exist to provide natural gas service. These contracts are regulated and approved by state commissions.
The negotiated contracts have multiple components, including a natural gas and a demand charge, similar to retail natural gas contracts. Duke Energy
considers each of these components to be a single performance obligation for providing natural gas service. This service represents consumption over the
billing period, generally one month.
Fixed capacity payments under long-term contracts for the GU&I segment include minimum margin contracts and supply arrangements with municipalities
and power generation facilities. Revenues for related sales are recognized monthly as natural gas is delivered and stand-ready service is provided,
consistent with invoiced amounts and unbilled estimates. Estimated remaining performance obligations are as follows:
Remaining Performance Obligations
(in millions) 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 Thereafter Total
Piedmont $ 68 $ 62 $ 61 $ 51 $ 49 $ 241 $ 532 
Other
The remainder of Duke Energy’s operations is presented as Other, which does not include material revenues from contracts with customers.
Disaggregated Revenues
For the EU&I and GU&I segments, revenue by customer class is most meaningful to Duke Energy as each respective customer class collectively represents
unique customer expectations of service, generally has diﬀerent energy and demand requirements, and operates under tailored, regulatory approved pricing
structures. Additionally, each customer class is impacted diﬀerently by weather and a variety of economic factors including the level of population growth,
economic investment, employment levels, and regulatory activities in each of Duke Energy’s jurisdictions. As such, analyzing revenues disaggregated by
customer class allows Duke Energy to understand the nature, amount, timing and uncertainty of revenue and cash ﬂows arising from contracts with
customers. Disaggregated revenues are presented as follows:
Year Ended December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
(in millions) Duke EnergyProgress Energy Energy Energy Energy
By market or type of customer EnergyCarolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure
Residential $11,377 $ 3,275 $ 5,812 $ 2,378 $ 3,434 $ 862 $ 1,430 $ — 
General 7,356  2,396  3,396  1,480  1,916  517  1,049  — 
Industrial 3,504  1,251  1,095  770  325  202  956  — 
Wholesale 2,856  561  1,785  1,346  439  127  383  — 
Other revenues 795  372  994  768  226  61  19  — 
Total Electric Utilities and Infrastructure
revenue from contracts with customers $25,888 $ 7,855 $13,082 $ 6,742 $ 6,340 $ 1,769 $ 3,837 $ — 
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure
Residential $ 1,462 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 488 $ — $ 974 
Commercial 765  —  —  —  —  180  —  585 
Industrial 170  —  —  —  —  24  —  144 
Power Generation —  —  —  —  —  —  —  94 
Other revenues 360  —  —  —  —  25  —  271 
Total Gas Utilities and Infrastructure revenue
from contracts with customers $ 2,757 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 717 $ — $ 2,068 
Other
Revenue from contracts with customers $ 30 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Total revenue from contracts with customers$28,675 $ 7,855 $13,082 $ 6,742 $ 6,340 $ 2,486 $ 3,837 $ 2,068 
Other revenue sources $ 93 $ 2 $ 43 $ 11 $ 13 $ 28 $ 85 $ 56 
Total revenues $28,768 $ 7,857 $13,125 $ 6,753 $ 6,353 $ 2,514 $ 3,922 $ 2,124 
(a)    Other revenue sources include revenues from leases, derivatives and alternative revenue programs that are not considered revenues from contracts
with customers. Alternative revenue programs in certain jurisdictions include regulatory mechanisms that periodically adjust for over or under
collection of related revenues.(a)
195
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REVENUE
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
(in millions) Duke EnergyProgress Energy Energy Energy Energy
By market or type of customer EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgress Florida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure
Residential $10,097 $ 3,054 $ 5,084 $ 2,156 $ 2,928 $ 767 $ 1,188 $ — 
General 6,375  2,210  2,883  1,378  1,505  440  825  — 
Industrial 2,924  1,145  894  634  260  135  750  — 
Wholesale 2,199  472  1,385  1,164  221  56  285  — 
Other revenues 879  264  716  387  329  83  86  — 
Total Electric Utilities and Infrastructure
revenue from contracts with customers $22,474 $ 7,145 $ 10,962 $ 5,719 $ 5,243 $ 1,481 $ 3,134 $ — 
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure
Residential $ 1,131 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 354 $ — $ 777 
Commercial 561  —  —  —  —  143  —  418 
Industrial 158  —  —  —  —  20  —  137 
Power Generation —  —  —  —  —  —  —  92 
Other revenues 133  —  —  —  —  28  —  45 
Total Gas Utilities and Infrastructure revenue
from contracts with customers $ 1,983 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 545 $ — $ 1,469 
Other
Revenue from contracts with customers $ 29 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Total revenue from contracts with customers$24,486 $ 7,145 $ 10,962 $ 5,719 $ 5,243 $ 2,026 $ 3,134 $ 1,469 
Other revenue sources $ 135 $ (43)$ 95 $ 61 $ 16 $ 11 $ 40 $ 100 
Total revenues $24,621 $ 7,102 $ 11,057 $ 5,780 $ 5,259 $ 2,037 $ 3,174 $ 1,569 
(a)    Other revenue sources include revenues from leases, derivatives and alternative revenue programs that are not considered revenues from contracts
with customers. Alternative revenue programs in certain jurisdictions include regulatory mechanisms that periodically adjust for over or under
collection of related revenues.(a)
196
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REVENUE
Year Ended December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
(in millions) Duke EnergyProgress Energy Energy Energy Energy
By market or type of customer EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgress Florida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Electric Utilities and Infrastructure
Residential $ 9,806 $ 2,997 $ 5,017 $ 2,059 $ 2,958 $ 726 $ 1,064 $ — 
General 6,194  2,233  2,779  1,312  1,467  442  740  — 
Industrial 2,859  1,137  901  649  252  137  683  — 
Wholesale 1,864  380  1,228  1,034  194  32  224  — 
Other revenues 914  281  596  294  302  82  72  — 
Total Electric Utilities and Infrastructure
revenue from contracts with customers $21,637 $ 7,028 $ 10,521 $ 5,348 $ 5,173 $ 1,419 $ 2,783 $ — 
Gas Utilities and Infrastructure
Residential $ 930 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 300 $ — $ 630 
Commercial 446  —  —  —  —  117  —  329 
Industrial 127  —  —  —  —  17  —  110 
Power Generation —  —  —  —  —  —  —  34 
Other revenues 87  —  —  —  —  17  —  70 
Total Gas Utilities and Infrastructure revenue
from contracts with customers $ 1,590 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 451 $ — $ 1,173 
Other
Revenue from contracts with customers $ 26 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Total revenue from contracts with customers$23,253 $ 7,028 $ 10,521 $ 5,348 $ 5,173 $ 1,870 $ 2,783 $ 1,173 
Other revenue sources $ 113 $ (13)$ 106 $ 74 $ 15 $ (12)$ 12 $ 124 
Total revenues $23,366 $ 7,015 $ 10,627 $ 5,422 $ 5,188 $ 1,858 $ 2,795 $ 1,297 
(a)    Other revenue sources include revenues from leases, derivatives and alternative revenue programs that are not considered revenues from contracts
with customers. Alternative revenue programs in certain jurisdictions include regulatory mechanisms that periodically adjust for over or under
collection of related revenues.
As described in Note 1, Duke Energy adopted the new guidance for credit losses eﬀective January 1, 2020, using the modiﬁed retrospective method of
adoption, which does not require restatement of prior year reported results. The following table presents the reserve for credit losses for trade and other
receivables based on adoption of the new standard.
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) EnergyCarolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 76 $ 10 $ 16 $ 8 $ 7 $ 4 $ 3 $ 6 
Cumulative Change in Accounting Principle 5  1  2  1  1  —  —  1 
Write-Oﬀs (58) (13) (23) (8) (14) —  —  (6)
Credit Loss Expense 75  13  29  9  20  —  —  11 
Other Adjustments 48  12  13  13  —  —  —  — 
Balance at December 31, 2020 $ 146 $ 23 $ 37 $ 23 $ 14 $ 4 $ 3 $ 12 
Write-Oﬀs (58) (21) (25) (12) (13) —  —  (9)
Credit Loss Expense 53  27  25  11  14  —  —  7 
Other Adjustments (20) 13  (1) (1) 1  —  —  5 
Balance at December 31, 2021 $ 121 $ 42 $ 36 $ 21 $ 16 $ 4 $ 3 $ 15 
Write-Oﬀs (158) (73) (70) (36) (34) —  —  (12)
Credit Loss Expense 160  40  72  17  55  2  1  11 
Other Adjustments 93  59  43  42  (1) —  —  — 
Balance at December 31, 2022 $ 216 $ 68 $ 81 $ 44 $ 36 $ 6 $ 4 $ 14 
Trade and other receivables are evaluated based on an estimate of the risk of loss over the life of the receivable and current and historical conditions using
supportable assumptions. Management evaluates the risk of loss for trade and other receivables by comparing the historical write-oﬀ amounts to total
revenue over a speciﬁed period. Historical loss rates are adjusted due to the impact of current conditions, as well as forecasted conditions over a reasonable
time period. The calculated write-oﬀ rate can be applied to the receivable balance for which an established reserve does not already exist. Management
reviews the assumptions and risk of loss periodically for trade and other receivables.(a)
197
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS REVENUE
The aging of trade receivables is presented in the table below.
December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgress Florida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Unbilled Receivables $ 1,457 $ 486 $ 355 $ 232 $ 123 $ 20 $ 28 $ 160 
Current 2,347  577  1,059  637  417  15  52  265 
1-30 days past due 261  96  60  15  45  5  17  15 
31-60 days past due 123  23  61  49  12  6  2  3 
61-90 days past due 74  25  18  9  9  3  11  2 
91+ days past due 209  70  74  27  47  26  6  4 
Deferred Payment Arrangements 160  57  62  35  27  4  —  1 
Trade and Other Receivables $ 4,631 $ 1,334 $ 1,689 $ 1,004 $ 680 $ 79 $ 116 $ 450 
December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) EnergyCarolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Unbilled Receivables $ 922 $ 316 $ 266 $ 193 $ 73 $ 4 $ 27 $ 106 
Current 1,941  592  716  405  311  42  50  202 
1-30 days past due 288  77  128  44  82  4  5  12 
31-60 days past due 98  30  49  21  28  1  10  2 
61-90 days past due 118  32  48  28  20  23  5  4 
91+ days past due 161  84  37  9  28  24  6  3 
Deferred Payment Arrangements 115  55  45  22  23  2  —  4 
Trade and Other Receivables $ 3,643 $ 1,186 $ 1,289 $ 722 $ 565 $ 100 $ 103 $ 333 
(a)    Unbilled revenues are recognized by applying customer billing rates to the estimated volumes of energy or natural gas delivered but not yet billed and
are included within Receivables and Receivables of VIEs on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
(b)    Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana sell, on a revolving basis, nearly all of their retail accounts receivable, including receivables for unbilled
revenues, to an aﬃliate, CRC, and account for the transfers of receivables as sales. Accordingly, the receivables sold are not reﬂected on the
Consolidated Balance Sheets of Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana. See Note 18 for further information. These receivables for unbilled
revenues are $148 million and $260 million for Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana, respectively, as of December 31, 2022, and $82 million
and $121 million for Duke Energy Ohio and Duke Energy Indiana, respectively, as of December 31, 2021.
(c)    Due to ongoing ﬁnancial hardships impacting customers, Duke Energy has permitted customers to defer payment of past-due amounts through
installment payment plans.
20. STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY
Basic EPS is computed by dividing net income available to Duke Energy common stockholders, as adjusted for distributed and undistributed earnings
allocated to participating securities and accumulated preferred dividends, by the weighted average number of common shares outstanding during the
period. Diluted EPS is computed by dividing net income available to Duke Energy common stockholders, as adjusted for distributed and undistributed
earnings allocated to participating securities and accumulated preferred dividends, by the diluted weighted average number of common shares outstanding
during the period. Diluted EPS reﬂects the potential dilution that could occur if securities or other agreements to issue common stock, such as equity forward
sale agreements, were exercised or settled. Duke Energy’s participating securities are RSUs that are entitled to dividends declared on Duke Energy common
stock during the RSUs vesting periods. Dividends declared on preferred stock are recorded on the Consolidated Statements of Operations as a reduction of
net income to arrive at net income available to Duke Energy common stockholders. Dividends accumulated on preferred stock are an adjustment to net
income used in the calculation of basic and diluted EPS.(a)(b)
(c)
(a)(b)
(c)
198
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY
The following table presents Duke Energy’s basic and diluted EPS calculations, the weighted average number of common shares outstanding and common
and preferred share dividends declared.
Years Ended December 31,
(in millions, except per share amounts) 2022 2021 2020
Net Income available to Duke Energy common stockholders $ 2,444 $ 3,802 $ 1,270 
Less: (Loss) Income from discontinued operations attributable to Duke Energy common stockholders (1,215) 200  289 
Accumulated preferred stock dividends adjustment —  —  1 
Less: Impact of participating securities 2  3  2 
Income from continuing operations available to Duke Energy common stockholders $ 3,657 $ 3,599 $ 980 
Loss from discontinued operations, net of tax $(1,323)$ (144)$ (7)
Add: Loss attributable to NCI 108  344  296 
(Loss) Income from discontinued operations attributable to Duke Energy common stockholders $(1,215)$ 200 $ 289 
Weighted average common shares outstanding – basic 770  769  737 
Equity forwards —  —  1 
Weighted average common shares outstanding – diluted 770  769  738 
EPS from continuing operations available to Duke Energy common stockholders
Basic and Diluted $ 4.74 $ 4.68 $ 1.33 
(Loss) Earnings Per Share from discontinued operations attributable to Duke Energy common stockholders
   Basic and Diluted $ (1.57)$ 0.26 $ 0.39 
Potentially dilutive items excluded from the calculation 2  2  2 
Dividends declared per common share $ 3.98 $ 3.90 $ 3.82 
Dividends declared on Series A preferred stock per depositary share $ 1.437 $ 1.437 $ 1.437 
Dividends declared on Series B preferred stock per share $48.750 $ 48.750 $ 49.292 
(a)    Performance stock awards were not included in the dilutive securities calculation because the performance measures related to the awards had not
been met.
(b)    5.75% Series A Cumulative Redeemable Perpetual Preferred Stock dividends are payable quarterly in arrears on the 16th day of March, June, September
and December. The preferred stock has a $25 liquidation preference per depositary share.
(c)    4.875% Series B Fixed-Rate Reset Cumulative Redeemable Perpetual Preferred Stock dividends are payable semiannually in arrears on the 16th day of
March and September. The preferred stock has a $1,000 liquidation preference per share. On September 16, 2024, the First Call Date, and any ﬁfth
anniversary of the First Call Date, the dividend rate will reset based on the then current ﬁve-year U.S. Treasury rate plus a spread of 3.388%.
Common Stock
In November 2022, Duke Energy ﬁled a prospectus supplement and executed an EDA under which it may sell up to $1.5 billion of its common stock through a
new ATM oﬀering program, including an equity forward sales component. Under the terms of the EDA, Duke Energy may issue and sell shares of common
stock through September 2025.
Preferred Stock
The Series A Preferred Stock has no maturity or mandatory redemption date, is not redeemable at the option of the holders and includes separate call
options. The ﬁrst call option allows Duke Energy to call the Series A Preferred Stock at a redemption price of $25.50 per depositary share prior to June 15,
2024, in whole but not in part, at any time within 120 days after a ratings event where a rating agency amends, clariﬁes or changes the criteria it uses to
assign equity credit for securities such as the preferred stock. The second call option allows Duke Energy to call the preferred stock, in whole or in part, at
any time, on or after June 15, 2024, at a redemption price of $25 per depositary share. Duke Energy is also required to redeem all accumulated and unpaid
dividends if either call option is exercised.
The Series B Preferred Stock has no maturity or mandatory redemption date, is not redeemable at the option of the holders and includes separate call
options. The ﬁrst call option allows Duke Energy to call the Series B Preferred Stock at a redemption price of $1,020 per share, in whole but not in part, at any
time within 120 days after a ratings event. The second call option allows Duke Energy to call the preferred stock, in whole or in part, on the First Call Date or
any subsequent Reset Date at a redemption price in cash equal to $1,000 per share. Duke Energy is also required to redeem all accumulated and unpaid
dividends if either call option is exercised.
Dividends issued on its Series A and Series B Preferred Stock are subject to approval by the Board of Directors. However, the deferral of dividend payments
on the preferred stock prohibits the declaration of common stock dividends.
The Series A and Series B Preferred Stock rank, with respect to dividends and distributions upon liquidation or dissolution:
• senior to Common Stock and to each other class or series of capital stock established after the original issue date of the Series A and Series B
Preferred Stock that is expressly made subordinated to the Series A and Series B Preferred Stock;
• on a parity with any class or series of capital stock established after the original issue date of the Series A and Series B Preferred Stock that is not
expressly made senior or subordinated to the Series A or Series B Preferred Stock;(a)
(b)
(c)
199
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY
• junior to any class or series of capital stock established after the original issue date of the Series A and Series B Preferred Stock that is expressly
made senior to the Series A or Series B Preferred Stock;
• junior to all existing and future indebtedness (including indebtedness outstanding under Duke Energy's credit facilities, unsecured senior notes,
junior subordinated debentures and commercial paper) and other liabilities with respect to assets available to satisfy claims against Duke Energy;
and
• structurally subordinated to existing and future indebtedness and other liabilities of Duke Energy's subsidiaries and future preferred stock of
subsidiaries.
Holders of Series A and Series B Preferred Stock have no voting rights with respect to matters that generally require the approval of voting stockholders. The
limited voting rights of holders of Series A and Series B Preferred Stock include the right to vote as a single class, respectively, on certain matters that may
aﬀect the preference or special rights of the preferred stock, except in the instance that Duke Energy elects to defer the payment of dividends for a total of
six quarterly full dividend periods for Series A Preferred Stock or three semiannual full dividend periods for Series B Preferred Stock. If dividends are deferred
for a cumulative total of six quarterly full dividend periods for Series A Preferred Stock or three semiannual full dividend periods for Series B Preferred Stock,
whether or not for consecutive dividend periods, holders of the respective preferred stock have the right to elect two additional Board members to the Board
of Directors.
21. SEVERANCE
During 2022, Duke Energy identiﬁed opportunities to eliminate work and create sustainable savings through a workload reduction initiative with a focus on
process improvement through digital technology, governance simpliﬁcation and elimination of low-value work. As a result, Duke Energy extended involuntary
severance beneﬁts to certain employees in speciﬁc areas as a part of this initiative.
During 2021, Duke Energy reviewed its operations and identiﬁed opportunities for improvement to better serve its customers. This operational review
included workforce realignment to ensure the company is staﬀed with the right skill sets and number of teammates to execute the long-term vision for Duke
Energy. As such, Duke Energy extended involuntary severance beneﬁts to certain employees in speciﬁc areas as a part of these workforce realignment
eﬀorts.
During 2020, as a result of partial settlements between Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and the Public Staﬀ, Duke Energy Carolinas and Duke
Energy Progress deferred as Regulatory assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheets, approximately $65 million and $33 million, respectively, of previously
recorded severance charges within Operation, maintenance and other on the Consolidated Statements of Operations. These severance charges were
previously recorded during 2018, as Duke Energy reviewed its operations and identiﬁed opportunities for improvement to better serve its customers. This
operational review included the company's workforce strategy and staﬃng levels to ensure the company was staﬀed with the right skill sets and number of
teammates to execute the long-term vision for Duke Energy. As such, Duke Energy extended voluntary and involuntary severance beneﬁts to certain
employees in speciﬁc areas as a part of workforce planning and digital transformation eﬀorts.
The following table presents the direct and allocated severance and related charges accrued for approximately 233 employees in 2022, 290 employees in
2021 and 30 employees in 2020, by the Duke Energy Registrants within Operation, maintenance and other on the Consolidated Statements of Operations.
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Year Ended December 31, 2022 $ 65 $ 40 $ 20 $ 17 $ 3 $ 1 $ 2 $ 2 
Year Ended December 31, 2021 69  33  26  20  6  2  3  2 
Year Ended December 31, 2020 (85) (58) (28) (31) 3  —  —  — 
(a)    Includes amortization of deferred severance charges of approximately $33 million, $22 million, $11 million and $11 million for Duke Energy, Duke
Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy and Duke Energy Progress, respectively.
(b)    Includes adjustments associated with 2021 severance charges of approximately $(19) million, $(6) million, $(8) million, $(4) million, $(4) million,
$(1) million, $(2) million and $(1) million for Duke Energy, Duke Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida,
Duke Energy Ohio, Duke Energy Indiana and Piedmont, respectively.
(c)    Includes amortization of deferred severance charges of approximately $33 million, $22 million, $11 million and $11 million for Duke Energy, Duke
Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy and Duke Energy Progress, respectively.
(d)    Includes adjustments associated with 2018 severance charges of approximately $(3) million, $(2) million and $(1) million for Duke Energy, Duke Energy
Carolinas and Duke Energy Indiana, respectively.
(e)    Includes unamortized deferred severance charges of approximately $(86) million, $(57) million, $(29) million and $(29) million for Duke Energy, Duke
Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy and Duke Energy Progress, respectively.
(f)    Includes adjustments associated with 2018 severance charges of approximately $(6) million, $(2) million, $(3) million and $(2) million for Duke Energy,
Duke Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy and Duke Energy Progress, respectively.(a)(b)
(c)(d)
(e)(f)
200
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS SEVERANCE
The table below presents the severance liability for past and ongoing severance plans including the plans described above.
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Balance at December 31, 2020 $ 11 $ 2 $ 3 $ 1 $ 2 $ — $ 1 $ — 
Provision/Adjustments 36  1  1  1  —  —  —  — 
Cash Reductions (8) (1) (2) (1) (1) —  (1) — 
Balance at December 31, 2021 $ 39 $ 2 $ 2 $ 1 $ 1 $ — $ — $ — 
Provision/Adjustments 33  14  4  3  1  —  —  1 
Cash Reductions (8) (1) —  —  —  —  —  — 
Balance at December 31, 2022 $ 64 $ 15 $ 6 $ 4 $ 2 $ — $ — $ 1 
22. STOCK-BASED COMPENSATION
The Duke Energy Corporation 2015 Long-Term Incentive Plan (the 2015 Plan) provides for the grant of stock-based compensation awards to employees and
outside directors. The 2015 Plan reserved 10 million shares of common stock for issuance. Duke Energy has historically issued new shares upon exercising or
vesting of share-based awards. However, Duke Energy may use a combination of new share issuances and open market repurchases for share-based awards
that are exercised or vest in the future. Duke Energy has not determined with certainty the amount of such new share issuances or open market repurchases.
The following table summarizes the total expense recognized by the Duke Energy Registrants, net of tax, for stock-based compensation.
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Duke Energy $ 74 $ 64 $ 61 
Duke Energy Carolinas 27  23  22 
Progress Energy 27  24  23 
Duke Energy Progress 17  15  15 
Duke Energy Florida 10  9  9 
Duke Energy Ohio 5  5  4 
Duke Energy Indiana 7  6  6 
Piedmont 4  3  3 
Duke Energy's pretax stock-based compensation costs, the tax beneﬁt associated with stock-based compensation expense and stock-based compensation
costs capitalized are included in the following table.
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
RSU awards $ 58 $ 49 $ 46 
Performance awards 42  39  38 
Pretax stock-based compensation cost $ 100 $ 88 $ 84 
Stock-based compensation costs capitalized 5  5  5 
Stock-based compensation expense $ 95 $ 83 $ 79 
Tax beneﬁt associated with stock-based compensation expense $ 21 $ 19 $ 18 
RESTRICTED STOCK UNIT AWARDS
RSU awards generally vest over periods from immediate to three years. Fair value amounts are based on the market price of Duke Energy's common stock on
the grant date. The following table includes information related to RSU awards.
  Years Ended December 31,
  2022 2021 2020
Shares granted (in thousands) 654  673  498 
Fair value (in millions) $ 64 $ 59 $ 50 
201
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS STOCK-BASED COMPENSATION
The following table summarizes information about RSU awards outstanding.
Weighted Average
Shares Grant Date Fair Value
  (in thousands) (per share)
Outstanding at December 31, 2021 1,043 $ 92 
Granted 654  98 
Vested (527) 93 
Forfeited (73) 94 
Outstanding at December 31, 2022 1,097  95 
RSU awards expected to vest 1,056  95 
The total grant date fair value of shares vested during the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, was $49 million, $45 million and $43 million,
respectively. At December 31, 2022, Duke Energy had $34 million of unrecognized compensation cost, which is expected to be recognized over a weighted
average period of 23 months.
PERFORMANCE AWARDS
Stock-based performance awards generally vest after three years to the extent performance targets are met. The actual number of shares issued will range
from zero to 200% of target shares, depending on the level of performance achieved.
Performance awards contain performance conditions and a market condition. The performance conditions are based on Duke Energy's cumulative adjusted
EPS and total incident case rate (total incident case rate is one of our key employee safety metrics). The market condition is based on TSR of Duke Energy
relative to a predeﬁned peer group.
Relative TSR is valued using a path-dependent model that incorporates expected relative TSR into the fair value determination of Duke Energy’s
performance-based share awards. The model uses three-year historical volatilities and correlations for all companies in the predeﬁned peer group, including
Duke Energy, to simulate Duke Energy’s relative TSR as of the end of the performance period. For each simulation, Duke Energy’s relative TSR associated
with the simulated stock price at the end of the performance period plus expected dividends within the period results in a value per share for the award
portfolio. The average of these simulations is the expected portfolio value per share. Actual life to date results of Duke Energy’s relative TSR for each grant
are incorporated within the model. For performance awards granted in 2022, the model used a risk-free interest rate of 1.78%, which reﬂects the yield on
three-year Treasury bonds as of the grant date, and an expected volatility of 26.8% based on Duke Energy's historical volatility over three years using daily
stock prices.
The following table includes information related to stock-based performance awards.
  Years Ended December 31,
  2022 2021 2020
Shares granted assuming target performance (in thousands) 408  380  319 
Fair value (in millions) $ 40 $ 33 $ 34 
The following table summarizes information about stock-based performance awards outstanding and assumes payout at the target level.
Weighted Average
Shares Grant Date Fair Value
  (in thousands) (per share)
Outstanding at December 31, 2021 952 $ 93 
Granted 408  99 
Vested (297) 86 
Forfeited (30) 96 
Outstanding at December 31, 2022 1,033  97 
Stock-based performance awards expected to vest 1,006  97 
The total grant date fair value of shares vested during the years ended December 31, 2022, and 2021, was $25 million and $25 million, respectively. At
December 31, 2022, Duke Energy had $22 million of unrecognized compensation cost, which is expected to be recognized over a weighted average period of
22 months.
202
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
23. EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
DEFINED BENEFIT RETIREMENT PLANS
Duke Energy and certain subsidiaries maintain, and the Subsidiary Registrants participate in, qualiﬁed, non-contributory deﬁned beneﬁt retirement plans,
which consist of the Duke Energy Retirement Cash Balance Plan (RCBP), which is an active plan, and the Duke Energy Legacy Pension Plan (DELPP), which is
an inactive plan. These plans cover most employees using a cash balance formula. Under a cash balance formula, a plan participant accumulates a
retirement beneﬁt consisting of pay credits based upon a percentage of current eligible earnings, age or age and years of service and interest credits.
Certain employees are eligible for beneﬁts that use a ﬁnal average earnings formula. Under these ﬁnal average earnings formulas, a plan participant
accumulates a retirement beneﬁt equal to the sum of percentages of their (i) highest three-, four-, or ﬁve-year average earnings, (ii) highest three-, four-, or
ﬁve-year average earnings in excess of covered compensation per year of participation (maximum of 35 years) or (iii) highest three-year average earnings
times years of participation in excess of 35 years. Duke Energy also maintains, and the Subsidiary Registrants participate in, non-qualiﬁed, non-contributory
deﬁned beneﬁt retirement plans that cover certain executives. The qualiﬁed and non-qualiﬁed, non-contributory deﬁned beneﬁt plans are closed to new
participants.
Duke Energy uses a December 31 measurement date for its deﬁned beneﬁt retirement plan assets and obligations. Actuarial losses experienced by the
deﬁned beneﬁt retirement plans in remeasuring plan assets on December 31, 2022, were primarily attributable to actual investment performance that was
less than expected investment performance. Actuarial gains experienced by the deﬁned beneﬁt retirement plans in remeasuring plan obligations as of
December 31, 2022, were primarily attributable to the increase in the discount rate used to measure plan obligations. Actuarial losses experienced by the
deﬁned beneﬁt retirement plans in remeasuring plan assets as of December 31, 2021, were primarily attributable to actual investment performance that was
less than expected investment performance. Actuarial gains experienced by the deﬁned beneﬁt retirement plans in remeasuring plan obligations as of
December 31, 2021, were primarily attributable to the increase in the discount rate used to measure plan obligations.
As a result of the application of settlement accounting due to total lump-sum beneﬁt payments exceeding the settlement threshold (deﬁned as the sum of
service cost and interest cost on projected beneﬁt obligation components of net periodic beneﬁt costs) for one of its qualiﬁed pension plans, Duke Energy
recognized settlement charges of $117 million, of which $95 million was recorded to Regulatory Assets within Other Noncurrent Assets on the Condensed
Consolidated Balance Sheets and $22 million was recorded to Other Income and Expenses, net, within the Condensed Consolidated Statement of Operations
as of December 31, 2022.
Settlement charges recognized by the Subsidiary Registrants as of December 31, 2022, which represent amounts allocated by Duke Energy for employees of
the Subsidiary Registrants and allocated charges for their proportionate share of settlement charges for employees of Duke Energy's shared services aﬃliate,
and recorded to Regulatory Assets within Other Noncurrent Assets on the Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets were $35 million for Duke Energy
Carolinas, $23 million for Progress Energy, $16 million for Duke Energy Progress, $7 million for Duke Energy Florida, $8 million for Duke Energy Indiana and
$29 million for Piedmont. Settlement charges recognized by the Subsidiary Registrants as of December 31, 2022, recorded to Other Income and Expenses,
net, within the Condensed Consolidated Statement of Operations were $3 million for Duke Energy Carolinas, $5 million for Progress Energy, $5 million for
Duke Energy Progress, $1 million for Duke Energy Florida, $5 million for Duke Energy Ohio and $6 million for Piedmont.
The settlement charges reﬂect the recognition of a pro-rata portion of previously unrecognized actuarial losses, equal to the percentage of reduction in the
projected beneﬁt obligation resulting from total lump-sum beneﬁt payments as of December 31, 2022. Settlement charges recognized as a regulatory asset
within Other Noncurrent Assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheets are amortized over the average remaining service period for participants in the plan.
Amortization of settlement charges is disclosed in the tables below as a component of net periodic pension costs.
Eﬀective December 31, 2022, Duke Energy Florida changed its method for calculating the market related value of plan assets (MRVA) from the fair value
method to a method that recognizes changes in fair value of its plan assets over a ﬁve-year period. This represents a change in regulatory treatment that will
serve to mitigate the impact of market volatility on retail customer rates, resulting in the timing of net periodic pension cost recognition that is more
consistent with treatment of the related cost in the ratemaking process. The three-year retrospective impact of this method change of $24 million was
recognized by Duke Energy, Progress Energy and Duke Energy Florida, respectively, and was recorded to Other Income and Expenses, net, within the
Condensed Consolidated Statement of Operations and has been disclosed in the tables below as a component of net periodic pension costs.
Net periodic beneﬁt costs disclosed in the tables below represent the cost of the respective beneﬁt plan for the periods presented prior to capitalization of
amounts reﬂected as Net property, plant and equipment, on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Only the service cost component of net periodic beneﬁt costs
is eligible to be capitalized. The remaining non-capitalized portions of net periodic beneﬁt costs are classiﬁed as either: (1) service cost, which is recorded in
Operations, maintenance and other on the Consolidated Statements of Operations; or as (2) components of non-service cost, which is recorded in Other
income and expenses, net on the Consolidated Statements of Operations. Amounts presented in the tables below for the Subsidiary Registrants represent
the amounts of pension and other post-retirement beneﬁt cost allocated by Duke Energy for employees of the Subsidiary Registrants. Additionally, the
Consolidated Statements of Operations of the Subsidiary Registrants also include allocated net periodic beneﬁt costs for their proportionate share of pension
and post-retirement beneﬁt cost for employees of Duke Energy’s shared services aﬃliate that provide support to the Subsidiary Registrants. However, in the
tables below, these amounts are only presented within the Duke Energy column (except for amortization of settlement charges). These allocated amounts
are included in the governance and shared service costs discussed in Note 14.
203
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
Duke Energy’s policy is to fund amounts on an actuarial basis to provide assets suﬃcient to meet beneﬁt payments to be paid to plan participants. The
following table includes information related to the Duke Energy Registrants’ contributions to its qualiﬁed deﬁned beneﬁt pension plans. There were no
contributions made in the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020.
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Contributions Made:
2022 $ 58 $ 15 $ 13 $ 8 $ 5 $ 3 $ 5 $ 2 
QUALIFIED PENSION PLANS
Components of Net Periodic Pension Costs
Year Ended December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Service cost $ 152 $ 48 $ 43 $ 25 $ 17 $ 4 $ 9 $ 5 
Interest cost on projected beneﬁt
obligation 249  59  77  35  41  13  20  8 
Expected return on plan assets (558) (152) (183) (88) (94) (23) (37) (24)
Amortization of actuarial loss 81  16  23  12  12  4  9  5 
Amortization of prior service credit (18) (3) —  —  —  —  (2) (7)
Amortization of settlement charges 32  9  8  7  1  5  1  7 
MRVA method change 24  —  24  —  24  —  —  — 
Net periodic pension costs $ (38)$ (23)$ (8)$ (9)$ 1 $ 3 $ — $ (6)
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Service cost $ 176 $ 56 $ 50 $ 29 $ 21 $ 5 $ 10 $ 6 
Interest cost on projected beneﬁt
obligation 220  51  70  30  39  13  18  7 
Expected return on plan assets (558) (141) (187) (84) (102) (28) (40) (20)
Amortization of actuarial loss 133  29  38  18  20  7  13  10 
Amortization of prior service credit (29) (8) (2) (1) (1) (1) (2) (9)
Amortization of settlement charges 9  5  2  2  1  —  —  1 
Net periodic pension costs $ (49)$ (8)$ (29)$ (6)$ (22)$ (4)$ (1)$ (5)
Year Ended December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Service cost $ 165 $ 51 $ 48 $ 27 $ 21 $ 5 $ 9 $ 6 
Interest cost on projected beneﬁt
obligation 269  62  85  38  46  15  22  9 
Expected return on plan assets (572) (145) (190) (87) (101) (28) (42) (21)
Amortization of actuarial loss 128  28  41  18  23  6  12  9 
Amortization of prior service credit (32) (8) (3) (2) (1) —  (2) (9)
Amortization of settlement charges 18  9  7  6  1  —  1  1 
Net periodic pension costs $ (24)$ (3)$ (12)$ — $ (11)$ (2)$ — $ (5)
(a)    Duke Energy amounts exclude $3 million, $3 million and $4 million for the years ended December 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively, of regulatory
asset amortization resulting from purchase accounting adjustments associated with Duke Energy's merger with Cinergy in April 2006.
(b)    Duke Energy Ohio amounts exclude $1 million, $1 million and $2 million for the years ended December 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively, of
regulatory asset amortization resulting from purchase accounting adjustments associated with Duke Energy's merger with Cinergy in April 2006.
(c)    Includes settlement charges not deferred as a regulatory asset.(c)
(a)(b)
(a)(b)
(c)
(a)(b)
204
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
Amounts Recognized in Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income and Regulatory Assets
Year Ended December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Regulatory assets, net increase
(decrease) $ 367 $ 221 $ 107 $ 101 $ 5 $ (1)$ (12)$ 9 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss
(income)
Deferred income tax expense $ (7)$ — $ (1)$ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Amortization of prior year service credit —  —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Amortization of prior year actuarial
losses 37  —  2  —  —  —  —  — 
Net amount recognized in accumulated
other comprehensive income $ 30 $ — $ 1 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Regulatory assets, net decrease $ (261)$ (57)$ (128)$ (31)$ (97)$ (17)$ (19)$ (5)
Accumulated other comprehensive loss
(income)
Deferred income tax expense $ 1 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Amortization of prior year service credit 1  —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Amortization of prior year actuarial
losses (8) —  (1) —  —  —  —  — 
Net amount recognized in accumulated
other comprehensive income $ (6)$ — $ (1)$ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Reconciliation of Funded Status to Net Amount Recognized
Year Ended December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Change in Projected Beneﬁt
Obligation
Obligation at prior measurement date$ 8,207 $ 1,903 $ 2,560 $ 1,153 $ 1,392 $ 450 $ 680 $ 273 
Service cost 145  47  40  24  16  4  8  5 
Interest cost 249  59  77  35  41  13  20  8 
Actuarial gain (1,490) (301) (513) (197) (312) (84) (143) (47)
Beneﬁts paid (753) (159) (184) (101) (82) (50) (66) (69)
Transfers —  5  (5) (5) —  —  —  — 
Obligation at measurement date $ 6,358 $ 1,554 $ 1,975 $ 909 $ 1,055 $ 333 $ 499 $ 170 
Accumulated Beneﬁt Obligation at
measurement date $ 6,324 $ 1,556 $ 1,959 $ 910 $ 1,038 $ 327 $ 495 $ 170 
Change in Fair Value of Plan Assets
Plan assets at prior measurement date$ 9,235 $ 2,365 $ 3,053 $ 1,421 $ 1,610 $ 438 $ 669 $ 334 
Employer contributions 58  15  13  8  5  3  5  2 
Actual return on plan assets (1,547) (411) (506) (240) (262) (68) (107) (64)
Beneﬁts paid (753) (159) (184) (101) (82) (50) (66) (69)
Transfers —  5  (5) (5) —  —  —  — 
Plan assets at measurement date $ 6,993 $ 1,815 $ 2,371 $ 1,083 $ 1,271 $ 323 $ 501 $ 203 
Funded status of plan $ 635 $ 261 $ 396 $ 174 $ 216 $ (10)$ 2 $ 33 
205
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Change in Projected Beneﬁt
Obligation
Obligation at prior measurement date $ 8,634 $ 1,988 $ 2,715 $ 1,193 $ 1,507 $ 502 $ 715 $ 293 
Service cost 168  54  48  28  20  5  9  6 
Interest cost 220  51  70  30  39  13  18  7 
Actuarial gain (200) (42) (108) (18) (89) (10) (10) (5)
Beneﬁts paid (615) (148) (161) (80) (81) (50) (52) (28)
Transfers —  —  (4) —  (4) (10) —  — 
Obligation at measurement date $ 8,207 $ 1,903 $ 2,560 $ 1,153 $ 1,392 $ 450 $ 680 $ 273 
Accumulated Beneﬁt Obligation at
measurement date $ 8,144 $ 1,904 $ 2,529 $ 1,154 $ 1,361 $ 439 $ 672 $ 274 
Change in Fair Value of Plan Assets
Plan assets at prior measurement date$ 9,337 $ 2,381 $ 3,049 $ 1,422 $ 1,605 $ 472 $ 684 $ 343 
Actual return on plan assets 513  132  169  79  90  26  37  19 
Beneﬁts paid (615) (148) (161) (80) (81) (50) (52) (28)
Transfers —  —  (4) —  (4) (10) —  — 
Plan assets at measurement date $ 9,235 $ 2,365 $ 3,053 $ 1,421 $ 1,610 $ 438 $ 669 $ 334 
Funded status of plan $ 1,028 $ 462 $ 493 $ 268 $ 218 $ (12)$ (11)$ 61 
Amounts Recognized in the Consolidated Balance Sheets
December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Prefunded pension $ 885 $ 261 $ 396 $ 174 $ 216 $ 62 $ 90 $ 33 
Noncurrent pension liability $ 250 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 72 $ 88 $ — 
Net asset (liability) recognized $ 635 $ 261 $ 396 $ 174 $ 216 $ (10)$ 2 $ 33 
Regulatory assets $ 2,016 $ 545 $ 670 $ 353 $ 316 $ 92 $ 178 $ 84 
Accumulated other comprehensive (income)
loss  
Deferred income tax beneﬁt $ (27)$ — $ (1)$ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Prior service credit (1) —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Net actuarial loss 129  —  3  —  —  —  —  — 
Net amounts recognized in accumulated
other comprehensive loss $ 101 $ — $ 2 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — (a)
(b)
206
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Prefunded pension $ 1,071 $ 462 $ 494 $ 268 $ 219 $ 74 $ 100 $ 61 
Noncurrent pension liability $ 43 $ — $ 1 $ — $ 1 $ 86 $ 111 $ — 
Net asset (liability) recognized $ 1,028 $ 462 $ 493 $ 268 $ 218 $ (12)$ (11)$ 61 
Regulatory assets $ 1,649 $ 324 $ 563 $ 252 $ 311 $ 93 $ 190 $ 75 
Accumulated other comprehensive (income)
loss
Deferred income tax beneﬁt $ (20)$ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Prior service credit (1) —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Net actuarial loss 92  —  1  —  —  —  —  — 
Net amounts recognized in accumulated
other comprehensive loss $ 71 $ — $ 1 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
(a)    Included in Other within Other Noncurrent Assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
(b)    Included in Accrued pension and other post-retirement beneﬁt costs on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Information for Plans with Accumulated Beneﬁt Obligation in Excess of Plan Assets
December 31, 2022
Duke Duke
Duke Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Ohio Indiana
Projected beneﬁt obligation $3,323 $ 103 $ 198 
Accumulated beneﬁt obligation 3,288  99  193 
Fair value of plan assets 3,073  31  110 
December 31, 2021
Duke Duke
Energy Energy
(in millions) Ohio Indiana
Projected beneﬁt obligation $ 153 $ 284 
Accumulated beneﬁt obligation 143  275 
Fair value of plan assets 67  173 
Assumptions Used for Pension Beneﬁts Accounting
The discount rate used to determine the current year pension obligation and following year’s pension expense is based on a bond selection-settlement
portfolio approach. This approach develops a discount rate by selecting a portfolio of high-quality corporate bonds that generate suﬃcient cash ﬂow to
provide for projected beneﬁt payments of the plan. The selected bond portfolio is derived from a universe of non-callable corporate bonds rated Aa quality or
higher. After the bond portfolio is selected, a single interest rate is determined that equates the present value of the plan’s projected beneﬁt payments
discounted at this rate with the market value of the bonds selected.
The average remaining service period for participants in active plans and life expectancy of participants in inactive plans is 13 years for Duke Energy and
Duke Energy Progress, 15 years for Duke Energy Florida and Duke Energy Ohio, 14 years for Progress Energy and Duke Energy Indiana, 12 years for Duke
Energy Carolinas and nine years for Piedmont.(a)
(b)
207
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
The following tables present the assumptions or range of assumptions used for pension beneﬁt accounting.
December 31,
2022 2021 2020
Beneﬁt Obligations
Discount rate 5.60% 2.90% 2.60%
Interest crediting rate 4.35% 4.00% 4.00%
Salary increase 3.50 %–4.00% 3.50 %–4.00% 3.50 %–4.00%
Net Periodic Beneﬁt Cost
Discount rate 2.90 %–5.70% 2.60% 3.30%
Interest crediting rate 4.00% 4.00% 4.00%
Salary increase 3.50 %–4.00% 3.50 %–4.00% 3.50 %–4.00%
Expected long-term rate of return on plan assets 6.50% 6.50% 6.85%
Expected Beneﬁt Payments
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgress Florida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Years ending December 31,
2023 $ 661 $ 186 $ 183 $ 99 $ 83 $ 32 $ 45 $ 19 
2024 635  176  180  95  84  31  45  18 
2025 629  174  183  97  85  31  44  16 
2026 607  164  180  91  87  30  44  16 
2027 592  156  177  89  87  29  43  15 
2028-2032 2,581  628  804  372  427  135  205  71 
NON-QUALIFIED PENSION PLANS
The accumulated beneﬁt obligation, which equals the projected beneﬁt obligation for non-qualiﬁed pension plans, was $232 million for Duke Energy, $10
million for Duke Energy Carolinas, $78 million for Progress Energy, $24 million for Duke Energy Progress, $32 million for Duke Energy Florida, $3 million for
Duke Energy Ohio, $2 million for Duke Energy Indiana and $3 million for Piedmont as of December 31, 2022.
Employer contributions, which equal beneﬁts paid for non-qualiﬁed pension plans, were $24 million for Duke Energy, $1 million for Duke Energy Carolinas,
$10 million for Progress Energy, $3 million for Duke Energy Progress and $4 million for Duke Energy Florida for the year ended December 31, 2022. Employer
contributions were not material for Duke Energy Ohio, Duke Energy Indiana or Piedmont for the year ended December 31, 2022.
Net periodic pension costs for non-qualiﬁed pension plans were not material for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 or 2020.
OTHER POST-RETIREMENT BENEFIT PLANS
Duke Energy provides, and the Subsidiary Registrants participate in, some health care and life insurance beneﬁts for retired employees on a contributory and
non-contributory basis. Employees are eligible for these beneﬁts if they have met age and service requirements at retirement, as deﬁned in the plans. The
health care beneﬁts include medical, dental, vision and prescription drug coverage and are subject to certain limitations, such as deductibles and
copayments.
Duke Energy did not make any pre-funding contributions to its other post-retirement beneﬁt plans during the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 or 2020.
208
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
Components of Net Periodic Other Post-Retirement Beneﬁt Costs
Year Ended December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Service cost $ 3 $ 1 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Interest cost on accumulated post-
retirement beneﬁt obligation 17  4  7  4  3  1  1  1 
Expected return on plan assets (10) (6) —  —  —  —  —  (2)
Amortization of actuarial loss 2  —  1  1  1  —  —  — 
Amortization of prior service credit (8) (3) (2) (1) (1) —  —  (2)
Net periodic post-retirement beneﬁt
costs $ 4 $ (4)$ 6 $ 4 $ 3 $ 1 $ 1 $ (3)
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Service cost $ 4 $ 1 $ 1 $ — $ — $ — $ 1 $ — 
Interest cost on accumulated post-
retirement beneﬁt obligation 18  4  7  4  3  1  1  1 
Expected return on plan assets (11) (7) —  —  —  —  —  (2)
Amortization of actuarial loss 2  —  1  —  1  —  4  — 
Amortization of prior service credit (13) (4) (2) (1) (1) (1) (1) (2)
Net periodic post-retirement beneﬁt
costs $ — $ (6)$ 7 $ 3 $ 3 $ — $ 5 $ (3)
Year Ended December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Service cost $ 4 $ 1 $ 1 $ — $ — $ — $ 1 $ — 
Interest cost on accumulated post-
retirement beneﬁt obligation 23  5  10  5  4  1  2  1 
Expected return on plan assets (13) (8) —  —  —  —  —  (2)
Amortization of actuarial loss 2  —  1  —  1  —  4  — 
Amortization of prior service credit (14) (4) (3) (1) (2) (1) (1) (2)
Net periodic post-retirement beneﬁt
costs $ 2 $ (6)$ 9 $ 4 $ 3 $ — $ 6 $ (3)
(a)    Duke Energy amounts exclude $4 million, $5 million and $6 million for the years ended December 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively, of regulatory
asset amortization resulting from purchase accounting adjustments associated with Duke Energy's merger with Cinergy in April 2006.
(b)    Duke Energy Ohio amounts exclude $1 million, $1 million and $1 million for the years ended December 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively, of
regulatory asset amortization resulting from purchase accounting adjustments associated with Duke Energy's merger with Cinergy in April 2006.(a)(b)
(a)(b)
(a)(b)
209
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
Amounts Recognized in Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income and Regulatory Assets and Liabilities
Year Ended December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Regulatory assets, net (decrease)
increase $ (79)$ — $ (80)$ (45)$ (36)$ — $ (3)$ — 
Regulatory liabilities, net increase
(decrease) $ 27 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 19 $ (5)
Accumulated other comprehensive
(income) loss
Amortization of prior year actuarial gain$ 1 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Net amount recognized in accumulated
other comprehensive income $ 1 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Regulatory assets, net (decrease)
increase $ (15)$ — $ (18)$ (9)$ (9)$ 4 $ (4)$ — 
Regulatory liabilities, net increase $ 23 $ 12 $ — $ — $ — $ 4 $ 1 $ 2 
Accumulated other comprehensive
(income) loss
Amortization of prior year actuarial gain$ (1)$ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Net amount recognized in accumulated
other comprehensive income $ (1)$ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Reconciliation of Funded Status to Accrued Other Post-Retirement Beneﬁt Costs
Year Ended December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Change in Projected Beneﬁt
Obligation
Accumulated post-retirement beneﬁt
obligation at prior measurement date $ 625 $ 149 $ 263 $ 147 $ 112 $ 25 $ 54 $ 27 
Service cost 3  1  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Interest cost 17  4  7  4  3  1  1  1 
Plan participants' contributions 11  2  4  2  2  1  1  — 
Actuarial gains (80) (17) (43) (27) (16) (3) (1) (5)
Plan amendments (71) (11) (37) (18) (19) —  (17) — 
Beneﬁts paid (68) (16) (26) (13) (13) (4) (8) (2)
Accumulated post-retirement beneﬁt
obligation at measurement date $ 437 $ 112 $ 168 $ 95 $ 69 $ 20 $ 30 $ 21 
Change in Fair Value of Plan Assets
Plan assets at prior measurement date $ 211 $ 135 $ (1)$ (2)$ (2)$ 9 $ 6 $ 39 
Actual return on plan assets (31) (19) —  —  —  (2) —  (7)
Beneﬁts paid (68) (16) (26) (13) (13) (4) (8) (2)
Employer contributions 39  3  23  11  11  3  4  1 
Plan participants' contributions 11  2  4  2  2  1  1  — 
Plan assets at measurement date $ 162 $ 105 $ — $ (2)$ (2)$ 7 $ 3 $ 31 
Funded status of plan $ (275)$ (7)$ (168)$ (97)$ (71)$ (13)$ (27)$ 10 
210
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Change in Projected Beneﬁt
Obligation
Accumulated post-retirement beneﬁt
obligation at prior measurement date $ 709 $ 174 $ 299 $ 166 $ 130 $ 27 $ 61 $ 30 
Service cost 4  1  1  —  —  —  1  — 
Interest cost 18  4  7  4  3  1  1  1 
Plan participants' contributions 14  3  5  3  2  1  2  — 
Actuarial gains (47) (14) (20) (10) (10) (1) (2) (2)
Beneﬁts paid (73) (19) (29) (16) (13) (3) (9) (2)
Accumulated post-retirement beneﬁt
obligation at measurement date $ 625 $ 149 $ 263 $ 147 $ 112 $ 25 $ 54 $ 27 
Change in Fair Value of Plan Assets
Plan assets at prior measurement date $ 237 $ 139 $ (1)$ (2)$ (1)$ 9 $ 7 $ 37 
Actual return on plan assets 15  9  —  —  —  1  —  3 
Beneﬁts paid (73) (19) (29) (16) (13) (3) (9) (2)
Employer contributions 18  3  24  13  10  1  6  1 
Plan participants' contributions 14  3  5  3  2  1  2  — 
Plan assets at measurement date $ 211 $ 135 $ (1)$ (2)$ (2)$ 9 $ 6 $ 39 
Funded status of plan $ (414)$ (14)$ (264)$ (149)$ (114)$ (16)$ (48)$ 12 
Amounts Recognized in the Consolidated Balance Sheets
December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Prefunded post-retirement beneﬁt $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 1 $ — $ 10 
Current post-retirement liability 9  —  5  3  2  2  —  — 
Noncurrent post-retirement liability 266  7  163  94  69  12  27  — 
Net liability (asset) recognized $ 275 $ 7 $ 168 $ 97 $ 71 $ 13 $ 27 $ (10)
Regulatory assets $ 50 $ — $ 46 $ 34 $ 11 $ 4 $ 25 $ — 
Regulatory liabilities $ 189 $ 44 $ — $ — $ — $ 21 $ 82 $ — 
Accumulated other comprehensive
(income) loss
Deferred income tax expense $ 3 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Prior service credit (1) —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Net actuarial gain (13) —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Net amounts recognized in
accumulated other comprehensive
income $ (11)$ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — (a)
(b)
211
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Prefunded post-retirement beneﬁt $ 12 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 1 $ — $ 12 
Current post-retirement liability 9  —  5  3  2  1  —  — 
Noncurrent post-retirement liability 417  14  259  146  112  16  48  — 
Net liability (asset) recognized $ 414 $ 14 $ 264 $ 149 $ 114 $ 16 $ 48 $ (12)
Regulatory assets $ 129 $ — $ 126 $ 79 $ 47 $ 4 $ 28 $ — 
Regulatory liabilities $ 162 $ 44 $ — $ — $ — $ 21 $ 63 $ 5 
Accumulated other comprehensive
(income) loss
Deferred income tax expense $ 3 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Prior service credit (1) —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Net actuarial gain (14) —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Net amounts recognized in accumulated
other comprehensive income $ (12)$ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
(a)    Included in Other within Current Liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. 
(b)    Included in Accrued pension and other post-retirement beneﬁt costs on the Consolidated Balance Sheets.
Assumptions Used for Other Post-Retirement Beneﬁts Accounting
The discount rate used to determine the current year other post-retirement beneﬁts obligation and following year’s other post-retirement beneﬁts expense is
based on a bond selection-settlement portfolio approach. This approach develops a discount rate by selecting a portfolio of high-quality corporate bonds that
generate suﬃcient cash ﬂow to provide for projected beneﬁt payments of the plan. The selected bond portfolio is derived from a universe of non-callable
corporate bonds rated Aa quality or higher. After the bond portfolio is selected, a single interest rate is determined that equates the present value of the
plan’s projected beneﬁt payments discounted at this rate with the market value of the bonds selected.
The average remaining service period of active covered employees is seven years for Duke Energy and Duke Energy Florida, six years for Duke Energy
Carolinas, Duke Energy Ohio, Duke Energy Indiana and Piedmont and ﬁve years for Progress Energy and Duke Energy Progress.
The following tables present the assumptions used for other post-retirement beneﬁts accounting.
December 31,
2022 2021 2020
Beneﬁt Obligations
Discount rate 5.60 % 2.90 % 2.60 %
Net Periodic Beneﬁt Cost
Discount rate 2.90 % 2.60 % 3.30 %
Expected long-term rate of return on plan assets 6.50 % 6.50 % 6.85 %
Assumed Health Care Cost Trend Rate
December 31,
2022 2021
Health care cost trend rate assumed for next year 6.50 % 6.25 %
Rate to which the cost trend is assumed to decline (the ultimate trend rate) 4.75 % 4.75 %
Year that rate reaches ultimate trend 2030-2032 2028(a)
(b)
212
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
Expected Beneﬁt Payments
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgress Florida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Years ending December 31,
2023 $ 68 $ 16 $ 25 $ 14 $ 11 $ 3 $ 7 $ 2 
2024 49  13  18  10  7  3  4  2 
2025 45  12  16  9  7  2  3  2 
2026 41  11  15  9  6  2  3  2 
2027 38  10  14  8  6  2  3  2 
2028-2032 158  41  61  36  25  8  9  9 
PLAN ASSETS
Description and Allocations
Duke Energy Corporation Master Retirement Trust
Assets for both the qualiﬁed pension and other post-retirement beneﬁts are maintained in the Duke Energy Corporation Master Retirement Trust.
Approximately 98% of the Duke Energy Corporation Master Retirement Trust assets were allocated to qualiﬁed pension plans and approximately 2% were
allocated to other post-retirement plans (comprised of 401(h) accounts), as of December 31, 2022, and 2021. The investment objective of the Duke Energy
Corporation Master Retirement Trust is to invest in a diverse portfolio of assets that is expected to generate positive surplus return over time (i.e., asset
growth greater than liability growth) subject to a prudent level of portfolio risk, for the purpose of enhancing the security of beneﬁts for plan participants.
As of December 31, 2022, Duke Energy assumes qualiﬁed pension and other post-retirement plan assets will generate a long-term rate of return of 8.25% for
the RCBP pension and RCBP 401(h) account assets and 6.5% for the DELPP pension and DELPP 401(h) account assets. The expected long-term rate of return
was developed using a weighted average calculation of expected returns based primarily on future expected returns across asset classes considering the use
of active asset managers, where applicable. The asset allocation targets were set after considering the investment objective and the risk proﬁle. Equity
securities are held for their higher expected returns. Debt securities are primarily held to hedge the qualiﬁed pension plan. Return seeking debt securities,
hedge funds and other global securities are held for diversiﬁcation. Investments within asset classes are diversiﬁed to achieve broad market participation
and reduce the impact of individual managers or investments.
Eﬀective January 1, 2023, the target asset allocation for the RCBP assets is 35% liability hedging and 65% return-seeking assets and the target asset
allocation for the DELPP assets is 80% liability hedging assets and 20% return-seeking assets. Duke Energy periodically reviews its asset allocation targets,
and over time, as the funded status of the beneﬁt plans increase, the level of asset risk relative to plan liabilities may be reduced to better manage Duke
Energy's beneﬁt plan liabilities and reduce funded status volatility.
The Duke Energy Corporation Master Retirement Trust is authorized to engage in the lending of certain plan assets. Securities lending is an investment
management enhancement that utilizes certain existing securities of the Duke Energy Corporation Master Retirement Trust to earn additional income.
Securities lending involves the loaning of securities to approved parties. In return for the loaned securities, the Duke Energy Corporation Master Retirement
Trust receives collateral in the form of cash and securities as a safeguard against possible default of any borrower on the return of the loan under terms that
permit the Duke Energy Corporation Master Retirement Trust to sell the securities. The Duke Energy Corporation Master Retirement Trust mitigates credit risk
associated with securities lending arrangements by monitoring the fair value of the securities loaned, with additional collateral obtained or refunded as
necessary. The fair value of securities on loan was approximately $390 million and $542 million at December 31, 2022, and 2021, respectively. Cash and
securities obtained as collateral exceeded the fair value of the securities loaned at December 31, 2022, and 2021, respectively. Securities lending income
earned by the Duke Energy Corporation Master Retirement Trust was immaterial for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
Qualiﬁed pension and other post-retirement beneﬁts for the Subsidiary Registrants are derived from the Duke Energy Corporation Master Retirement Trust, as
such, each are allocated their proportionate share of the assets discussed below.
The following table includes the target asset allocations by asset class at December 31, 2022, and the actual asset allocations for the RCBP assets.
Actual Allocation at
Target December 31,
Allocation 2022 2021
Global equity securities 45 % 49 % 24 %
Global private equity securities 2 % 2 % 1 %
Debt securities 35 % 30 % 62 %
Return seeking debt securities 7 % 7 % 4 %
Hedge funds 4 % 6 % 3 %
Real estate and cash 7 % 6 % 6 %
Total 100 % 100 % 100 %
213
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
The following table includes the target asset allocations by asset class at December 31, 2022, and the actual asset allocations for the DELPP assets.
Actual Allocation at
Target December 31,
Allocation 2022 2021
Global equity securities 14 % 14 % 24 %
Global private equity securities 1 % — % 1 %
Debt securities 80 % 80 % 62 %
Return seeking debt securities 2 % 2 % 4 %
Hedge funds 1 % 2 % 3 %
Real estate and cash 2 % 2 % 6 %
Total 100 % 100 % 100 %
Other post-retirement assets
Duke Energy's other post-retirement assets are comprised of Voluntary Employees' Beneﬁciary Association (VEBA) trusts and 401(h) accounts held within the
Duke Energy Corporation Master Retirement Trust. Duke Energy's investment objective is to achieve suﬃcient returns, subject to a prudent level of portfolio
risk, for the purpose of promoting the security of plan beneﬁts for participants.
The following table presents target and actual asset allocations for the VEBA trusts at December 31, 2022.
Actual Allocation at
Target December 31,
Allocation 2022 2021
U.S. equity securities 30 % 12 % 19 %
Non-U.S. equity securities 5 % 5 % 5 %
Real estate 1 % 3 % 3 %
Debt securities 45 % 11 % 18 %
Cash 19 % 69 % 55 %
Total 100 % 100 % 100 %
Fair Value Measurements
Duke Energy classiﬁes recurring and non-recurring fair value measurements based on the fair value hierarchy as discussed in Note 17.
Valuation methods of the primary fair value measurements disclosed below are as follows:
Investments in equity securities
Investments in equity securities are typically valued at the closing price in the principal active market as of the last business day of the reporting period.
Principal active markets for equity prices include published exchanges such as NASDAQ and NYSE. Foreign equity prices are translated from their trading
currency using the currency exchange rate in eﬀect at the close of the principal active market. Prices have not been adjusted to reﬂect after-hours market
activity. The majority of investments in equity securities are valued using Level 1 measurements. When the price of an institutional commingled fund is
unpublished, it is not categorized in the fair value hierarchy, even though the funds are readily available at the fair value.
Investments in corporate debt securities and U.S. government securities
Most debt investments are valued based on a calculation using interest rate curves and credit spreads applied to the terms of the debt instrument (maturity
and coupon interest rate) and consider the counterparty credit rating. Most debt valuations are Level 2 measurements. If the market for a particular ﬁxed-
income security is relatively inactive or illiquid, the measurement is Level 3. U.S. Treasury debt is typically Level 2.
Investments in short-term investment funds
Investments in short-term investment funds are valued at the net asset value of units held at year end and are readily redeemable at the measurement date.
Investments in short-term investment funds with published prices are valued as Level 1. Investments in short-term investment funds with unpublished prices
are valued as Level 2.
214
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
Duke Energy Corporation Master Retirement Trust
The following tables provide the fair value measurement amounts for the Duke Energy Corporation Master Retirement Trust qualiﬁed pension and other post-
retirement assets.
December 31, 2022
Total Fair Not
(in millions) Value Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Categorized
Equity securities $ 2,234 $ 2,014 $ 194 $ — $ 26 
Corporate debt securities 2,944  —  2,944  —  — 
Short-term investment funds 193  1  192  —  — 
Partnership interests 62  —  —  62  — 
Hedge funds 209  —  —  —  209 
U.S. government securities 1,254  —  1,254  —  — 
Governments bonds – foreign 112  —  112  —  — 
Cash 45  45  —  —  — 
Government and commercial mortgage backed securities 6  —  6  —  — 
Net pending transactions and other investments 14  5  9  —  — 
Total assets $ 7,073 $ 2,065 $ 4,711 $ 62 $ 235 
(a)    Duke Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida, Duke Energy Ohio, Duke Energy Indiana and Piedmont were
allocated approximately 27%, 33%, 15%, 18%, 5%, 7% and 3%, respectively, of the Duke Energy Corporation Master Retirement Trust at
December 31, 2022. Accordingly, all amounts included in the table above are allocable to the Subsidiary Registrants using these percentages.
(b)    Certain investments that are measured at fair value using the net asset value per share practical expedient have not been categorized in the fair value
hierarchy.
December 31, 2021
Total Fair Not
(in millions) Value Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Categorized
Equity securities $ 2,575 $ 2,547 $ — $ — $ 28 
Corporate debt securities 4,189  —  4,189  —  — 
Short-term investment funds 382  272  110  —  — 
Partnership interests 95  —  —  95  — 
Hedge funds 216  —  —  —  216 
U.S. government securities 1,618  —  1,618  —  — 
Governments bonds – foreign 78  —  78  —  — 
Cash 144  144  —  —  — 
Government and commercial mortgage backed securities 2  —  2  —  — 
Net pending transactions and other investments 53  12  41  —  — 
Total assets $ 9,352 $ 2,975 $ 6,038 $ 95 $ 244 
(a)    Duke Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress, Duke Energy Florida, Duke Energy Ohio, Duke Energy Indiana and Piedmont were
allocated approximately 26%, 32%, 15%, 17%, 5%, 7% and 4%, respectively, of the Duke Energy Corporation Master Retirement Trust at
December 31, 2021. Accordingly, all amounts included in the table above are allocable to the Subsidiary Registrants using these percentages.
(b)    Certain investments that are measured at fair value using the net asset value per share practical expedient have not been categorized in the fair value
hierarchy.
The following table provides a reconciliation of beginning and ending balances of Duke Energy Corporation Master Retirement Trust qualiﬁed pension and
other post-retirement assets at fair value on a recurring basis where the determination of fair value includes signiﬁcant unobservable inputs (Level 3).
(in millions) 2022 2021
Balance at January 1 $ 95 $ — 
Sales (18) — 
Total gains and other, net (8) — 
Transfer of Level 3 assets from other classiﬁcations (7) 95 
Balance at December 31 $ 62 $ 95 (b)
(a)
(b)
(a)
215
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
Other post-retirement assets
The following tables provide the fair value measurement amounts for VEBA trust assets.
December 31, 2022
Total Fair
(in millions) Value Level 2
Cash and cash equivalents $ 11 $ 11 
Real estate 2  2 
Equity securities 12  12 
Debt securities 8  8 
Total assets $ 33 $ 33 
December 31, 2021
Total Fair
(in millions) Value Level 2
Cash and cash equivalents $ 14 $ 14 
Real estate 2  2 
Equity securities 18  18 
Debt securities 11  11 
Total assets $ 45 $ 45 
EMPLOYEE SAVINGS PLANS
Retirement Savings Plan
Duke Energy Corporation sponsors, and the Subsidiary Registrants participate in, employee savings plans that cover substantially all U.S. employees. Most
employees participate in a matching contribution formula where Duke Energy provides a matching contribution generally equal to 100% of employee before-
tax and Roth 401(k) contributions of up to 6% of eligible pay per pay period. Dividends on Duke Energy shares held by the savings plans are charged to
retained earnings when declared and shares held in the plans are considered outstanding in the calculation of basic and diluted EPS.
For new and rehired employees who are not eligible to participate in Duke Energy’s deﬁned beneﬁt plans, an additional employer contribution of 4% of
eligible pay per pay period, which is subject to a three-year vesting schedule, is provided to the employee’s savings plan account. Certain Piedmont
employees whose participation in a prior Piedmont deﬁned beneﬁt plan (that was frozen as of December 31, 2017) are eligible for employer transition credit
contributions of 3% to 5% of eligible pay per period, for each pay period during the three-year period ending December 31, 2020.
The following table includes pretax employer matching contributions made by Duke Energy and expensed by the Subsidiary Registrants.
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Years ended December 31,
2022 $ 246 $ 76 $ 65 $ 43 $ 22 $ 6 $ 12 $ 13 
2021 229  70  60  39  21  5  12  11 
2020 213  67  57  38  19  5  11  13 
24. INCOME TAXES
Inﬂation Reduction Act
On August 16, 2022, the IRA was signed into law. Among other provisions, the IRA implemented a new 15% corporate alternative minimum tax based on
GAAP net income, with certain adjustments as deﬁned by the IRA, and clean energy-related provisions. The IRA's clean energy provisions include, among
other provisions, the extension and modiﬁcation of existing investment and PTCs for projects placed in service through 2024 and introduces new technology-
neutral clean energy related credits beginning in 2025. In addition, the IRA created a new, zero-emission nuclear power PTC and a clean hydrogen PTC.
Duke Energy has preliminarily reviewed the provisions of the IRA and has determined there were no material impacts on the results of operations, ﬁnancial
position, or cash ﬂows in the periods presented for the Duke Energy Registrants as a result of the IRA being signed into law. Based on the preliminary review
of the IRA provisions, future annual cash ﬂow impacts related to the energy credits could be material to the Duke Energy Registrants. However, the majority
of Duke Energy's operations are regulated and the FERC and state utility commissions will determine the regulatory treatment. We anticipate the Subsidiary
Registrants will defer and expect to pass along the net ﬁnancial impact associated with the IRA to customers over time. See Note 4 for further details on the
IRA as it relates to Duke Energy Florida. Duke Energy will continue to assess the IRA as new information and anticipated guidance from the U.S. Department
of the Treasury becomes available.
216
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS INCOME TAXES
North Carolina's 2021 Appropriations Act
On November 18, 2021, North Carolina Senate Bill 105 (SB 105) was signed into law. Starting with tax year 2025, SB 105 begins phasing out the North
Carolina corporate income tax rate over ﬁve years, from a statutory rate of 2.5% to zero. Duke Energy recorded a net reduction of approximately
$490 million to its North Carolina deferred tax liability in the fourth quarter of 2021. The majority of this deferred tax liability reduction was oﬀset by
recording a regulatory liability pending NCUC determination of the disposition of the amounts related to Duke Energy Carolinas, Duke Energy Progress and
Piedmont. In addition, Duke Energy recorded a net reduction of North Carolina consolidating deferred tax assets of approximately $25 million to deferred
state income tax expense in the fourth quarter of 2021. North Carolina SB 105 did not have a signiﬁcant impact on the ﬁnancial position, results of operation,
or cash ﬂows of Duke Energy, Duke Energy Carolinas, Progress Energy, Duke Energy Progress or Piedmont.
Consolidated Appropriations Act
On December 27, 2020, the Consolidated Appropriations Act (CAA) was signed into law. In addition to the CAA providing funding for government operations,
it also provided tax provisions to assist with COVID-19 relief, including extending certain expiring tax provisions. The company has reviewed the provisions of
the CAA and has determined that there are no material impacts on the ﬁnancial statements as a result of the CAA being signed into law.
CARES Act
On March 27, 2020, the CARES Act was enacted. The CARES Act was an emergency economic stimulus package in response to the COVID-19 pandemic.
Among other provisions, the CARES Act accelerated the remaining AMT credit refund allowances resulting in taxpayers being able to immediately claim a
refund in full for any AMT credit carryforwards and provided for the deferral of certain 2020 payroll taxes. In the third quarter of 2020, Duke Energy received
$572 million related to these AMT credit carryforwards and $19 million of interest income. In addition, the company deferred approximately $117 million of
payroll taxes, of which, 50% were paid by December 31, 2021, with the remaining 50% payable by December 31, 2022. The other provisions within the
CARES Act did not materially impact Duke Energy's income tax accounting.
Income Tax Expense
Components of Income Tax Expense
Tax beneﬁt from discontinued operations, in the following tables, includes income tax beneﬁts related to the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups. See
Note 2 for further details.
  Year Ended December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress EnergyEnergyEnergyEnergy
(in millions) EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgressFlorida OhioIndianaPiedmont
Current income taxes
Federal $ 1 $ (71)$ (13)$ 37 $ (37)$ (2)$ 38 $ 32 
State (8) (13) (3) —  (23) 1  2  2 
Foreign 4  —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Total current income taxes (3) (84) (16) 37  (60) (1) 40  34 
Deferred income taxes            
Federal 328  230  310  118  201  (22) (63) 12 
State (14) (16) 59  7  84  3  —  (7)
Total deferred income taxes 314  214  369  125  285  (19) (63) 5 
ITC amortization (11) (4) (5) (4) —  (1) (1) — 
Income tax expense from continuing operations 300  126  348  158  225  (21) (24) 39 
Tax beneﬁt from discontinued operations (503) —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Total income tax (beneﬁt) expense included in
Consolidated Statements of Operations $(203)$ 126 $ 348 $ 158 $ 225 $(21)$ (24)$ 39 
(a)     Total deferred income taxes includes the generation of NOL carryforwards and tax credit carryforwards of $550 million at Duke Energy, $97 million at
Duke Energy Carolinas, $128 million at Progress Energy, $9 million at Duke Energy Progress, $111 million at Duke Energy Florida, $7 million at Duke
Energy Ohio, $13 million at Duke Energy Indiana, and $12 million at Piedmont.(a)
217
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS INCOME TAXES
  Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress EnergyEnergyEnergyEnergy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy ProgressFlorida OhioIndiana Piedmont
Current income taxes              
Federal $ (2)$ 241 $ (15)$ 113 $ (75)$ (8)$ 65 $ 23 
State 1  23  (4) 8  (17) (2) 7  3 
Foreign 2  —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Total current income taxes 1  264  (19) 121  (92) (10) 72  26 
Deferred income taxes            
Federal 275  (130) 203  (16) 202  35  19  17 
State —  (79) 47  (26) 77  5  16  (13)
Total deferred income taxes 275  (209) 250  (42) 279  40  35  4 
ITC amortization (8) (4) (4) (4) —  —  —  — 
Income tax expense from continuing operations 268  51  227  75  187  30  107  30 
Tax beneﬁt from discontinued operations (76) —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Total income tax expense included in Consolidated
Statements of Operations $ 192 $ 51 $ 227 $ 75 $ 187 $ 30 $ 107 $ 30 
(a)    Total deferred income taxes includes the generation of NOL carryforwards and tax credit carryforwards of $32 million at Duke Energy Carolinas,
$8 million at Duke Energy Indiana, and $3 million at Piedmont. In addition, total deferred income taxes includes utilization of NOL carryforwards and
tax credit carryforwards of $250 million at Duke Energy, $95 million at Progress Energy, $14 million at Duke Energy Progress, $64 million at Duke
Energy Florida, and $2 million at Duke Energy Ohio.
  Year Ended December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress EnergyEnergyEnergyEnergy
(in millions) EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgressFlorida OhioIndianaPiedmont
Current income taxes              
Federal $(281)$ 314 $ 280 $ 181 $ 148 $ 10 $ 48 $ (27)
State (3) 35  29  17  24  1  7  (8)
Foreign 1  —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Total current income taxes (283) 349  309  198  172  11  55  (35)
Deferred income taxes              
Federal 222  (171) (167) (180) 1  30  12  60 
State (98) (86) (24) (49) 25  2  17  (7)
Total deferred income taxes 124  (257) (191) (229) 26  32  29  53 
ITC amortization (10) (4) (5) (5) —  —  —  — 
Income tax (beneﬁt) expense from continuing operations (169) 88  113  (36) 198  43  84  18 
Tax beneﬁt from discontinued operations (65) —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Total income tax (beneﬁt) expense included in Consolidated
Statements of Operations $(234)$ 88 $ 113 $ (36)$ 198 $ 43 $ 84 $ 18 
(a)    Total deferred income taxes includes the generation of NOL carryforwards and tax credit carryforwards of $20 million at Duke Energy Carolinas,
$3 million at Duke Energy Progress, $8 million at Duke Energy Indiana, and $11 million at Piedmont. In addition, total deferred income taxes
includes utilization of NOL carryforwards and tax credit carryforwards of $39 million at Progress Energy, $30 million at Duke Energy Florida and $189
million at Duke Energy.    
Duke Energy Income from Continuing Operations before Income Taxes
  Years Ended December 31,
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Domestic $ 3,991 $ 3,947 $ 907 
Foreign 87  44  13 
Income from continuing operations before income taxes $ 4,078 $ 3,991 $ 920 (a)
(a)
218
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS INCOME TAXES
Statutory Rate Reconciliation
The following tables present a reconciliation of income tax expense at the U.S. federal statutory tax rate to the actual tax expense from continuing
operations.
  Year Ended December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy EnergyEnergy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Income tax expense, computed at the statutory
rate of 21% $856 $ 362 $ 457 $ 245 $ 238 $ 59 $ 24 $ 76 
State income tax, net of federal income tax
eﬀect (17) (23) 44  6  48  3  2  (4)
Amortization of excess deferred income tax (481) (195) (133) (74) (59) (79) (48) (23)
AFUDC equity income (41) (20) (14) (11) (3) (1) (2) (2)
AFUDC equity depreciation 36  18  12  6  6  1  4  — 
Other tax credits (43) (12) (16) (9) (7) (2) (3) (8)
Other items, net (10) (4) (2) (5) 2  (2) (1) — 
Income tax expense from continuing operations$300 $ 126 $ 348 $ 158 $ 225 $(21)$ (24)$ 39 
Eﬀective tax rate 7.4 % 7.3 % 16.0 % 13.6 % 19.8 % (7.5)% (21.2)% 10.8 %
  Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Income tax expense, computed at the
statutory rate of 21% $ 838 $ 291 $ 384 $ 224 $ 194 $ 49 $ 123 $ 71 
State income tax, net of federal income tax
eﬀect 1  (44) 34  (14) 47  2  18  (8)
Amortization of excess deferred income tax (438) (184) (174) (120) (54) (22) (34) (25)
AFUDC equity income (34) (14) (11) (7) (3) (2) (4) (4)
AFUDC equity depreciation 35  18  10  5  5  2  5  — 
Other tax credits (30) (12) (11) (8) (3) (1) (2) (4)
Valuation allowance (85) —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Other items, net (19) (4) (5) (5) 1  2  1  — 
Income tax expense from continuing
operations $ 268 $ 51 $ 227 $ 75 $ 187 $ 30 $ 107 $ 30 
Eﬀective tax rate 6.7 % 3.7 % 12.4 % 7.0 % 20.2 % 12.8 % 18.2 % 8.8 %
(a)    In the fourth quarter of 2021, the company recognized a federal capital gain in the amount of $426 million. As a result, a valuation allowance of
$85 million related to a federal capital loss carryforward was released. This valuation allowance was originally recorded as a result of the 2019 sale
of minority interest of certain renewable assets within the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups.
  Year Ended December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Income tax expense, computed at the
statutory rate of 21% $ 193 $ 219 $ 243 $ 80 $ 204 $ 62 $ 103 $ 61 
State income tax, net of federal income tax
eﬀect (80) (40) 4  (25) 39  2  19  (12)
Amortization of excess deferred income tax (276) (82) (118) (68) (49) (20) (36) (21)
AFUDC equity income (48) (13) (9) (6) (3) (2) (4) (10)
AFUDC equity depreciation 103  19  10  5  5  1  4  — 
Other tax credits (37) (13) (16) (14) (2) (1) (3) (2)
Tax true up (12) (3) 1  (5) 5  —  (1) 1 
Other items, net (12) 1  (2) (3) (1) 1  2  1 
Income tax (beneﬁt) expense from continuing
operations $ (169)$ 88 $ 113 $ (36)$ 198 $ 43 $ 84 $ 18 
Eﬀective tax rate (18.4)% 8.4 % 9.7 % (9.5)% 20.4 % 14.6 % 17.1 % 6.2 %(a)
219
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS INCOME TAXES
Valuation allowances have been established for certain state NOL carryforwards and state income tax credits that reduce deferred tax assets to an amount
that will be realized on a more-likely-than-not basis. The net change in the total valuation allowance is included in state income tax, net of federal income tax
eﬀect, in the above tables.
DEFERRED TAXES
Net Deferred Income Tax Liability Components
The following tables include deferred income tax assets and liabilities related to the Commercial Renewables Disposal Groups. See Note 2 for further details.
  December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress Energy EnergyEnergy Energy
(in millions) EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgress Florida OhioIndiana Piedmont
Deferred credits and other liabilities $ 348 $ 170 $ 117 $ 33 $ 83 $ 12 $ 23 $ 24 
Lease obligations 405  89  263  197  65  4  15  3 
Pension, post-retirement and other employee beneﬁts 192  (1) 12  18  (10) 9  10  (2)
Progress Energy merger purchase accounting
adjustments 301  —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Tax credits and NOL carryforwards 4,426  444  618  167  412  20  208  37 
Regulatory liabilities and deferred credits —  —  —  —  —  3  61  — 
Investments and other assets —  —  —  —  —  3  —  — 
Other 106  18  22  12  10  5  2  9 
Valuation allowance (519) —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Total deferred income tax assets 5,259  720  1,032  427  560  56  319  71 
Investments and other assets (1,671) (983) (521) (432) (102) —  (12) (28)
Accelerated depreciation rates (11,478) (3,410) (4,358) (1,844)(2,576)(1,192)(1,606) (892)
Regulatory assets and deferred debits, net (2,074) (480) (1,300) (628) (671) —  —  (21)
Total deferred income tax liabilities (15,223) (4,873) (6,179) (2,904)(3,349)(1,192)(1,618) (941)
Net deferred income tax liabilities $(9,964)$(4,153)$(5,147)$(2,477)$(2,789)$(1,136)$(1,299)$ (870)
(a)    Primarily related to lease obligations and debt fair value adjustments.
The following table presents the expiration of tax credits and NOL carryforwards.
  December 31, 2022
(in millions) Amount Expiration Year
General Business Credits $ 2,473  2027— 2042
Federal NOL carryforwards 306  2024— Indeﬁnite
Charitable contribution carryforwards 18  2024— 2027
State carryforwards and credits 394  2023— Indeﬁnite
Foreign NOL carryforwards 12  2027— 2037
Foreign Tax Credits 1,223  2024— 2028
Total tax credits and NOL carryforwards $ 4,426       
(a)    A valuation allowance of $4 million has been recorded on the Federal NOL carryforwards, as presented in the Net Deferred Income Tax Liability
Components table.
(b)    A valuation allowance of $109 million has been recorded on the state NOL and attribute carryforwards, as presented in the Net Deferred Income Tax
Liability Components table.
(c)    A valuation allowance of $12 million has been recorded on the foreign NOL carryforwards, as presented in the Net Deferred Income Tax Liability
Components table.
(d)    A valuation allowance of $391 million has been recorded on the foreign tax credits, as presented in the Net Deferred Income Tax Liability Components
table.
(e)    Indeﬁnite carryforward for Federal NOLs, and NOLs for states that have adopted the Tax Act's NOL provisions, generated in tax years beginning after
December 31, 2017.(a)
(a) (e)
(b) (e)
(c)
(d)
220
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS INCOME TAXES
  December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress Energy EnergyEnergy Energy
(in millions) EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgress Florida OhioIndiana Piedmont
Deferred credits and other liabilities $ 347 $ 121 $ 101 $ 60 $ 40 $ 19 $ 7 $ 18 
Lease obligations 346  91  197  121  76  4  16  4 
Pension, post-retirement and other employee beneﬁts 207  (36) 30  17  7  11  20  (8)
Progress Energy merger purchase accounting
adjustments 340  —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Tax credits and NOL carryforwards 3,784  349  497  160  306  13  195  29 
Regulatory liabilities and deferred credits —  11  —  —  —  16  —  6 
Investments and other assets —  —  —  —  —  5  6  — 
Other 85  12  12  7  4  7  2  8 
Valuation allowance (518) —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Total deferred income tax assets 4,591  548  837  365  433  75  246  57 
Investments and other assets (2,428) (1,205) (742) (610) (135) —  —  (39)
Accelerated depreciation rates (10,391) (2,977) (3,891) (1,546) (2,382)(1,125) (1,496) (833)
Regulatory assets and deferred debits, net  (1,151) —  (768) (417) (350) —  (53) — 
Total deferred income tax liabilities (13,970) (4,182) (5,401) (2,573) (2,867)(1,125) (1,549) (872)
Net deferred income tax liabilities $(9,379)$ (3,634)$ (4,564)$ (2,208)$(2,434)$(1,050)$(1,303)$ (815)
(a)    Primarily related to lease obligations and debt fair value adjustments.
UNRECOGNIZED TAX BENEFITS
The following tables present changes to unrecognized tax beneﬁts.
  Year Ended December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress EnergyEnergyEnergy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy ProgressFlorida OhioIndiana Piedmont
Unrecognized tax beneﬁts – January 1 $ 51 $ 13 $ 15 $ 10 $ 4 $ 1 $ 2 $ 4 
Gross decreases – tax positions in prior periods —  —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Gross increases – current period tax positions 14  4  4  3  1  —  —  5 
Total changes 14  4  4  3  1  —  —  5 
Unrecognized tax beneﬁts – December 31 $ 65 $ 17 $ 19 $ 13 $ 5 $ 1 $ 2 $ 9 
  Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgress Florida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Unrecognized tax beneﬁts – January 1 $ 125 $ 10 $ 10 $ 6 $ 3 $ 1 $ 1 $ 1 
Gross decreases – tax positions in prior periods (86) —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Gross increases – current period tax positions 12  3  5  4  1  —  1  3 
Total changes (74) 3  5  4  1  —  1  3 
Unrecognized tax beneﬁts – December 31 $ 51 $ 13 $ 15 $ 10 $ 4 $ 1 $ 2 $ 4 
(a)    In the fourth quarter of 2021, the company recognized a federal capital gain in the amount of $426 million. As a result of the capital gain, a previously
recorded unrecognized tax beneﬁt related to the character of a taxable loss has been reversed. See note (a) under the Statutory Rate Reconciliation
table for more details.(a)
(a)
221
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS INCOME TAXES
  Year Ended December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress EnergyEnergy Energy Energy
(in millions) EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgressFlorida Ohio IndianaPiedmont
Unrecognized tax beneﬁts – January 1 $ 126 $ 8 $ 9 $ 6 $ 3 $ 1 $ 1 $ 4 
Gross decreases – tax positions in prior periods (2) —  —  —  —  —  —  — 
Gross increases – current period tax positions 4  2  1  —  —  —  —  — 
Reduction due to lapse of statute of limitations (3) —  —  —  —  —  —  (3)
Total changes (1) 2  1  —  —  —  —  (3)
Unrecognized tax beneﬁts – December 31 $ 125 $ 10 $ 10 $ 6 $ 3 $ 1 $ 1 $ 1 
The following table includes additional information regarding the Duke Energy Registrants' unrecognized tax beneﬁts at December 31, 2022. None of Duke
Energy Registrants anticipates a material increase or decrease in unrecognized tax beneﬁts within the next 12 months.
  December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke EnergyProgress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) EnergyCarolinas EnergyProgress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Amount that if recognized, would aﬀect the
eﬀective tax rate or regulatory liability $ 59 $ 17 $ 18 $ 13 $ 5 $ 1 $ 2 $ 8 
(a)    The Duke Energy Registrants are unable to estimate the speciﬁc amounts that would aﬀect the ETR versus the regulatory liability.
Duke Energy and its subsidiaries are no longer subject to federal, state, local or non-U.S. income tax examinations by tax authorities for years before 2016,
aside from certain state tax attributes carried forward for utilization in future years.
25. OTHER INCOME AND EXPENSES, NET
The components of Other income and expenses, net on the Consolidated Statements of Operations are as follows.
  Year Ended December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Interest income $ 27 $ 2 $ 24 $ 4 $ 20 $ 11 $ 15 $ 19 
AFUDC equity 197  98  68  52  16  7  13  11 
Post in-service equity returns 34  14  18  18  —  1  1  — 
Nonoperating income, other 134  107  71  40  38  —  7  16 
Other income and expense, net $392 $ 221 $ 181 $ 114 $ 74 $ 19 $ 36 $ 46 
  Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Interest income $ 13 $ 4 $ 8 $ 6 $ 2 $ 4 $ 6 $ 19 
AFUDC equity 171  65  51  34  16  7  27  20 
Post in-service equity returns 39  21  16  16  —  1  1  — 
Nonoperating income, other 413  180  140  87  53  6  8  16 
Other income and expense, net $ 636 $ 270 $ 215 $ 143 $ 71 $ 18 $ 42 $ 55 (a)
222
FINANCIAL STATEMENTS OTHER INCOME AND EXPENSES, NET
  Year Ended December 31, 2020
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Interest income $ 30 $ 4 $ 8 $ 2 $ 6 $ 4 $ 6 $ 17 
AFUDC equity 154  62  42  29  12  7  23  19 
Post in-service equity returns 27  17  8  8  —  1  1  — 
Nonoperating income, other 240  94  71  36  35  4  7  15 
Other income and expense, net $ 451 $ 177 $ 129 $ 75 $ 53 $ 16 $ 37 $ 51 
26. SUBSEQUENT EVENTS
For information on subsequent events related to dispositions, regulatory matters, commitments and contingencies, and debt and credit facilities see Notes 2,
4, 5 and 7, respectively.
27. QUARTERLY FINANCIAL DATA (UNAUDITED)
DUKE ENERGY
Quarterly EPS amounts may not sum to the full-year total due to changes in the weighted average number of common shares outstanding and rounding.
First Second Third Fourth
(in millions, except per share data) Quarter Quarter Quarter Quarter Total
2022          
Operating revenues $ 7,011 $ 6,564 $ 7,842 $ 7,351 $28,768 
Operating income 1,314  1,448  2,056  1,194  6,012 
Income from continuing operations 835  898  1,410  635  3,778 
(Loss) Income from discontinued operations, net of tax (15) (18) 3  (1,293) (1,323)
Net income (loss) 820  880  1,413  (658) 2,455 
Net income (loss) available to Duke Energy Corporation common stockholders 818  893  1,383  (650) 2,444 
Earnings per share:          
Income from continuing operations available to Duke Energy Corporation
common stockholders          
Basic and diluted $ 1.06 $ 1.11 $ 1.78 $ 0.80 $ 4.74 
Income (Loss) from discontinued operations attributable to Duke Energy
Corporation common stockholders  
Basic and diluted $ 0.02 $ 0.03 $ 0.03 $ (1.66)$ (1.57)
Net income (loss) available to Duke Energy Corporation common stockholders        
Basic and diluted $ 1.08 $ 1.14 $ 1.81 $ (0.86)$ 3.17 
2021          
Operating revenues $ 6,032 $ 5,638 $ 6,834 $ 6,117 $ 24,621 
Operating income 1,466  1,198  1,726  1,110  5,500 
Income from continuing operations 967  723  1,333  700  3,723 
Loss from discontinued operations, net of tax (26) (25) (57) (36) (144)
Net income 941  698  1,276  664  3,579 
Net income available to Duke Energy Corporation common stockholders 953  751  1,366  732  3,802 
Earnings per share:          
Income from continuing operations available to Duke Energy Corporation
common stockholders          
Basic and diluted $ 1.22 $ 0.90 $ 1.69 $ 0.86 $ 4.68 
Income from discontinued operations attributable to Duke Energy Corporation
common stockholders  
Basic and diluted $ 0.03 $ 0.06 $ 0.10 $ 0.07 $ 0.26 
Net income available to Duke Energy Corporation common stockholders          
Basic and diluted $ 1.25 $ 0.96 $ 1.79 $ 0.93 $ 4.94 
223
INDEPENDENT ACCOUNTANTS
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE
None.
ITEM 9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
Disclosure Controls and Procedures
Disclosure controls and procedures are controls and other procedures that are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the Duke
Energy Registrants in the reports they ﬁle or submit under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported, within the time periods
speciﬁed by the SEC rules and forms.
Disclosure controls and procedures include, without limitation, controls and procedures designed to provide reasonable assurance that information required
to be disclosed by the Duke Energy Registrants in the reports they ﬁle or submit under the Exchange Act is accumulated and communicated to management,
including the Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer, as appropriate, to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure.
Under the supervision and with the participation of management, including the Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer, the Duke Energy
Registrants have evaluated the eﬀectiveness of their disclosure controls and procedures (as such term is deﬁned in Rule 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) under the
Exchange Act) as of December 31, 2022, and, based upon this evaluation, the Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer have concluded that these
controls and procedures are eﬀective in providing reasonable assurance of compliance.
Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
Under the supervision and with the participation of management, including the Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer, the Duke Energy
Registrants have evaluated changes in internal control over ﬁnancial reporting (as such term is deﬁned in Rules 13a-15 and 15d-15 under the Exchange Act)
that occurred during the ﬁscal quarter ended December 31, 2022, and have concluded no change has materially aﬀected, or is reasonably likely to materially
aﬀect, internal controls over ﬁnancial reporting.
Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
The Duke Energy Registrants’ management is responsible for establishing and maintaining an adequate system of internal control over ﬁnancial reporting, as
such term is deﬁned in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f). The Duke Energy Registrants’ internal control system was designed to provide
reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of ﬁnancial reporting and the preparation of ﬁnancial statements for external purposes, in accordance with
GAAP. Due to inherent limitations, internal control over ﬁnancial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of
eﬀectiveness of the internal control over ﬁnancial reporting to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of
changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with policies and procedures may deteriorate.
The Duke Energy Registrants’ management, including their Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer, has conducted an evaluation of the
eﬀectiveness of their internal control over ﬁnancial reporting as of December 31, 2022, based on the framework in the Internal Control – Integrated
Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission. Based on that evaluation, management concluded
that its internal controls over ﬁnancial reporting were eﬀective as of December 31, 2022.
Deloitte & Touche LLP, Duke Energy’s independent registered public accounting ﬁrm, has issued an attestation report on the eﬀectiveness of Duke Energy’s
internal control over ﬁnancial reporting, which is included herein. This report is not applicable to the Subsidiary Registrants as these companies are not
accelerated or large accelerated ﬁlers.
224
REPORTS
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholders and the Board of Directors of Duke Energy Corporation
Opinion on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the internal control over ﬁnancial reporting of Duke Energy Corporation and subsidiaries (the “Company”) as of December 31, 2022, based
on criteria established in Internal Control — Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission
(COSO). In our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material respects, eﬀective internal control over ﬁnancial reporting as of December 31, 2022, based
on criteria established in Internal Control — Integrated Framework (2013) issued by COSO.
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB), the consolidated
ﬁnancial statements as of and for the year ended December 31, 2022, of the Company and our report dated February 27, 2023, expressed an unqualiﬁed
opinion on those ﬁnancial statements.
Basis for Opinion
The Company’s management is responsible for maintaining eﬀective internal control over ﬁnancial reporting and for its assessment of the eﬀectiveness of
internal control over ﬁnancial reporting, included in the accompanying Management's Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting. Our
responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial reporting based on our audit. We are a public accounting ﬁrm
registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the
applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable
assurance about whether eﬀective internal control over ﬁnancial reporting was maintained in all material respects. Our audit included obtaining an
understanding of internal control over ﬁnancial reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness exists, testing and evaluating the design and operating
eﬀectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk, and performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We
believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Deﬁnition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over ﬁnancial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of ﬁnancial reporting and
the preparation of ﬁnancial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A company’s internal control over
ﬁnancial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly
reﬂect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to
permit preparation of ﬁnancial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company
are being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable assurance regarding
prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that could have a material eﬀect on the ﬁnancial
statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over ﬁnancial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of
eﬀectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of
compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
/s/ Deloitte and Touche LLP
Charlotte, North Carolina
February 27, 2023
225
OTHER INFORMATION
ITEM 10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE
Information regarding Duke Energy's Executive Oﬃcers is set forth in Part I, Item 1, "Business – Information about Our Executive Oﬃcers," in this Annual
Report. Duke Energy will provide information that is responsive to the remainder of this Item 10 in its deﬁnitive proxy statement or in an amendment to this
Annual Report not later than 120 days after the end of the ﬁscal year covered by this Annual Report. That information is incorporated in this Item 10 by
reference.
ITEM 11. EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION
Duke Energy will provide information that is responsive to this Item 11 in its deﬁnitive proxy statement or in an amendment to this Annual Report not later
than 120 days after the end of the ﬁscal year covered by this Annual Report. That information is incorporated in this Item 11 by reference.
ITEM 12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND RELATED
STOCKHOLDER MATTERS
Equity Compensation Plan Information
The following table shows information as of December 31, 2022, about securities to be issued upon exercise of outstanding options, warrants and rights
under Duke Energy's equity compensation plans, along with the weighted average exercise price of the outstanding options, warrants and rights and the
number of securities remaining available for future issuance under the plans.
Plan CategoryNumber of securities
to be issued upon
exercise of
outstanding options,
warrants and rights
(a)Weighted average
exercise price of
outstanding options,
warrants and rights
(b)Number of securities
remaining available for
future issuance under
equity compensation plans
(excluding securities
reﬂected in column (a))
(c)
Equity compensation plans approved by security holders3,385,638 (2) n/a 2,410,473(3)
Equity compensation plans not approved by security holders109,690 (4) n/a n/a(5)
Total3,495,328  n/a 2,410,473
(1)    As of December 31, 2022, no options were outstanding under equity compensation plans.
(2)    Includes RSUs and performance shares (assuming the maximum payout level) granted under the Duke Energy Corporation 2015 Long-Term Incentive
Plan, as well as shares that could be payable with respect to certain compensation deferred under the Duke Energy Corporation Executive Savings
Plan (Executive Savings Plan) or the Directors’ Savings Plan.
(3)    Includes shares remaining available for issuance pursuant to stock awards under the Duke Energy Corporation 2015 Long-Term Incentive Plan.
(4)    Includes shares that could be payable with respect to certain compensation deferred under the Executive Savings Plan or the Duke Energy Corporation
Directors' Savings Plan (Directors' Savings Plan), each of which is a non-qualiﬁed deferred compensation plan described in more detail below.
(5)    The number of shares remaining available for future issuance under equity compensation plans not approved by security holders cannot be determined
because it is based on the amount of future voluntary deferrals, if any, under the Executive Savings Plan and the Directors' Savings Plan.
Under the Executive Savings Plan, participants can elect to defer a portion of their base salary and short‑term incentive compensation. Participants also
receive a company matching contribution in excess of the contribution limits prescribed by the Internal Revenue Code under the Duke Energy Retirement
Savings Plan, which is the 401(k) plan in which employees are generally eligible to participate. Eligible participants may also earn pay credits based on age
and length of service on eligible earnings that exceed limits prescribed by the Internal Revenue Code.
In general, payments are made following termination of employment or death in the form of a lump sum or installments, as selected by the participant.
Participants may direct the deemed investment of their accounts (with certain exceptions) among investment options available under the Duke Energy
Retirement Savings Plan, including the Duke Energy Common Stock Fund. Participants may change their investment elections on a daily basis. Deferrals of
equity awards are credited with earnings and losses based on the performance of the Duke Energy Common Stock Fund. The beneﬁts payable under the plan
are unfunded and subject to the claims of Duke Energy’s creditors.
Under the Directors’ Savings Plan, outside directors may elect to defer all or a portion of their annual compensation, generally consisting of retainers.
Deferred amounts are credited to an unfunded account, the balance of which is adjusted for the performance of phantom investment options, including the
Duke Energy Common Stock Fund, as elected by the director, and generally are paid when the director terminates his or her service from the Board of
Directors.
Duke Energy will provide additional information that is responsive to this Item 12 in its deﬁnitive proxy statement or in an amendment to this Annual Report
not later than 120 days after the end of the ﬁscal year covered by this Annual Report. That information is incorporated in this Item 12 by reference.
ITEM 13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE
Duke Energy will provide information that is responsive to this Item 13 in its deﬁnitive proxy statement or in an amendment to this Annual Report not later
than 120 days after the end of the ﬁscal year covered by this Annual Report. That information is incorporated in this Item 13 by reference.(1)
226
OTHER INFORMATION
ITEM 14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTING FEES AND SERVICES
Deloitte provided professional services to the Duke Energy Registrants. The following tables present the Deloitte fees for services rendered to the Duke
Energy Registrants during 2022 and 2021.
  Year Ended December 31, 2022
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Types of Fees              
Audit Fees $13.7 $ 3.2 $ 4.9 $ 2.5 $ 2.4 $ 2.0 $ 1.8 $ 1.3 
Audit-Related Fees 1.7  0.1  0.2  0.1  0.1  0.2  —  — 
Total Fees $15.4 $ 3.3 $ 5.1 $ 2.6 $ 2.5 $ 2.2 $ 1.8 $ 1.3 
  Year Ended December 31, 2021
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Duke Energy Progress Energy Energy Energy Energy
(in millions) Energy Carolinas Energy Progress Florida Ohio Indiana Piedmont
Types of Fees              
Audit Fees $ 13.2 $ 3.1 $ 4.7 $ 2.4 $ 2.3 $ 1.9 $ 1.7 $ 1.3 
Audit-Related Fees 1.5  0.1  0.2  0.1  0.1  0.2  —  — 
Total Fees $ 14.7 $ 3.2 $ 4.9 $ 2.5 $ 2.4 $ 2.1 $ 1.7 $ 1.3 
(a)    Audit Fees are fees billed, or expected to be billed, by Deloitte for professional services for the ﬁnancial statement audits, audit of the Duke Energy
Registrants’ ﬁnancial statements included in Duke Energy's Annual Report on Form 10-K, reviews of ﬁnancial statements included in Quarterly
Reports on Form 10‑Q, and services associated with securities ﬁlings such as comfort letters and consents.
(b)    Audit-Related Fees are fees billed, or expected to be billed, by Deloitte for assurance and related services that are reasonably related to the
performance of an audit or review of ﬁnancial statements, including statutory reporting requirements.
To safeguard the continued independence of the independent auditor, the Audit Committee of Duke Energy adopted a policy that all services provided by the
independent auditor require preapproval by the Audit Committee. Pursuant to the policy, certain audit services, audit-related services, tax services and other
services have been speciﬁcally preapproved up to fee limits. In the event the cost of any of these services may exceed the fee limits, the Audit Committee
must speciﬁcally approve the service. All services performed in 2022 and 2021 by the independent accountant were approved by the Audit Committee
pursuant to the preapproval policy.(a)
(b)
(a)
(b)
227
EXHIBITS
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
(a)     Consolidated Financial Statements and Supplemental Schedules included in Part II of this Annual Report are as follows:
Duke Energy Corporation
Consolidated Financial Statements
Consolidated Statements of Operations for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2022, and 2021
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
All other schedules are omitted because they are not required, or because the required information is included in the Consolidated Financial Statements
or Notes.
Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC
Consolidated Financial Statements
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2022, and 2021
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
All other schedules are omitted because they are not required, or because the required information is included in the Consolidated Financial Statements
or Notes.
Progress Energy, Inc.
Consolidated Financial Statements
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2022, and 2021
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
All other schedules are omitted because they are not required, or because the required information is included in the Consolidated Financial Statements
or Notes.
Duke Energy Progress, LLC
Consolidated Financial Statements
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2022, and 2021
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
All other schedules are omitted because they are not required, or because the required information is included in the Consolidated Financial Statements
or Notes.
Duke Energy Florida, LLC
Consolidated Financial Statements
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2022, and 2021
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
All other schedules are omitted because they are not required, or because the required information is included in the Consolidated Financial Statements
or Notes.
Duke Energy Ohio, Inc.
Consolidated Financial Statements
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2022, and 2021
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
All other schedules are omitted because they are not required, or because the required information is included in the Consolidated Financial Statements
or Notes.
228
EXHIBITS
Duke Energy Indiana, LLC
Consolidated Financial Statements
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2022, and 2021
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
All other schedules are omitted because they are not required, or because the required information is included in the Consolidated Financial Statements
or Notes.
Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc.
Consolidated Financial Statements
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2022, and 2021
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Equity for the Years Ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
All other schedules are omitted because they are not required, or because the required information is included in the Consolidated Financial Statements
or Notes.
229
EXHIBITS
EXHIBIT INDEX
Exhibits ﬁled herewith are designated by an asterisk (*). All exhibits not so designated are incorporated by reference to a prior ﬁling, as indicated. Items
constituting management contracts or compensatory plans or arrangements are designated by a double asterisk (**). The Company agrees to furnish upon
request to the commission a copy of any omitted schedules or exhibits upon request on all items designated by a triple asterisk (***).
Duke Duke Duke Duke Duke
Exhibit Duke EnergyProgressEnergyEnergyEnergyEnergy
Number EnergyCarolinasEnergyProgressFloridaOhioIndianaPiedmont
2.1 Agreement and Plan of Merger between Duke Energy
Corporation, Diamond Acquisition Corporation and Progress
Energy, Inc., dated as of January 8, 2011 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 2.1 to Duke Energy Corporation's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on January 11, 2011, File
No. 1-32853).X      X           
2.2 Agreement and Plan of Merger between Piedmont Natural
Gas Company, Duke Energy Corporation and Forest
Subsidiary, Inc. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.1 to
Duke Energy Corporation's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled
on October 26, 2015, File No. 1-32853).X X
3.1 Amended and Restated Certiﬁcate of Incorporation
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on May 20,
2014, File No. 1-32853).X
3.2 Amended and Restated By-Laws of Duke Energy
Corporation (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to
Duke Energy Corporation's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled
on January 4, 2016, File No. 1-32853).X
3.2.1 Amended and Restated By-Laws of Duke Energy
Corporation, eﬀective as of September 22, 2022,
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
September 28, 2022, File No. 1-32853).X
3.3 Articles of Organization including Articles of Conversion
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Duke Energy
Carolinas, LLC's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on April 7,
2006, File No. 1-4928).   X               
3.3.1 Amended Articles of Organization, eﬀective October 1, 2006
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Duke Energy
Carolinas, LLC's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended September 30, 2006, ﬁled on November 13,
2006, File No. 1-4928).   X               
3.4 Amended Articles of Incorporation of Duke Energy Ohio, Inc.
(formerly The Cincinnati Gas & Electric Company), eﬀective
October 23, 1996, (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3(a)
to registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended September 30, 1996, ﬁled on November 13,
1996, File No. 1-1232).                X  
3.4.1 Amended Articles of Incorporation, eﬀective September 19,
2006 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Duke
Energy Ohio, Inc.'s (formerly The Cincinnati Gas & Electric
Company) Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended September 30, 2006, ﬁled on November 17, 2006,
File No. 1-1232).                X  
3.5 Certiﬁcate of Conversion of Duke Energy Indiana, LLC
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on January 4, 2016, File
No. 1-3543).                    X
3.5.1 Articles of Entity Conversion of Duke Energy Indiana, LLC
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.2 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on January 4, 2016, File
No. 1-3543).                   X
3.5.2 Plan of Entity Conversion of Duke Energy Indiana, LLC
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.3 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on January 4, 2016, File
No. 1-3543).                   X
3.5.3 Articles of Organization of Duke Energy Indiana, LLC
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.4 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on January 4, 2016, File
No. 1-3543).X
3.5.4 Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company
Operating Agreement of Duke Energy Indiana, LLC, dated
August 25, 2021 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1
to registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended September 30, 2021, ﬁled on November 4,
2021, File No. 1-3543).X
3.6 Limited Liability Company Operating Agreement of Duke
Energy Carolinas, LLC (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
3.2 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on April
7, 2006, File No. 1-4928).   X                
3.7 Regulations of Duke Energy Ohio, Inc. (formerly The
Cincinnati Gas & Electric Company), eﬀective July 23, 2003
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.2 to registrant's
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June
30, 2003, ﬁled on August 13, 2003, File No. 1-1232).                X  
3.8 Articles of Organization including Articles of Conversion for
Duke Energy Progress, LLC (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 3.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled
on August 4, 2015, File No. 1-3382).           X         
3.8.1 Plan of Conversion of Duke Energy Progress, Inc.
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.2 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on August 4, 2015, File No.
1-3382).X
3.8.2 Limited Liability Company Operating Agreement of Duke
Energy Progress, LLC (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
3.3 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
August 4, 2015, File No. 1-3382).X
3.9 Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation of Progress
Energy, Inc. (formerly CP&L Energy, Inc.), eﬀective June 15,
2000 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3(a)(1) to
registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June 30, 2000, ﬁled on August 14, 2000, File No. 1-
3382).       X             
3.9.1 Articles of Amendment to the Amended and Restated
Articles of Incorporation of Progress Energy, Inc. (formerly
CP&L Energy, Inc.), eﬀective December 4, 2000
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3(b)(1) to registrant's
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December
31, 2001, ﬁled on March 28, 2002, File No. 1-3382).       X             
3.9.2 Articles of Amendment to the Amended and Restated
Articles of Incorporation of Progress Energy, Inc. (formerly
CP&L Energy, Inc.), eﬀective May 10, 2006 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 3(a) to registrant's Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2006, ﬁled on
August 9, 2006, File No. 1-15929).       X             
3.9.3 By-Laws of Progress Energy, Inc. (formerly CP&L Energy,
Inc.),eﬀectiveMay10,2006(incorporatedbyreferencetoX
Inc.), eﬀective May 10, 2006 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 3(b) to registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q
for the quarter ended June 30, 2006, ﬁled on August 9,
2006, File No. 1-15929).
3.10 Articles of Conversion for Duke Energy Florida, LLC
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.4 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on August 4, 2015, File No.
1-3274).              X      
3.10.1 Articles of Organization for Duke Energy Florida, LLC
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.5 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on August 4, 2015, File No.
1-3274).            X      
3.10.2 Plan of Conversion of Duke Energy Florida, Inc.
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.6 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on August 4, 2015, File No.
1-3274).              X      
3.10.3 Limited Liability Company Operating Agreement of Duke
Energy Florida, LLC (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
3.7 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
August 4, 2015, File No. 1-3274).X
3.11 Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation of
Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc., dated as of October
3, 2016 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to
registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the ﬁscal year
ended October 31, 2016, ﬁled on December 22, 2016, File
No. 001-06196).X
3.11.1 Bylaws of Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc., as
amended and restated eﬀective October 3, 2016
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.2 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on October 3, 2016, File
No. 1-06196).X
3.12 Certiﬁcate of Designations with respect to Series A
Preferred Stock, dated March 28, 2019 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 3.1 to registrant’s Current Report on
Form 8-K ﬁled on March 29, 2019, File No. 1-32853).X
3.13 Certiﬁcate of Designation with respect to the Series B
Preferred Stock, dated September 11, 2019 (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to registrant’s Current Report on
Form 8-K ﬁled on September 12, 2019, File No. 1-32853).X
3.14 Description of Registered Securities (incorporated by
reference from the registrant's prospectus contained in
Form S-3 ﬁled on September 23, 2019, File No. 333-
233896,under the headings "Description of Common
Stock," "Description of Preferred Stock," "Description of
Depositary Shares," "Description of Stock Purchase
Contracts and Stock Purchase Units," and "Description of
Debt Securities").X
3.15 Description of Registered Securities (incorporated by
reference from the registrant’s prospectus contained in
Form S-3 ﬁled on September 23, 2019, File No. 333-233896-
01, under the heading "Description of Debt Securities").X
3.16 Description of Registered Securities (incorporated by
reference from the registrant’s prospectus contained in
Form S-3 ﬁled on September 23, 2019, File No. 333-233896-
02, under the headings "Description of First Mortgage
Bonds" and "Description of Debt Securities").X
3.17 Description of Registered Securities (incorporated by
reference from the registrant’s prospectus contained in
Form S-3 ﬁled on September 23, 2019, File No. 333-233896-
03, under the headings "Description of First Mortgage
Bonds" and "Description of Unsecured Debt Securities").X
3.18 Description of Registered Securities (incorporated by
reference from the registrant’s prospectus contained in
Form S-3 ﬁled on September 23, 2019, File No. 333-233896-
04, under the headings "Description of First Mortgage
Bonds" and "Description of Unsecured Debt Securities").X
3.19 Description of Registered Securities (incorporated by
reference from the registrant’s prospectus contained in
Form S-3 ﬁled on September 23, 2019, File No. 333-233896-
05, under the headings "Description of First Mortgage
Bonds" and "Description of Debt Securities").X
3.20 Description of Registered Securities (incorporated by
reference from the registrant’s prospectus contained in
Form S-3 ﬁled on September 23, 2019, File No. 333-233896-
06, under the headings "Description of First and Refunding
Mortgage Bonds," "Description of Senior Notes," and
"Description of Subordinate Notes").X
4.1 Indenture between Duke Energy Corporation and The Bank
of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as Trustee, dated
as of June 3, 2008 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1
to Duke Energy Corporation's Current Report on Form 8-K
ﬁled on June 16, 2008, File No. 1-32853).X                   
4.1.1 First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 16, 2008
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on June 16,
2008, File No. 1-32853).X                   
4.1.2 Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of January 26,
2009 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke
Energy Corporation's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
January 26, 2009, File No. 1-32853).X                   
4.1.3 Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 28, 2009
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on August
28, 2009, File No. 1-32853).X                   
4.1.4 Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March 25, 2010
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on March 25,
2010, File No. 1-32853).X                   
4.1.5 Fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 25, 2011
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on August
25, 2011, File No. 1-32853).X                   
4.1.6 Sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 17,
2011 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke
Energy Corporation's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
November 17, 2011, File No. 1-32853).X                   
4.1.7 Seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 16,
2012 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke
Energy Corporation's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
August 16, 2012, File No. 1-32853).X                   
4.1.8 Eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of January 14,
2013 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2 to the
RittiStt tF 8AfDkEX                   
Registration Statement on Form 8-A of Duke Energy
Corporation ﬁled on January 14, 2013, File No. 1-32853).
4.1.9 Ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 13, 2013
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on June 13,
2013, File No. 1-32853).X                   
4.1.10 Tenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of October 11,
2013 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke
Energy Corporation's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
October 11, 2013, File No. 1-32853).X                   
4.1.11 Eleventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 4, 2014
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on April 4,
2014, File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.12 Twelfth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 19,
2015 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Duke
Energy Corporation's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
November 19, 2015, File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.13 Thirteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 18,
2016, to the indenture dated as of June 3, 2008, between
Duke Energy Corporation and The Bank of New York Mellon
Trust Company, N.A., as Trustee (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy Corporation's Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016,
ﬁled on May 5, 2016, File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.14Fourteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 12,
2016 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on August 12,
2016, File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.15 Fifteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 11,
2017 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended March 31, 2017, ﬁled on May 9, 2017, File No. 1-
32853).X
4.1.16 Sixteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 13,
2017 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June 30, 2017, ﬁled on August 3, 2017, File No. 1-
32853).X
4.1.17 Seventeenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August
10, 2017 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on August 10,
2017, File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.18 Eighteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March 29,
2018 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended March 31, 2018, ﬁled on May 10, 2018, File No. 1-
32853).X
4.1.19 Nineteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of May 16,
2018 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June 30, 2018, ﬁled on August 2, 2018, File No. 1-
32853).X
4.1.20 Twentieth Supplemental Indenture (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.2 to registrant's Registration
Statement on Form 8-A ﬁled on September 17, 2018, File
No. 1-32853).X
4.1.21 Twenty-ﬁrst Supplemental Indenture (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.1 to registrant’s Current Report on
Form 8-K ﬁled on March 11, 2019, File no. 1-32853).X
4.1.22 Twenty-second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 7,
2019 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on June 7,
2019, File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.23 Twenty-third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of May 15,
2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on May 15,
2020, File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.24 Twenty-fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 11, 2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.2 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
September 11, 2020, File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.25 Twenty-ﬁfth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 10,
2021 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on June 10,
2021, File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.26 Twenty-sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 28, 2021 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
September 28, 2021, File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.27 Twenty-seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June
15, 2022, to the indenture, dated as of June 3, 2008,
between Duke Energy Corporation and The Bank of New
York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as Trustee (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Current Report on
Form 8-K ﬁled on June 15, 2022, File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.28 Twenty-eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August
11, 2022, to the indenture, dated as of June 3, 2008,
between Duke Energy Corporation and The Bank of New
York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as Trustee, and forms of
global notes included therein (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled
on August 11, 2022, File No. 1-32853).X
4.1.29 Twenty-ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
December 8, 2022, to the Indenture, dated as of June 3,
2008, between Duke Energy Corporation and The Bank of
New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as Trustee, and forms
of global notes included therein (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K
ﬁled on December 8, 2022, File No. 1-32853).X
4.2 Senior Indenture between Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC and
The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as
successor trustee to JPMorgan Chase Bank (formerly known
as The Chase Manhattan Bank), dated as of September 1,
1998 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4-D-1 to
registrant's Post-Eﬀective Amendment No. 2 to Registration
Statement on Form S-3 ﬁled on April 7, 1999, File No. 333-
14209).   X                
4.2.1 Fifteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 3, 2006
(i tdb f tEhibit441t itt'  X                 
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4.1 to registrant's
Registration Statement on Form S-3 ﬁled on October 3,
2007, File No. 333-146483-03).
4.2.2 Sixteenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 5, 2007
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on June 6, 2007, File No. 1-
4928).   X                 
4.3 First and Refunding Mortgage from Duke Energy Carolinas,
LLC to The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A.,
successor trustee to Guaranty Trust Company of New York,
dated as of December 1, 1927 (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 7(a) to registrant's Form S-1, eﬀective October
15, 1947, File No. 2-7224).   X                 
4.3.1 Instrument of Resignation, Appointment and Acceptance
among Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC, JPMorgan Chase Bank,
N.A., as Trustee, and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust
Company, N.A., as Successor Trustee, dated as of
September 24, 2007, (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.6.1 to registrant's Registration Statement on Form S-3
ﬁled on October 3, 2007, File No. 333-146483).   X                 
4.3.2 Ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of February 1, 1949
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 7(j) to registrant's
Form S-1 ﬁled on February 3, 1949, File No. 2-7808).   X                 
4.3.3 Twentieth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 15,
1964 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4-B-20 to
registrant's Form S-1 ﬁled on August 23, 1966, File No. 2-
25367).   X                 
4.3.4 Twenty-third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of February
1, 1968 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2-B-26 to
registrant's Form S-9 ﬁled on January 21, 1969, File No. 2-
31304).   X                 
4.3.5 Sixtieth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March 1, 1990
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4-B-61 to registrant's
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December
31, 1990, File No.1-4928).   X                 
4.3.6 Sixty-third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of July 1, 1991
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4-B-64 to registrant's
Registration Statement on Form S-3 ﬁled on February 13,
1992, File No. 33-45501).   X                 
4.3.7 Eighty-fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March
20, 2006 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.6.9 to
registrant's Registration Statement on Form S-3 ﬁled on
October 3, 2007, File No. 333-146483-03).  X                 
4.3.8 Eighty-ﬁfth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of January 10,
2008 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke
Energy Carolinas, LLC’s Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
January 11, 2008, File No.1-4928).   X                 
4.3.9 Eighty-seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April
14, 2008 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke
Energy Carolinas, LLC’s Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
April 15, 2008, File No.1-4928).   X                 
4.3.10 Eighty-eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 17, 2008 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC’s Current Report on Form
8-K ﬁled on November 20, 2008, File No.1-4928).   X                 
4.3.11 Ninetieth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November
19, 2009 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke
Energy Carolinas, LLC’s Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
November 19, 2009, File No.1-4928).   X                 
4.3.12 Ninety-ﬁrst Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 7,
2010 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke
Energy Carolinas, LLC’s Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
June 7, 2010, File No.1-4928).   X                 
4.3.13 Ninety-third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of May 19,
2011 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke
Energy Carolinas, LLC’s Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
May 19, 2011, File No.1-4928).   X                 
4.3.14 Ninety-fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
December 8, 2011 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1
to Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC’s Current Report on Form 8-K
ﬁled on December 8, 2011, File No.1-4928).   X                 
4.3.15 Ninety-ﬁfth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of September
21, 2012 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke
Energy Carolinas, LLC’s Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
September 21, 2012, File No.1-4928).   X                 
4.3.16 Ninety-sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March 12,
2015, between Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC and The Bank of
New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as Trustee
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy
Carolinas, LLC's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on March
12, 2015, File No. 1-4928).X
4.3.17 Ninety-seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March
11, 2016 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke
Energy Carolinas, LLC's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
March 11, 2016, File No. 1-4928).X
4.3.18 Ninety-eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 17, 2016 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC's Current Report on Form
8-K ﬁled on November 17, 2016, File No. 1-4928).X
4.3.19 Ninety-ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 14, 2017 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC Current Report on Form
8-K ﬁled on November 14, 2017, File No. 1-4928).X
4.3.20 One Hundredth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March
1, 2018 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on March 1,
2018, File No. 1-4928).X
4.3.21 One-Hundred and Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as
of August 14, 2019 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1
to registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on August
14, 2019, File No. 1-4928).X
4.3.22 One-Hundred and Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as
of January 8, 2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2
to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on January
8, 2020, File No. 1-4928).X
4.3.23 One-Hundred and Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as
of January 8, 2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3
to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on January
8, 2020, File No. 1-4928).X
4.3.24 One-Hundred and Fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
April 1, 2021 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
i ﬁld ilX
p p y
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on April 1,
2021, File No. 1-4928).
4.3.25 One-Hundred and Sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as
of March 4, 2022 between the registrant and The Bank of
New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as Trustee, and forms
of global bonds representing the First and Refunding
Mortgage Bonds, 2.85% Series due 2032 and First and
Refunding Mortgage Bonds, 3.55% Series due 2052
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on March 4, 2022, File No.
1-32853).X
4.4 Mortgage and Deed of Trust between Duke Energy Progress,
Inc. (formerly Carolina Power & Light Company) and The
Bank of New York Mellon (formerly Irving Trust Company)
and Frederick G. Herbst (Tina D. Gonzalez, successor), as
Trustees, dated as of May 1, 1940.           X         
4.4.1 First through Fifth Supplemental Indentures thereto
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(b), File No. 2-
64189).X
4.4.2 Sixth Supplemental Indenture dated April 1, 1960
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(b)-5, File No. 2-
16210).X
4.4.3 Seventh Supplemental Indenture dated November 1, 1961
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(b)-6, File No. 2-
16210).X
4.4.4 Eighth Supplemental Indenture dated July 1, 1964
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(b)-8, File No. 2-
19118).X
4.4.5 Ninth Supplemental Indenture dated April 1, 1966
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(b)-2, File No. 2-
22439).X
4.4.6 Tenth Supplemental Indenture dated October 1, 1967
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(b)-2, File No. 2-
24624).X
4.4.7 Eleventh Supplemental Indenture dated October 1, 1968
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-27297).X
4.4.8 Twelfth Supplemental Indenture dated January 1, 1970
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-30172).X
4.4.9 Thirteenth Supplemental Indenture dated August 1, 1970
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-35694).X
4.4.10 Fourteenth Supplemental Indenture dated January 1, 1971
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-37505).X
4.4.11 Fifteenth Supplemental Indenture dated October 1, 1971
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-39002).X
4.4.12 Sixteenth Supplemental Indenture dated May 1, 1972
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-41738).X
4.4.13 Seventeenth Supplemental Indenture dated November 1,
1973 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-
43439).X
4.4.14 Eighteenth Supplemental Indenture dated (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-47751).X
4.4.15 Nineteenth Supplemental Indenture dated May 1, 1974
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-49347).X
4.4.16 Twentieth Supplemental Indenture dated December 1, 1974
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-53113).X
4.4.17 Twenty-ﬁrst Supplemental Indenture dated April 15, 1975
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(d), File No. 2-
53113).X
4.4.18 Twenty-second Supplemental Indenture dated October 1,
1977 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-
59511).X
4.4.19 Twenty-third Supplemental Indenture dated June 1, 1978
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-61611).X
4.4.20 Twenty-fourth Supplemental Indenture dated May 15, 1979
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(d), File No. 2-
64189).X
4.4.21 Twenty-ﬁfth Supplemental Indenture dated November 1,
1979 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-
65514).X
4.4.22 Twenty-sixth Supplemental Indenture dated November 1,
1979 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-
66851).X
4.4.23 Twenty-seventh Supplemental Indenture dated April 1, 1980
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2 (d), File No. 2-
66851).X
4.4.24 Twenty-eighth Supplemental Indenture dated October 1,
1980 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(b)-1, File
No. 2-81299).X
4.4.25 Twenty-ninth Supplemental Indenture dated October 1,
1980 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(b)-2, File
No. 2-81299).X
4.4.26 Thirtieth Supplemental Indenture dated December 1, 1982
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(b)- 3, File No. 2-
81299).X
4.4.27 Thirty-ﬁrst Supplemental Indenture dated March 15, 1983
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(c)-1, File No. 2-
95505).X
4.4.28 Thirty-second Supplemental Indenture dated March 15,
1983 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(c)-2, File No. 2-
95505).X
4.4.29 Thirty-third Supplemental Indenture dated December 1,
1983 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(c)-3, File No. 2-
95505).X
4.4.30 Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture dated December 15,
1983 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(c)-4, File No. 2-
95505).X
4.4.31 Thirty-ﬁfth Supplemental Indenture dated April 1, 1984
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(c)-5, File No. 2-
95505).X
4.4.32 Thirty-sixth Supplemental Indenture dated June 1, 1984
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(c)-6, File No. 2-
95505).X
4.4.33 Thirty-seventh Supplemental Indenture dated June 1, 1984
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(c)-7, File No. 2-
95505).X
4.4.34 Thirty-eighth Supplemental Indenture dated June 1, 1984
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(c)- 8, File No. 2-
 )X
95505).
4.4.35 Thirty-ninth Supplemental Indenture dated April 1, 1985
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(b), File No. 33-
25560).X
4.4.36 Fortieth Supplemental Indenture dated October 1, 1985
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(c), File No. 33-
25560).X
4.4.37 Forty-ﬁrst Supplemental Indenture dated March 1, 1986
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(d), File No. 33-
25560).X
4.4.38 Forty-second Supplemental Indenture dated July 1, 1986
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(e), File No. 33-
25560).X
4.4.39 Forty-third Supplemental Indenture dated January 1, 1987
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(f), File No. 33-
25560).X
4.4.40 Forty-fourth Supplemental Indenture dated December 1,
1987 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(g), File No. 33-
25560).X
4.4.41 Forty-ﬁfth Supplemental Indenture dated September 1,
1988 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(h), File No. 33-
25560).X
4.4.42 Forty-sixth Supplemental Indenture dated April 1, 1989
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(b), File No. 33-
33431).X
4.4.43 Forty-seventh Supplemental Indenture dated August 1,
1989 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(c), File No. 33-
33431).X
4.4.44 Forty-eighth Supplemental Indenture dated November 15,
1990 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(b), File No. 33-
38298).X
4.4.45 Forty-ninth Supplemental Indenture dated November 15,
1990 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(c), File No. 33-
38298).X
4.4.46 Fiftieth Supplemental Indenture dated February 15, 1991
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(h), File No. 33-
42869).X
4.4.47 Fifty-ﬁrst Supplemental Indenture dated April 1, 1991
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(i), File No. 33-
42869).X
4.4.48 Fifty-second Supplemental Indenture dated September 15,
1991(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(e), File No. 33-
48607).X
4.4.49 Fifty-third Supplemental Indenture dated January 1, 1992
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(f), File No. 33-
48607).X
4.4.50 Fifty-fourth Supplemental Indenture dated April 15, 1992
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4 (g), File No. 33-
48607).X
4.4.51 Fifty-ﬁfth Supplemental Indenture dated July 1, 1992
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(e), File No. 33-
55060).X
4.4.52 Fifty-sixth Supplemental Indenture dated October 1, 1992
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(f), File No. 33-
55060).X
4.4.53 Fifty-seventh Supplemental Indenture dated February 1,
1993 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(e), File No. 33-
60014).X
4.4.54 Fifty-eighth Supplemental Indenture dated March 1, 1993
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(f), File No. 33-
60014).X
4.4.55 Fifty-ninth Supplemental Indenture dated July 1, 1993
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(a) to Post-Eﬀective
Amendment No. 1, File No. 33-38349).X
4.4.56 Sixtieth Supplemental Indenture dated July 1, 1993
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(b) to Post-Eﬀective
Amendment No. 1, File No. 33-38349).X
4.4.57 Sixty-ﬁrst Supplemental Indenture dated August 15, 1993
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(e), File No. 33-
50597).X
4.4.58 Sixty-second Supplemental Indenture dated January 15,
1994 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4 to Duke
Energy Progress’ Current Report on Form 8-K dated January
19, 1994, File No. 1-3382).X
4.4.59 Sixty-third Supplemental Indenture dated May 1, 1994
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(f) for Duke Energy
Progress’ Form S-3, File No. 033-57835).X
4.4.60 Sixty-fourth Supplemental Indenture dated August 15, 1997
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit to Duke Energy
Progress’ Current Report on Form 8-K dated August 26,
1997, File No. 1-3382).X
4.4.61 Sixty-ﬁfth Supplemental Indenture dated April 1, 1998
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(b) for Duke Energy
Progress’ Registration Statement on Form S-3 ﬁled
December 18, 1998, File No. 333-69237).X
4.4.62 Sixty-sixth Supplemental Indenture dated March 1, 1999
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(c) to Duke Energy
Progress’ Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on March 19,
1999, File No. 1-3382).X
4.4.63 Form of Carolina Power & Light Company First Mortgage
Bond, 6.80% Series Due August 15, 2007 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4 to Duke Energy Progress’ Form 10-Q
for the period ended September 30, 1998, File No. 1-3382).X
4.4.64 Sixty-eighth Supplemental Indenture dated April 1, 2000
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit No. 4(b) to Duke
Energy Progress’ Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on April
20, 2000, File No. 1-3382).X
4.4.65 Sixty-ninth Supplemental Indenture dated June 1, 2000
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit No. 4b(2) to Duke
Energy Progress’ Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2000, ﬁled on March 29, 2001, File No.
1-3382).X
4.4.66 Seventieth Supplemental Indenture dated July 1, 2000
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4b(3) to Duke Energy
Progress’ Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2000, ﬁled on March 29, 2001, File No. 1-
3382).X
4.4.67 Seventy-ﬁrst Supplemental Indenture dated February 1,
2002(incorporatedbyreferencetoExhibit4b(2)toDukeX
2002 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4b(2) to Duke
Energy Progress’ Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2001, ﬁled on March 28, 2002, File No.
1-3382 and 1-15929).
4.4.68 Seventy-second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 1, 2003 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4
to Duke Energy Progress, Inc.'s (formerly Carolina Power &
Light Company (d/b/a Progress Energy Carolinas, Inc.))
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on September 12, 2003,
File No. 1-3382).           X         
4.4.69 Seventy-third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March 1,
2005 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4 to Duke
Energy Progress, Inc.'s (formerly Carolina Power & Light
Company (d/b/a Progress Energy Carolinas, Inc.)) Current
Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on March 22, 2005, File No. 1-
3382).           X         
4.4.70 Seventy-fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 1, 2005 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4
to Duke Energy Progress, Inc.'s (formerly Carolina Power &
Light Company (d/b/a Progress Energy Carolinas, Inc.))
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on November 30, 2005,
File No. 1-3382).           X         
4.4.71 Seventy-ﬁfth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March 1,
2008 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4 to Duke
Energy Progress, Inc.'s (formerly Carolina Power & Light
Company (d/b/a Progress Energy Carolinas, Inc.)) Current
Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on March 13, 2008, File No. 1-
3382).           X         
4.4.72 Seventy-sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of January
1, 2009 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4 to Duke
Energy Progress, Inc.'s (formerly Carolina Power & Light
Company (d/b/a Progress Energy Carolinas, Inc.)) Current
Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on January 15, 2009, File No. 1-
3382).           X         
4.4.73 Seventy-seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June
18, 2009 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4 to Duke
Energy Progress, Inc.'s (formerly Carolina Power & Light
Company (d/b/a Progress Energy Carolinas, Inc.)) Current
Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on June 23, 2009, File No. 1-3382).           X         
4.4.74 Seventy-eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 1, 2011 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4
to Duke Energy Progress, Inc.'s (formerly Carolina Power &
Light Company (d/b/a Progress Energy Carolinas, Inc.))
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on September 15, 2011,
File No. 1-3382).           X         
4.4.75 Seventy-ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of May 1,
2012 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4 to Duke
Energy Progress, Inc.'s (formerly Carolina Power & Light
Company (d/b/a Progress Energy Carolinas, Inc.)) Current
Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on May 18, 2012, File No. 1-3382).           X         
4.4.76 Eightieth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March 1,
2013 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke
Energy Progress, Inc.'s (formerly Carolina Power & Light
Company (d/b/a Progress Energy Carolinas, Inc.)) Current
Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on March 12, 2013, File No. 1-
3382).           X         
4.4.77 Eighty-second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March
1, 2014, between Duke Energy Progress, Inc. and The Bank
of New York Mellon (formerly Irving Trust Company) and
Tina D. Gonzalez (successor to Frederick G. Herbst) and
forms of global notes (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to Duke Energy Progress, Inc.'s Current Report on Form
8-K ﬁled on March 6, 2014, File No. 1-3382).X
4.4.78 Eighty-third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November
1, 2014, between Duke Energy Progress, Inc. and The Bank
of New York Mellon (formerly Irving Trust Company) and
Tina D. Gonzalez (successor to Frederick G. Herbst) and
forms of global notes (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to Duke Energy Progress, Inc.'s Current Report on Form
8-K ﬁled on November 20, 2014, File No. 1-3382).X
4.4.79 Eighty-ﬁfth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 1,
2015 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke
Energy Progress, LLC's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
August 13, 2015, File No. 1-3382).X
4.4.80 Eighty-sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 1, 2016 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
September 16, 2016, File No. 1-15929).X
4.4.81 Eighty-seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 1, 2017 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
September 8, 2017, File No. 1-3382).X
4.4.82 Eighty-ninth Supplemental Indenture (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.1 to registrant’s Current Report on
Form 8-K ﬁled on March 7, 2019, File no. 1-3382).X
4.4.83 Ninetieth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 1,
2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on August 20,
2020, File No. 1-3382).X
4.4.84 Ninety-ﬁrst Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 1,
2021 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on August 12,
2021, File No. 1-3382).X
4.4.85 Ninety-second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March
1, 2022, among the registrant, The Bank of New York Mellon
(formerly Irving Trust Company) and Christie Leppert
(successor to Frederick G. Herbst) and forms of global
bonds (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on March 17,
2022, File No. 1-3382).X
4.4.86 First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 1, 2020
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on August 20, 2020, File
No. 1-3382).X
4.5 Indenture (for Debt Securities) between Duke Energy
Progress, Inc. (formerly Carolina Power & Light Company)
and The Bank of New York Mellon (successor in interest to
The Chase Manhattan Bank), as Trustee (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4(a) to registrant's Current Report on
Form 8-K ﬁled on November 5, 1999, File No. 1-3382).           X         
4.6 Indenture (for [Subordinated] Debt Securities) (open ended)
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(a)(2) to Duke Energy
Progress, Inc.'s (formerly Carolina Power & Light Company           X         
g y g py
(d/b/a Progress Energy Carolinas, Inc.)) Registration
Statement on Form S-3 ﬁled on November 18, 2008, File No.
333-155418).
4.7 Indenture (for First Mortgage Bonds) between Duke Energy
Florida, Inc. (formerly Florida Power Corporation) and The
Bank of New York Mellon (as successor to Guaranty Trust
Company of New York and The Florida National Bank of
Jacksonville), as Trustee, dated as of January 1, 1944,
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit B-18 to registrant's
Form A-2, File No. 2-5293).              X      
4.7.1 Seventh Supplemental Indenture (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 4(b) to Duke Energy Florida, Inc.'s (formerly
Florida Power Corporation) Registration Statement on Form
S-3 ﬁled on September 27, 1991, File No. 33-16788).              X      
4.7.2 Eighth Supplemental Indenture (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 4(c) to Duke Energy Florida, Inc.'s (formerly
Florida Power Corporation) Registration Statement on Form
S-3 ﬁled on September 27, 1991, File No. 33-16788).              X      
4.7.3 Sixteenth Supplemental Indenture (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4(d) to Duke Energy Florida, Inc.'s
(formerly Florida Power Corporation) Registration Statement
on Form S-3 ﬁled on September 27, 1991, File No. 33-
16788).              X      
4.7.4 Twenty-ninth Supplemental Indenture (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4(c) to Duke Energy Florida, Inc.'s
(formerly Florida Power Corporation) Registration Statement
on Form S-3 ﬁled on September 17, 1982, File No. 2-79832).              X      
4.7.5 Thirty-eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of July 25,
1994 (incorporated by reference to exhibit 4(f) to Duke
Energy Florida, Inc.'s (formerly Florida Power Corporation)
Registration Statement on Form S-3 ﬁled on August 29,
1994, File No. 33-55273).              X      
4.7.6 Forty-ﬁrst Supplemental Indenture, dated as of February 1,
2003 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4 to Duke
Energy Florida, Inc.'s (formerly Duke Energy Florida Power
Corporation (d/b/a Progress Energy Florida, Inc.)) Current
Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on February 21, 2003, File No. 1-
3274).              X      
4.7.7 Forty-second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 1,
2003 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4 to Duke
Energy Florida, Inc.'s (formerly Florida Power Corporation
(d/b/a Progress Energy Florida, Inc.)) Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2003, ﬁled on
August 11, 2003, File No. 1-3274).  X
4.7.8 Forty-third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November
1, 2003 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4 to Duke
Energy Florida, Inc.'s (formerly Florida Power Corporation
(d/b/a Progress Energy Florida, Inc.)) Current Report on
Form 8-K ﬁled on November 21, 2003, File No. 1-3274).X
4.7.9 Forty-fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 1,
2004 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(m) to Duke
Energy Florida, Inc.'s (formerly Florida Power Corporation
(d/b/a Progress Energy Florida, Inc.)) Annual Report on Form
10-K for the year ended December 31, 2004, ﬁled on March
16, 2005, File No. 1-3274).X
4.7.10 Forty-sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of September
1, 2007 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4 to Duke
Energy Florida, Inc.'s (formerly Florida Power Corporation
(d/b/a Progress Energy Florida, Inc.)) Current Report on
Form 8-K ﬁled on September 19, 2007, File No. 1-3274).X
4.7.11 Forty-seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
December 1, 2007 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4
to Duke Energy Florida, Inc.'s (formerly Florida Power
Corporation (d/b/a Progress Energy Florida, Inc.)) Current
Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on December 13, 2007, File No. 1-
3274).X
4.7.12 Forty-eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 1,
2008 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4 to Duke
Energy Florida, Inc.'s (formerly Florida Power Corporation
(d/b/a Progress Energy Florida, Inc.)) Current Report on
Form 8-K ﬁled on June 18, 2008, File No. 1-3274).X
4.7.13 Forty-ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March 1,
2010 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4 to Duke
Energy Florida, Inc.'s (formerly Florida Power Corporation
(d/b/a Progress Energy Florida, Inc.)) Current Report on
Form 8-K ﬁled on March 25, 2010, File No. 1-3274).X
4.7.14 Fiftieth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 11,
2011 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4 to Duke
Energy Florida, Inc.'s (formerly Florida Power Corporation
(d/b/a Progress Energy Florida, Inc.)) Current Report on
Form 8-K ﬁled on August 18, 2011, File No. 1-3274).X
4.7.15 Fifty-ﬁrst Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 1,
2012 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke
Energy Florida, Inc.'s (formerly Florida Power Corporation
(d/b/a Progress Energy Florida, Inc.)) Current Report on
Form 8-K ﬁled on November 20, 2012, File No. 1-3274).X
4.7.16 Fifty-third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of September
1, 2016 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on September
9, 2016, File No. 1-03274).X
4.7.17 Fifty-ﬁfth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 1, 2018
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on June 21, 2018, File No.
1-3274).X
4.7.18 Fifty-sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November
1, 2019 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on November
26, 2019, File No. 1-3274).X
4.7.19 Fifty-seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 1,
2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on June 11,
2020, File No. 1-3274).X
4.7.20 Fifty-eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November
1, 2021 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on December
2, 2021, File No. 1-3274).X
4.8 Indenture (for Debt Securities) between Duke Energy
Florida, Inc. (formerly Florida Power Corporation (d/b/a
Progress Energy Florida, Inc.)) and The Bank of New York
Mellon Trust Company, National Association (successor in
interest to J.P. Morgan Trust Company, National Association),
as Trustee, dated as of December 7, 2005 (incorporated by
referencetoExhibit4(a)toregistrant'sCurrentReportonX
reference to Exhibit 4(a) to registrant's Current Report on
Form 8-K ﬁled on December 13, 2005, File No. 1-3274).
4.8.1 First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of December 12,
2017 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on December
12, 2017, File No. 1-03274).X
4.8.2 Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 26,
2019 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to
registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on November
26, 2019, File No. 1-3274).X
4.9 Indenture (for [Subordinated] Debt Securities) (open ended)
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(a)(2) Duke Energy
Florida, Inc.'s (formerly Florida Power Corporation (d/b/a
Progress Energy Florida, Inc.)) Registration Statement on
Form S-3 ﬁled on November 18, 2008, File No. 333-155418).X
4.10 Original Indenture (Unsecured Debt Securities) between
Duke Energy Ohio, Inc. (formerly The Cincinnati Gas &
Electric Company) and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust
Company, N.A., as Successor Trustee, dated as of May 15,
1995 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3 to registrant's
Form 8-A ﬁled on July 27, 1995, File No. 1-1232).X
4.10.1 First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 1, 1995
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4 B to Duke Energy
Ohio, Inc.'s (formerly The Cincinnati Gas & Electric
Company) Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June 30, 1995, ﬁled on August 11, 1995, File No. 1-
1232).X
4.10.2 Seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 15, 2003
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy
Ohio, Inc.'s (formerly The Cincinnati Gas & Electric
Company) Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June 30, 2003, ﬁled on August 13, 2003, File No. 1-
1232).X
4.11 Original Indenture (First Mortgage Bonds) between Duke
Energy Ohio, Inc. (formerly The Cincinnati Gas & Electric
Company) and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company,
N.A., as Successor Trustee, dated as of August 1, 1936
(incorporated by reference to an exhibit to registrant's
Registration Statement No. 2-2374).X
4.11.1 Fortieth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March 23,
2009 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke
Energy Ohio, Inc.’s (formerly The Cincinnati Gas & Electric
Company) Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on March 24,
2009, File No. 1-1232).X
4.11.2 Forty-second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 6, 2013 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to Duke Energy Ohio, Inc.’s (formerly The Cincinnati Gas
& Electric Company) Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
September 6, 2013, File No. 1-1232).X
4.11.3 Forty-fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 23,
2016 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on June 23, 2016, File No.
1-1232).X
4.11.4 Forty-ﬁfth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March 27,
2017 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on March
27,2017, File No. 1-01232).X
4.11.5 Forty-sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of January 8,
2019 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on January 8,
2019, File No. 1-1232).X
4.11.6 Forty-seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of May 21,
2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on May 21,
2020, File No. 1-1232).X
4.12 Indenture between Duke Energy Indiana, LLC (formerly PSI
Energy, Inc.) and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust
Company, N.A., as Successor Trustee, dated as of
November 15, 1996 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4(v) to the Cinergy Corp. Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 1996, ﬁled on March 27, 1997, File No. 1-
11377).X
4.12.1 Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March 15, 1998
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4-w to Cinergy Corp.’s
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December
31, 1997, ﬁled on March 27, 1998, File No. 1-11377).X
4.12.2 Eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of September 23,
2003 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Duke
Energy Indiana, LLC's (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.) Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30,
2003, ﬁled on November 13, 2003, File No. 1-3543).X
4.12.3 Ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of October 21,
2005 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.7.3 to Duke
Energy Indiana, LLC's (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.)
Registration Statement on Form S-3 ﬁled on September 29,
2010, File No. 333-169633).X
4.12.4 Tenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 9, 2006
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke Energy
Indiana, LLC’s (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.) Current Report on
Form 8-K ﬁled on June 15, 2006, File No. 1-3543).X
4.13 Original Indenture (First Mortgage Bonds) between Duke
Energy Indiana, LLC (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.) and
Deutsche Bank National Trust Company, as Successor
Trustee, dated as of September 1, 1939, (ﬁled as an exhibit
in File No. 70-258).X
4.13.1 Tenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of July 1, 1952,
(ﬁled as an exhibit in File No. 2-9687).X
4.13.2 Twenty-third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of January 1,
1977, (ﬁled as an exhibit in File No. 2-57828).X
4.13.3 Twenty-ﬁfth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 1, 1978, (ﬁled as an exhibit in File No. 2-62543).X
4.13.4 Twenty-sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 1, 1978, (ﬁled as an exhibit in File No. 2-62543).X
4.13.5 Thirtieth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 1,
1980, (ﬁled as an exhibit in File No. 2-68562).X
4.13.6 Thirty-ﬁfth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March 30,
1984, (ﬁled as an exhibit to registrant's Annual Report on
Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 1984, File No.
1-3543).X
4.13.7 Forty-sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 1,
1990, (ﬁled as an exhibit to registrant's Annual Report on
F 10Kfth ddD b311991FilNX
Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 1991, File No.
1-3543).
4.13.8 Forty-seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of July 15,
1991, (ﬁled as an exhibit to registrant's Annual Report on
Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 1991, File No.
1-3543).X
4.13.9 Forty-eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of July 15,
1992, (ﬁled as an exhibit to registrant's Annual Report on
Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 1992, File No.
1-3543).X
4.13.10Fifty-second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 30,
1999 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4 to Duke
Energy Indiana, LLC’s (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.) Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 1999,
ﬁled on May 13, 1999, File No. 1-3543).X
4.13.11Fifty-seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August
21, 2008 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke
Energy Indiana, LLC’s (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.) Current
Report Form 8-K ﬁled on August 21, 2008, File No. 1-3543).X
4.13.12Fifty-eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of December
19, 2008 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.8.12 to
Duke Energy Indiana, LLC’s (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.)
Registration Statement on Form S-3 ﬁled on September 29,
2010, File No. 333-169633-02).X
4.13.13Fifty-ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March 23,
2009 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke
Energy Indiana, LLC’s (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.) Current
Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on March 24, 2009, File No. 1-
3543).X
4.13.14Sixtieth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 1, 2009
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.8.14 to Duke Energy
Indiana, LLC’s (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.) Registration
Statement on Form S-3 ﬁled on September 29, 2010, File
No. 333-169633-02).X
4.13.15Sixty-ﬁrst Supplemental Indenture, dated as of October 1,
2009 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.8.15 to Duke
Energy Indiana, LLC’s (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.)
Registration Statement on Form S-3 ﬁled on September 29,
2010, File No. 333-169633-02).X
4.13.16Sixty-second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of July 9,
2010 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke
Energy Indiana, LLC’s (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.) Current
Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on July 9, 2010, File No. 1-3543). X
4.13.17Sixty-third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of September
23, 2010 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.8.17 to
Duke Energy Indiana, LLC’s (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.)
Registration Statement on Form S-3 ﬁled on September 29,
2010, File No. 333-169633-02).X
4.13.18Sixty-fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of December
1, 2011 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4(d)(2)(xviii)
to Duke Energy Indiana, LLC’s (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.)
Registration Statement on Form S-3 ﬁled on September 30,
2013, File No. 333-191462-03).X
4.13.19Sixty-ﬁfth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March 15,
2012 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke
Energy Indiana, LLC’s (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.) Current
Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on March 15, 2012, File No. 1-
3543).X
4.13.20Sixty-sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of July 11,
2013 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Duke
Energy Indiana, LLC’s (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.) Current
Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on July 11, 2013, File No. 1-3543).X
4.13.21Sixty-seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of January
1, 2016, between Duke Energy Indiana, Inc. and Deutsche
Bank National Trust Company, as Trustee, supplementing
and amending the Indenture of Mortgage or Deed of Trust,
dated September 1, 1939, between Duke Energy Indiana,
Inc. and Deutsche Bank National Trust Company, as Trustee
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Duke Energy
Indiana, LLC's (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.) Quarterly Report
on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016, ﬁled
on May 5, 2016, File No. 1-3543).X
4.13.22Sixty-eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of May 12,
2016 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on May 12,
2016, File No. 1-3543).X
4.13.23Sixty-ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of September
27, 2019 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on September
27, 2019, File No. 1-3543).X
4.13.24Seventieth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March 12,
2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on March 12,
2020, File No. 1-3543).X
4.14 Repayment Agreement between Duke Energy Ohio, Inc.
(formerly The Cincinnati Gas & Electric Company) and The
Dayton Power and Light Company, dated as of December
23, 1992, (ﬁled with registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-
K for the year ended December 31, 1992, File No. 1-1232).X
4.15 Unsecured Promissory Note between Duke Energy Indiana,
LLC (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.) and the Rural Utilities
Service, dated as of October 14, 1998 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4 to registrant's Annual Report on Form
10-K for the year ended December 31, 1998, ﬁled on March
8, 1999, File No. 1-3543).X
4.16 6.302% Subordinated Note between Duke Energy Indiana,
LLC (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.) and Cinergy Corp., dated as
of February 5, 2003 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4(yyy) to registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended March 31, 2003, ﬁled on May 12,2003, File
No. 1-3543).X
4.17 6.403% Subordinated Note between Duke Energy Indiana,
LLC (formerly PSI Energy, Inc.) and Cinergy Corp., dated as
of February 5, 2003 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4(zzz) to registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended March 31, 2003, ﬁled on May 12, 2003, File
No. 1-3543).X
4.18 Contingent Value Obligation Agreement between Progress
Energy, Inc. (formerly CP&L Energy, Inc.) and The Chase
Manhattan Bank, as Trustee, dated as of November 30,
2000 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
itt'C tR tF 8Kﬁld D bX
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on December
1, 2000, File No. 1-3382).
4.19 Form of 3.47% Series A Senior Notes due July 16, 2027
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on March 29, 2012, File No.
1-06196).X
4.20 Form of 3.57% Series B Senior Notes due July 16, 2027
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on March 29, 2012, File No.
1-06196).X
4.21 Form of 4.65% Senior Notes due 2043 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.2 to registrant's Current Report on
Form 8-K ﬁled on August 1, 2013, File No. 1-06196).X
4.22 Form of 4.10% Senior Notes due 2034 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.2 to registrant's Current Report on
Form 8-K ﬁled on September 18, 2014, File No. 1-06196).X
4.23 Form of 3.60% Senior Notes due 2025 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.2 to registrant's Current Report on
Form 8-K ﬁled on September 14, 2015, File No. 1-06196).X
4.24 Form of 3.64% Senior Notes due 2046 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.2 to registrant's Current Report on
Form 8-K ﬁled on July 28, 2016, File No. 1-06196).X
4.25 Form of 4.24% Series B Senior Notes due June 6, 2021
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on May 12, 2011, File No.
1-06196).X
4.26 Indenture, dated as of April 1, 1993, between Piedmont and
The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A. (as
successor to Citibank, N.A.), Trustee (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Registration
Statement on Form S-3 ﬁled on May 16, 1995, File No. 33-
59369).X
4.26.1 Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 15, 2003,
between Piedmont and Citibank, N.A., Trustee (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to registrant's Registration
Statement on Form S-3 ﬁled on June 19, 2003, File No. 333-
106268).X
4.26.2 Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of May 6, 2011,
between Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc. and The
Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as trustee
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to registrant's
Registration Statement on Form S-3-ASR ﬁled on July 7,
2011, File No. 333-175386).X
4.26.3 Fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated August 1, 2013,
between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon
Trust Company, N.A. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
August 1, 2013, File No. 1-06196).X
4.26.4 Sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated September 18, 2014,
between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon
Trust Company, N.A. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
September 18, 2014, File No. 1-06196).X
4.26.5 Seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated September 14,
2015, between the Company and The Bank of New York
Mellon Trust Company, N.A. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled
on September 14, 2015, File No. 1-06196).X
4.26.6 Eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated July 28, 2016,
between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon
Trust Company, N.A. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on July
28, 2016, File No. 1-06196).X
4.26.7 Ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of May 24, 2019
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to registrant’s
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on May 24, 2019, File No.
1-6196).X
4.26.8 Tenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of May 21, 2020
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on May 21, 2020, File No.
1-6196).X
4.26.9 Eleventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of March 11,
2021 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on March 11,
2021, File No. 1-6196).X
4.26.10Twelfth Supplemental Indenture dated as of May 13, 2022
between Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc. and The
Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as successor
to Citibank, N.A. and form of global notes (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Current Report on
Form 8-K ﬁled on May 13, 2022, File No. 1-6196).X
4.27 Medium-Term Note, Series A, dated as of October 6, 1993
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.8 to registrant's
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended October 31,
1993, File No. 1-06196).X
4.28 Medium-Term Note, Series A, dated as of September 19,
1994 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.9 to
registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
October 31, 1994, File No. 1-06196).X
4.29 Form of 6% Medium-Term Note, Series E, dated as of
December 19, 2003 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
99.2 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
December 23, 2003, File No. 1-06196).X
4.30 Form of Master Global Note (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.4 to registrant's Registration Statement on Form S-
3 ﬁled on April 30, 1997, File No. 333-26161).X
4.31 Pricing Supplement of Medium-Term Notes, Series B, dated
October 3, 1995 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.10
to registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended October 31, 1995, File No. 1-06196).X
4.32 Pricing Supplement of Medium-Term Notes, Series B, dated
October 4, 1996 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.11
to registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended October 31, 1996, File No. 1-06196).X
4.33 Pricing Supplement of Medium-Term Notes, Series C, dated
September 15, 1999 (incorporated by reference to Rule
424(b)(3) Pricing Supplement to Form S-3 Registration
Statement Nos. 33-59369 and 333-26161).X
4.34 Agreement of Resignation, Appointment and Acceptance
dated as of March 29, 2007, by and among Piedmont
Natural Gas Company, Inc., Citibank, N.A., and The Bank of
 k (i db fX
New York Trust Company, N.A. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for
the quarter ended April 30, 2007, ﬁled on June 8, 2007, File
No. 1-06196).
10.1 Agreements with Piedmont Electric Membership
Corporation, Rutherford Electric Membership Corporation
and Blue Ridge Electric Membership Corporation
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.15 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June 30, 2006, ﬁled on August 9, 2006, File No. 1-
32853).X
10.2 Asset Purchase Agreement between Saluda River Electric
Cooperative, Inc., as Seller, and Duke Energy Carolinas,
LLC, as Purchaser, dated as of December 20, 2006
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on December 27, 2006,
File No. 1-4928).X
10.3 Settlement between Duke Energy Corporation, Duke Energy
Carolinas, LLC and the U.S. Department of Justice resolving
Duke Energy's used nuclear fuel litigation against the U.S.
Department of Energy, dated as of March 6, 2007
(incorporated by reference to Item 8.01 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on March 12, 2007, File No.
1-4928).X
10.4 Letter Agreement between Georgia Natural Gas Company
and Piedmont Energy Company dated February 12, 2016
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on February 18, 2016, File
No. 1-06196).X
10.5 Assignment of Membership Interests dated as of October 3,
2016 between Piedmont ACP Company, LLC and Dominion
Atlantic Coast Pipeline, LLC, (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled
on October 7, 2016, File No. 1-06196).X
10.6 Agreements between Piedmont Electric Membership
Corporation, Rutherford Electric Membership Corporation
and Blue Ridge Electric Membership Corporation
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.15 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June 30, 2006, ﬁled on August 9, 2006, File No. 1-
32853).X
10.7 Conveyance and Assignment Agreement, dated as of
October 3, 2016, by and between Piedmont Energy
Company and Georgia Natural Gas Company (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to registrant's Current Report
on Form 8-K ﬁled on October 3, 2016, File No. 1-06196).X
10.8 Engineering, Procurement and Construction Management
Agreement between Duke Energy Indiana, LLC (formerly PSI
Energy, Inc.) and Bechtel Power Corporation, dated as of
December 15, 2008 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.16 to registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the
year ended December 31, 2008, ﬁled on March 13, 2009,
File No. 1-3543). (Portions of the exhibit have been omitted
and ﬁled separately with the Securities and Exchange
Commission pursuant to a request for conﬁdential
treatment pursuant to Rule 24b-2 under the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.)X
10.9 Formation and Sale Agreement between Duke Ventures,
LLC, Crescent Resources, LLC, Morgan Stanley Real Estate
Fund V U.S. L.P., Morgan Stanley Real Estate Fund V Special
U.S., L.P., Morgan Stanley Real Estate Investors V U.S., L.P.,
MSP Real Estate Fund V, L.P., and Morgan Stanley Strategic
Investments, Inc., dated as of September 7, 2006
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended September 30, 2006, ﬁled on November 9, 2006, File
No. 1-32853).X
10.10 Operating Agreement of Pioneer Transmission, LLC
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended September 30, 2008, ﬁled on November 7, 2008, File
No. 1-32853).X
10.11**Amended and Restated Duke Energy Corporation Directors'
Saving Plan, dated as of January 1, 2014 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.32 to Duke Energy Corporation's
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December
31, 2013, ﬁled on February 28, 2014, File No. 1-32853).X
10.12**Amendment to Duke Energy Corporation Directors' Savings
Plan, eﬀective as of December 16, 2021 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.12 to Duke Energy Corporation's
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December
31, 2021, ﬁled on February 24, 2022, File No. 1-32853).X
10.13 Engineering, Procurement and Construction Management
Agreement between Duke Energy Indiana, LLC (formerly PSI
Energy, Inc.) and Bechtel Power Corporation, dated as of
December 15, 2008 (incorporated by reference to Item 1.01
to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
December 19, 2008, File Nos. 1-32853 and 1-3543).
(Portions of the exhibit have been omitted and ﬁled
separately with the Securities and Exchange Commission
pursuant to a request for conﬁdential treatment pursuant to
Rule 24b-2 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as
amended.)X X
10.14**Duke Energy Corporation Executive Severance Plan
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on January 13, 2011, File
No. 1-32853).X
10.15 $6,000,000,000 Five-Year Credit Agreement between Duke
Energy Corporation, Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC, Duke
Energy Ohio, Inc., Duke Energy Indiana, LLC, Duke Energy
Kentucky, Inc., Carolina Power and Light Company d/b/a
Duke Energy Progress, Inc. and Florida Power Corporation,
d/b/a Duke Energy Florida, Inc., as Borrowers, the lenders
listed therein, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as
Administrative Agent, Bank of America, N.A. and The Royal
Bank of Scotland plc, as Co-Syndication Agents and Bank of
China, New York Branch, Barclays Bank PLC, Citibank, N.A.,
Credit Suisse AG, Cayman Islands Branch, Industrial and
Commercial Bank of China Limited, New York Branch,
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. and UBS Securities LLC, as Co-
Documentation Agents, dated as of November 18, 2011
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on November 25, 2011,
File Nos. 1-32853, 1-4928, 1-1232 and 1-3543).X X X X
10151AmendmentNo1andConsentbetweenDukeEnergy X X X X X X
10.15.1Amendment No. 1 and Consent between Duke Energy
Corporation, Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC, Duke Energy Ohio,
Inc., Duke Energy Indiana, LLC, Duke Energy Kentucky, Inc.,
Duke Energy Progress, Inc., Duke Energy Florida, Inc., and
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, dated as of
December 18, 2013 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
December 23, 2013, File Nos. 1-32853, 1-4928, 1-3382, 1-
3274, 1-1232 and 1-3543).X X X X X X
10.15.2Amendment No. 2 and Consent between Duke Energy
Corporation, Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC, Duke Energy Ohio,
Inc., Duke Energy Indiana, LLC, Duke Energy Kentucky, Inc.,
Duke Energy Progress, Inc., and Duke Energy Florida, Inc.,
the Lenders party hereto, the issuing Lenders party hereto,
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative
Agent and Swingline Lender, dated as of January 30, 2015
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on February 5, 2015, File
Nos. 1-32853, 1-4928, 1-1232, 1-3543, 1-3382 and 1-3274).X X X X X X
10.15.3Amendment No. 3 and Consent, dated as of March 16,
2017, among the registrants, the Lenders party thereto, the
issuing Lenders party thereto, and Wells Fargo Bank,
National Association, as Administrative Agent and Swingline
Lender (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
registrants' Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on March 17,
2017, File Nos. 1-32853, 1-04928, 1-03382, 1-03274, 1-
01232, 1-03543, 1-06196).X X X X X X X
10.15.4Amendment No.4 and Consent, dated as of March 18, 2019,
among Duke Energy Corporation, Duke Energy Carolinas,
LLC, Duke Energy Ohio, Inc., Duke Energy Indiana, LLC,
Duke Energy Kentucky, Inc., Duke Energy Progress, LLC,
Duke Energy Florida, LLC, and Piedmont Natural Gas
Company, Inc., the Lenders party thereto, the Issuing
Lenders party thereto, and Wells Fargo Bank, National
Association, as Administrative Agent and Swingline Lender
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to registrants’
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on March 21, 2019, File
Nos. 1-32853. 1-4928, 1-3382, 1-3274, 1-1232, 1-3543, 1-
6196).X X X X X X X
10.15.5Amendment No. 5 and Consent, dated as of March 16,
2020, among registrants', the Lenders party thereto, the
Issuing Lenders party thereto, and Wells Fargo Bank, N.A.,
as Administrative Agent, and Swingline Lender
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to registrants'
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on March 17, 2020, File
Nos. 1-32853, 1-4928, 1-3382, 1-3274, 1-1232, 1-3543, 1-
6196).X X X X X X X
10.16**Duke Energy Corporation 2015 Long-Term Incentive Plan
(incorporated by reference to Appendix C to registrant's
DEF 14A ﬁled on March 26, 2015, File No. 1-32853).X
10.16.1**Amendment to Duke Energy Corporation 2015 Long-Term
Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.16.1
to Duke Energy Corporation's Annual Report on Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2018, ﬁled on February
28, 2019, File No. 1-32853).X
10.17**Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.4 to registrant's Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2017 ﬁled on
May 9, 2017, File No. 1-32853).X
10.18**Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.24 to Duke Energy Corporation's
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December
31, 2017, ﬁled on February 21, 2018, File No. 1-32853).X
10.19**Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.3 to Duke Energy Corporation’s
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March
31, 2019, ﬁled on May 9, 2019, File No. 1-32853).X
10.20**Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.4 to Duke Energy Corporation's
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March
31, 2022, ﬁled on May 9, 2022, File No. 1-32853).X
*10.21**Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement X
10.22**Performance Share Award Agreement (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Duke Energy Corporation’s
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March
31, 2019, ﬁled on May 9, 2019, File No. 1-32853).X
10.23**Performance Share Award Agreement (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.4 to Duke Energy Corporation's
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March
31, 2020, ﬁled on May 12, 2020, File No. 1-32853).X
*10.24**Performance Share Award Agreement X
10.25 Settlement Agreement between Duke Energy Corporation,
the North Carolina Utilities Commission Staﬀ and the North
Carolina Public Staﬀ, dated as of November 28, 2012
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on November 29, 2012,
File No. 1-32853).X
10.26 Settlement Agreement between Duke Energy Corporation
and the North Carolina Attorney General, dated as of
December 3, 2012 (incorporated by reference Item 7.01 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on December
3, 2012, File No. 1-32853).X
10.27 Settlement Agreement between Duke Energy Carolinas,
LLC, Duke Energy Progress, LLC, and The North Carolina
Department of Environmental Quality, dated as of
December 31, 2019 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.1 to registrants' Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
January 2, 2020, File Nos. 1-4928, 1-3382).X X
10.28 Duke Energy Carolinas Summary of Partial Settlement in
North Carolina Rate Case (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 99.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled
on March 26, 2020, File Nos. 1-32853, 1-4928, 1-3382).X X X
10.29 Coal Combustion Residuals Settlement Agreement between
registrants and the Public Staﬀ-North Carolina Utilities
Commission, the North Carolina Attorney General's Oﬃce,
and the Sierra Club, dated as of January 22, 2021
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to registrants'
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March
31, 2021, ﬁled on May 10, 2021, File Nos. 1-32853, 1-4928,
1-3382).X X X
10.30 Investment Agreement by and among Cinergy Corp., Duke
Energy Indiana HoldCo, LLC, Duke Energy Corporation, and
Epson Investment PTE. LTD,. dated as of January 28, 2021
(incorporatedbyreferencetoExhibit10.2toregistrants'X X
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to registrants
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March
31, 2021, ﬁled on May 10, 2021, File Nos. 1-32853, 1-3543).
10.31 Cooperation Agreement, dated as of November 13, 2021,
by and among Duke Energy Corporation, Elliott Investment
Management L.P., and Elliott International, L.P.(incorporated
by reference to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled
on November 15, 2021, File No. 1-32853).X
10.32**Form of Change-in-Control Agreement (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.58 to Duke Energy Corporation's
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December
31, 2012, ﬁled on March 1, 2013, File No. 1-32853).X
10.33**Amended and Restated Duke Energy Corporation Executive
Cash Balance Plan, dated as of January 1, 2014
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.52 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2013, ﬁled on February 28, 2014, File
No. 1-32852).X
10.33.1**Amended and Restated Duke Energy Corporation Executive
Cash Balance Plan, dated as of September 30, 2020
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on September 25, 2020,
File No. 1-32853).X
10.34 Purchase, Construction and Ownership Agreement, dated as
of July 30, 1981, between Duke Energy Progress, Inc.
(formerly Carolina Power & Light Company) and North
Carolina Municipal Power Agency Number 3 and Exhibits,
together with resolution, dated as of December 16, 1981,
changing name to North Carolina Eastern Municipal Power
Agency, amending letter, dated as of February 18, 1982,
and amendment, dated as of February 24, 1982
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10(a) to registrant's
File No. 33-25560).X
10.35 Operating and Fuel Agreement, dated as of July 30, 1981,
between Duke Energy Progress, Inc. (formerly Carolina
Power & Light Company) and North Carolina Municipal
Power Agency Number 3 and Exhibits, together with
resolution, dated as of December 16, 1981, changing name
to North Carolina Eastern Municipal Power Agency,
amending letters, dated as of August 21, 1981, and
December 15, 1981, and amendment, dated as of February
24, 1982 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10(b) to
registrant's File No. 33-25560).X
10.36 Power Coordination Agreement, dated as of July 30, 1981,
between Duke Energy Progress, Inc. (formerly Carolina
Power & Light Company) and North Carolina Municipal
Power Agency Number 3 and Exhibits, together with
resolution, dated as of December 16, 1981, changing name
to North Carolina Eastern Municipal Power Agency and
amending letter, dated as of January 29, 1982 (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10(c) to registrant's File No. 33-
25560).X
10.37 Amendment, dated as of December 16, 1982, to Purchase,
Construction and Ownership Agreement, dated as of July
30, 1981, between Duke Energy Progress, Inc. (formerly
Carolina Power & Light Company) and North Carolina
Eastern Municipal Power Agency (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10(d) to registrant's File No. 33-25560).X
10.38 Precedent and Related Agreements between Duke Energy
Florida, Inc. (formerly Florida Power Corporation d/b/a
Progress Energy Florida, Inc. (“PEF”)), Southern Natural Gas
Company, Florida Gas Transmission Company (“FGT”), and
BG LNG Services, LLC (“BG”), including: a) Precedent
Agreement between Southern Natural Gas Company and
PEF, dated as of December 2, 2004; b) Gas Sale and
Purchase Contract between BG and PEF, dated as of
December 1, 2004; c) Interim Firm Transportation Service
Agreement by and between FGT and PEF, dated as of
December 2, 2004; d) Letter Agreement between FGT and
PEF, dated as of December 2, 2004, and Firm Transportation
Service Agreement between FGT and PEF to be entered into
upon satisfaction of certain conditions precedent; e)
Discount Agreement between FGT and PEF, dated as of
December 2, 2004; f) Amendment to Gas Sale and Purchase
Contract between BG and PEF, dated as of January 28,
2005; and g) Letter Agreement between FGT and PEF,
dated as of January 31, 2005 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K/A
ﬁled on March 15, 2005, File Nos. 1-15929 and 1-3274).
(Portions of the exhibit have been omitted and ﬁled
separately with the Securities and Exchange Commission
pursuant to a request for conﬁdential treatment pursuant to
Rule 24b-2 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as
amended.)X X
10.39 Engineering, Procurement and Construction Agreement
between Duke Energy Florida, Inc. (formerly Florida Power
Corporation d/b/a/ Progress Energy Florida, Inc.), as owner,
and a consortium consisting of Westinghouse Electric
Company LLC and Stone & Webster, Inc., as contractor, for
a two-unit AP1000 Nuclear Power Plant, dated as of
December 31, 2008 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
March 2, 2009, File Nos. 1-15929 and 1-3274). (Portions of
the exhibit have been omitted and ﬁled separately with the
Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to a request
for conﬁdential treatment pursuant to Rule 24b-2 under the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.)X X
10.40**Employment Agreement between Duke Energy Corporation
and Lynn J. Good, dated as of June 17, 2013 (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Duke Energy Corporation's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on June 18, 2013, File No.
1-32853).X
10.40.1**Amendment to Employment Agreement between Duke
Energy Corporation and Lynn J. Good, dated as of June 25,
2015 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Duke
Energy Corporation's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
June 29, 2015, File No. 1-32853).X
10.41**Amended and Restated Duke Energy Corporation Executive
Short-Term Incentive Plan, eﬀective February 23, 2022
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on February 24, 2022, File
No. 1-32853).X
10.42**Duke Energy Corporation 2017 Director Compensation
Program Summary (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.3 to Duke Energy Corporation's Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2017, ﬁled on
 il )X
August 3, 2017, File No. 1-32853).
10.43**Duke Energy Corporation 2022 Director Compensation
Program Summary (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.5 to Duke Energy Corporation's Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2022, ﬁled on
May 9, 2022, File No. 1-32853).X
10.44**Amended and Restated Duke Energy Corporation Executive
Savings Plan, dated as of January 1, 2014 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.82 to Duke Energy Corporation's
Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December
31, 2013, ﬁled on February 28, 2014, File No. 1-32853).X
10.44.1**Amendment to Duke Energy Corporation Executive Savings
Plan, dated as of January 1, 2014 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Duke Energy Corporation's
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
September 30, 2017, ﬁled on November 3, 2017, File No. 1-
32853).X
10.44.2**Amendment to Duke Energy Corporation Executive Savings
Plan, dated as of October 1, 2020 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Duke Energy Corporation's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on September 25, 2020,
File No. 1-32853).X
10.45**Consulting Agreement, dated as of September 22, 2021,
between Duke Energy Business Services, LLC and Douglas F
Esamann (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on September
27, 2021, File No. 1-32853).X
10.46**Retention Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.42 to Duke Energy Corporation's Annual Report
on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2021, ﬁled
on February 24, 2022, File No. 1-32853).X
10.47 Agreement between Duke Energy SAM, LLC, Duke Energy
Ohio, Inc., Duke Energy Commercial Enterprise, Inc. and
Dynegy Resource I, LLC, dated as of August 21, 2014
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.61 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2014, ﬁled on March 2, 2015, File No.
1-32853).X X
10.48 Asset Purchase Agreement between Duke Energy Progress,
Inc. and North Carolina Eastern Municipal Power Agency,
dated as of September 5, 2014 (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.62 to Duke Energy Corporation's Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
2014, ﬁled on March 2, 2015, File No. 1-32853).X X
10.49 Accelerated Stock Repurchase Program executed by
Goldman, Sachs & Co., and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. on
April 6, 2015, under an agreement with Duke Energy
Corporation (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
Duke Energy Corporation's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled
on April 6, 2015, File No. 1-32853).X
10.50 Plea Agreement between Duke Energy Corporation and the
Court of the Eastern District of North Carolina in connection
with the May 14, 2015, Dan River Grand Jury Settlement
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June 30, 2015, ﬁled on August 7, 2015, File No. 1-
32853).X
10.51 Plea Agreement between Duke Energy Corporation and the
Court of the Eastern District of North Carolina in connection
with the May 14, 2015, Dan River Grand Jury Settlement
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 to Duke Energy
Corporation's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June 30, 2015, ﬁled on August 7, 2015, File No. 1-
32853).X
10.52 Purchase and Sale Agreement by and among Duke Energy
International Group S.à.r.l., Duke Energy International Brazil
Holdings S.à.r.l. and China Three Gorges (Luxembourg)
Energy S.à.r.l., dated as of October 10, 2016 (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 2.1 to registrant's Current Report on
Form 8-K ﬁled on October 13, 2016, File No. 1-32853).X
10.53Purchase and Sale Agreement by and among Duke Energy
Brazil Holdings II, C.V., Duke Energy International Uruguay
Investments SRL, Duke Energy International Group S.à.r.l.,
Duke Energy International España Holdings SL, Duke Energy
International Investments No. 2 Ltd., ISQ Enerlam
Aggregator, L.P., and Enerlam (UK) Holdings Ltd., dated as
of October 10, 2016 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
2.2. to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on
October 13, 2016, File No. 1-32853).X
10.54 $1,000,000,000 Credit Agreement, dated as of June 14,
2017, among Duke Energy Corporation, the Lenders listed
therein, The Bank of Nova Scotia, as Administrative Agent,
PNC Bank, N.A., Sumitomo Mitsui Banking Corporation, and
TD Bank, N.A., as C0-Syndication Agents, and Bank of
China, New York Branch, BNP Paribas, Santander Bank, N.A.
and U.S. Bank N.A., as Co-Documentation Agents
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on June 14, 2017, File No.
1-32853).X
10.55 $1,000,000,000 Credit Agreement, dated as of May 15,
2019, among Duke Energy Corporation, the Lenders party
thereto, The Bank of Nova Scotia, as Administrative Agent,
PNC Bank, N.A., Sumitomo Mitsui Banking Corporation, and
TD Bank, N.A., as Co-Syndication Agents, and Bank of
China, New York Branch, BNP Paribas, Santander Bank, N.A.,
and U.S. Bank, N.A., as Co-Documentation Agents
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to registrant’s
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on May 16, 2019, File No.
1-32853).X
10.55.1First Amendment to $1,000,000,000 Credit Agreement,
dated as of May 15, 2019, among Duke Energy Corporation,
the Lenders party therein, The Bank of Nova Scotia, as
Administrative Agent, PNC Bank, N.A., Sumitomo Mitsui
Banking Corporation, and TD Bank, N.A., as Co-Syndication
Agents, and Bank of China, New York Branch, BNP Paribas,
Santander Bank, N.A., and U.S> Bank, N.A., as Co-
Documentation Agents (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.3 to registrant's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q
for the quarter ended March 31, 2021, ﬁled on May 10,
2021, File No. 1-32853).X
10.56 Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of
March 18, 2022, among Duke Energy Corporation, Duke
Energy Carolinas, LLC, Duke Energy Ohio, Inc., Duke EnergyX X X X X X X
gy gy gy
Indiana, LLC, Duke Energy Kentucky, Inc., Duke Energy
Progress, LLC, Duke Energy Florida, LLC, and Piedmont
Natural Gas Company, Inc., the Lenders party thereto, Wells
Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent
and Swingline Lender and Wells Fargo Securities, LLC, as
Joint Lead Arranger, Joint Bookrunner and Sustainability
Structuring Agent. that increases the amount of the credit
facility from $8B to $9B (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 to registrants' Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled
on March 21, 2022, File Nos. 1-32853, 1-4928, 1-3382, 1-
3274, 1-1232, 1-3543, 1-6196).
10.57 $800 million Credit Agreement, dated as of October 21,
2022, among Duke Energy Florida, LLC, as Borrower, the
lenders listed therein, Truist Bank, as Administrative Agent,
Truist Securities, Inc., Mizuho Bank Ltd., and TD Bank, N.A.,
as Joint Lead Arrangers, and Truist Securities, Inc., as Sole
Bookrunner (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on October 21,
2022, File No. 1-3274X
10.58 $1.5 billion 364-Day Term Loan Credit Agreement, dated as
of March 19, 2020, among the registrant, as Borrower,
certain Lenders from time to time parties thereto, and PNC
Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent, and registrant's
borrowing of the remaining $500 million under registrant's
existing $1 billion revolving credit facility on March 17, 2020
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to registrant's
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on March 19, 2020, File No.
1-32853).X
10.59 Joinder Agreement, dated as of March 27, 2020, by and
among, the registrant, each of the Incremental Lenders
listed therein, and PNC Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2.1 to registrant's
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March
31, 2020, ﬁled on May 12, 2020, File No. 1-32853).X
10.60 $1,400,000,000 Term Loan Credit Facility, dated as of March
9, 2022, among the registrant, as Borrower, certain Lenders
from time to time parties thereto, and The Bank of Nova
Scotia as Administrative Agent and Coordinating Lead
Arranger (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on March 22,
2022, File No. 1-32853).X
10.61 Note Purchase Agreement, dated as of May 6, 2011, among
Piedmont Natural Gas Company, Inc. and the Purchasers
party thereto (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on May 12,
2011, File No. 1-06196).X
10.62 Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company
Agreement of Constitution Pipeline Company, LLC dated
April 9, 2012, by and among Williams Partners Operating
LLC and Cabot Pipeline Holdings LLC (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to registrant's Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended January 31, 2013, ﬁled on
March 6, 2013, File No. 1-06196).X
10.62.1First Amendment to Amended and Restated Limited Liability
Company Agreement of Constitution Pipeline Company,
LLC, dated as of November 9, 2012, by and among
Constitution Pipeline Company, LLC, Williams Partners
Operating LLC, Cabot Pipeline Holdings LLC, and Piedmont
Constitution Pipeline Company, LLC (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 to registrant's Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q for the quarter ended January 31, 2013, ﬁled on
March 6, 2013, File No. 1-06196).X
10.62.2Second Amendment to Amended and Restated Limited
Liability Company Agreement of Constitution Pipeline
Company, LLC, dated as of May 29, 2013, by and among
Constitution Pipeline Company, LLC, Williams Partners
Operating LLC, Cabot Pipeline Holdings LLC, Piedmont
Constitution Pipeline Company, LLC, and Capitol Energy
Ventures Corp. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 99.1 to
registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on September
4, 2013, File No. 1-06196).X
10.63 Second Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company
Agreement of SouthStar Energy Services LLC, dated as of
September 1, 2013, by and between Georgia Natural Gas
Company and Piedmont Energy Company (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.39 to registrant's Annual Report on
Form 10-K for the year ended October 31, 2013, ﬁled on
December 23, 2013, File No. 1-06196).X
10.64 Limited Liability Company Agreement of Atlantic Coast
Pipeline, LLC, dated as of September 2, 2014, by and
between Dominion Atlantic Coast Pipeline, LLC, Duke
Energy ACP, LLC, Piedmont ACP Company, LLC, and Maple
Enterprise Holdings, Inc. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.35 to registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-K for
the year ended October 31, 2014, ﬁled on December 23,
2014, File No. 1-06196).X
10.65 Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company
Operating Agreement of Duke Energy Indiana Holdco, LLC
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to registrants'
Current Report on Form 8-K ﬁled on September 8, 2021, File
Nos. 1-32853, 1-03543).X X
10.66 Engineering, Procurement and Construction Agreement
between Duke Energy Business Services, LLC, as agent for
and on behalf of Piedmont Natural Gas Company Inc. and
Matrix Service, Inc., dated as of April 30, 2019
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to registrant’s
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June
30, 2019, ﬁled on August 6, 2019, File No. 1-06196).
(Portions of the exhibit have been omitted for
conﬁdentiality.)X
10.67 Decommissioning Services Agreement between Duke
Energy Florida, LLC, and ADP CR3, LLC, and ADP SF1, LLC
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to registrant's
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June
30, 2019, ﬁled on August 6, 2019, File No. 2-5293).
(Portions of the exhibit have been omitted for
conﬁdentiality.)X
10.68 Form of Forward Sale Agreement (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K
ﬁled on November 8, 2019, File No. 1-32853).X
10.69 Lease Agreement dated as of December 23, 2019, between
the registrant and CGA 525 South Tryon TIC 1, LLC, a
Delaware limited liability company, CGA 525 South Tryon
TIC 2, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, and CK
525 South Tryon TIC, LLC, a Delaware limited liabilityX
y y
company (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.64 to
registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2019, ﬁled on February 20, 2020, File No. 1-
4928).
10.70 Construction Agency Agreement dated as of December 23,
2019, between the registrant and CGA 525 South Tryon TIC
1, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, CGA 525 South
Tryon TIC 2, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, and
CK 525 South Tryon TIC, LLC, a Delaware limited liability
company (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.65 to
registrant's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2019, ﬁled on February 20, 2020, File No. 1-
4928).X
10.71 Equity Distribution Agreement, dated November 10, 2022,
among Duke Energy Corporation and Barclays Capital, Inc.,
BofA Securities, Inc., Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC,
Mizuho Securities USA LLC, Scotia Capital (USA) Inc. and
SMBC Nikko Securities America, Inc., acting as sales agents,
and Barclays Capital Inc., BofA Securities Inc., Credit Suisse
Securities (USA) LLC, Mizuho Markets Americas LLC and
Scotia Capital (USA) Inc. or their respective aﬃliates, acting
as forward purchasers (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.1 to registrant's Current Report on Form 8-K, ﬁled on
November 10, 2022, File No. 1-32853X
*21 List of Subsidiaries X  
*23.1.1Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm. X  
*23.1.2Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm.   X  
*23.1.3Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm.     X  
*23.1.4Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm.      X  
*23.1.5Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm.      X  
*23.1.6Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm.      X
*23.1.7Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm. X
*24.1 Power of attorney authorizing Lynn J. Good and others to
sign the Annual Report on behalf of the registrant and
certain of its directors and oﬃcers.X
*24.2 Certiﬁed copy of resolution of the Board of Directors of the
registrant authorizing power of attorney.X
*31.1.1Certiﬁcation of the Chief Executive Oﬃcer Pursuant to
Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.1.2Certiﬁcation of the Chief Executive Oﬃcer Pursuant to
Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.1.3Certiﬁcation of the Chief Executive Oﬃcer Pursuant to
Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.1.4Certiﬁcation of the Chief Executive Oﬃcer Pursuant to
Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.1.5Certiﬁcation of the Chief Executive Oﬃcer Pursuant to
Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.1.6Certiﬁcation of the Chief Executive Oﬃcer Pursuant to
Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.1.7Certiﬁcation of the Chief Executive Oﬃcer Pursuant to
Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.1.8Certiﬁcation of the Chief Executive Oﬃcer Pursuant to
Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.2.1Certiﬁcation of the Chief Financial Oﬃcer Pursuant to
Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.2.2Certiﬁcation of the Chief Financial Oﬃcer Pursuant to
Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.2.3Certiﬁcation of the Chief Financial Oﬃcer Pursuant to
Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.2.4Certiﬁcation of the Chief Financial Oﬃcer Pursuant to
Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.2.5Certiﬁcation of the Chief Financial Oﬃcer Pursuant to
Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.2.6Certiﬁcation of the Chief Financial Oﬃcer Pursuant to
Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.2.7Certiﬁcation of the Chief Financial Oﬃcer Pursuant to
Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*31.2.8Certiﬁcation of the Chief Financial Oﬃcer Pursuant to
Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.1.1Certiﬁcation Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as Adopted
Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.1.2Certiﬁcation Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as Adopted
Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.1.3Certiﬁcation Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as Adopted
Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.1.4Certiﬁcation Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as Adopted
Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.1.5Certiﬁcation Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as Adopted
Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.1.6Certiﬁcation Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as Adopted
Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.1.7Certiﬁcation Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as Adopted
Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.1.8Certiﬁcation Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as Adopted
Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.2.1Certiﬁcation Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as Adopted
Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.2.2Certiﬁcation Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as Adopted
Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.2.3Certiﬁcation Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as Adopted
Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.2.4Certiﬁcation Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as Adopted
Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.2.5Certiﬁcation Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as Adopted
Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.2.6Certiﬁcation Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as Adopted
Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.2.7Certiﬁcation Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as Adopted
Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*32.2.8Certiﬁcation Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as Adopted
Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.X
*101.INSXBRL Instance Document (this does not appear in the
Interactive Data File because it's XBRL tags are embedded
withintheInlineXBRLdocument)X X X X X X X X
within the Inline XBRL document).
*101.SCHXBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document X X X X X X X X
*101.CALXBRL Taxonomy Calculation Linkbase Document X X X X X X X X
*101.LABXBRL Taxonomy Label Linkbase Document X X X X X X X X
*101.PREXBRL Taxonomy Presentation Linkbase Document X X X X X X X X
*101.DEFXBRL Taxonomy Deﬁnition Linkbase Document X X X X X X X X
*104 Cover Page Interactive Data File (formatted in Inline XBRL
and contained in Exhibit 101).X X X X X X X X
The total amount of securities of each respective registrant or its subsidiaries authorized under any instrument with respect to long-term debt not ﬁled as an
exhibit does not exceed 10% of the total assets of such registrant and its subsidiaries on a consolidated basis. Each registrant agrees, upon request of the
SEC, to furnish copies of any or all of such instruments to it.
E-1
SIGNATURES
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrants have duly caused this report to
be signed on their behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Date: February 27, 2023
DUKE ENERGY CORPORATION
(Registrant)
By: /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
Lynn J. Good
Chair, President and Chief Executive Oﬃcer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on behalf
of the registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
(i) /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
  Lynn J. Good
  Chair, President and Chief Executive Oﬃcer (Principal Executive Oﬃcer and Director)
   
(ii) /s/ BRIAN D. SAVOY
  Brian D. Savoy
  Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Oﬃcer (Principal Financial Oﬃcer)
   
(iii) /s/ CYNTHIA S. LEE
  Cynthia S. Lee
  Vice President, Chief Accounting Oﬃcer and Controller (Principal Accounting Oﬃcer)
     
(iv) Directors:  
  Derrick Burks* Lynn J. Good*
Annette K. Clayton* John T. Herron*
  Theodore F. Craver, Jr.* Idalene F. Kesner*
  Robert M. Davis* E. Marie McKee*
  Caroline D. Dorsa* Michael J. Pacilio*
W. Roy Dunbar* Thomas E. Skains*
  Nicholas C. Fanandakis* William E. Webster, Jr.*
 
Brian D. Savoy, by signing his name hereto, does hereby sign this document on behalf of the registrant and on behalf of each of the above-named persons
previously indicated by asterisk (*) pursuant to a power of attorney duly executed by the registrant and such persons, ﬁled with the Securities and Exchange
Commission as an exhibit hereto.
     
 By: /s/ BRIAN D. SAVOY
  Attorney-In-Fact
       
 Date: February 27, 2023
E-2
SIGNATURES
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to
be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Date: February 27, 2023
DUKE ENERGY CAROLINAS, LLC
(Registrant)
By: /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
Lynn J. Good
Chief Executive Oﬃcer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on behalf
of the registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
     
(i) /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
  Lynn J. Good
  Chief Executive Oﬃcer (Principal Executive Oﬃcer)
     
(ii) /s/ BRIAN D. SAVOY
  Brian D. Savoy
  Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Oﬃcer (Principal Financial Oﬃcer)
     
(iii) /s/ CYNTHIA S. LEE
  Cynthia S. Lee
  Vice President, Chief Accounting Oﬃcer and Controller (Principal Accounting Oﬃcer)
     
(iv) Directors:  
     
  /s/ LYNN J. GOOD  
  Lynn J. Good  
     
  /s/ DHIAA M. JAMIL  
  Dhiaa M. Jamil  
     
  /s/ JULIA S. JANSON  
  Julia S. Janson  
Date: February 27, 2023
E-3
SIGNATURES
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to
be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Date: February 27, 2023
PROGRESS ENERGY, INC.
(Registrant)
By: /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
Lynn J. Good
Chief Executive Oﬃcer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on behalf
of the registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
     
(i) /s/ LYNN J. GOOD  
  Lynn J. Good  
  Chief Executive Oﬃcer (Principal Executive Oﬃcer)
     
(ii) /s/ BRIAN D. SAVOY
  Brian D. Savoy
  Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Oﬃcer (Principal Financial Oﬃcer)
 
(iii)/s/ CYNTHIA S. LEE
  Cynthia S. Lee
  Vice President, Chief Accounting Oﬃcer and Controller (Principal Accounting Oﬃcer)
     
(iv)Directors:  
     
  /s/ KODWO GHARTEY-TAGOE  
  Kodwo Ghartey-Tagoe  
     
  /s/ LYNN J. GOOD  
  Lynn J. Good  
Date: February 27, 2023
E-4
SIGNATURES
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to
be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Date: February 27, 2023
DUKE ENERGY PROGRESS, LLC
(Registrant)
By: /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
Lynn J. Good
Chief Executive Oﬃcer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on behalf
of the registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
(i) /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
  Lynn J. Good
  Chief Executive Oﬃcer (Principal Executive Oﬃcer)
   
(ii) /s/ BRIAN D. SAVOY
  Brian D. Savoy
  Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Oﬃcer (Principal Financial Oﬃcer)
 
(iii)/s/ CYNTHIA S. LEE
  Cynthia S. Lee
  Vice President, Chief Accounting Oﬃcer and Controller (Principal Accounting Oﬃcer)
   
(iv)Directors:
   
  /s/ KODWO GHARTEY-TAGOE
  Kodwo Ghartey-Tagoe
   
/s/ R. ALEXANDER GLENN
R. Alexander Glenn
  /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
  Lynn J. Good
   
  /s/ DHIAA M. JAMIL
  Dhiaa M. Jamil
   
  /s/ JULIA S. JANSON
  Julia S. Janson
Date: February 27, 2023
E-5
SIGNATURES
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to
be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Date: February 27, 2023
DUKE ENERGY FLORIDA, LLC
(Registrant)
By: /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
Lynn J. Good
Chief Executive Oﬃcer
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on behalf
of the registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
     
(i) /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
  Lynn J. Good
  Chief Executive Oﬃcer (Principal Executive Oﬃcer)
     
(ii) /s/ BRIAN D. SAVOY
  Brian D. Savoy
  Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Oﬃcer (Principal Financial Oﬃcer)
     
(iii)/s/ CYNTHIA S. LEE
  Cynthia S. Lee
  Vice President, Chief Accounting Oﬃcer and Controller (Principal Accounting Oﬃcer)
     
(iv)Directors:  
  /s/ KODWO GHARTEY-TAGOE  
  Kodwo Ghartey-Tagoe  
     
/s/ R. ALEXANDER GLENN
R. Alexander Glenn
  /s/ LYNN J. GOOD  
Lynn J. Good
     
  /s/ DHIAA M. JAMIL  
Dhiaa M. Jamil
     
  /s/ JULIA S. JANSON  
  Julia S. Janson  
Date: February 27, 2023
E-6
SIGNATURES
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to
be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Date: February 27, 2023
DUKE ENERGY OHIO, INC.
(Registrant)
By: /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
Lynn J. Good
Chief Executive Oﬃcer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on behalf
of the registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
     
(i) /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
  Lynn J. Good
  Chief Executive Oﬃcer (Principal Executive Oﬃcer)
 
(ii) /s/ BRIAN D. SAVOY
  Brian D. Savoy
  Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Oﬃcer (Principal Financial Oﬃcer)
 
(iii)/s/ CYNTHIA S. LEE
  Cynthia S. Lee
  Vice President, Chief Accounting Oﬃcer and Controller (Principal Accounting Oﬃcer)
     
(iv)Directors:  
/s/ R. ALEXANDER GLENN
R. Alexander Glenn
     
  /s/ LYNN J. GOOD  
  Lynn J. Good  
     
  /s/ DHIAA M. JAMIL  
  Dhiaa M. Jamil  
Date: February 27, 2023
E-7
SIGNATURES
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to
be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Date: February 27, 2023
DUKE ENERGY INDIANA, LLC
(Registrant)
By: /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
Lynn J. Good
Chief Executive Oﬃcer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on behalf
of the registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
     
(i) /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
  Lynn J. Good
  Chief Executive Oﬃcer (Principal Executive Oﬃcer)
 
(ii) /s/ BRIAN D. SAVOY
  Brian D. Savoy
  Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Oﬃcer (Principal Financial Oﬃcer)
 
(iii) /s/ CYNTHIA S. LEE
  Cynthia S. Lee
  Vice President, Chief Accounting Oﬃcer and Controller (Principal Accounting Oﬃcer)
     
(iv) Directors:  
     
  /s/ R. ALEXANDER GLENN
R. Alexander Glenn
     
  /s/ KELLEY A. KARN
Kelley A. Karn
/s/ STAN PINEGAR
Stan Pinegar
Date: February 27, 2023
E-8
SIGNATURES
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to
be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Date: February 27, 2023
PIEDMONT NATURAL GAS
COMPANY, INC.
(Registrant)
By: /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
Lynn J. Good
Chief Executive Oﬃcer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on behalf
of the registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
     
(i) /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
  Lynn J. Good
  Chief Executive Oﬃcer (Principal Executive Oﬃcer)
 
(ii) /s/ BRIAN D. SAVOY
  Brian D. Savoy
  Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Oﬃcer (Principal Financial Oﬃcer)
 
(iii) /s/ CYNTHIA S. LEE
  Cynthia S. Lee
  Vice President, Chief Accounting Oﬃcer and Controller (Principal Accounting Oﬃcer)
     
(iv) Directors:  
  /s/ LYNN J. GOOD
Lynn J. Good
/s/ DHIAA M. JAMIL
Dhiaa M. Jamil
/s/ BRIAN D. SAVOY
Brian D. Savoy
Date: February 27, 2023
E-9
